Ill-fated and mysterious man!--bewildered in the brilliancy
of thine own imagination, and fallen in the flames of thine own
youth!  Again in fancy I behold thee!  Once more thy form hath
risen before me!--not--oh not as thou art--in the cold valley and
shadow--but as thou shouldst be--squandering away a life of
magnificent meditation in that city of dim visions, thine own
Venice--which is a star-beloved Elysium of the sea, and the wide
windows of whose Palladian palaces look down with a deep and
bitter meaning upon the secrets of her silent waters.  Yes!  I
repeat it--as thou shouldst be.  There are surely other worlds
than this--other thoughts than the thoughts of the multitude--
other speculations than the speculations of the sophist.  Who
then shall call thy conduct into question? who blame thee for thy
visionary hours, or denounce those occupations as a wasting away
of life, which were but the overflowing of thine everlasting
energies?It was at Venice, beneath the covered archway there called
the Ponte di Sospiri, that I met for the third or fourth time the
person of whom I speak.  It is with a confused recollection that
I bring to mind the circumstances of that meeting.  Yet I
remember--ah! how should I forget?--the deep midnight, the Bridge
of Sighs, the beauty of woman, and the Genius of Romance that
stalked up and down the narrow canal.It was a night of unusual gloom.  The great clock of the
Piazza had sounded the fifth hour of the Italian evening.  The
square of the Campanile lay silent and deserted, and the lights
in the old Ducal Palace were dying fast away.  I was returning
home from the Piazetta, by way of the Grand Canal.  But as my
gondola arrived opposite the mouth of the canal San Marco, a
female voice from its recesses broke suddenly upon the night, in
one wild, hysterical, and long-continued shriek.  Startled at the
sound, I sprang upon my feet: while the gondolier, letting slip
his single oar, lost it in the pitchy darkness beyond a chance of
recovery, and we were consequently left to the guidance of the
current which here sets from the greater into the smaller
channel.  Like some huge and sable-feathered condor, we were
slowly drifting down towards the Bridge of Sighs, when a thousand
flambeaux flashing from the windows, and down the staircases of
the Ducal Palace, turned all at once that deep gloom into a livid
and preternatural day.A child, slipping from the arms of its own mother, had
fallen from an upper window of the lofty structure into the deep
and dim canal.  The quiet waters had closed placidly over their
victim; and, although my own gondola was the only one in sight,
many a stout swimmer, already in the stream, was seeking in vain
upon the surface, the treasure which was to be found, alas! only
within the abyss.  Upon the broad black marble flagstones at the
entrance of the palace, and a few steps above the water, stood a
figure which none who then saw can have ever since forgotten.  It
was the Marchesa Aphrodite--the adoration of all Venice--the
gayest of the gay--the most lovely where all were beautiful--but
still the young wife of the old and intriguing Mentoni, and the
mother of that fair child, her first and only one, who now deep
beneath the murky water, was thinking in bitterness of heart upon
her sweet caresses, and exhausting its little life in struggles
to call upon her name.She stood alone.  Her small, bare, and silvery feet gleamed
in the black mirror of marble beneath her.  Her hair, not as yet
more than half loosened for the night from its ball-room array,
clustered, amid a shower of diamonds, round and round her
classical head, in curls like those of the young hyacinth.  A
snowy-white and gauze-like drapery seemed to be nearly the sole
covering to her delicate form; but the midsummer and midnight air
was hot, sullen, and still, and no motion in the statue-like form
itself, stirred even the folds of that raiment of very vapour
which hung around it as the heavy marble hangs around the Niobe. 
Yet--strange to say!--her large lustrous eyes were not turned
downwards upon that grave wherein her brightest hope lay buried--
but riveted in a widely different direction!  The prison of the
Old Republic is, I think, the stateliest building in all Venice--
but how could that lady gaze so fixedly upon it, when beneath her
lay stifling her only child?  Yon dark, gloomy niche, too, yawns
right opposite her chamber window--what, then, could there be in
its shadows--in its architecture--in its ivy-wreathed and solemn
cornices--that the Marchesa di Mentoni had not wondered at a
thousand times before?  Nonsense!--  Who does not remember that,
at such a time as this, the eye, like a shattered mirror,
multiplies the images of its sorrow, and sees in innumerable far-
off places the woe which is close at hand?Many steps above the Marchesa, and within the arch of the
water-gate, stood, in full dress, the Satyr-like figure of
Mentoni himself.  He was occasionally occupied in thrumming a
guitar, and seemed ennuye to the very death, as at intervals he
gave directions for the recovery of his child.  Stupefied and
aghast, I had myself no power to move from the upright position I
had assumed upon first hearing the shriek, and must have
presented to the eyes of the agitated group a spectral and
ominous appearance, as with pale countenance and rigid limbs, I
floated down among them in that funereal gondola.All efforts proved in vain.  Many of the most energetic in
the search were relaxing their exertions, and yielding to a
gloomy sorrow.  There seemed but little hope for the child (how
much less than for the mother!); but now, from the interior of
that dark niche which has been already mentioned as forming a
part of the Old Republican prison, and as fronting the lattice of
the Marchesa, a figure muffled in a cloak stepped out within
reach of the light, and, pausing a moment upon the verge of the
giddy descent, plunged headlong into the canal.  As, in an
instant afterwards, he stood with the still living and breathing
child within his grasp, upon the marble flagstones by the side of
the Marchesa, his cloak, heavy with the drenching water, became
unfastened, and, falling in folds about his feet, discovered to
the wonder-stricken spectators the graceful person of a very
young man, with the sound of whose name the greater part of
Europe was then ringing.No word spoke the deliverer.  But the Marchesa!  She will
now receive her child--she will press it to her heart--she will
cling to its little form, and smother it with her caresses. 
Alas! another's arms have taken it from the stranger--another's
arms have taken it away, and borne it afar off, unnoticed, into
the palace!  And the Marchesa!  Her lip--her beautiful lip
trembles: tears are gathering in her eyes--those eyes which, like
Pliny's acanthus, are 'soft and almost liquid'.  Yes! tears are
gathering in those eyes--and see! the entire woman thrills
throughout the soul, and the statue has started into life!  The
pallor of the marble countenance, the swelling of the marble
bosom, the very purity of the marble feet, we behold suddenly
flushed over with a tide of ungovernable crimson; and a slight
shudder quivers about her delicate frame, as a gentle air at
Napoli about the rich silver lilies in the grass.Why should that lady blush!  To this demand there is no
answer--except that, having left, in the eager haste and terror
of a mother's heart, the privacy of her own boudoir, she has
neglected to enthrall her tiny feet in their slippers, and
utterly forgotten to throw over her Venetian shoulders that
drapery which is their due.  What other possible reason could
there have been for her so blushing?--for the glance of those
wild appealing eyes? for the unusual tumult of that throbbing
bosom?--for the convulsive pressure of that trembling hand?--that
hand which fell, as Mentoni turned into the palace, accidentally,
upon the hand of the stranger.  What reason could there have been
for the low--the singularly low tone of those unmeaning words
which the lady uttered hurriedly in bidding him adieu?  'Thou
hast conquered--' she said, or the murmurs of the water deceived
me--'thou hast conquered--one hour after sunrise--we shall meet--
so let it be!'The tumult had subsided, the lights had died away within the
palace, and the stranger, whom I now recognized, stood alone upon
the flags.  He shook with inconceivable agitation, and his eye
glanced around in search of a gondola.  I could not do less than
offer him the service of my own; and he accepted the civility. 
Having obtained an oar at the water-gate, we proceeded together
to his residence, while he rapidly recovered his self-possession,
and spoke of our former slight acquaintance in terms of great
apparent cordiality.There are some subjects upon which I take pleasure in being
minute.  The person of the stranger--let me call him by this
title, who to all the world was still a stranger--the person of
the stranger is one of these subjects.  In height he might have
been below rather than above the medium size: although there were
moments of intense passion when his frame actually expanded and
belied the assertion.  The light, almost slender symmetry of his
figure, promised more of that ready activity which he evinced at
the Bridge of Sighs, than of that Herculean strength which he has
been known to wield without an effort, upon occasions of more
dangerous emergency.  With the mouth and chin of a deity--
singular, wild, full, liquid eyes, whose shadows varied from pure
hazel to intense and brilliant jet--and a profusion of curling,
black hair, from which a forehead of unusual breadth gleamed
forth at intervals all light and ivory--his were features than
which I have seen none more classically regular, except, perhaps,
the marble ones of the Emperor Commodus.  Yet his countenance
was, nevertheless, one of those which all men have seen at some
period of their lives, and have never afterwards seen again.  It
had no peculiar--it had no settled predominant expression to be
fastened upon the memory; a countenance seen and instantly
forgotten--but forgotten with a vague and never-ceasing desire of
recalling it to mind.  Not that the spirit of each rapid passion
failed, at any time, to throw its own distinct image upon the
mirror of that face--but that the mirror, mirror-like, retained
no vestige of the passion, when the passion had departed.Upon leaving him on the night of our adventure, he solicited
me, in what I thought an urgent manner, to call upon him very
early the next morning.  Shortly after sunrise, I found myself
accordingly at his Palazzo, one of those huge structures of
gloomy, yet fantastic pomp, which tower above the waters of the
Grand Canal in the vicinity of the Rialto.  I was shown up a
broad winding staircase of mosaics, into an apartment whose
unparalleled splendour burst through the opening door with an
actual glare, making me blind and dizzy with luxuriousness.I knew my acquaintance to be wealthy.  Report had spoken of
his possessions in terms which I had even ventured to call terms
of ridiculous exaggeration.  But as I gazed about me, I could not
bring myself to believe that the wealth of any subject in Europe
could have supplied the princely magnificence which burned and
blazed around.Although, as I say, the sun had arisen, yet the room was
still brilliantly lighted up.  I judge from this circumstance, as
well as from an air of exhaustion in the countenance of my
friend, that he had not retired to bed during the whole of the
preceding night.  In the architecture and embellishments of the
chamber, the evident design had been to dazzle and astound. 
Little attention had been paid to the decora of what is
technically called keeping, or to the proprieties of nationality. 
The eye wandered from object to object, and rested upon none--
neither the grotesques of the Greek painters, nor the sculptures
of the best Italian days, nor the huge carvings of untutored
Egypt.  Rich draperies in every part of the room trembled to the
vibration of low, melancholy music, whose origin was not to be
discovered.  The senses were oppressed by mingled and conflicting
perfumes, reeking up from strange convolute censers, together
with multitudinous flaring and flickering tongues of emerald and
violet fire.  The rays of the newly risen sun poured in upon the
whole, through windows formed each of a single pane of crimson-
tinted glass.  Glancing to and fro, in a thousand reflections,
from curtains which rolled from their cornices like cataracts of
molten silver, the beams of natural glory mingled at length
fitfully with the artificial light, and lay weltering in subdued
masses upon a carpet of rich, liquid-looking cloth of Chili gold.'Ha! ha! ha!--ha! ha! ha!'--laughed the proprietor, motioning
me to a seat as I entered the room, and throwing himself back at
full-length upon an ottoman.  'I see,' said he, perceiving that I
could not immediately reconcile myself to the bienseance of so
singular a welcome--'I see you are astonished at my apartment--at
my statues--my pictures--my originality of conception in
architecture and upholstery--absolutely drunk, eh? with my
magnificence?  But pardon me, my dear sir,' (here his tone of
voice dropped to the very spirit of cordiality) 'pardon me for my
uncharitable laughter.  You appeared so utterly astonished. 
Besides, some things are so completely ludicrous that a man must
laugh or die.  To die laughing must be the most glorious of all
glorious deaths!  Sir Thomas More--a very fine man was Sir Thomas
More--Sire Thomas More died laughing, you remember.  Also in the
Absurdities of Ravisius Textor, there is a long list of
characters who came to the same magnificent end.  Do you know,
however,' continued he musingly, 'that at Sparta (which is now
Palaeochori)--at Sparta, I say, to the west of the citadel, among
a chaos of scarcely visible ruins, is a kind of socle, upon which
are still legible the letters .  They are undoubtedly part of 
 .  Now at Sparta were a thousand temples and shrines to a
thousand different divinities.  How exceedingly strange that the
altar of Laughter should have survived all the others!  But in
the present instance,' he resumed, with a singular alteration of
voice and manner, 'I have no right to be merry at your expense. 
You might well have been amazed.  Europe cannot produce anything
so fine as this, my little regal cabinet.  My other apartments
are by no means of the same order; mere ultras of fashionable
insipidity.  This is better than fashion--is it not?  Yet this
has but to be seen to become the rage--that is, with those who
could afford it at the cost of their entire patrimony.  I have
guarded, however, against any such profanation.  With one
exception you are the only human being besides myself and my
valet, who has been admitted within the mysteries of these
imperial precincts, since they have been bedizened as you see!'I bowed in acknowledgment; for the overpowering sense of
splendour and perfume, and music, together with the unexpected
eccentricity of his address and manner, prevented me from
expressing, in words, my appreciation of what I might have
construed into a compliment.'Here,' he resumed, arising and leaning on my arm as he
sauntered around the apartment--'here are paintings from the
Greeks to Cimabue, and from Cimabue to the present hour.  Many
are chosen, as you see, with little deference to the opinions of
Virtu.  They are all, however, fitting tapestry for a chamber
such as this.  Here too, are some chefs d'oeuvre of the unknown
great--and here unfinished designs by men, celebrated in their
day, whose very names the perspicacity of the academies has left
to silence and to me.  What think you,' said he, turning abruptly
as he spoke--'what think you of this Madonna della Pieta?''It is Guido's own!' I said with all the enthusiasm of my
nature, for I had been poring intently over its surpassing
loveliness.  'It is Guido's own!--how could you have obtained
it?--she is undoubtedly in painting what the Venus is in
sculpture.''Ha!' said he thoughtfully, 'the Venus--the beautiful
Venus?--the Venus of the Medici?--she of the diminutive head and
the gilded hair?  Part of the left arm' (here his voice dropped
so as to be heard with difficulty), 'and all the right are
restorations, and in the coquetry of that right arm lies, I
think, the quintessence of all affectation.  Give me the Canova! 
The Apollo, too!--is a copy--there can be no doubt of it--blind
fool that I am, who cannot behold the boasted inspiration of the
Apollo!  I cannot help--pity me!--I cannot help preferring the
Antinous.  Was it not Socrates who said that the statuary found
his statue in the block of marble?  Then Michael Angelo was by no
means original in his couplet--'Non ha l'ottimo artista alcun concettoChe un marmo solo in se non circonscriva.'It has been, or should be remarked, that, in the manner of
the true gentleman, we are always aware of a difference from the
bearing of the vulgar, without being at once precisely able to
determine in what such difference consists.  Allowing the remark
to have applied in its full force to the outward demeanour of my
acquaintance, I felt it, on that eventful morning, still more
fully applicable to his moral temperament and character.  Nor can
I better define that peculiarity of spirit which seemed to place
him so essentially apart from all other human beings, than by
calling it a habit of intense and continual thought, pervading
even his most trivial actions--intruding upon his moments of
dalliance--and interweaving itself with his very flashes of
merriment--like adders which writhe from out the eyes of the
grinning masks in the cornices around the temples of Persepolis.I could not help, however, repeatedly observing, through the
mingled tone of levity and solemnity with which he rapidly
descanted upon matters of little importance, a certain air of
trepidation--a degree of nervous unction in action and in speech-
-an unquiet excitability of manner which appeared to me at all
times unaccountable, and upon some occasions even filled me with
alarm.  Frequently, too, pausing in the middle of a sentence
whose commencement he had apparently forgotten, he seemed to be
listening in the deepest attention, as if either in momentary
expectation of a visitor, or to sounds which must have had
existence in his imagination alone.It was during one of these reveries or pauses of apparent
abstraction, that, in turning over a page of the poet and scholar
Politian's beautiful tragedy of The Orfeo (the first native
Italian tragedy) which lay near me upon an ottoman, I discovered
a passage underlined in pencil.  It was a passage towards the end
of the third act--a passage of the most heart-stirring
excitement--a passage which, although tainted with impurity, no
man shall read without a thrill of novel emotion--no woman
without a sigh.  The whole page was blotted with fresh tears,
and, upon the opposite interleaf, were the following English
lines, written in a hand so very different from the peculiar
characters of my acquaintance, that I had some difficulty in
recognizing it as his own.Thou wast that all to me, love,For which my soul did pine--A green isle in the sea, love,A fountain and a shrine,All wreathed with fairy fruits and flowers,And all the flowers were mine.Ah, dream too bright to last!Ah, starry Hope! that didst ariseBut to be overcast!A voice from out the Future cries,'On! on!'--but o'er the Past(Dim gulf!) my spirit hovering liesMute, motionless, aghast!For alas! alas! with me.The light of life is o'er.'No more--no more--no more'(Such language holds the solemn seaTo the sands upon the shore)Shall bloom the thunder-blasted tree,Or the stricken eagle soar!Now all my days are trances,And all my nightly dreamsAre where thy grey eye glances,And where thy footstep gleams--In what ethereal dances,By what Italian streams.Alas! for that accursed timeThey bore thee o'er the billow,From Love to titled age and crime,And an unholy pillow--From me, and from our misty clime,Where weeps the silver willow!That these lines were written in English--a language with
which I had not believed their author acquainted--afforded me
little matter for surprise.  I was too well aware of the extent
of his acquirements, and of the singular pleasure he took in
concealing them from observation, to be astonished at any similar
discovery; but the place of date, I must confess, occasioned me
no little amazement.  It had been originally written London, and
afterwards carefully overscored--not, however, so effectually as
to conceal the word from a scrutinizing eye.  I say this
occasioned me no little amazement; for I well remember that, in a
former conversation with my friend, I particularly inquired if he
had at any time met in London the Marchesa di Mentoni (who for
some years previous to her marriage had resided in that city),
when his answer, if I mistake not, gave me to understand that he
had never visited the metropolis of Great Britain.  I might as
well here mention, that I have more than once heard (without of
course giving credit to a report involving so many
improbabilities), that the person of whom I speak was not only by
birth, but in education, an Englishman.*'There is one painting,' said he, without being aware of my
notice of the tragedy--'there is still one painting which you
have not seen.'  And throwing aside a drapery, he discovered a
full-length portrait of the Marchesa Aphrodite.Human art could have done no more in the delineation of her
superhuman beauty.  The same ethereal figure which stood before
me the preceding night upon the steps of the Ducal Palace, stood
before me once again.  But in the expression of the countenance,
which was beaming all over with smiles, there still lurked
(incomprehensible anomaly!) that fitful stain of melancholy which
will ever be found inseparable from the perfection of the
beautiful.  Her right arm lay folded over her bosom.  With her
left she pointed downwards to a curiously fashioned vase.  One
small, fairy foot, alone visible, barely touched the earth--and,
scarcely discernible in the brilliant atmosphere which seemed to
encircle and enshrine her loveliness, floated a pair of the most
delicately imagined wings.  My glance fell from the painting to
the figure of my friend, and the vigorous words of Chapman's
Bussy D'Ambois quivered instinctively upon my lips:He is upThere like a Roman statue!  He will standTill Death hath made him marble!'Come!' he said at length, turning towards a table of richly
enamelled and massive silver, upon which were a few goblets
fantastically stained, together with two large Etruscan vases,
fashioned in the same extraordinary model as that in the
foreground of the portrait, and filled with what I supposed to be
Johannisberger.  'Come!' he said abruptly, 'let us drink!  It is
early--but let us drink.  It is indeed early,' he continued,
musingly, as a cherub with a heavy golden hammer made the
apartment ring with the first hour after sunrise--'It is indeed
early, but what matters it?  Let us drink!  Let us pour out an
offering to yon solemn sun which these gaudy lamps and censers
are so eager to subdue!'  And, having made me pledge him in a
bumper, he swallowed in rapid succession several goblets of the
wine.'To dream,' he continued, resuming the tone of his desultory
conversation, as he held up to the rich light of a censer one of
the magnificent vases--'to dream has been the business of my
life.  I have therefore framed for myself, as you see, a bower of
dreams.  In the heart of Venice, could I have erected a better? 
You behold around you, it is true, a medley of architectural
embellishments.  The chastity of Ionia is offended by
antediluvian devices, and the sphinxes of Egypt are outstretched
upon carpets of gold.  Yet the effect is incongruous to the timid
alone.  Proprieties of place, and especially of time, are the
bugbears which terrify mankind from the contemplation of the
magnificent.  Once I was myself a decorist: but that sublimation
of folly has palled upon my soul.  All this is now the fitter for
my purpose.  Like these arabesque censers, my spirit is writhing
in fire, and the delirium of this scene is fashioning me for the
wilder visions of that land of real dreams whither I am now
rapidly departing.'  He here paused abruptly, bent his head to
his bosom, and seemed to listen to a sound which I could not
hear.  At length, erecting his frame, he looked upwards and
ejaculated the lines of the Bishop of Chichester:--Stay for me there!  I will not failTo meet thee in that hollow vale.In the next instant, confessing the power of the wine, he
threw himself at full length upon an ottoman.A quick step was now heard upon the staircase, and a loud
knock at the door rapidly succeeded.  I was hastening to
anticipate a second disturbance, when a page of Mentoni's
household burst into the room, and faltered out, in a voice
choking with emotion, the incoherent words, 'My mistress!--my
mistress!--poisoned!--poisoned!  Oh beautiful--oh beautiful
Aphrodite!'Bewildered, I flew to the ottoman, and endeavoured to arouse
the sleeper to a sense of the startling intelligence.  But his
limbs were rigid--his lips were livid--his lately beaming eyes
were riveted in death.  I staggered back towards the table--my
hand fell upon a cracked and blackened goblet--and a
consciousness of the entire and terrible truth flashed suddenly
over my soul.I WAS sick, sick unto death, with that long
agony, and when they at length unbound
me, and I was permitted to sit, I felt that
my senses were leaving me. The sentence, the dread
sentence of death, was the last of distinct accentuation
which reached my ears. After that, the sound
of the inquisitorial voices seemed merged in one
dreamy indeterminate hum. It conveyed to my
soul the idea of REVOLUTION, perhaps from its association
in fancy with the burr of a mill-wheel. This
only for a brief period, for presently I heard no more.
Yet, for a while, I saw, but with how terrible an exaggeration
! I saw the lips of the black-robed judges.
They appeared to me white -- whiter than the sheet
upon which I trace these words -- and thin even to
grotesqueness; thin with the intensity of their expression
of firmness, of immovable resolution, of
stern contempt of human torture. I saw that the
decrees of what to me was fate were still issuing
from those lips. I saw them writhe with a deadly
locution. I saw them fashion the syllables of my
name, and I shuddered, because no sound succeeded.
I saw, too, for a few moments of delirious horror,
the soft and nearly imperceptible waving of the
sable draperies which enwrapped the walls of the
apartment; and then my vision fell upon the seven
tall candles upon the table. At first they wore the
aspect of charity, and seemed white slender angels
who would save me: but then all at once there
came a most deadly nausea over my spirit, and I felt
every fibre in my frame thrill, as if I had touched
the wire of a galvanic battery, while the angel forms
became meaningless spectres, with heads of flame,
and I saw that from them there would be no help.
And then there stole into my fancy, like a rich
musical note, the thought of what sweet rest there
must be in the grave. The thought came gently
and stealthily, and it seemed long before it attained
full appreciation; but just as my spirit came at length
properly to feel and entertain it, the figures of the
judges vanished, as if magically, from before me;
the tall candles sank into nothingness; their flames
went out utterly; the blackness of darkness superened
; all sensations appeared swallowed up in a mad
rushing descent as of the soul into Hades. Then
silence, and stillness, and night were the universe.I had swooned; but still will not say that all of
consciousness was lost. What of it there remained
I will not attempt to define, or even to describe; yet
all was not lost. In the deepest slumber -- no! In
delirium -- no! In a swoon -- no! In death -- no!
Even in the grave all was not lost. Else there is no
immortality for man. Arousing from the most profound
of slumbers, we break the gossamer web of
some dream. Yet in a second afterwards (so frail
may that web have been) we remember not that we
have dreamed. In the return to life from the swoon
there are two stages; first, that of the sense of mental
or spiritual; secondly, that of the sense of physical
existence. It seems probable that if, upon reaching
the second stage, we could recall the impressions of
the first, we should find these impressions eloquent
in memories of the gulf beyond. And that gulf is,
what? How at least shall we distinguish its shadows
from those of the tomb? But if the impressions of
what I have termed the first stage are not at will
recalled, yet, after long interval, do they not come
unbidden, while we marvel whence they come? He
who has never swooned is not he who finds strange
palaces and wildly familiar faces in coals that glow;
is not he who beholds floating in mid-air the sad
visions that the many may not view; is not he who
ponders over the perfume of some novel flower; is
not he whose brain grows bewildered with the meaning
of some musical cadence which has never before
arrested his attention.Amid frequent and thoughtful endeavours to remember
, amid earnest struggles to regather some
token of the state of seeming nothingness into which
my soul had lapsed, there have been moments when
I have dreamed of success; there have been brief,
very brief periods when I have conjured up remembrances
which the lucid reason of a later epoch
assures me could have had reference only to that
condition of seeming unconsciousness. These shadows
of memory tell indistinctly of tall figures that
lifted and bore me in silence down -- down -- still
down -- till a hideous dizziness oppressed me at the
mere idea of the interminableness of the descent.
They tell also of a vague horror at my heart on account
of that heart's unnatural stillness. Then comes
a sense of sudden motionlessness throughout all
things; as if those who bore me (a ghastly train!)
had outrun, in their descent, the limits of the limitless
, and paused from the wearisomeness of their toil.
After this I call to mind flatness and dampness; and
then all is MADNESS -- the madness of a memory which
busies itself among forbidden things.Very suddenly there came back to my soul motion
and sound -- the tumultuous motion of the heart,
and in my ears the sound of its beating. Then a
pause in which all is blank. Then again sound,
and motion, and touch, a tingling sensation pervading
my frame. Then the mere consciousness
of existence, without thought, a condition which
lasted long. Then, very suddenly, THOUGHT, and shuddering
terror, and earnest endeavour to comprehend
my true state. Then a strong desire to lapse into
insensibility. Then a rushing revival of soul and a
successful effort to move. And now a full memory
of the trial, of the judges, of the sable draperies, of
the sentence, of the sickness, of the swoon. Then
entire forgetfulness of all that followed; of all that
a later day and much earnestness of endeavour have
enabled me vaguely to recall.So far I had not opened my eyes. I felt that I
lay upon my back unbound. I reached out my
hand, and it fell heavily upon something damp
and hard. There I suffered it to remain for many
minutes, while I strove to imagine where and what
I could be. I longed, yet dared not, to employ my
vision. I dreaded the first glance at objects around
me. It was not that I feared to look upon things
horrible, but that I grew aghast lest there should be
NOTHING to see. At length, with a wild desperation
at heart, I quickly unclosed my eyes. My worst
thoughts, then, were confirmed. The blackness of
eternal night encompassed me. I struggled for
breath. The intensity of the darkness seemed to
oppress and stifle me. The atmosphere was intolerably
close. I still lay quietly, and made effort to
exercise my reason. I brought to mind the inquisitorial
proceedings, and attempted from that point
to deduce my real condition. The sentence had
passed, and it appeared to me that a very long
interval of time had since elapsed. Yet not for a
moment did I suppose myself actually dead. Such
a supposition, notwithstanding what we read in fiction
, is altogether inconsistent with real existence;
-- but where and in what state was I? The condemned
to death, I knew, perished usually at the
auto-da-fes, and one of these had been held on the
very night of the day of my trial. Had I been remanded
to my dungeon, to await the next sacrifice,
which would not take place for many months?
This I at once saw could not be. Victims had been
in immediate demand. Moreover my dungeon, as
well as all the condemned cells at Toledo, had stone
floors, and light was not altogether excluded.A fearful idea now suddenly drove the blood in
torrents upon my heart, and for a brief period I once
more relapsed into insensibility. Upon recovering,
I at once started to my feet, trembling convulsively
in every fibre. I thrust my arms wildly above and
around me in all directions. I felt nothing; yet
dreaded to move a step, lest I should be impeded by
the walls of a TOMB. Perspiration burst from every
pore, and stood in cold big beads upon my forehead.
The agony of suspense grew at length intolerable,
and I cautiously moved forward, with my arms extended
, and my eyes straining from their sockets, in
the hope of catching some faint ray of light. I proceeded
for many paces, but still all was blackness and
vacancy. I breathed more freely. It seemed evident
that mine was not, at least, the most hideous of
fates.And now, as I still continued to step cautiously
onward, there came thronging upon my recollection
a thousand vague rumours of the horrors of Toledo.
Of the dungeons there had been strange things
narrated -- fables I had always deemed them -- but
yet strange, and too ghastly to repeat, save in a
whisper. Was I left to perish of starvation in this
subterranean world of darkness; or what fate perhaps
even more fearful awaited me? That the result
would be death, and a death of more than
customary bitterness, I knew too well the character
of my judges to doubt. The mode and the hour
were all that occupied or distracted me.My outstretched hands at length encountered
some solid obstruction. It was a wall, seemingly of
stone masonry -- very smooth, slimy, and cold. I
followed it up; stepping with all the careful distrust
with which certain antique narratives had inspired
me. This process, however, afforded me no means
of ascertaining the dimensions of my dungeon; as I
might make its circuit, and return to the point
whence I set out, without being aware of the fact,
so perfectly uniform seemed the wall. I therefore
sought the knife which had been in my pocket when
led into the inquisitorial chamber, but it was gone;
my clothes had been exchanged for a wrapper of
coarse serge. I had thought of forcing the blade
in some minute crevice of the masonry, so as to
identify my point of departure. The difficulty,
nevertheless, was but trivial, although, in the disorder
of my fancy, it seemed at first insuperable. I
tore a part of the hem from the robe, and placed
the fragment at full length, and at right angles to
the wall. In groping my way around the prison, I
could not fail to encounter this rag upon completing
the circuit. So, at least, I thought, but I had not
counted upon the extent of the dungeon, or upon
my own weakness. The ground was moist and
slippery. I staggered onward for some time, when
I stumbled and fell. My excessive fatigue induced
me to remain prostrate, and sleep soon overtook me
as I lay.Upon awaking, and stretching forth an arm, I
found beside me a loaf and a pitcher with water. I
was too much exhausted to reflect upon this circumstance
, but ate and drank with avidity. Shortly
afterwards I resumed my tour around the prison,
and with much toil came at last upon the fragment
of the serge. Up to the period when I fell I had
counted fifty-two paces, and upon resuming my
walk I had counted forty-eight more, when I
arrived at the rag. There were in all, then, a
hundred paces; and, admitting two paces to the
yard, I presumed the dungeon to be fifty yards in
circuit. I had met, however, with many angles in
the wall, and thus I could form no guess at the shape
of the vault, for vault I could not help supposing it
to be.I had little object -- certainly no hope -- in these
researches, but a vague curiosity prompted me to
continue them. Quitting the wall, I resolved to
cross the area of the enclosure. At first I proceeded
with extreme caution, for the floor although seemingly
of solid material was treacherous with slime.
At length, however, I took courage and did not
hesitate to step firmly -- endeavouring to cross in as
direct a line as possible. I had advanced some ten
or twelve paces in this manner, when the remnant
of the torn hem of my robe became entangled between
my legs. I stepped on it, and fell violently
on my face.In the confusion attending my fall, I did not
immediately apprehend a somewhat startling circumstance
, which yet, in a few seconds afterward,
and while I still lay prostrate, arrested my attention.
It was this: my chin rested upon the floor of the
prison, but my lips, and the upper portion of my
head, although seemingly at a less elevation than
the chin, touched nothing. At the same time, my
forehead seemed bathed in a clammy vapour, and
the peculiar smell of decayed fungus arose to my
nostrils. I put forward my arm, and shuddered to
find that I had fallen at the very brink of a circular
pit, whose extent of course I had no means of ascertaining
at the moment. Groping about the masonry
just below the margin, I succeeded in dislodging a
small fragment, and let it fall into the abyss. For
many seconds I hearkened to its reverberations as
it dashed against the sides of the chasm in its descent
; at length there was a sullen plunge into
water, succeeded by loud echoes. At the same
moment there came a sound resembling the quick
opening, and as rapid closing of a door overhead,
while a faint gleam of light flashed suddenly through
the gloom, and as suddenly faded away.I saw clearly the doom which had been prepared
for me, and congratulated myself upon the timely
accident by which I had escaped. Another step before
my fall, and the world had seen me no more
and the death just avoided was of that very character
which I had regarded as fabulous and frivolous
in the tales respecting the Inquisition. To the
victims of its tyranny, there was the choice of death
with its direst physical agonies, or death with its
most hideous moral horrors. I had been reserved
for the latter. By long suffering my nerves had
been unstrung, until I trembled at the sound of my
own voice, and had become in every respect a fitting
subject for the species of torture which awaited me.Shaking in every limb, I groped my way back to
the wall -- resolving there to perish rather than risk
the terrors of the wells, of which my imagination
now pictured many in various positions about the
dungeon. In other conditions of mind I might have
had courage to end my misery at once by a plunge
into one of these abysses; but now I was the veriest
of cowards. Neither could I forget what I had read
of these pits -- that the SUDDEN extinction of life
formed no part of their most horrible plan.Agitation of spirit kept me awake for many long
hours; but at length I again slumbered. Upon
arousing, I found by my side, as before, a loaf and a
pitcher of water. A burning thirst consumed me,
and I emptied the vessel at a draught. It must have
been drugged, for scarcely had I drunk before I
became irresistibly drowsy. A deep sleep fell upon
me -- a sleep like that of death. How long it lasted
of course I know not; but when once again I unclosed
my eyes the objects around me were visible.
By a wild sulphurous lustre, the origin of which I
could not at first determine, I was enabled to see the
extent and aspect of the prison.In its size I had been greatly mistaken. The
whole circuit of its walls did not exceed twenty-five
yards. For some minutes this fact occasioned me
a world of vain trouble; vain indeed -- for what
could be of less importance, under the terrible circumstances
which environed me than the mere
dimensions of my dungeon? But my soul took a
wild interest in trifles, and I busied myself in endeavours
to account for the error I had committed
in my measurement. The truth at length flashed
upon me. In my first attempt at exploration I had
counted fifty-two paces up to the period when I
fell; I must then have been within a pace or two of
the fragment of serge; in fact I had nearly performed
the circuit of the vault. I then slept, and
upon awaking, I must have returned upon my steps,
thus supposing the circuit nearly double what it
actually was. My confusion of mind prevented
me from observing that I began my tour with the
wall to the left, and ended it with the wall to the
right.I had been deceived too in respect to the shape
of the enclosure. In feeling my way I had found
many angles, and thus deduced an idea of great
irregularity, so potent is the effect of total darkness
upon one arousing from lethargy or sleep! The
angles were simply those of a few slight depressions
or niches at odd intervals. The general shape of
the prison was square. What I had taken for masonry
seemed now to be iron, or some other metal
in huge plates, whose sutures or joints occasioned
the depression. The entire surface of this metallic
enclosure was rudely daubed in all the hideous and
repulsive devices to which the charnel superstition
of the monks has given rise. The figures of fiends
in aspects of menace, with skeleton forms and other
more really fearful images, overspread and disfigured
the walls. I observed that the outlines of these
monstrosities were sufficiently distinct, but that the
colours seemed faded and blurred, as if from the
effects of a damp atmosphere. I now noticed the
floor, too, which was of stone. In the centre
yawned the circular pit from whose jaws I had escaped
; but it was the only one in the dungeon.All this I saw indistinctly and by much effort, for
my personal condition had been greatly changed during
slumber. I now lay upon my back, and at full
length, on a species of low framework of wood. To
this I was securely bound by a long strap resembling
a surcingle. It passed in many convolutions about
my limbs and body, leaving at liberty only my head,
and my left arm to such extent that I could by dint
of much exertion supply myself with food from an
earthen dish which lay by my side on the floor. I
saw to my horror that the pitcher had been removed
. I say to my horror, for I was consumed
with intolerable thirst. This thirst it appeared to
be the design of my persecutors to stimulate, for the
food in the dish was meat pungently seasoned.Looking upward, I surveyed the ceiling of my
prison. It was some thirty or forty feet overhead, and
constructed much as the side walls. In one of its
panels a very singular figure riveted my whole attention
. It was the painted figure of Time as he is
commonly represented, save that in lieu of a scythe
he held what at a casual glance I supposed to be the
pictured image of a huge pendulum, such as we see
on antique clocks. There was something, however,
in the appearance of this machine which caused me
to regard it more attentively. While I gazed directly
upward at it (for its position was immediately
over my own), I fancied that I saw it in motion.
In an instant afterward the fancy was confirmed.
Its sweep was brief, and of course slow. I watched
it for some minutes, somewhat in fear but more in
wonder. Wearied at length with observing its dull
movement, I turned my eyes upon the other objects
in the cell.A slight noise attracted my notice, and looking
to the floor, I saw several enormous rats traversing
it. They had issued from the well which lay just
within view to my right. Even then while I gazed,
they came up in troops hurriedly, with ravenous
eyes, allured by the scent of the meat. From this
it required much effort and attention to scare them
away.It might have been half-an-hour, perhaps even
an hour (for I could take but imperfect note of
time) before I again cast my eyes upward. What
I then saw confounded and amazed me. The sweep
of the pendulum had increased in extent by nearly
a yard. As a natural consequence, its velocity was
also much greater. But what mainly disturbed me
was the idea that it had perceptibly DESCENDED. I
now observed, with what horror it is needless to
say, that its nether extremity was formed of a crescent
of glittering steel, about a foot in length from
horn to horn; the horns upward, and the under
edge evidently as keen as that of a razor. Like a
razor also it seemed massy and heavy, tapering from
the edge into a solid and broad structure above. It
was appended to a weighty rod of brass, and the
whole HISSED as it swung through the air.I could no longer doubt the doom prepared for me
by monkish ingenuity in torture. My cognisance
of the pit had become known to the inquisitorial
agents -- THE PIT, whose horrors had been destined
for so bold a recusant as myself, THE PIT, typical of
hell, and regarded by rumour as the Ultima Thule
of all their punishments. The plunge into this pit
I had avoided by the merest of accidents, and I knew
that surprise or entrapment into torment formed an
important portion of all the grotesquerie of these
dungeon deaths. Having failed to fall, it was no
part of the demon plan to hurl me into the abyss,
and thus (there being no alternative) a different and
a milder destruction awaited me. Milder! I half
smiled in my agony as I thought of such application
of such a term.What boots it to tell of the long, long hours of
horror more than mortal, during which I counted
the rushing oscillations of the steel! Inch by inch
-- line by line -- with a descent only appreciable at
intervals that seemed ages -- down and still down it
came! Days passed -- it might have been that many
days passed -- ere it swept so closely over me as to
fan me with its acrid breath. The odour of the
sharp steel forced itself into my nostrils. I prayed
-- I wearied heaven with my prayer for its more
speedy descent. I grew frantically mad, and struggled
to force myself upward against the sweep of
the fearful scimitar. And then I fell suddenly calm
and lay smiling at the glittering death as a child at
some rare bauble.There was another interval of utter insensibility;
it was brief, for upon again lapsing into life there
had been no perceptible descent in the pendulum.
But it might have been long -- for I knew there were
demons who took note of my swoon, and who could
have arrested the vibration at pleasure. Upon my
recovery, too, I felt very -- oh! inexpressibly -- sick
and weak, as if through long inanition. Even amid
the agonies of that period the human nature craved
food. With painful effort I outstretched my left
arm as far as my bonds permitted, and took possession
of the small remnant which had been spared
me by the rats. As I put a portion of it within my
lips there rushed to my mind a half-formed thought
of joy -- of hope. Yet what business had I with
hope? It was, as I say, a half-formed thought --
man has many such, which are never completed.
I felt that it was of joy -- of hope; but I felt also
that it had perished in its formation. In vain I
struggled to perfect -- to regain it. Long suffering
had nearly annihilated all my ordinary powers of
mind. I was an imbecile -- an idiot.The vibration of the pendulum was at right angles
to my length. I saw that the crescent was designed
to cross the region of the heart. It would fray the
serge of my robe; it would return and repeat its
operations -- again -- and again. Notwithstanding
its terrifically wide sweep (some thirty feet or more)
and the hissing vigour of its descent, sufficient to
sunder these very walls of iron, still the fraying of
my robe would be all that, for several minutes, it
would accomplish; and at this thought I paused. I
dared not go farther than this reflection. I dwelt
upon it with a pertinacity of attention -- as if, in so
dwelling, I could arrest HERE the descent of the steel.
I forced myself to ponder upon the sound of the
crescent as it should pass across the garment -- upon
the peculiar thrilling sensation which the friction of
cloth produces on the nerves. I pondered upon all
this frivolity until my teeth were on edge.Down -- steadily down it crept. I took a frenzied
pleasure in contrasting its downward with its
lateral velocity. To the right -- to the left -- far
and wide -- with the shriek of a damned spirit! to
my heart with the stealthy pace of the tiger! I
alternately laughed and howled, as the one or the
other idea grew predominant.Down -- certainly, relentlessly down! It vibrated
within three inches of my bosom! I struggled
violently -- furiously -- to free my left arm. This
was free only from the elbow to the hand. I could
reach the latter, from the platter beside me to my
mouth with great effort, but no farther. Could I
have broken the fastenings above the elbow, I
would have seized and attempted to arrest the
pendulum. I might as well have attempted to
arrest an avalanche!Down -- still unceasingly -- still inevitably down!
I gasped and struggled at each vibration. I shrunk
convulsively at its very sweep. My eyes followed
its outward or upward whirls with the eagerness of
the most unmeaning despair; they closed themselves
spasmodically at the descent, although death
would have been a relief, O, how unspeakable!
Still I quivered in every nerve to think how slight
a sinking of the machinery would precipitate that
keen glistening axe upon my bosom. It was hope
that prompted the nerve to quiver -- the frame to
shrink. It was HOPE -- the hope that triumphs on
the rack -- that whispers to the death-condemned
even in the dungeons of the Inquisition.I saw that some ten or twelve vibrations would
bring the steel in actual contact with my robe, and
with this observation there suddenly came over my
spirit all the keen, collected calmness of despair.
For the first time during many hours, or perhaps
days, I THOUGHT. It now occurred to me that the
bandage or surcingle which enveloped me was
UNIQUE. I was tied by no separate cord. The first
stroke of the razor-like crescent athwart any portion
of the band would so detach it that it might be unwound
from my person by means of my left hand.
But how fearful, in that case, the proximity of the
steel! The result of the slightest struggle, how
deadly! Was it likely, moreover, that the minions
of the torturer had not foreseen and provided for
this possibility! Was it probable that the bandage
crossed my bosom in the track of the pendulum?
Dreading to find my faint, and, as it seemed, my
last hope frustrated, I so far elevated my head as to
obtain a distinct view of my breast. The surcingle
enveloped my limbs and body close in all directions
save SAVE IN THE PATH OF THE DESTROYING CRESCENT.Scarcely had I dropped my head back into its
original position when there flashed upon my mind
what I cannot better describe than as the unformed
half of that idea of deliverance to which I have previously
alluded, and of which a moiety only floated
indeterminately through my brain when I raised
food to my burning lips. The whole thought was
now present -- feeble, scarcely sane, scarcely definite,
but still entire. I proceeded at once, with the
nervous energy of despair, to attempt its execution.For many hours the immediate vicinity of the
low framework upon which I lay had been literally
swarming with rats. They were wild, bold, ravenous
, their red eyes glaring upon me as if they
waited but for motionlessness on my part to make
me their prey. "To what food," I thought, "have
they been accustomed in the well?"They had devoured, in spite of all my efforts to
prevent them, all but a small remnant of the contents
of the dish. I had fallen into an habitual
see-saw or wave of the hand about the platter; and
at length the unconscious uniformity of the movement
deprived it of effect. In their voracity the
vermin frequently fastened their sharp fangs in my
fingers. With the particles of the oily and spicy
viand which now remained, I thoroughly rubbed
the bandage wherever I could reach it; then, raising
my hand from the floor, I lay breathlessly still.At first the ravenous animals were startled and
terrified at the change -- at the cessation of movement
. They shrank alarmedly back; many sought
the well. But this was only for a moment. I had
not counted in vain upon their voracity. Observing
that I remained without motion, one or two of
the boldest leaped upon the frame-work and smelt
at the surcingle. This seemed the signal for a
general rush. Forth from the well they hurried in
fresh troops. They clung to the wood, they overran
it, and leaped in hundreds upon my person. The
measured movement of the pendulum disturbed
them not at all. Avoiding its strokes, they busied
themselves with the annointed bandage. They
pressed, they swarmed upon me in ever accumulating
heaps. They writhed upon my throat; their
cold lips sought my own; I was half stifled by their
thronging pressure; disgust, for which the world
has no name, swelled my bosom, and chilled with
heavy clamminess my heart. Yet one minute and
I felt that the struggle would be over. Plainly I
perceived the loosening of the bandage. I knew
that in more than one place it must be already
severed. With a more than human resolution I
lay STILL.Nor had I erred in my calculations, nor had I endured
in vain. I at length felt that I was FREE. The
surcingle hung in ribands from my body. But the
stroke of the pendulum already pressed upon my
bosom. It had divided the serge of the robe. It
had cut through the linen beneath. Twice again
it swung, and a sharp sense of pain shot through
every nerve. But the moment of escape had arrived.
At a wave of my hand my deliverers hurried tumultously
away. With a steady movement, cautious,
sidelong, shrinking, and slow, I slid from the embrace
of the bandage and beyond the reach of the
scimitar. For the moment, at least I WAS FREE.Free! and in the grasp of the Inquisition! I had
scarcely stepped from my wooden bed of horror
upon the stone floor of the prison, when the motion
of the hellish machine ceased and I beheld it drawn
up by some invisible force through the ceiling.
This was a lesson which I took desperately to heart.
My every motion was undoubtedly watched. Free!
I had but escaped death in one form of agony to be
delivered unto worse than death in some other.
With that thought I rolled my eyes nervously
around on the barriers of iron that hemmed me in.
Something unusual -- some change which at first I
could not appreciate distinctly -- it was obvious had
taken place in the apartment. For many minutes
of a dreamy and trembling abstraction I busied myself
in vain, unconnected conjecture. During this
period I became aware, for the first time, of the
origin of the sulphurous light which illumined the
cell. It proceeded from a fissure about half-an-inch
in width extending entirely around the prison at
the base of the walls which thus appeared, and were
completely separated from the floor. I endeavoured,
but of course in vain, to look through the aperture.As I arose from the attempt, the mystery of the
alteration in the chamber broke at once upon my
understanding. I have observed that although the
outlines of the figures upon the walls were sufficiently
distinct, yet the colours seemed blurred and indefinite
. These colours had now assumed, and were
momentarily assuming, a startling and most intense
brilliancy, that give to the spectral and fiendish portraitures
an aspect that might have thrilled even
firmer nerves than my own. Demon eyes, of a wild
and ghastly vivacity, glared upon me in a thousand
directions where none had been visible before, and
gleamed with the lurid lustre of a fire that I could
not force my imagination to regard as unreal.UNREAL! -- Even while I breathed there came to
my nostrils the breath of the vapour of heated iron!
A suffocating odour pervaded the prison! A deeper
glow settled each moment in the eyes that glared at
my agonies! A richer tint of crimson diffused itself
over the pictured horrors of blood. I panted '
I gasped for breath! There could be no doubt of
the design of my tormentors -- oh most unrelenting!
oh, most demoniac of men! I shrank from the
glowing metal to the centre of the cell. Amid the
thought of the fiery destruction that impended, the
idea of the coolness of the well came over my soul
like balm. I rushed to its deadly brink. I threw
my straining vision below. The glare from the enkindled
roof illumined its inmost recesses. Yet, for
a wild moment, did my spirit refuse to comprehend
the meaning of what I saw. At length it forced --
it wrestled its way into my soul -- it burned itself in
upon my shuddering reason. O for a voice to speak!
-- oh, horror! -- oh, any horror but this! With a
shriek I rushed from the margin and buried my
face in my hands -- weeping bitterly.The heat rapidly increased, and once again I
looked up, shuddering as if with a fit of the ague.
There had been a second change in the cell -- and
now the change was obviously in the FORM. As before
, it was in vain that I at first endeavoured to
appreciate or understand what was taking place.
But not long was I left in doubt. The inquisitorial
vengeance had been hurried by my two-fold
escape, and there was to be no more dallying with
the King of Terrors. The room had been square.
I saw that two of its iron angles were now acute --
two consequently, obtuse. The fearful difference
quickly increased with a low rumbling or moaning
sound. In an instant the apartment had shifted
its form into that of a lozenge. But the alteration
stopped not here -- I neither hoped nor desired it
to stop. I could have clasped the red walls to my
bosom as a garment of eternal peace. "Death," I
said "any death but that of the pit!" Fool! might
I not have known that INTO THE PIT it was the object
of the burning iron to urge me? Could I resist its
glow? or if even that, could I withstand its pressure
? And now, flatter and flatter grew the lozenge,
with a rapidity that left me no time for contempla-
tion. Its centre, and of course, its greatest width,
came just over the yawning gulf. I shrank back --
but the closing walls pressed me resistlessly onward
. At length for my seared and writhing body
there was no longer an inch of foothold on the firm
floor of the prison. I struggled no more, but the
agony of my soul found vent in one loud, long, and
final scream of despair. I felt that I tottered upon
the brink -- I averted my eyes --There was a discordant hum of human voices!
There was a loud blast as of many trumpets! There
was a harsh grating as of a thousand thunders! The
fiery walls rushed back! An outstretched arm
caught my own as I fell fainting into the abyss.
It was that of General Lasalle. The French army
had entered Toledo. The Inquisition was in the
hands of its enemies.>



The candle was instantly extinguished. In discreet silence the
girls stole back to their beds, and listened.

As an aid to the vigilance of the sentinel, the door had been
left ajar. Through the narrow opening, a creaking of the broad
wooden stairs of the old house became audible. In another moment
there was silence. An interval passed, and the creaking was heard
again. This time, the sound was distant and diminishing. On a
sudden it stopped. The midnight silence was disturbed no more.

What did this mean?

Had one among the many persons in authority under Miss Ladd's
roof heard the girls talking, and ascended the stairs to surprise
them in the act of violating one of the rules of the house? So
far, such a proceeding was by no means uncommon. But was it
within the limits of probability that a teacher should alter her
opinion of her own duty half-way up the stairs, and deliberately
go back to her own room again? The bare idea of such a thing was
absurd on the face of it. What more rational explanation could
ingenuity discover on the spur of the moment?

Francine was the first to offer a suggestion. She shook and
shivered in her bed, and said, "For heaven's sake, light the
candle again! It's a Ghost."

"Clear away the supper, you fools, before the ghost can report us
to Miss Ladd."

With this excellent advice Emily checked the rising panic. The
door was closed, the candle was lit; all traces of the supper
disappeared. For five minutes more they listened again. No sound
came from the stairs; no teacher, or ghost of a teacher, appeared
at the door.

Having eaten her supper, Cecilia's immediate anxieties were at an
end; she was at leisure to exert her intelligence for the benefit
of her schoolfellows. In her gentle ingratiating way, she offered
a composing suggestion. "When we heard the creaking, I don't
believe there was anybody on the stairs. In these old houses
there are always strange noises at night--and they say the stairs
here were made more than two hundred years since."

The girls looked at each other with a sense of relief--but they
waited to hear the opinion of the queen. Emily, as usual,
justified the confidence placed in her. She discovered an
ingenious method of putting Cecilia's suggestion to the test.

"Let's go on talking," she said. "If Cecilia is right, the
teachers are all asleep, and we have nothing to fear from them.
If she's wrong, we shall sooner or later see one of them at the
door. Don't be alarmed, Miss de Sor. Catching us talking at
night, in this school, only means a reprimand. Catching us with a
light, ends in punishment. Blow out the candle."

Francine's belief in the ghost was too sincerely superstitious to
be shaken: she started up in bed. "Oh, don't leave me in the
dark! I'll take the punishment, if we are found out."

"On your sacred word of honor?" Emily stipulated.

"Yes--yes."

The queen's sense of humor was tickled.

"There's something funny," she remarked, addressing her subjects,
"in a big girl like this coming to a new school and beginning
with a punishment. May I ask if you are a foreigner, Miss de
Sor?"

"My papa is a Spanish gentleman," Francine answered, with
dignity.

"And your mamma?"

"My mamma is English."

"And you have always lived in the West Indies?"

"I have always lived in the Island of St. Domingo."

Emily checked off on her fingers the different points thus far
discovered in the character of Mr. de Sor's daughter. "She's
ignorant, and superstitious, and foreign, and rich. My dear
(forgive the familiarity), you are an interesting girl--and we
must really know more of you. Entertain the bedroom. What have
you been about all your life? And what in the name of wonder,
brings you here? Before you begin I insist on one condition, in
the name of all the young ladies in the room. No useful
information about the West Indies!"

Francine disappointed her audience.

She was ready enough to make herself an object of interest to her
companions; but she was not possessed of the capacity to arrange
events in their proper order, necessary to the recital of the
simplest narrative. Emily was obliged to help her, by means of
questions. In one respect, the result justified the trouble taken
to obtain it. A sufficient reason was discovered for the
extraordinary appearance of a new pupil, on the day before the
school closed for the holidays.

Mr. de Sor's elder brother had left him an estate in St. Domingo,
and a fortune in money as well; on the one easy condition that he
continued to reside in the island. The question of expense being
now beneath the notice of the family, Francine had been sent to
England, especially recommended to Miss Ladd as a young lady with
grand prospects, sorely in need of a fashionable education. The
voyage had been so timed, by the advice of the schoolmistress, as
to make the holidays a means of obtaining this object privately.
Francine was to be taken to Brighton, where excellent masters
could be obtained to assist Miss Ladd. With six weeks before her,
she might in some degree make up for lost time; and, when the
school opened again, she would avoid the mortification of being
put down in the lowest class, along with the children.

The examination of Miss de Sor having produced these results was
pursued no further. Her character now appeared in a new, and not
very attractive, light. She audaciously took to herself the whole
credit of telling her story:

"I think it's my turn now," she said, "to be interested and
amused. May I ask you to begin, Miss Emily? All I know of you at
present is,  t hat your family name is Brown."

Emily held up her hand for silence.

Was the mysterious creaking on the stairs making itself heard
once more? No. The sound that had caught Emily's quick ear came
from the beds, on the opposite side of the room, occupied by the
three lazy girls. With no new alarm to disturb them, Effie,
Annis, and Priscilla had yielded to the composing influences of a
good supper and a warm night. They were fast asleep--and the
stoutest of the three (softly, as became a young lady) was
snoring!

The unblemished reputation of the bedroom was dear to Emily, in
her capacity of queen. She felt herself humiliated in the
presence of the new pupil.

"If that fat girl ever gets a lover," she said indignantly, "I
shall consider it my duty to warn the poor man before he marries
her. Her ridiculous name is Euphemia. I have christened her (far
more appropriately) Boiled Veal. No color in her hair, no color
in her eyes, no color in her complexion. In short, no flavor in
Euphemia. You naturally object to snoring. Pardon me if I turn my
back on you--I am going to throw my slipper at her."

The soft voice of Cecilia--suspiciously drowsy in
tone--interposed in the interests of mercy.

"She can't help it, poor thing; and she really isn't loud enough
to disturb us."

"She won't disturb _you_, at any rate! Rouse yourself, Cecilia.
We are wide awake on this side of the room--and Francine says
it's our turn to amuse her."

A low murmur, dying away gently in a sigh, was the only answer.
Sweet Cecilia had yielded to the somnolent influences of the
supper and the night. The soft infection of repose seemed to be
in some danger of communicating itself to Francine. Her large
mouth opened luxuriously in a long-continued yawn.

"Good-night!" said Emily.

Miss de Sor became wide awake in an instant.

"No," she said positively; "you are quite mistaken if you think I
am going to sleep. Please exert yourself, Miss Emily--I am
waiting to be interested."

Emily appeared to be unwilling to exert herself. She preferred
talking of the weather.

"Isn't the wind rising?" she said.

There could be no doubt of it. The leaves in the garden were
beginning to rustle, and the pattering of the rain sounded on the
windows.

Francine (as her straight chin proclaimed to all students of
physiognomy) was an obstinate girl. Determined to carry her point
she tried Emily's own system on Emily herself--she put questions.

"Have you been long at this school?"

"More than three years."

"Have you got any brothers and sisters?"

"I am the only child."

"Are your father and mother alive?"

Emily suddenly raised herself in bed.

"Wait a minute," she said; "I think I hear it again."

"The creaking on the stairs?"

"Yes."

Either she was mistaken, or the change for the worse in the
weather made it not easy to hear slight noises in the house. The
wind was still rising. The passage of it through the great trees
in the garden began to sound like the fall of waves on a distant
beach. It drove the rain--a heavy downpour by this time--rattling
against the windows.

"Almost a storm, isn't it?" Emily said

Francine's last question had not been answered yet. She took the
earliest opportunity of repeating it:

"Never mind the weather," she said. "Tell me about your father
and mother. Are they both alive?"

Emily's reply only related to one of her parents.

"My mother died before I was old enough to feel my loss."

"And your father?"

Emily referred to another relative--her father's sister. "Since I
have grown up," she proceeded, "my good aunt has been a second
mother to me. My story is, in one respect, the reverse of yours.
You are unexpectedly rich; and I am unexpectedly poor. My aunt's
fortune was to have been my fortune, if I outlived her. She has
been ruined by the failure of a bank. In her old age, she must
live on an income of two hundred a year--and I must get my own
living when I leave school."

"Surely your father can help you?" Francine persisted.

"His property is landed property." Her voice faltered, as she
referred to him, even in that indirect manner. "It is entailed;
his nearest male relative inherits it."

The delicacy which is easily discouraged was not one of the
weaknesses in the nature of Francine.

"Do I understand that your father is dead?" she asked.

Our thick-skinned fellow-creatures have the rest of us at their
mercy: only give them time, and they carry their point in the
end. In sad subdued tones--telling of deeply-rooted reserves of
feeling, seldom revealed to strangers--Emily yielded at last.

"Yes," she said, "my father is dead."

"Long ago?"

"Some people might think it long ago. I was very fond of my
father. It's nearly four years since he died, and my heart still
aches when I think of him. I'm not easily depressed by troubles,
Miss de Sor. But his death was sudden--he was in his grave when I
first heard of it--and-- Oh, he was so good to me; he was so good
to me!"

The gay high-spirited little creature who took the lead among
them all--who was the life and soul of the school--hid her face
in her hands, and burst out crying.

Startled and--to do her justice--ashamed, Francine attempted to
make excuses. Emily's generous nature passed over the cruel
persistency that had tortured her. "No no; I have nothing to
forgive. It isn't your fault. Other girls have not mothers and
brothers and sisters--and get reconciled to such a loss as mine.
Don't make excuses."

"Yes, but I want you to know that I feel for you," Francine
insisted, without the slightest approach to sympathy in face,
voice, or manner. "When my uncle died, and left us all the money,
papa was much shocked. He trusted to time to help him."

"Time has been long about it with me, Francine. I am afraid there
is something perverse in my nature; the hope of meeting again in
a better world seems so faint and so far away. No more of it now!
Let us talk of that good creature who is asleep on the other side
of you. Did I tell you that I must earn my own bread when I leave
school? Well, Cecilia has written home and found an employment
for me. Not a situation as governess--something quite out of the
common way. You shall hear all about it."

In the brief interval that had passed, the weather had begun to
change again. The wind was as high as ever; but to judge by the
lessening patter on the windows the rain was passing away.

Emily began.

She was too grateful to her friend and school-fellow, and too
deeply interested in her story, to notice the air of indifference
with which Francine settled herself on her pillow to hear the
praises of Cecilia. The most beautiful girl in the school was not
an object of interest to a young lady with an obstinate chin and
unfortunately-placed eyes. Pouring warm from the speaker's heart
the story ran smoothly on, to the monotonous accompaniment of the
moaning wind. By fine degrees Francine's eyes closed, opened and
closed again. Toward the latter part of the narrative Emily's
memory became, for the moment only, confused between two events.
She stopped to consider--noticed Francine's silence, in an
interval when she might have said a word of encouragement--and
looked closer at her. Miss de Sor was asleep.

"She might have told me she was tired," Emily said to herself
quietly. "Well! the best thing I can do is to put out the light
and follow her example."

As she took up the extinguisher, the bedroom door was suddenly
opened from the outer side. A tall woman, robed in a black
dressing-gown, stood on the threshold, looking at Emily.



Early in the last century one of the picturesque race of robbers
and murderers, practicing the vices of humanity on the
borderlands watered by the river Tweed, built a tower of stone on
the coast of Northumberland. He lived joyously in the
perpetration of atrocities; and he died penitent, under the
direction of his priest. Since that event, he has figured in
poems and pictures; and has been greatly admired by modern ladies
and gentlemen, whom he would have outraged and robbed if he had
been lucky enough to meet with them in the good old times.

His son succeeded him, and failed to profit by the paternal
example: that is to say, he made the fatal mistake of fighting
for other people instead of fighting for himself.

In the rebellion of Forty-Five, this northern squire sided to
serious purpose with Prince Charles and the Highlanders. He lost
his head; and his children lost their inheritance. In the lapse
of years, the confiscated property fell into the hands of
strangers; the last of whom (having a taste for the turf)
discovered, in course of time, that he was in want of money. A
retired merchant, named Delvin (originally of French extraction),
took a liking to the wild situation, and purchased the tower. His
wife--already in failing health--had been ordered by the doctors
to live a quiet life by the sea. Her husband's death left her a
rich and lonely widow; by day and night alike, a prisoner in her
room; wasted by disease, and having but two interests which
reconciled her to life--writing poetry in the intervals of pain,
and paying the debts of a reverend brother who succeeded in the
pulpit, and prospered nowhere else.

In the later days of its life, the tower had been greatly
improved as a place of residence. The contrast was remarkable
between the dreary gray outer walls, and the luxuriously
furnished rooms inside, rising by two at a time to the lofty
eighth story of the building. Among the scattered populace of the
country round, the tower was still known by the odd name given to
it in the bygone time--"The Clink." It had been so called (as was
supposed) in allusion to the noise made by loose stones, washed
backward and forward at certain times of the tide, in hollows of
the rock on which the building stood.

On the evening of her arrival at Mrs. Delvin's retreat, Emily
retired at an early hour, fatigued by her long journey. Mirabel
had an opportunity of speaking with his sister privately in her
own room.

"Send me away, Agatha, if I disturb you," he said, "and let me
know when I can see you in the morning."

"My dear Miles, have you forgotten that I am never able to sleep
in calm weather? My lullaby, for years past, has been the moaning
of the great North Sea, under my window. Listen! There is not a
sound outside on this peaceful night. It is the right time of the
tide, just now--and yet, 'the clink' is not to be heard. Is the
moon up?"

Mirabel opened the curtains. "The whole sky is one great abyss of
black," he answered. "If I was superstitious, I should think that
horrid darkness a bad omen for the future. Are you suffering,
Agatha?"

"Not just now. I suppose I look sadly changed for the worse since
you saw me last?"

But for the feverish brightness of her eyes, she would have
looked like a corpse. Her wrinkled forehead, her hollow cheeks,
her white lips told their terrible tale of the suffering of
years. The ghastly appearance of her face was heightened by the
furnishing of the room. This doomed woman, dying slowly day by
day, delighted in bright colors and sumptuous materials. The
paper on the walls, the curtains, the carpet presented the hues
of the rainbow. She lay on a couch covered with purple silk,
under draperies of green velvet to keep her warm. Rich lace hid h
er scanty hair, turning prematurely gray; brilliant rings
glittered on her bony fingers. The room was in a blaze of light
from lamps and candles. Even the wine at her side that kept her
alive had been decanted into a bottle of lustrous Venetian glass.
"My grave is open," she used to say; "and I want all these
beautiful things to keep me from looking at it. I should die at
once, if I was left in the dark."

Her brother sat by the couch, thinking "Shall I tell you what is
in your mind?" she asked.

Mirabel humored the caprice of the moment. "Tell me!" he said.

"You want to know what I think of Emily," she answered. "Your
letter told me you were in love; but I didn't believe your
letter. I have always doubted whether you were capable of feeling
true love--until I saw Emily. The moment she entered the room, I
knew that I had never properly appreciated my brother. You _are_
in love with her, Miles; and you are a better man than I thought
you. Does that express my opinion?"

Mirabel took her wasted hand, and kissed it gratefully.

"What a position I am in!" he said. "To love her as I love her;
and, if she knew the truth, to be the object of her horror--to be
the man whom she would hunt to the scaffold, as an act of duty to
the memory of her father!"

"You have left out the worst part of it," Mrs. Delvin reminded
him. "You have bound yourself to help her to find the man. Your
one hope of persuading her to become your wife rests on your
success in finding him. And you are the man. There is your
situation! You can't submit to it. How can you escape from it?"

"You are trying to frighten me, Agatha."

"I am trying to encourage you to face your position boldly."

"I am doing my best," Mirabel said, with sullen resignation.
"Fortune has favored me so far. I have, really and truly, been
unable to satisfy Emily by discovering Miss Jethro. She has left
the place at which I saw her last--there is no trace to be found
of her--and Emily knows it."

"Don't forget," Mrs. Delvin replied, "that there is a trace to be
found of Mrs. Rook, and that Emily expects you to follow it."

Mirabel shuddered. "I am surrounded by dangers, whichever way I
look," he said. "Do what I may, it turns out to be wrong. I was
wrong, perhaps, when I brought Emily here."

"No!"

"I could easily make an excuse," Mirabel persisted "and take her
back to London."

"And for all you know to the contrary," his wiser sister replied,
"Mrs. Rook may go to London; and you may take Emily back in time
to receive her at the cottage. In every way you are safer in my
old tower. And--don't forget--you have got my money to help you,
if you want it. In my belief, Miles, you _will_ want it."

"You are the dearest and best of sisters! What do you recommend
me to do?"

"What you would have been obliged to do," Mrs. Delvin answered,
"if you had remained in London. You must go to Redwood Hall
tomorrow, as Emily has arranged it. If Mrs. Rook is not there,
you must ask for her address in Scotland. If nobody knows the
address, you must still bestir yourself in trying to find it.
And, when you do fall in with Mrs. Rook--"

"Well?"

"Take care, wherever it may be, that you see her privately."

Mirabel was alarmed. "Don't keep me in suspense," he burst out.
"Tell me what you propose."

"Never mind what I propose, to-night. Before I can tell you what
I have in my mind, I must know whether Mrs. Rook is in England or
Scotland. Bring me that information to-morrow, and I shall have
something to say to you. Hark! The wind is rising, the rain is
falling. There is a chance of sleep for me--I shall soon hear the
sea. Good-night."

"Good-night, dearest--and thank you again, and again!"



On the Monday, a plowboy from Vale Regis arrived at Monksmoor.

In respect of himself, he was a person beneath notice. In respect
of his errand, he was sufficiently important to cast a gloom over
the household. The faithless Mirabel had broken his engagement,
and the plowboy was the herald of misfortune who brought his
apology. To his great disappointment (he wrote) he was detained
by the affairs of his parish. He could only trust to Mr. Wyvil's
indulgence to excuse him, and to communicate his sincere sense of
regret (on scented note paper) to the ladies.

Everybody believed in the affairs of the parish--with the
exception of Francine. "Mr. Mirabel has made the best excuse he
could think of for shortening his visit; and I don't wonder at
it," she said, looking significantly at Emily.

Emily was playing with one of the dogs; exercising him in the
tricks which he had learned. She balanced a morsel of sugar on
his nose--and had no attention to spare for Francine.

Cecilia, as the mistress of the house, felt it her duty to
interfere. "That is a strange remark to make," she answered. "Do
you mean to say that we have driven Mr. Mirabel away from us?"

"I accuse nobody," Francine began with spiteful candor.

"Now she's going to accuse everybody!" Emily interposed,
addressing herself facetiously to the dog.

"But when girls are bent on fascinating men, whether they like it
or not," Francine proceeded, "men have only one alternative--they
must keep out of the way." She looked again at Emily, more
pointedly than ever.

Even gentle Cecilia resented this. "Whom do you refer to?" she
said sharply.

"My dear!" Emily remonstrated, "need you ask?" She glanced at
Francine as she spoke, and then gave the dog his signal. He
tossed up the sugar, and caught it in his mouth. His audience
applauded him--and so, for that time, the skirmish ended.

Among the letters of the next morning's delivery, arrived Alban's
reply. Emily's anticipations proved to be correct. The
drawing-master's du ties would not permit him to leave
Netherwoods; and he, like Mirabel, sent his apologies. His short
letter to Emily contained no further allusion to Miss Jethro; it
began and ended on the first page.

Had he been disappointed by the tone of reserve in which Emily
had written to him, under Mr. Wyvil's advice? Or (as Cecilia
suggested) had his detention at the school so bitterly
disappointed him that he was too disheartened to write at any
length? Emily made no attempt to arrive at a conclusion, either
one way or the other. She seemed to be in depressed spirits; and
she spoke superstitiously, for the first time in Cecilia's
experience of her.

"I don't like this reappearance of Miss Jethro," she said. "If
the mystery about that woman is ever cleared up, it will bring
trouble and sorrow to me--and I believe, in his own secret heart,
Alban Morris thinks so too."

"Write, and ask him," Cecilia suggested.

"He is so kind and so unwilling to distress me," Emily answered,
"that he wouldn't acknowledge it, even if I am right."

In the middle of the week, the course of private life at
Monksmoor suffered an interruption--due to the parliamentary
position of the master of the house.

The insatiable appetite for making and hearing speeches, which
represents one of the marked peculiarities of the English race
(including their cousins in the United States), had seized on Mr.
Wyvil's constituents. There was to be a political meeting at the
market hall, in the neighboring town; and the member was expected
to make an oration, passing in review contemporary events at home
and abroad. "Pray don't think of accompanying me," the good man
said to his guests. "The hall is badly ventilated, and the
speeches, including my own, will not be worth hearing."

This humane warning was ungratefully disregarded. The gentlemen
were all interested in "the objects of the meeting"; and the
ladies were firm in the resolution not to be left at home by
themselves. They dressed with a view to the large assembly of
spectators before whom they were about to appear; and they
outtalked the men on political subjects, all the way to the town.

The most delightful of surprises was in store for them, when they
reached the market hall. Among the crowd of ordinary gentlemen,
waiting under the portico until the proceedings began, appeared
one person of distinction, whose title was "Reverend," and whose
name was Mirabel.

Francine was the first to discover him. She darted up the steps
and held out her hand.

"This _is_ a pleasure!" she cried. "Have you come here to see--"
she was about to say Me, but, observing the strangers round her,
altered the word to Us. "Please give me your arm," she whispered,
before her young friends had arrived within hearing. "I am so
frightened in a crowd!"

She held fast by Mirabel, and kept a jealous watch on him. Was it
only her fancy? or did she detect a new charm in his smile when
he spoke to Emily?

Before it was possible to decide, the time for the meeting had
arrived. Mr. Wyvil's friends were of course accommodated with
seats on the platform. Francine, still insisting on her claim to
Mirabel's arm, got a chair next to him. As she seated herself,
she left him free for a moment. In that moment, the infatuated
man took an empty chair on the other side of him, and placed it
for Emily. He communicated to that hated rival the information
which he ought to have reserved for Francine. "The committee
insist," he said, "on my proposing one of the Resolutions. I
promise not to bore you; mine shall be the shortest speech
delivered at the meeting."

The proceedings began.

Among the earlier speakers not one was inspired by a feeling of
mercy for the audience. The chairman reveled in words. The mover
and seconder of the first Resolution (not having so much as the
ghost of an idea to trouble either of them), poured out language
in flowing and overflowing streams, like water from a perpetual
spring. The heat exhaled by the crowded audience was already
becoming insufferable. Cries of "Sit down!" assailed the orator
of the moment. The chairman was obliged to interfere. A man at
the back of the hall roared out, "Ventilation!" and broke a
window with his stick. He was rewarded with three rounds of
cheers; and was ironically invited to mount the platform and take
the chair.

Under these embarrassing circumstances, Mirabel rose to speak.

He secured silence, at the outset, by a humorous allusion to the
prolix speaker who had preceded him. "Look at the clock,
gentlemen," he said; "and limit my speech to an interval of ten
minutes." The applause which followed was heard, through the
broken window, in the street. The boys among the mob outside
intercepted the flow of air by climbing on each other's shoulders
and looking in at the meeting, through the gaps left by the
shattered glass. Having proposed his Resolution with discreet
brevity of speech, Mirabel courted popularity on the plan adopted
by the late Lord Palmerston in the House of Commons--he told
stories, and made jokes, adapted to the intelligence of the
dullest people who were listening to him. The charm of his voice
and manner completed his success. Punctually at the tenth minute,
he sat down amid cries of "Go on." Francine was the first to take
his hand, and to express admiration mutely by pressing it. He
returned the pressure--but he looked at the wrong lady--the lady
on the other side.

Although she made no complaint, he instantly saw that Emily was
overcome by the heat. Her lips were white, and her eyes were
closing. "Let me take you out," he said, "or you will faint."

Francine started to her feet to follow them. The lower order of
the audience, eager for amusement, put their own humorous
construction on the young lady's action. They roared with
laughter. "Let the parson and his sweetheart be," they called
out; "two's company, miss, and three isn't." Mr. Wyvil interposed
his authority and rebuked them. A lady seated behind Francine
interfered to good purpose by giving her a chair, which placed
her out of sight of the audience. Order was restored--and the
proceedings were resumed.

On the conclusion of the meeting, Mirabel and Emily were found
waiting for their friends at the door. Mr. Wyvil innocently added
fuel to the fire that was burning in Francine. He insisted that
Mirabel should return to Monksmoor, and offered him a seat in the
carriage at Emily's side.

Later in the evening, when they all met at dinner, there appeared
a change in Miss de Sor which surprised everybody but Mirabel.
She was gay and good-humored, and especially amiable and
attentive to Emily--who sat opposite to her at the table. "What
did you and Mr. Mirabel talk about while you were away from us?"
she asked innocently. "Politics?"

Emily readily adopted Francine's friendly tone. "Would you have
talked politics, in my place?" she asked gayly.

"In your place, I should have had the most delightful of
companions," Francine rejoined; "I wish I had been overcome by
the heat too!"

Mirabel--attentively observing her--acknowledged the compliment
by a bow, and left Emily to continue the conversation. In perfect
good faith she owned to having led Mirabel to talk of himself.
She had heard from Cecilia that his early life had been devoted
to various occupations, and she was interested in knowing how
circumstances had led him into devoting himself to the Church.
Francine listened with the outward appearance of implicit belief,
and with the inward conviction that Emily was deliberately
deceiving her. When the little narrative was at an end, she was
more agreeable than ever. She admired Emily's dress, and she
rivaled Cecilia in enjoyment of the good things on the table; she
entertained Mirabel with humorous anecdotes of the priests at St.
Domingo, and was so interested in the manufacture of violins,
ancient and modern, that Mr. Wyvil promised to show her his
famous collection of instruments, after dinner. Her overflowing
amiability included even poor Miss Darnaway and the absent
brothers and sisters. She heard with flattering sympathy, how
they had been ill and had got well again; what amusing tricks
they played, what alarming accidents happened to them, a nd how
remarkably clever they were--"including, I do assure you, dear
Miss de Sor, the baby only ten months old." When the ladies rose
to retire, Francine was, socially speaking, the heroine of the
evening.

While the violins were in course of exhibition, Mirabel found an
opportunity of speaking to Emily, unobserved.

"Have you said, or done, anything to offend Miss de Sor?" he
asked.

"Nothing whatever!" Emily declared, startled by the question.
"What makes you think I have offended her?"

"I have been trying to find a reason for the change in her,"
Mirabel answered--"especially the change toward yourself."

"Well?"

"Well--she means mischief."

"Mischief of what sort?"

"Of a sort which may expose her to discovery--unless she disarms
suspicion at the outset. That is (as I believe) exactly what she
has been doing this evening. I needn't warn you to be on your
guard."

All the next day Emily was on the watch for events--and nothing
happened. Not the slightest appearance of jealousy betrayed
itself in Francine. She made no attempt to attract to herself the
attentions of Mirabel; and she showed no hostility to Emily,
either by word, look, or manner.

. . . . . . . .

The day after, an event occurred at Netherwoods. Alban Morris
received an anonymous letter, addressed to him in these terms:

"A certain young lady, in whom you are supposed to be interested,
is forgetting you in your absence. If you are not mean enough to
allow yourself to be supplanted by another man, join the party at
Monksmoor before it is too late."




Emily found Mirabel in the waiting room at Belford. Her sudden
appearance might well have amazed him; but his face expressed a
more serious emotion than surprise--he looked at her as if she
had alarmed him.

"Didn't you get my message?" he asked. "I told the groom I wished
you to wait for my return. I sent a note to my sister, in case he
made any mistake."

"The man made no mistake," Emily answered. "I was in too great a
hurry to be able to speak with Mrs. Delvin. Did you really
suppose I could endure the suspense of waiting till you came
back? Do you think I can be of no use--I who know Mrs. Rook?"

"They won't let you see her."

"Why not? _You_ seem to be waiting to see her."

"I am waiting for the return of the rector of Belford. He is at
Berwick; and he has been sent for at Mrs. Rook's urgent request."

"Is she dying?"

"She is in fear of death--whether rightly or wrongly, I don't
know. There is some internal injury from the fall. I hope to see
her when the rector returns. As a brother cler gyman, I may with
perfect propriety ask him to use his influence in my favor."

"I am glad to find you so eager about it."

"I am always eager in your interests."

"Don't think me ungrateful," Emily replied gently. "I am no
stranger to Mrs. Rook; and, if I send in my name, I may be able
to see her before the clergyman returns."

She stopped. Mirabel suddenly moved so as to place himself
between her and the door. "I must really beg of you to give up
that idea," he said; "you don't know what horrid sight you may
see--what dreadful agonies of pain this unhappy woman may be
suffering."

His manner suggested to Emily that he might be acting under some
motive which he was unwilling to acknowledge. "If you have a
reason for wishing that I should keep away from Mrs. Rook," she
said, "let me hear what it is. Surely we trust each other? I have
done my best to set the example, at any rate."

Mirabel seemed to be at a loss for a reply.

While he was hesitating, the station-master passed the door.
Emily asked him to direct her to the house in which Mrs. Rook had
been received. He led the way to the end of the platform, and
pointed to the house. Emily and Mrs. Ellmother immediately left
the station. Mirabel accompanied them, still remonstrating, still
raising obstacles.

The house door was opened by an old man. He looked reproachfully
at Mirabel. "You have been told already," he said, "that no
strangers are to see my wife?"

Encouraged by discovering that the man was Mr. Rook, Emily
mentioned her name. "Perhaps you may have heard Mrs. Rook speak
of me," she added.

"I've heard her speak of you oftentimes."

"What does the doctor say?"

"He thinks she may get over it. She doesn't believe him."

"Will you say that I am anxious to see her, if she feels well
enough to receive me?"

Mr. Rook looked at Mrs. Ellmother. "Are there two of you wanting
to go upstairs?" he inquired.

"This is my old friend and servant," Emily answered. "She will
wait for me down here."

"She can wait in the parlor; the good people of this house are
well known to me." He pointed to the parlor door--and then led
the way to the first floor. Emily followed him. Mirabel, as
obstinate as ever, followed Emily.

Mr. Rook opened a door at the end of the landing; and, turning
round to speak to Emily, noticed Mirabel standing behind her.
Without making any remarks, the old man pointed significantly
down the stairs. His resolution was evidently immovable. Mirabel
appealed to Emily to help him.

"She will see me, if _you_ ask her," he said, "Let me wait here?"

The sound of his voice was instantly followed by a cry from the
bed-chamber--a cry of terror.

Mr. Rook hurried into the room, and closed the door. In less than
a minute, he opened it again, with doubt and horror plainly
visible in his face. He stepped up to Mirabel--eyed him with the
closest scrutiny--and drew back again with a look of relief.

"She's wrong," he said; "you are not the man."

This strange proceeding startled Emily.

"What man do you mean?" she asked.

Mr. Rook took no notice of the question. Still looking at
Mirabel, he pointed down the stairs once more. With vacant
eyes--moving mechanically, like a sleep-walker in his
dream--Mirabel silently obeyed. Mr. Rook turned to Emily.

"Are you easily frightened?" he said

"I don't understand you," Emily replied. "Who is going to
frighten me? Why did you speak to Mr. Mirabel in that strange
way?"

Mr. Rook looked toward the bedroom door. "Maybe you'll hear why,
inside there. If I could have my way, you shouldn't see her--but
she's not to be reasoned with. A caution, miss. Don't be too
ready to believe what my wife may say to you. She's had a
fright." He opened the door. "In my belief," he whispered, "she's
off her head."

Emily crossed the threshold. Mr. Rook softly closed the door
behind her.





The arrival of Miss Ladd, some time before she had been expected,
interrupted the two girls at a critical moment. She had hurried
over her business in London, eager to pass the rest of the day
with her favorite pupil. Emily's affectionate welcome was, in
some degree at least, inspired by a sensation of relief. To feel
herself in the embrace of the warm-hearted schoolmistress was
like finding a refuge from Francine.

When the hour of departure arrived, Miss Ladd invited Emily to
Brighton for the second time. "On the last occasion, my dear, you
wrote me an excuse; I won't be treated in that way again. If you
can't return with us now, come to-morrow." She added in a
whisper, "Otherwise, I shall think you include _me_ in your
dislike of Francine."

There was no resisting this. It was arranged that Emily should go
to Brighton on the next day.

Left by herself, her thoughts might have reverted to Mrs.
Ellmother's doubtful prospects, and to Francine's strange
allusion to her life in the West Indies, but for the arrival of
two letters by the afternoon post. The handwriting on one of them
was unknown to her. She opened that one first. It was an answer
to the letter of apology which she had persisted in writing to
Mrs. Rook. Happily for herself, Alban's influence had not been
without its effect, after his departure. She had written
kindly--but she had written briefly at the same time.

Mrs. Rook's reply presented a nicely compounded mixture of
gratitude and grief. The gratitude was addressed to Emily as a
matter of course. The grief related to her "excellent master."
Sir Jervis's strength had suddenly failed. His medical attendant,
being summoned, had expressed no surprise. "My patient is over
seventy years of age," the doctor remarked. "He will sit up late
at night, writing his book; and he refuses to take exercise, till
headache and giddiness force him to try the fresh air. As the
necessary result, he has broken down at last. It may end in
paralysis, or it may end in death." Reporting this expression of
medical opinion, Mrs. Rook's letter glided imperceptibly from
respectful sympathy to modest regard for her own interests in the
future. It might be the sad fate of her husband and herself to be
thrown on the world again. If necessity brought them to London,
would "kind Miss Emily grant her the honor of an interview, and
favor a poor unlucky woman with a word of advice?"

"She may pervert your letter to some use of her own, which you
may have reason to regret." Did Emily remember Alban's warning
words? No: she accepted Mrs. Rook's reply as a gratifying tribute
to the justice of her own opinions.

Having proposed to write to Alban, feeling penitently that she
had been in the wrong, she was now readier than ever to send him
a letter, feeling compassionately that she had been in the right.
Besides, it was due to the faithful friend, who was still working
for her in the reading room, that he should be informed of Sir
Jervis's illness. Whether the old man lived or whether he died,
his literary labors were fatally interrupted in either case; and
one of the consequences would be the termination of her
employment at the Museum. Although the second of the two letters
which she had received was addressed to her in Cecilia's
handwriting, Emily waited to read it until she had first written
to Alban. "He will come to-morrow," she thought; "and we shall
both make apologies. I shall regret that I was angry with him and
he will regret that he was mistaken in his judgment of Mrs. Rook.
We shall be as good friends again as ever."

In this happy frame of mind she opened Cecilia's letter. It was
full of good news from first to last.

The invalid sister had made such rapid progress toward recovery
that the travelers had arranged to set forth on their journey
back to England in a fortnight. "My one regret," Cecilia added,
"is the parting with Lady Doris. She and her husband are going to
Genoa, where they will embark in Lord Janeaway's yacht for a
cruise in the Mediterranean. When we have said that miserable
word good-by--oh, Emily, what a hurry I shall be in to get back
to you! Those allusions to your lonely life are so dreadful, my
dear, that I have destroyed your letter; it is enough to break
one's heart only to look at it. When once I get to London, there
shall be no more solitude for my poor afflicted friend. Papa will
be free from his parliamentary duties in August--and he has
promised to have the house full of delightful people to meet you.
Who do you think will be one of our guests? He is illustrious; he
is fascinating; he deserves a line all to himself, thus:

"The Reverend Miles Mirabel!

"Lady Doris has discovered that the country parsonage, in which
this brilliant clergyman submits to exile, is only twelve miles
away from our house. She has written to Mr. Mirabel to introduce
me, and to mention the date of my return. We will have some fun
with the popular preacher--we will both fall in love with him
together.

"Is there anybody to whom you would like me to send an
invitation? Shall we have Mr. Alban Morris? Now I know how kindly
he took care of you at the railway station, your good opinion of
him is my opinion. Your letter also mentions a doctor. Is he
nice? and do you think he will let me eat pastry, if we have him
too? I am so overflowing with hospitality (all for your sake)
that I am ready to invite anybody, and everybody, to cheer you
and make you happy. Would you like to meet Miss Ladd and the
whole school?

"As to our amusements, make your mind easy.

"I have come to a distinct understanding with Papa that we are to
have dances every evening--except when we try a little concert as
a change. Private theatricals are to follow, when we want another
change after the dancing and the music. No early rising; no fixed
hour for breakfast; everything that is most exquisitely delicious
at dinner--and, to crown all, your room next to mine, for
delightful midnight gossipings, when we ought to be in bed. What
do you say, darling, to the programme?

"A last piece of news--and I have done.

"I have actually had a proposal of marriage, from a young
gentleman who sits opposite me at the table d'hote! When I tell
you that he has white eyelashes, and red hands, and such enormous
front teeth that he can't shut his mouth, you will not need to be
told that I refused him. This vindictive person has abused me
ever since, in the most shameful manner. I heard him last night,
under my window, trying to set one of his friends against me.
'Keep clear of her, my dear fellow; she's the most heartless
creature living.' The friend took my part; he said, 'I don't
agree with you; the young lady is a person of great sensibility.'
'Nonsense!' says my amiable lover; 'she eats too much--her
sensibility is all stomach.' There's a wretch for you. What a
shameful advantage to take of sitting opposite to me at dinner!
Good-by, my love, till we meet soon, and are as happy together as
the day is long."

Emily kissed the signature. At that moment of all others, Cecilia
was such a refreshing contrast to Francine!

Before putting the letter away, she looked again at that part of
it which mentioned Lady Doris's introduction of Cecilia to Mr.
Mirabel. "I don't feel the slightest interest in Mr. Mirabel,"
she thought, smiling as the idea occurred to her; "and I need
never have known him, but for Lady Doris--who is a perfect
stranger to me."

She had just placed the letter in her desk, when a visitor was
announced. Doctor Allday presented himself (in a hurry as usual).

"Another patient waiting?" Emily asked mischievously. "No time to
spare, again?"

"Not a moment," the old gentleman answered. "Have you heard from
Mrs. Ellmother?"

"Yes."

"You don't mean to say you have answered her?"

"I have done better than that, doctor--I have seen her this
morning."

"And consented to be her reference, of course?"

"How well you know me!"

Doctor Allday was a philosopher: he kept his temper. "Just what I
might have expected," he said. "Eve and the apple! Only forbid a
woman to do anything, and she does it directly--be cause you have
forbidden her. I'll try the other way with you now, Miss Emily.
There was something else that I meant to have forbidden."

"What was it?"

"May I make a special request?"

"Certainly."

"Oh, my dear, write to Mrs. Rook! I beg and entreat of you, write
to Mrs. Rook!"

Emily's playful manner suddenly disappeared.

Ignoring the doctor's little outbreak of humor, she waited in
grave surprise, until it was his pleasure to explain himself.

Doctor Allday, on his side, ignored the ominous change in Emily;
he went on as pleasantly as ever. "Mr. Morris and I have had a
long talk about you, my dear. Mr. Morris is a capital fellow; I
recommend him as a sweetheart. I also back him in the matter of
Mrs. Rook.--What's the matter now? You're as red as a rose.
Temper again, eh?"

"Hatred of meanness!" Emily answered indignantly. "I despise a
man who plots, behind my back, to get another man to help him.
Oh, how I have been mistaken in Alban Morris!"

"Oh, how little you know of the best friend you have!" cried the
doctor, imitating her. "Girls are all alike; the only man they
can understand, is the man who flatters them. _Will_ you oblige
me by writing to Mrs. Rook?"

Emily made an attempt to match the doctor, with his own weapons.
"Your little joke comes too late," she said satirically. "There
is Mrs. Rook's answer. Read it, and--" she checked herself, even
in her anger she was incapable of speaking ungenerously to the
old man who had so warmly befriended her. "I won't say to _you_,"
she resumed, "what I might have said to another person."

"Shall I say it for you?" asked the incorrigible doctor. "'Read
it, and be ashamed of yourself'--That was what you had in your
mind, isn't it? Anything to please you, my dear." He put on his
spectacles, read the letter, and handed it back to Emily with an
impenetrable countenance. "What do you think of my new
spectacles?" he asked, as he took the glasses off his nose. "In
the experience of thirty years, I have had three grateful
patients." He put the spectacles back in the case. "This comes
from the third. Very gratifying--very gratifying."

Emily's sense of humor was not the uppermost sense in her at that
moment. She pointed with a peremptory forefinger to Mrs. Rook's
letter. "Have you nothing to say about this?"

The doctor had so little to say about it that he was able to
express himself in one word:

"Humbug!"

He took his hat--nodded kindly to Emily--and hurried away to
feverish pulses waiting to be felt, and to furred tongues that
were ashamed to show themselves.





Alban took Mrs. Ellmother at her word. "I am going to venture on
a guess," he said. "You have been with Miss de Sor to-night."

"Quite true, Mr. Morris."

"I am going to guess again. Did Miss de Sor ask you to stay with
her, when you went into her room?"

"That's it! She rang for me, to see how I was getting on with my
needlework--and she was what I call hearty, for the first time
since I have been in her service. I didn't think badly of her
when she first talked of engaging me; and I've had reason to
repent of my opinion ever since. Oh, she showed the cloven foot
to-night! 'Sit down,' she says; 'I've nothing to read, and I hate
work; let's have a little chat.' She's got a glib tongue of her
own. All I could do was to say a word now and then to keep her
going. She talked and talked till it was time to light the lamp.
She was particular in telling me to put the shade over it. We
were half in the dark, and half in the light. She trapped me
(Lord knows how!) into talking about foreign parts; I mean the
place she lived in before they sent her to England. Have you
heard that she comes from the West lndies?"

"Yes; I have heard that. Go on."

"Wait a bit, sir. There's something, by your leave, that I want
to know. Do you believe in Witchcraft?"

"I know nothing about it. Did Miss de Sor put that question to
you?"

"She did."

"And how did you answer?"

"Neither in one way nor the other. I'm in two minds about that
matter of Witchcraft. When I was a girl, there was an old woman
in our village, who was a sort of show. People came to see her
from all the country round--gentlefolks among them. It was her
great age that made her famous. More than a hundred years old,
sir! One of our neighbors didn't believe in her age, and she
heard of it. She cast a spell on his flock. I tell you, she sent
a plague on his sheep, the plague of the Bots. The whole flock
died; I remember it well. Some said the sheep would have had the
Bots anyhow. Some said it was the spell. Which of them was right?
How am I to settle it?"

"Did you mention this to Miss de Sor?"

"I was obliged to mention it. Didn't I tell you, just now, that I
can't make up my mind about Witchcraft? 'You don't seem to know
whether you believe or disbelieve,' she says. It made me look
like a fool. I told her I had my reasons, and then I was obliged
to give them."

"And what did she do then?"

"She said, 'I've got a better story of Witchcraft than yours.'
And she opened a little book, with a lot of writing in it, and
began to read. Her story made my flesh creep. It turns me cold,
sir, when I think of it now."

He heard her moaning and shuddering. Strongly as his interest was
excited, there was a compassionate reluctance in him to ask her
to go on. His merciful scruples proved to be needless. The
fascination of beauty it is possible to resist. The fascination
of horror fastens its fearful hold on us, struggle against it as
we may. Mrs. Ellmother repeated what she had heard, in spite of
herself.

"It happened in the West Indies," she said; "and the writing of a
woman slave was the writing in the little book. The slave wrote
about her mother. Her mother was a black--a Witch in her own
country. There was a forest in her own country. The devil taught
her Witchcraft in the forest. The serpents and the wild beasts
were afraid to touch her. She lived without eating. She was sold
for a slave, and sent to the island--an island in the West
Indies. An old man lived there; the wickedest man of them all. He
filled the black Witch with devilish knowledge. She learned to
make the image of wax. The image of wax casts spells. You put
pins in the image of wax. At every pin you put, the person under
the spell gets nearer and nearer to death. There was a poor black
in the island. He offended the Witch. She made his image in wax;
she cast spells on him. He couldn't sleep; he couldn't eat; he
was such a coward that common noises frightened him. Like Me! Oh,
God, like me!"

"Wait a little," Alban interposed. "You are exciting yourself
again--wait."

"You're wrong, sir! You think it ended when she finished her
story, and shut up her book; there's worse to come than anything
you've heard yet. I don't know what I did to offend her. She
looked at me and spoke to me, as if I was the dirt under her
feet. 'If you're too stupid to understand what I have been
reading,' she says, 'get up and go to the glass. Look at
yourself, and remember what happened to the slave who was under
the spell. You're getting paler and paler, and thinner and
thinner; you're pining away just as he did. Shall I tell you
why?' She snatched off the shade from the lamp, and put her hand
under the table, and brought out an image of wax. _My_ image! She
pointed to three pins in it. 'One,' she says, 'for no sleep. One
for no appetite. One for broken nerves.' I asked her what I had
done to make such a bitter enemy of her. She says, 'Remember what
I asked of you when we talked of your being my servant. Choose
which you will do? Die by inches' (I swear she said it as I hope
to be saved); 'die by inches, or tell me--'"

There--in the full frenzy of the agitation that possessed
 her--there, Mrs. Ellmother suddenly stopped.

Alban's first impression was that she might have fainted. He
looked closer, and could just see her shadowy figure still seated
in the chair. He asked if she was ill. No.

"Then why don't you go on?"

"I have done," she answered.

"Do you think you can put me off," he rejoined sternly, "with
such an excuse as that? What did Miss de Sor ask you to tell her?
You promised to trust me. Be as good as your word."

In the days of her health and strength, she would have set him at
defiance. All she could do now was to appeal to his mercy.

"Make some allowance for me," she said. "I have been terribly
upset. What has become of my courage? What has broken me down in
this way? Spare me, sir."

He refused to listen. "This vile attempt to practice on your
fears may be repeated," he reminded her. "More cruel advantage
may be taken of the nervous derangement from which you are
suffering in the climate of this place. You little know me, if
you think I will allow that to go on."

She made a last effort to plead with him. "Oh sir, is this
behaving like the good kind man I thought you were? You say you
are Miss Emily's friend? Don't press me--for Miss Emily's sake!"

"Emily!" Alban exclaimed. "Is _she_ concerned in this?"

There was a change to tenderness in his voice, which persuaded
Mrs. Ellmother that she had found her way to the weak side of
him. Her one effort now was to strengthen the impression which
she believed herself to have produced. "Miss Emily _is_ concerned
in it," she confessed.

"In what way?"

"Never mind in what way."

"But I do mind."

"I tell you, sir, Miss Emily must never know it to her dying
day!"

The first suspicion of the truth crossed Alban's mind.

"I understand you at last," he said. "What Miss Emily must never
know--is what Miss de Sor wanted you to tell her. Oh, it's
useless to contradict me! Her motive in trying to frighten you is
as plain to me now as if she had confessed it. Are you sure you
didn't betray yourself, when she showed the image of wax?"

"I should have died first!" The reply had hardly escaped her
before she regretted it. "What makes you want to be so sure about
it?" she said. "It looks as if you knew--"

"I do know."

"What!"

The kindest thing that he could do now was to speak out. "Your
secret is no secret to _me_," he said.

Rage and fear shook her together. For the moment she was like the
Mrs. Ellmother of former days. "You lie!" she cried.

"I speak the truth."

"I won't believe you! I daren't believe you!"

"Listen to me. In Emily's interests, listen to me. I have read of
the murder at Zeeland--"

"That's nothing! The man was a namesake of her father."

"The man was her father himself. Keep your seat! There is nothing
to be alarmed about. I know that Emily is ignorant of the horrid
death that her father died. I know that you and your late
mistress have kept the discovery from her to this day. I know the
love and pity which plead your excuse for deceiving her, and the
circumstances that favored the deception. My good creature,
Emily's peace of mind is as sacred to me as it is to you! I love
her as I love my own life--and better. Are you calmer, now?"

He heard her crying: it was the best relief that could come to
her. After waiting a while to let the tears have their way, he
helped her to rise. There was no more to be said now. The one
thing to do was to take her back to the house.

"I can give you a word of advice," he said, "before we part for
the night. You must leave Miss de Sor's service at once. Your
health will be a sufficient excuse. Give her warning
immediately."

Mrs. Ellmother hung back, when he offered her his arm. The bare
prospect of seeing Francine again was revolting to her. On
Alban's assurance that the notice to leave could be given in
writing, she made no further resistance. The village clock struck
eleven as they ascended the terrace steps.

A minute later, another person left the grounds by the path which
led to the house. Alban's precaution had been taken too late. The
smell of tobacco-smoke had guided Francine, when she was at a
loss which way to turn next in search of Mrs. Ellmother. For the
last quarter of an hour she had been listening, hidden among the
trees.





"May I say a word?" Mrs. Mosey inquired. She entered the
room--pale and trembling. Seeing that ominous change, Emily
dropped back into her chair.

"Dead?" she said faintly.

Mrs. Mosey looked at her in vacant surprise.

"I wish to say, miss, that your aunt has frightened me."

Even that vague allusion was enough for Emily.

"You need say no more," she replied. "I know but too well how my
aunt's mind is affected by the fever."

Confused and frightened as she was, Mrs. Mosey still found relief
in her customary flow of words.

"Many and many a person have I nursed in fever," she announced.
"Many and many a person have I heard say strange things. Never
yet, miss, in all my experience--!"

"Don't tell me of it!" Emily interposed.

"Oh, but I _must_ tell you! In your own interests, Miss Emily--in
your own interests. I won't be inhuman enough to leave you alone
in the house to-night; but if this delirium goes on, I must ask
you to get another nurse. Shocking suspicions are lying in wait
for me in that bedroom, as it were. I can't resist them as I
ought, if I go back again, and hear your aunt saying what she has
been saying for the last half hour and more. Mrs. Ellmother has
expected impossibilities of me; and Mrs. Ellmother must take the
consequences. I don't say she didn't warn me--speaking, you will
please to understand, in the strictest confidence. 'Elizabeth,'
she says, 'you know how wildly people talk in Miss Letitia's
present condition. Pay no heed to it,' she says. 'Let it go in at
one ear and out at the other,' she says. 'If Miss Emily asks
questions--you know nothing about it. If she's frightened--you
know nothing about it. If she bursts into fits of crying that are
dreadful to see, pity her, poor thing, but take no notice.' All
very well, and sounds like speaking out, doesn't it? Nothing of
the sort! Mrs. Ellmother warns me to expect this, that, and the
other. But there is one horrid thing (which I heard, mind, over
and over again at your aunt's bedside) that she does _not_
prepare me for; and that horrid thing is--Murder!"

At that last word, Mrs. Mosey dropped her voice to a whisper--and
waited to see what effect she had produced.

Sorely tried
 already by the cruel perplexities of her position, Emily's
courage failed to resist the first sensation of horror, aroused
in her by the climax of the nurse's hysterical narrative.
Encouraged by her silence, Mrs. Mosey went on. She lifted one
hand with theatrical solemnity--and luxuriously terrified herself
with her own horrors.

"An inn, Miss Emily; a lonely inn, somewhere in the country; and
a comfortless room at the inn, with a makeshift bed at one end of
it, and a makeshift bed at the other--I give you my word of
honor, that was how your aunt put it. She spoke of two men next;
two men asleep (you understand) in the two beds. I think she
called them 'gentlemen'; but I can't be sure, and I wouldn't
deceive you--you know I wouldn't deceive you, for the world. Miss
Letitia muttered and mumbled, poor soul. I own I was getting
tired of listening--when she burst out plain again, in that one
horrid word--Oh, miss, don't be impatient! don't interrupt me!"

Emily did interrupt, nevertheless. In some degree at least she
had recovered herself. "No more of it!" she said--"I won't hear a
word more."

But Mrs. Mosey was too resolutely bent on asserting her own
importance, by making the most of the alarm that she had
suffered, to be repressed by any ordinary method of remonstrance.
Without paying the slightest attention to what Emily had said,
she went on again more loudly and more excitably than ever.

"Listen, miss--listen! The dreadful part of it is to come; you
haven't heard about the two gentlemen yet. One of them was
murdered--what do you think of that!--and the other (I heard your
aunt say it, in so many words) committed the crime. Did Miss
Letitia fancy she was addressing a lot of people when _you_ were
nursing her? She called out, like a person making public
proclamation, when I was in her room. 'Whoever you are, good
people' (she says), 'a hundred pounds reward, if you find the
runaway murderer. Search everywhere for a poor weak womanish
creature, with rings on his little white hands. There's nothing
about him like a man, except his voice--a fine round voice.
You'll know him, my friends--the wretch, the monster--you'll know
him by his voice.' That was how she put it; I tell you again,
that was how she put it. Did you hear her scream? Ah, my dear
young lady, so much the better for you! 'O the horrid murder'
(she says)--'hush it up!' I'll take my Bible oath before the
magistrate," cried Mrs. Mosey, starting out of her chair, "your
aunt said, 'Hush it up!'"

Emily crossed the room. The energy of her character was roused at
last. She seized the foolish woman by the shoulders, forced her
back in the chair, and looked her straight in the face without
uttering a word.

For the moment, Mrs. Mosey was petrified. She had fully
expected--having reached the end of her terrible story--to find
Emily at her feet, entreating her not to carry out her intention
of leaving the cottage the next morning; and she had determined,
after her sense of her own importance had been sufficiently
flattered, to grant the prayer of the helpless young lady. Those
were her anticipations--and how had they been fulfilled? She had
been treated like a mad woman in a state of revolt!

"How dare you assault me?" she asked piteously. "You ought to be
ashamed of yourself. God knows I meant well."

"You are not the first person," Emily answered, quietly releasing
her, "who has done wrong with the best intentions."

"I did my duty, miss, when I told you what your aunt said."

"You forgot your duty when you listened to what my aunt said."

"Allow me to explain myself."

"No: not a word more on _that_ subject shall pass between us.
Remain here, if you please; I have something to suggest in your
own interests. Wait, and compose yourself."

The purpose which had taken a foremost place in Emily's mind
rested on the firm foundation of her love and pity for her aunt.

Now that she had regained the power to think, she felt a hateful
doubt pressed on her by Mrs. Mosey's disclosures. Having taken
for granted that there was a foundation in truth for what she
herself had heard in her aunt's room, could she reasonably resist
the conclusion that there must be a foundation in truth for what
Mrs. Mosey had heard, under similar circumstances?

There was but one way of escaping from this dilemma--and Emily
deliberately took it. She turned her back on her own convictions;
and persuaded herself that she had been in the wrong, when she
had attached importance to anything that her aunt had said, under
the influence of delirium. Having adopted this conclusion, she
resolved to face the prospect of a night's solitude by the
death-bed--rather than permit Mrs. Mosey to have a second
opportunity of drawing her own inferences from what she might
hear in Miss Letitia's room.

"Do you mean to keep me waiting much longer, miss?"

"Not a moment longer, now you are composed again," Emily
answered. "I have been thinking of what has happened; and I fail
to see any necessity for putting off your departure until the
doctor comes to-morrow morning. There is really no objection to
your leaving me to-night."

"I beg your pardon, miss; there _is_ an objection. I have already
told you I can't reconcile it to my conscience to leave you here
by yourself. I am not an inhuman woman," said Mrs. Mosey, putting
her handkerchief to her eyes--smitten with pity for herself.

Emily tried the effect of a conciliatory reply. "I am grateful
for your kindness in offering to stay with me," she said.

"Very good of you, I'm sure," Mrs. Mosey answered ironically.
"But for all that, you persist in sending me away."

"I persist in thinking that there is no necessity for my keeping
you here until to-morrow."

"Oh, have it your own way! I am not reduced to forcing my company
on anybody."

Mrs. Mosey put her handkerchief in her pocket, and asserted her
dignity. With head erect and slowly-marching steps she walked out
of the room. Emily was left in the cottage, alone with her dying
aunt.





Mr. Rook having completed his evidence, the police authorities
were the next witnesses examined.

They had not found the slightest trace of any attempt to break
into the house in the night. The murdered man's gold watch and
chain were discovered under his pillow. On examining his clothes
the money was found in his purse, and the gold studs and sleeve
buttons were left in his shirt. But his pocketbook (seen by
witnesses who had not yet been examined) was missing. The search
for visiting cards and letters had proved to be fruitless. Only
the initials, "J. B.," were marked on his linen. He had brought
no luggage with him to the inn. Nothing could be found which led
to the discovery of his name or of the purpose which had taken
him into that part of the country.

The police examined the outhouse next, in search of
circumstantial evidence against the missing man.

He must have carried away his knapsack, when he took to flight,
but he had been (probably) in too great a hurry to look for his
razor--or perhaps too terrified to touch it, if it had attracted
his notice. The leather roll, and the other articles used for his
toilet, had been taken away. Mr. Rook identified the
blood-stained razor. He had noticed overnight the name of the
Belgian city, "Liege," engraved on it.

The yard was the next place inspected. Foot-steps were found on
the muddy earth up to the wall. But the road on the other side
had been recently mended with stones, and the trace of the
fugitive was lost. Casts had been taken of the footsteps; and no
other means of discovery had been left untried. The authorities
in London had also been communicated with by telegraph.

The doctor being called, described a personal peculiarity, which
he had noticed at the post-mortem examination, and which might
lead to the identification of the murdered man.

As to the cause of death, the witness said it could be stated in
two words. The internal jugular vein had been cut through, with
such violence, judging by the appearances, that the wound could
not have been inflicted, in the act of suicide, by the hand of
the deceased person. No other injuries, and no sign of disease,
was found on the body. The one cause of death had been
Hemorrhage; and the one peculiarity which called for notice had
been discovered in the mouth. Two of the front teeth, in the
upper jaw, were false. They had been so admirably made to
resemble the natural teeth on either side of them, in form and
color, that the witness had only hit on the discovery by
accidentally touching the inner side of the gum with one of his
fingers.

The landlady was examined, when the doctor had retired. Mrs. Rook
was able, in answering questions put to her, to give important
information, in reference to the missing pocketbook.

Before retiring to rest, the two gentlemen had paid the
bill--intending to leave the inn the first thing in the morning.
The traveler with the knapsack paid his share in money. The other
unfortunate gentleman looked into his purse, and found only a
shilling and a sixpence in it. He asked Mrs. Rook if she could
change a bank-note. She told him it could be done, provided the
note was for no considerable sum of money. Upon that he opened
his pocketbook (which the witness described minutely) and turned
out the contents on the table. After searching among many Bank of
England notes, some in one pocket of the book and some in
another, he found a note of the value of five pounds. He
thereupon settled his bill, and received the change from Mrs.
Rook--her husband being in another part of the room, attending to
the guests. She noticed a letter in an envelope, and a few cards
which looked (to her judgment) like visiting cards, among the
bank-notes which he had turned out on the table. When she
returned to him with the change, he had just put them back, and
was closing the pocketbook. She saw him place it in one of the
breast pockets of his coat.

The fellow-traveler who had accompanied him to the inn was
present all the time, sitting on the opposite side of the table.
He made a remark when he saw the notes produced. He said, "Put
all that money back--don't tempt a poor man like me!" It was said
laughing, as if by way of a joke.

Mrs. Rook had observed nothing more that night; had slept as
soundly as usual; and had been awakened when her husband knocked
at the outhouse door, according to instructions received from the
gentlemen, overnight.

Three of the guests in the public room corroborated Mrs. Rook's
evidence. They were respectable persons, well and widely known in
that part of Hampshire. Besides these, there were two strangers
staying in the house. They referred the coroner to their
employers--eminent manufacturers at Sheffield and
Wolverhampton--whose testimony spoke for itself.

The last witness called was a grocer in the village, who kept the
post-office.

On the evening of the 30th, a dark gentleman, wearing his beard,
knocked at the door, and asked for a letter addressed to "J. B.,
Post-office, Zeeland." The letter had arrived by that morning's
post; but, being Sunday evening, the grocer requested that
application might be made for it the next morning. The stranger
said the letter contained news, which it was of importance to him
to receive without delay. Upon this, the grocer made an exception
to customary rules and gave him the letter. He read it by the
light of the lamp in the passage. It must have been short, for
the reading was done in a moment. He seemed to think over it for
a while; and then he turned round to go out. There was nothing to
notice in his look or in his manner. The witness offered a remark
on the weather; and the gentleman said, "Yes, it looks like a bad
night"--and so went away.

The postmaster's evidence was of importance in one respect: it
suggested the motive which had brought the deceased to Zeeland.
The letter addressed to "J. B." was, in all probability, the
letter seen by Mrs. Rook among the contents of the pocketbook,
spread out on the table.

The inquiry being, so far, at an end, the inquest was
adjourned--on the chance of obtaining additional evidence, when
the reported proceedings were read by the public.

                                        . . . . . . . .

Consulting a later number of the newspaper Emily discovered that
the deceased person had been identified by a witness from London.

Henry Forth, gentleman's valet, being examined, made the
following statement:

He had read the medical evidence contained in the report of the
inquest; and, believing that he could identify the deceased, had
been sent by his present master to assist the object of the
inquiry. Ten days since, being then out of place, he had answered
an advertisement. The next day, he was instructed to call at
Tracey's Hotel, London, at six o'clock in the evening, and to ask
for Mr. James Brown. Arriving at the hotel he saw the gentleman
for a few minutes only. Mr. Brown had a friend with him. After
glancing over the valet's references, he said, "I haven't time
enough to speak to you this evening. Call here to-morrow morning
at nine o'clock." The gentleman who was present laughed, and
said, "You won't be up!" Mr. Brown answered, "That won't matter;
the man can come to my bedroom, and let me see how he understands
his duties, on trial." At nine the next morning, Mr. Brown was
reported to be still in bed; and the witness was informed of the
number of the room. He knocked at the door. A drowsy voice inside
said something, which he interpreted as meaning "Come in." He
went in. The toilet-table was on his left hand, and the bed (with
the lower curtain drawn) was on his right. He saw on the table a
tumbler with a little water in it, and with two false teeth in
the water. Mr. Brown started up in bed--looked at him
furiously--abused him for daring to enter the room--and shouted
to him to "get out." The witness, not accustomed to be treated in
that way, felt naturally indignant, and at once withdrew--but not
before he had plainly seen the vacant place which the false teeth
had been made to fill. Perhaps Mr. Brown had forgotten that he
had left his teeth on the table. Or perhaps he (the valet) had
misunderstood what had been said to him when he knocked at the
door. Either way, it seemed to be plain enough that the gentleman
resented the discovery of his false teeth by a stranger.

Having concluded his statement the witness proceeded to identify
the remains of the deceased.

He at once recognized the gentleman named James Brown, whom he
had twice seen--once in the evening, and again the next
morning--at Tracey's Hotel. In answer to further inquiries, he
declared that he knew nothing of the family, or of the place of
residence, of the deceased. He complained to the proprietor of
the hotel of the rude treatment that he had received, and asked
if Mr. Tracey knew anything of Mr. James Brown. Mr. Tracey knew
nothing of him. On consulting the hotel book it was found that he
had given notice to leave, that afternoon.

Before returning to London, the witness produced references which
gave him an excellent character. He also left the address of the
master who had engaged him three days since.

The last precaution adopted was to have the face of the corpse
photographed, before the coffin was closed. On the same day the
jury agreed on their verdict: "Willful murder against some person
unknown."

                                        . . . . . . . .


Two days later, Emily found a last allusion to the
crime--extracted from the columns of the _South Hampshire
Gazette_.

A relative of the deceased, seeing the report of the adjourned
inquest, had appeared (accompanied by a medical gentleman); had
seen the photograph; and had declared the identification by Henry
Forth to be correct.

Among other particulars, now communicated for the first time, it
was stated that the late Mr. James Brown had been unreasonably
sensitive on the subject of his false teeth, and that the one
member of his family who knew of his wearing them was the
relative who now claimed his remains.

The claim having been established to the satisfaction of the
authorities, the corpse was removed by railroad the same day. No
further light had been thrown on the murder. The Handbill
offering the reward, and describing the suspected man, had failed
to prove of any assistance to the investigations of the police.

From that date, no further notice of the crime committed at the
Hand-in-Hand inn appeared in the public journals.

                                        . . . . . . . .


Emily closed the volume which she had been consulting, and
thankfully acknowledged the services of the librarian.

The new reader had excited this gentleman's interest. Noticing
how carefully she examined the numbers of the old newspaper, he
looked at her, from time to time, wondering whether it was good
news or bad of which she was in search. She read steadily and
continuously; but she never rewarded his curiosity by any outward
sign of the impression that had been produced on her. When she
left the room there was nothing to remark in her manner; she
looked quietly thoughtful--and that was all.

The librarian smiled--amused by his own folly. Because a
stranger's appearance had attracted him, he had taken it for
granted that circumstances of romantic interest must be connected
with her visit to the library. Far from misleading him, as he
supposed, his fancy might have been employed to better purpose,
if it had taken a higher flight still--and had associated Emily
with the fateful gloom of tragedy, in place of the brighter
interest of romance.

There, among the ordinary readers of the day, was a dutiful and
affectionate daughter following the dreadful story of the death
of her father by murder, and believing it to be the story of a
stranger--because she loved and trusted the person whose
short-sighted mercy had deceived her. That very discovery, the
dread of which had shaken the good doctor's firm nerves, had
forced Alban to exclude from his confidence the woman whom he
loved, and had driven the faithful old servant from the bedside
of her dying mistress--that very discovery Emily had now made,
with a face which never changed color, and a heart which beat at
ease. Was the deception that had won this cruel victory over
truth destined still to triumph in the days which were to come?
Yes--if the life of earth is a foretaste of the life of hell.
No--if a lie _is_ a lie, be the merciful motive for the falsehood
what it may. No--if all deceit contains in it the seed of
retribution, to be ripened inexorably in the lapse of time.





The parting words had been spoken. Emily and her companion were
on their way to London.

For some little time, they traveled in silence--alone in the
railway carriage. After submitting as long as she could to lay an
embargo on the use of her tongue, Mrs. Ellmother started the
conversation by means of a question: "Do you think Mr. Mirabel
will get over it, miss?"

"It's useless to ask me," Emily said. "Even the great man from
Edinburgh is not able to decide yet, whether he will recover or
not."

"You have taken me into your confidence, Miss Emily, as you
promised--and I have got something in my mind in consequence. May
I mention it without giving offense?"

"What is it?"

"I wish you had never taken up with Mr. Mirabel."

Emily was silent. Mrs. Ellmother, having a design of her own to
accomplish, ventured to speak more plainly. "I often think of Mr.
Alban Morris," she proceeded. "I always did like him, and I
always shall."

Emily suddenly pulled down her veil. "Don't speak of him!" she
said.

"I didn't mean to offend you."

"You don't offend me. You distress me. Oh, how often I have
wished--!" She threw herself back in a corner of the carriage and
said no more.

Although not remarkable for the possession of delicate tact, Mrs.
Ellmother discovered that the best course she could now follow
was a course of silence.

Even at the time when she had most implicitly trusted Mirabel,
the fear that she might have acted hastily and harshly toward
Alban had occasionally troubled Emily's mind. The impression
produced by later events had not only intensified this feeling,
but had presented the motives of that true friend under an
entirely new point of view. If she had been left in ignorance of
the manner of her father's death--as Alban had designed to leave
her; as she would have been left, but for the treachery of
Francine--how happily free she would have been from thoughts
which it was now a terror to her to recall. She would have parted
from Mirabel, when the visit to the pleasant country house had
come to an end, remembering him as an amusing acquaintance and
nothing more. He would have been spared, and she would have been
spared, the shock that had so cruelly assailed them both. What
had she gained by Mrs. Rook's detestable confession? The result
had been perpetual disturbance of mind provoked by self-torturing
speculations on the subject of the murder. If Mirabel was
innocent, who was guilty? The false wife, without pity and
without shame--or the brutal husband, who looked capable of any
enormity? What was her future to be? How was it all to end? In
the despair of that bitter moment--seeing her devoted old servant
looking at her with kind compassionate eyes--Emily's troubled
spirit sought refuge in impetuous self-betrayal; the very
betrayal which she had resolved should not escape her, hardly a
minute since!

She bent forward out of her corner, and suddenly drew up her
veil. "Do you expect to see Mr. Alban Morris, when we get back?"
she asked.

"I should like to see him, miss--if you have no objection."

"Tell him I am ashamed of myself! and say I ask his pardon with
all my heart!"

"The Lord be praised!" Mrs. Ellmother burst out--and then, when
it was too late, remembered the conventional restraints
appropriate to the occasion. "Gracious, what a fool I am!" she
said to herself. "Beautiful weather, Miss Emily, isn't it?" she
continued, in a desperate hurry to change the subject.

Emily reclined again in her corner of the carriage. She smiled,
for the first time since she had become Mrs. Delvin's guest at
the tower.



Reaching the hotel at which he was accustomed to stay when he was
in London, Mirabel locked the door of his room. He looked at the
houses on the opposite side of the street. His mind was in such a
state of morbid distrust that he lowered the blind over the
window. In solitude and obscurity, the miserable wretch sat down
in a corner, and covered his face with his hands, and tried to
realize what had happened to him.

Nothing had been said at the fatal interview with Emily, which
could have given him the slightest warning of what was to come.
Her father's name--absolutely unknown to him when he fled from
the inn--had only been communicated to the public by the
newspaper reports of the adjourned inquest. At the time when
those reports appeared, he was in hiding, under circumstances
which prevented him from seeing a newspaper. While the murder was
still a subject of conversation, he was in France--far out of the
track of English travelers--and he remained on the continent
until the summer of eighteen hundred and eighty-one. No exercise
of discretion, on his part, could have extricated him from the
terrible position in which he was now placed. He stood pledged to
Emily to discover the man suspected of the murder of her father;
and that man was--himself!

What refuge was left open to him?

If he took to flight, his sudden disappearance would be a
suspicious circumstance in itself, and would therefore provoke
inquiries which might lead to serious results. Supposing that he
overlooked the risk thus presented, would he be capable of
enduring a separation from Emily, which might be a separation for
life? Even in the first horror of discovering his situation, her
influence remained unshaken--the animating spirit of the one
manly capacity for resistance which raised him above the reach of
his own fears. The only prospect before him which he felt himself
to be incapable of contemplating, was the prospect of leaving
Emily.

Having arrived at this conclusion, his fears urged him to think
of providing for his own safety.

The first precaution to adopt was to separate Emily from friends
whose advice might be hostile to his interests--perhaps even
subversive of his security. To effect this design, he had need of
an ally whom he could trust. That ally was at his disposal, far
away in the north.

At the time when Francine's jealousy began to interfere with all
freedom of intercourse between Emily and himself at Monksmoor, he
had contemplated making arrangements which might enable them to
meet at the house of his invalid sister, Mrs. Delvin. He had
spoken of her, and of the bodily affliction which confined her to
her room, in terms which had already interested Emily. In the
present emergency, he decided on returning to the subject, and on
hastening the meeting between the two women which he had first
suggested at Mr. Wyvil's country seat.

No time was to be lost in carrying out this intention. He wrote
to Mrs. Delvin by that day's post; confiding to her, in the first
place, the critical position in which he now found himself. This
done, he proceeded as follows:

"To your sound judgment, dearest Agatha, it may appear that I am
making myself needlessly uneasy about the future. Two persons
only know that I am the man who escaped from the inn at Zeeland.
You are one of them, and Miss Jethro is the other. On you I can
absolutely rely; and, after my experience of her, I ought to feel
sure of Miss Jethro. I admit this; but I cannot get over my
distrust of Emily's friends. I fear the cunning old doctor; I
doubt Mr. Wyvil; I hate Alban Morris.

"Do me a favor, my dear. Invite Emily to be your guest, and so
separate her from these friends. The old servant who attends on
her will be included in the invitation, of course. Mrs. Ellmother
is, as I believe, devoted to the interests of Mr. Alban Morris:
she will be well out of the way of doing mischief, while we have
her safe in your northern solitude.

"There is no fear that Emily will refuse your invitation.

"In the first place, she is already interested in you. In the
second place, I shall consider the small proprieties of social
life; and, instead of traveling with her to your house, I shall
follow by a later train. In the third place, I am now the chosen
adviser in whom she trusts; and what I tell her to do, she will
do. It pains me, really and truly pains me, to be compelled to
deceive her--but the other alternative is to reveal myself as the
wretch of whom she is in search. Was there ever such a situation?
And, oh, Agatha, I am so fond of her! If I fail to persuade her
to be my wife, I don't care what becomes of me. I used to think
disgrace, and death on the scaffold, the most frightful prospect
that a man can contemplate. In my present frame of mind, a life
without Emily may just as well end in that way as in any other.
When we are together in your old sea-beaten tower, do your best,
my dear, to incline the heart of this sweet girl toward me. If
she remains in London, how do I know that Mr. Morris may not
recover the place he has lost in her good opinion? The bare idea
of it turns me cold.

"There is one more point on which I must touch, before I can
finish my letter.

"When you last wrote, you told me that Sir Jervis Redwood was not
expected to live much longer, and that the establishment would be
broken up after his death. Can you find out for me what will
become, under the circumstances, of Mr. and Mrs. Rook? So far as
I am concerned, I don't doubt that the alteration in my personal
appearance, which has protected me for years past, may be trusted
to preserve me from recognition by these two people. But it is of
the utmost importance, remembering the project to which Emily has
devoted herself, that she should not meet with Mrs. Rook. They
have been already in correspondence; and Mrs. Rook has expressed
an intention (if the opportunity offers itself) of calling at the
cottage. Another reason, and a pressing reason, for removing
Emily from London! We can easily keep the Rooks out of _your_
house; but I own I should feel more at my ease, if I heard that
they had left Northumberland."

With that confession, Mrs. Delvin's brother closed his letter.






Miss De Sor and Miss Wyvil were still sitting together under the
trees, talking of the murder at the inn.

"And is that really all you can tell me?" said Francine.

"That is all," Cecilia answered.

"Is there no love in it?"

"None that I know of."

"It's the most uninteresting murder that ever was committed. What
shall we do with ourselves? I'm tired of being here in the
garden. When do the performances in the schoolroom begin?"

"Not for two hours yet."

Francine yawned. "And what part do you take in it?" she asked.

"No part, my dear. I tried once--only to sing a simple little
song. When I found myself standing before all the company and saw
rows of ladies and gentlemen waiting for me to begin, I was so
frightened that Miss Ladd had to make an apology for me. I didn't
get over it for the rest of the day. For the first time in my
life, I had no appetite for my dinner. Horrible!" said Cecilia,
shuddering over the remembrance of it. "I do assure you, I
thought I was going to die."

Perfectly unimpressed by this harrowing narrative, Francine
turned her head lazily toward the house. The door was thrown open
at the same moment. A lithe little person rapidly descended the
steps that led to the lawn.

"It's Emily come back again," said Francine.

"And she seems to be rather in a hurry," Cecilia remarked.

Francine's satirical smile showed itself for a moment. Did this
appearance of hurry in Emily's movements denote impatience to
resume the recital of "the dagger-scene"? She had no book in her
hand; she never even looked toward Francine. Sorrow became
plainly visible in her face as she approached the two girls.

Cecilia rose in alarm. She had been the first person to whom
Emily had confided her domestic anxieties. "Bad news from your
aunt?" she asked.

"No, my dear; no news at all." Emily put her arms tenderly round
her friend's neck. "The time has come, Cecilia," she said. "We
must wish each other good-by."

"Is Mrs. Rook here already?"

"It's _you_, dear, who are going," Emily answered sadly. "They
have sent the governess to fetch you. Miss Ladd is too busy in
the schoolroom to see her--and she has told me all about it.
Don't be alarmed. There is no bad news from home. Your plans are
altered; that's all."

"Altered?" Cecilia repeated. "In what way?"

"In a very agreeable way--you are going to travel. Your father
wishes you to be in London, in time for the evening mail to
France."

Cecilia guessed what had happened. "My sister is not getting
well," she said, "and the doctors are sending her to the
Continent."

"To the baths at St. Moritz," Emily added. "There is only one
difficulty in the way; and you can remove it. Your sister has the
good old governess to take care of her, and the courier to
relieve her of all trouble on the journey. They were to have
started yesterday. You know how fond Julia is of you. At the last
moment, she won't hear of going away, unless you go too. The
rooms are waiting at St. Moritz; and your father is annoyed (the
governess says) by the delay that has taken place already."

She paused. Cecilia was silent. "Surely you don't hesitate?"
Emily said.

"I am too happy to go wherever Julia go es," Cecilia answered
warmly; "I was thinking of you, dear." Her tender nature,
shrinking from the hard necessities of life, shrank from the
cruelly-close prospect of parting. "I thought we were to have had
some hours together yet," she said. "Why are we hurried in this
way? There is no second train to London, from our station, till
late in the afternoon."

"There is the express," Emily reminded her; "and there is time to
catch it, if you drive at once to the town." She took Cecilia's
hand and pressed it to her bosom. "Thank you again and again,
dear, for all you have done for me. Whether we meet again or not,
as long as I live I shall love you. Don't cry!" She made a faint
attempt to resume her customary gayety, for Cecilia's sake. "Try
to be as hard-hearted as I am. Think of your sister--don't think
of me. Only kiss me."

Cecilia's tears fell fast. "Oh, my love, I am so anxious about
you! I am so afraid that you will not be happy with that selfish
old man--in that dreary house. Give it up, Emily! I have got
plenty of money for both of us; come abroad with me. Why not? You
always got on well with Julia, when you came to see us in the
holidays. Oh, my darling! my darling! What shall I do without
you?"

All that longed for love in Emily's nature had clung round her
school-friend since her father's death. Turning deadly pale under
the struggle to control herself, she made the effort--and bore
the pain of it without letting a cry or a tear escape her. "Our
ways in life lie far apart," she said gently. "There is the hope
of meeting again, dear--if there is nothing more."

The clasp of Cecilia's arm tightened round her. She tried to
release herself; but her resolution had reached its limits. Her
hands dropped, trembling. She could still try to speak
cheerfully, and that was all.

"There is not the least reason, Cecilia, to be anxious about my
prospects. I mean to be Sir Jervis Redwood's favorite before I
have been a week in his service."

She stopped, and pointed to the house. The governess was
approaching them. "One more kiss, darling. We shall not forget
the happy hours we have spent together; we shall constantly write
to each other." She broke down at last. "Oh, Cecilia! Cecilia!
leave me for God's sake--I can't bear it any longer!"

The governess parted them. Emily dropped into the chair that her
friend had left. Even her hopeful nature sank under the burden of
life at that moment.

A hard voice, speaking close at her side, startled her.

"Would you rather be Me," the voice asked, "without a creature to
care for you?"

Emily raised her head. Francine, the unnoticed witness of the
parting interview, was standing by her, idly picking the leaves
from a rose which had dropped out of Cecilia's nosegay.

Had she felt her own isolated position? She had felt it
resentfully.

Emily looked at her, with a heart softened by sorrow. There was
no answering kindness in the eyes of Miss de Sor--there was only
a dogged endurance, sad to see in a creature so young.

"You and Cecilia are going to write to each other," she said. "I
suppose there is some comfort in that. When I left the island
they were glad to get rid of me. They said, 'Telegraph when you
are safe at Miss Ladd's school.' You see, we are so rich, the
expense of telegraphing to the West Indies is nothing to us.
Besides, a telegram has an advantage over a letter--it doesn't
take long to read. I daresay I shall write home. But they are in
no hurry; and I am in no hurry. The school's breaking up; you are
going your way, and I am going mine--and who cares what becomes
of me? Only an ugly old schoolmistress, who is paid for caring. I
wonder why I am saying all this? Because I like you? I don't know
that I like you any better than you like me. When I wanted to be
friends with you, you treated me coolly; I don't want to force
myself on you. I don't particularly care about you. May I write
to you from Brighton?"

Under all this bitterness--the first exhibition of Francine's
temper, at its worst, which had taken place since she joined the
school--Emily saw, or thought she saw, distress that was too
proud, or too shy, to show itself. "How can you ask the
question?" she answered cordially.

Francine was incapable of meeting the sympathy offered to her,
even half way. "Never mind how," she said. "Yes or no is all I
want from you."

"Oh, Francine! Francine! what are you made of! Flesh and blood?
or stone and iron? Write to me of course--and I will write back
again."

"Thank you. Are you going to stay here under the trees?"

"Yes."

"All by yourself?"

"All by myself."

"With nothing to do?"

"I can think of Cecilia."

Francine eyed her with steady attention for a moment.

"Didn't you tell me last night that you were very poor?" she
asked.

"I did."

"So poor that you are obliged to earn your own living?"

"Yes."

Francine looked at her again.

"I daresay you won't believe me," she said. "I wish I was you."

She turned away irritably, and walked back to the house.

Were there really longings for kindness and love under the
surface of this girl's perverse nature? Or was there nothing to
be hoped from a better knowledge of her?--In place of tender
remembrances of Cecilia, these were the perplexing and unwelcome
thoughts which the more potent personality of Francine forced
upon Emily's mind.

She rose impatiently, and looked at her watch. When would it be
her turn to leave the school, and begin the new life?

Still undecided what to do next, her interest was excited by the
appearance of one of the servants on the lawn. The woman
approached her, and presented a visiting-card; bearing on it the
name of _Sir Jervis Redwood_. Beneath the name, there was a line
written in pencil: "Mrs. Rook, to wait on Miss Emily Brown." The
way to the new life was open before her at last!

Looking again at the commonplace announcement contained in the
line of writing, she was not quite satisfied. Was it claiming a
deference toward herself, to which she was not entitled, to
expect a letter either from Sir Jervis, or from Miss Redwood;
giving her some information as to the journey which she was about
to undertake, and expressing with some little politeness the wish
to make her comfortable in her future home? At any rate, her
employer had done her one service: he had reminded her that her
station in life was not what it had been in the days when her
father was living, and when her aunt was in affluent
circumstances.

She looked up from the card. The servant had gone. Alban Morris
was waiting at a little distance--waiting silently until she
noticed him.






"I got invited to Sir Jervis's house," Alban resumed, "by
treating the old savage as unceremoniously as he had treated me.
'That's an idle trade of yours,' he said, looking at my sketch.
'Other ignorant people have made the same remark,' I answered. He
rode away, as if he was not used to be spoken to in that manner,
and then thought better of it, and came back. 'Do you understand
wood engraving?' he asked. 'Yes.' 'And etching?' 'I have
practiced etching myself.' 'Are you a Royal Academician?' 'I'm a
drawing-master at a ladies' school.' 'Whose school?' 'Miss
Ladd's.' 'Damn it, you know the girl who ought to have been my
secretary.' I am not quite sure whether you will take it as a
compliment--Sir Jervis appeared to view you in the light of a
reference to my respectability. At any rate, he went on with his
questions. 'How long do you stop in these parts?' 'I haven't made
up my mind.' 'Look here; I want to consult you--are you
listening?' 'No; I'm sketching.' He burst into a horrid scream. I
asked if he felt himself taken ill. 'Ill?' he said--'I'm
laughing.' It was a diabolical laugh, in one syllable--not 'ha!
ha! ha!' only 'ha!'--and it made him look wonderfully like that
eminent person, whom I persist in thinking he resembles. 'You're
an impudent dog,' he said; 'where are you living?' He was so
delighted when he heard of my uncomfortable position in the
kennel-bedroom, that he offered his hospitality on the spot. 'I
can't go to you in such a pigstye as that,' he said; 'you must
come to me. What's your name?' 'Alban Morris; what's yours?'
'Jervis Redwood. Pack up your traps when you've done your job,
and come and try my kennel. There it is, in a corner of your
drawing, and devilish like, too.' I packed up my traps, and I
tried his kennel. And now you have had enough of Sir Jervis
Redwood."

"Not half enough!" Emily answered. "Your story leaves off just at
the interesting moment. I want you to take me to Sir Jervis's
house."

"And I want you, Miss Emily, to take me to the British Museum.
Don't let me startle you! When I called here earlier in the day,
I was told that you had gone to the reading-room. Is your reading
a secret?"

His manner, when he made that reply, suggested to Emily that
there was some foregone conclusion in his mind, which he was
putting to the test. She answered without alluding to the
impression which he had produced on her.

"My reading is no secret. I am only consulting old newspapers."

He repeated the last words to himself. "Old newspapers?" he
said--as if he was not quite sure of having rightly understood
her.

She tried to help him by a more definite reply.

"I am looking through old newspapers," she resumed, "beginning
with the year eighteen hundred and seventy-six."

"And going back from that time," he asked eagerly; "to earlier
dates still?"

"No--just the contrary--advancing from 'seventy-six' to the
present time."

He suddenly turned pale--and tried to hide his face from her by
looking out of the window. For a moment, his agitation deprived
him of his presence of mind. In that moment, she saw that she had
alarmed him.

"What have I said to frighten you?" she asked.

He tried to assume a tone of commonplace gallantry. "There are
limits even to your power over me," he replied. "Whatever else
you may do, you can never frighten me. Are you searching those
old newspapers with any particular object in view?"

"Yes."

"May I know what it is?"

"May I know why I frightened you?"

He began to walk up and down the room again--then checked himself
abruptly, and appealed to her mercy.

"Don't be hard on me," he pleaded. "I am so fond of you--oh,
forgive me! I only mean that it distresses me to have any
concealments from you. If I could open my whole heart  at this
moment, I shou ld be a happier man."

She understood him and believed him. "My curiosity shall never
embarrass you again," she answered warmly. "I won't even remember
that I wanted to hear how you got on in Sir Jervis's house."

His gratitude seized the opportunity of taking her harmlessly
into his confidence. "As Sir Jervis's guest," he said, "my
experience is at your service. Only tell me how I can interest
you."

She replied, with some hesitation, "I should like to know what
happened when you first saw Mrs. Rook." To her surprise and
relief, he at once complied with her wishes.

"We met," he said, "on the evening when I first entered the
house. Sir Jervis took me into the dining-room--and there sat
Miss Redwood, with a large black cat on her lap. Older than her
brother, taller than her brother, leaner than her brother--with
strange stony eyes, and a skin like parchment--she looked (if I
may speak in contradictions) like a living corpse. I was
presented, and the corpse revived. The last lingering relics of
former good breeding showed themselves faintly in her brow and in
her smile. You will hear more of Miss Redwood presently. In the
meanwhile, Sir Jervis made me reward his hospitality by
professional advice. He wished me to decide whether the artists
whom he had employed to illustrate his wonderful book had cheated
him by overcharges and bad work--and Mrs. Rook was sent to fetch
the engravings from his study upstairs. You remember her
petrified appearance, when she first read the inscription on your
locket? The same result followed when she found herself face to
face with me. I saluted her civilly--she was deaf and blind to my
politeness. Her master snatched the illustrations out of her
hand, and told her to leave the room. She stood stockstill,
staring helplessly. Sir Jervis looked round at his sister; and I
followed his example. Miss Redwood was observing the housekeeper
too attentively to notice anything else; her brother was obliged
to speak to her. 'Try Rook with the bell,' he said. Miss Redwood
took a fine old bronze hand-bell from the table at her side, and
rang it. At the shrill silvery sound of the bell, Mrs. Rook put
her hand to her head as if the ringing had hurt her--turned
instantly, and left us. 'Nobody can manage Rook but my sister,'
Sir Jervis explained; 'Rook is crazy.' Miss Redwood differed with
him. 'No!' she said. Only one word, but there were volumes of
contradiction in it. Sir Jervis looked at me slyly; meaning,
perhaps, that he thought his sister crazy too. The dinner was
brought in at the same moment, and my attention was diverted to
Mrs. Rook's husband."

"What was he like?" Emily asked.

"I really can't tell you; he was one of those essentially
commonplace persons, whom one never looks at a second time. His
dress was shabby, his head was bald, and his hands shook when he
waited on us at table--and that is all I remember. Sir Jervis and
I feasted on salt fish, mutton, and beer. Miss Redwood had cold
broth, with a wine-glass full of rum poured into it by Mr. Rook.
'She's got no stomach,' her brother informed me; 'hot things come
up again ten minutes after they have gone down her throat; she
lives on that beastly mixture, and calls it broth-grog!' Miss
Redwood sipped her elixir of life, and occasionally looked at me
with an appearance of interest which I was at a loss to
understand. Dinner being over, she rang her antique bell. The
shabby old man-servant answered her call. 'Where's your wife?'
she inquired. 'Ill, miss.' She took Mr. Rook's arm to go out, and
stopped as she passed me. 'Come to my room, if you please, sir,
to-morrow at two o'clock,' she said. Sir Jervis explained again:
'She's all to pieces in the morning' (he invariably called his
sister 'She'); 'and gets patched up toward the middle of the day.
Death has forgotten her, that's about the truth of it.' He
lighted his pipe and pondered over the hieroglyphics found among
the ruined cities of Yucatan; I lighted my pipe, and read the
only book I could find in the dining-room--a dreadful record of
shipwrecks and disasters at sea. When the room was full of
tobacco-smoke we fell asleep in our chairs--and when we awoke
again we got up and went to bed. There is the true story of my
first evening at Redwood Hall."

Emily begged him to go on. "You have interested me in Miss
Redwood," she said. "You kept your appointment, of course?"

"I kept my appointment in no very pleasant humor. Encouraged by
my favorable report of the illustrations which he had submitted
to my judgment, Sir Jervis proposed to make me useful to him in a
new capacity. 'You have nothing particular to do,' he said,
'suppose you clean my pictures?' I gave him one of my black
looks, and made no other reply. My interview with his sister
tried my powers of self-command in another way. Miss Redwood
declared her purpose in sending for me the moment I entered the
room. Without any preliminary remarks--speaking slowly and
emphatically, in a wonderfully strong voice for a woman of her
age--she said, 'I have a favor to ask of you, sir. I want you to
tell me what Mrs. Rook has done.' I was so staggered that I
stared at her like a fool. She went on: 'I suspected Mrs. Rook,
sir, of having guilty remembrances on her conscience before she
had been a week in our service.' Can you imagine my astonishment
when I heard that Miss Redwood's view of Mrs. Rook was my view?
Finding that I still said nothing, the old lady entered into
details: 'We arranged, sir,' (she persisted in calling me 'sir,'
with the formal politeness of the old school)--'we arranged, sir,
that Mrs. Rook and her husband should occupy the bedroom next to
mine, so that I might have her near me in case of my being taken
ill in the night. She looked at the door between the two
rooms--suspicious! She asked if there was any objection to her
changing to another room--suspicious! suspicious! Pray take a
seat, sir, and tell me which Mrs. Rook is guilty of--theft or
murder?' "

"What a dreadful old woman!" Emily exclaimed. "How did you answer
her?"

"I told her, with perfect truth, that I knew nothing of Mrs.
Rook's secrets. Miss Redwood's humor took a satirical turn.
'Allow me to ask, sir, whether your eyes were shut, when our
housekeeper found herself unexpectedly in your presence?' I
referred the old lady to her brother's opinion. 'Sir Jervis
believes Mrs. Rook to be crazy,' I reminded her. 'Do you refuse
to trust me, sir?' 'I have no information to give you, madam.'
She waved her skinny old hand in the direction of the door. I
made my bow, and retired. She called me back. 'Old women used to
be prophets, sir, in the bygone time,' she said. 'I will venture
on a prediction. You will be the means of depriving us of the
services of Mr. and Mrs. Rook. If you will be so good as to stay
here a day or two longer you will hear that those two people have
given us notice to quit. It will be her doing, mind--he is a mere
cypher. I wish you good-morning.' Will you believe me, when I
tell you that the prophecy was fulfilled?"

"Do you mean that they actually left the house?"

"They would certainly have left the house," Alban answered, "if
Sir Jervis had not insisted on receiving the customary month's
warning. He asserted his resolution by locking up the old husband
in the pantry. His sister's suspicions never entered his head;
the housekeeper's conduct (he said) simply proved that she was,
what he had always considered her to be, crazy. 'A capital
servant, in spite of that drawback,' he remarked; 'and you will
see, I shall bring her to her senses.' The impression produced on
me was naturally of a very different kind. While I was still
uncertain how to entrap Mrs. Rook into confirming my suspicions,
she herself had saved me the trouble. She had placed her own
guilty interpretation on my appearance in the house--I had driven
her away!"

Emily remained true to her resolution not to let her curiosity
embarrass Alban again. But the unexpressed question was in her
thoughts--"Of what guilt does he suspect Mrs. Rook? And, when he
first felt his suspicions, was my father in his mind?"

Alban proceeded.

"I had only to consider next, whether I could hope to make any
further discoveries,
 if I continued to be Sir Jervis's guest. The object of my
journey had been gained; and I had no desire to be employed as
picture-cleaner. Miss Redwood assisted me in arriving at a
decision. I was sent for to speak to her again. The success of
her prophecy had raised her spirits. She asked, with ironical
humility, if I proposed to honor them by still remaining their
guest, after the disturbance that I had provoked. I answered that
I proposed to leave by the first train the next morning. 'Will it
be convenient for you to travel to some place at a good distance
from this part of the world?' she asked. I had my own reasons for
going to London, and said so. 'Will you mention that to my
brother this evening, just before we sit down to dinner?' she
continued. 'And will you tell him plainly that you have no
intention of returning to the North? I shall make use of Mrs.
Rook's arm, as usual, to help me downstairs--and I will take care
that she hears what you say. Without venturing on another
prophecy, I will only hint to you that I have my own idea of what
will happen; and I should like you to see for yourself, sir,
whether my anticipations are realized.' Need I tell you that this
strange old woman proved to be right once more? Mr. Rook was
released; Mrs. Rook made humble apologies, and laid the whole
blame on her husband's temper: and Sir Jervis bade me remark that
his method had succeeded in bringing the housekeeper to her
senses. Such were the results produced by the announcement of my
departure for London--purposely made in Mrs. Rook's hearing. Do
you agree with me, that my journey to Northumberland has not been
taken in vain?"

Once more, Emily felt the necessity of controlling herself.

Alban had said that he had "reasons of his own for going to
London." Could she venture to ask him what those reasons were?
She could only persist in restraining her curiosity, and conclude
that he would have mentioned his motive, if it had been (as she
had at one time supposed) connected with herself. It was a wise
decision. No earthly consideration would have induced Alban to
answer her, if she had put the question to him.

All doubt of the correctness of his own first impression was now
at an end; he was convinced that Mrs. Rook had been an accomplice
in the crime committed, in 1877, at the village inn. His object
in traveling to London was to consult the newspaper narrative of
the murder. He, too, had been one of the readers at the
Museum--had examined the back numbers of the newspaper--and had
arrived at the conclusion that Emily's father had been the victim
of the crime. Unless he found means to prevent it, her course of
reading would take her from the year 1876 to the year 1877, and
under that date, she would see the fatal report, heading the top
of a column, and printed in conspicuous type.

In the meanwhile Emily had broken the silence, before it could
lead to embarrassing results, by asking if Alban had seen Mrs.
Rook again, on the morning when he left Sir Jervis's house.

"There was nothing to be gained by seeing her, "Alban replied.
"Now that she and her husband had decided to remain at Redwood
Hall, I knew where to find her in case of necessity. As it
happened I saw nobody, on the morning of my departure, but Sir
Jervis himself. He still held to his idea of having his pictures
cleaned for nothing. 'If you can't do it yourself,' he said,
'couldn't you teach my secretary?' He described the lady whom he
had engaged in your place as a 'nasty middle-aged woman with a
perpetual cold in her head.' At the same time (he remarked) he
was a friend to the women, 'because he got them cheap.' I
declined to teach the unfortunate secretary the art of
picture-cleaning. Finding me determined, Sir Jervis was quite
ready to say good-by. But he made use of me to the last. He
employed me as postman and saved a stamp. The letter addressed to
you arrived at breakfast-time. Sir Jervis said, 'You are going to
London; suppose you take it with you?'"

"Did he tell you that there was a letter of his own inclosed in
the envelope?"

"No. When he gave me the envelope it was already sealed."

Emily at once handed to him Sir Jervis's letter. "That will tell
you who employs me at the Museum, and what my work is," she said.

He looked through the letter, and at once offered--eagerly
offered--to help her.

"I have been a student in the reading-room at intervals, for
years past," he said. "Let me assist you, and I shall have
something to do in my holiday time." He was so anxious to be of
use that he interrupted her before she could thank him. "Let us
take alternate years," he suggested. "Did you not tell me you
were searching the newspapers published in eighteen hundred and
seventy-six?"

"Yes."

"Very well. I will take the next year. You will take the year
after. And so on."

"You are very kind," she answered--"but I should like to propose
an improvement on your plan."

"What improvement?" he asked, rather sharply.

"If you will leave the five years, from 'seventy-six to
'eighty-one, entirely to me," she resumed, "and take the next
five years, reckoning _backward_ from 'seventy-six, you will help
me to better purpose. Sir Jervis expects me to look for reports
of Central American Explorations, through the newspapers of the
last forty years; and I have taken the liberty of limiting the
heavy task imposed on me. When I report my progress to my
employer, I should like to say that I have got through ten years
of the examination, instead of five. Do you see any objection to
the arrangement I propose?"

He proved to be obstinate--incomprehensibly obstinate.

'Let us try my plan to begin with," he insisted. "While you are
looking through 'seventy-six, let me be at work on
'seventy-seven. If you still prefer your own arrangement, after
that, I will follow your suggestion with pleasure. Is it agreed?"

Her acute perception--enlightened by his tone as wall as by his
words--detected something under the surface already.

"It isn't agreed until I understand you a little better," she
quietly replied. "I fancy you have some object of your own in
view."

She spoke with her usual directness of look and manner. He was
evidently disconcerted. "What makes you think so?" he asked.

"My own experience of myself makes me think so," she answered.
"If _I_ had some object to gain, I should persist in carrying it
out--like you."

"Does that mean, Miss Emily, that you refuse to give way?"

"No, Mr. Morris. I have made myself disagreeable, but I know when
to stop. I trust you--and submit."

If he had been less deeply interested in the accomplishment of
his merciful design, he might have viewed Emily's sudden
submission with some distrust. As it was, his eagerness to
prevent her from discovering the narrative of the murder hurried
him into an act of indiscretion. He made an excuse to leave her
immediately, in the fear that she might change her mind.

"I have inexcusably prolonged my visit," he said. "If I presume
on your kindness in this way, how can I hope that you will
receive me again? We meet to-morrow in the reading-room."

He hastened away, as if he was afraid to let her say a word in
reply.

Emily reflected.

"Is there something he doesn't want me to see, in the news of the
year 'seventy-seven?" The one explanation which suggested itself
to her mind assumed that form of expression--and the one method
of satisfying her curiosity that seemed likely to succeed, was to
search the volume which Alban had reserved for his own reading.

For two days they pursued their task together, seated at opposite
desks. On the third day Emily was absent.

Was she ill?

She was at the library in the City, consulting the file of _The
Times_ for the year 1877.






Emily recovered her presence of mind. She opened the door, so as
to make a draught of air in the room, and called for water.
Returning to Mirabel, she loosened his cravat. Mrs. Ellmother
came in, just in time to prevent her from committing a common
error in the treatment of fainting persons, by raising Mirabel's
head. The current of air, and the sprinkling of water over his
face, soon produced their customary effect. "He'll come round,
directly," Mrs. Ellmother remarked. "Your aunt was sometimes
taken with these swoons, miss; and I know something about them.
He looks a poor weak creature, in spite of his big beard. Has
anything frightened him?"

Emily little knew how correctly that chance guess had hit on the
truth!

"Nothing can possibly have frightened him," she replied; "I am
afraid he is in bad health. He turned suddenly pale while we were
talking; and I thought he was going to be taken ill; he made
light of it, and seemed to recover. Unfortunately, I was right;
it was the threatening of a fainting fit--he dropped on the floor
a minute afterward."

A sigh fluttered over Mirabel's lips. His eyes opened, looked at
Mrs. Ellmother in vacant terror, and closed again. Emily
whispered to her to leave the room. The old woman smiled
satirically as she opened the door--then looked back, with a
sudden change of humor. To see the kind young mistress bending
over the feeble little clergyman set her--by some strange
association of ideas--thinking of Alban Morris. "Ah," she
muttered to herself, on her way out, "I call _him_ a Man!"

There was wine in the sideboard--the wine which Emily had once
already offered in vain. Mirabel drank it eagerly, this time. He
looked round the room, as if he wished to be sure that they were
alone. "Have I fallen to a low place in your estimation?" he
asked, smiling faintly. "I am afraid you will think poorly enough
of your new ally, after this?"

"I only think you should take more care of your health," Emily
replied, with sincere interest in his recovery. "Let me leave you
to rest on the sofa."

He refused to remain at the cottage--he asked, with a sudden
change to fretfulness, if she would let her servant get him a
cab. She ventured to doubt whether he was quite strong enough yet
to go away by himself. He reiterated, piteously reiterated, his
request. A passing cab was stopped directly. Emily accompanied
him to the gate. "I know what to do," he said, in a hurried
absent way. "Rest and a little tonic medicine will soon set me
right." The clammy coldness of his skin made Emily shudder, as
they shook hands. "You won't think the worse of me for this?" he
asked.

"How can you imagine such a thing!" she answered warmly.

"Will you see me, if I come to-morrow?"

"I shall be anxious to see you."

So they parted. Emily returned to the house, pitying him with all
her heart.




The discovery of the letter gave a new direction to Emily's
thoughts--and so, for the time at least, relieved her mind from
the burden that weighed on it. To what question, on her father's
part, had "I say No" been Miss Jethro's brief and stern reply?
Neither letter nor envelope offered the slightest hint that might
assist inquiry; even the postmark had been so carelessly
impressed that it was illegible.

Emily was still pondering over the three mysterious words, when
she was interrupted by Mrs. Ellmother's voice at the door.

"I must ask you to let me come in, miss; though I know you wished
to be left by yourself till to-morrow. Mrs. Delvin says she must
positively see you to-night. It's my belief that she will send
for the servants, and have herself carried in here, if you refuse
to do what she asks. You needn't be afraid of seeing Mr.
Mirabel."

"Where is he?"

"His sister has given up her bedroom to him," Mrs. Ellmother
answered. "She thought of your feelings before she sent me
here--and had the curtains closed between the sitting-room and
the bedroom. I suspect my nasty temper misled me, when I took a
dislike to Mrs. Delvin. She's a good creature; I'm sorry you
didn't go to her as soon as we got back."

"Did she seem to be angry, when she sent you here?"

"Angry! She was crying when I left her."

Emily hesitated no longer.

She noticed a remarkable change in the invalid's sitting-room--so
brilliantly lighted on other occasions--the moment she entered
it. The lamps were shaded, and the candles were all extinguished.
"My eyes don't bear the light so well as usual," Mrs. Delvin
said. "Come and sit near me, Emily; I hope to quiet your mind. I
should be grieved if you left my house with a wrong impression of
me."

Knowing what she knew, suffering as she must have suffered, the
quiet kindness of her tone implied an exercise of self-restraint
which appealed irresistibly to Emily's sympathies. "Forgive me,"
she said, "for having done you an injustice. I am ashamed to
think that I shrank from seeing you when I returned from
Belford."

"I will endeavor to be worthy of your better opinion of me," Mrs.
Delvin replied. "In one respect at least, I may claim to have had
your best interests at heart--while we were still personally
strangers. I tried to prevail on my poor brother to own the
truth, when he discovered the terrible position in which he was
placed toward you. He was too conscious of the absence of any
proof which might induce you to believe him, if he attempted to
defend himself--in one word, he was too timid--to take my advice.
He has paid the penalty, and I have paid the penalty, of
deceiving you."

Emily started. "In what way have you deceived me?" she asked.

"In the way that was forced on us by our own conduct," Mrs.
Delvin said. "We have appeared to help you, without really doing
so; we calculated on inducing you to marry my brother, and then
(when he could speak with the authority of a husband) on
prevailing on you to give up all further inquiries. When you
insisted on seeing Mrs. Rook, Miles had the money in his hand to
bribe her and her husband to leave England."

"Oh, Mrs. Delvin!"

"I don't attempt to excuse myself. I don't expect you to consider
how sorely I was tempted to secure the happiness of my brother's
life, by marriage with such a woman as yourself. I don't remind
you that I knew--when I put obstacles in your way--that you were
blindly devoting yourself to the discovery of an innocent man."

Emily heard her with angry surprise. "Innocent?" she repeated.
"Mrs. Rook recognized his voice the instant she heard him speak."

Impenetrable to interruption, Mrs. Delvin went on. "But what I do
ask," she persisted, "even after our short acquaintance, is this.
Do you suspect me of deliberately scheming to make you the wife
of a murderer?"

Emily had never viewed the serious question between them in this
light. Warmly, generously, she answered the appeal that had been
made to her. "Oh, don't think that of me! I know I spoke
thoughtlessly and cruelly to you, just now--"

"You spoke impulsively," Mrs. Delvin interposed; "that was all.
My one desire before we part--how can I expect you to remain
here, after what has happened?--is to tell you the truth. I have
no interested object in view; for all hope of your marriage with
my brother is now at an end. May I ask if you have heard that he
and your father were strangers, when they met at the inn?"

"Yes; I know that."

"If there had been any conversation between them, when they
retired to rest, they might have mentioned their names. But your
father was preoccupied; and my brother, after a long day's walk,
was so tired that he fell asleep as soon as his head was on the
pillow. He only woke when the morning dawned. What he saw when he
looked toward the opposite bed might have struck with terror the
boldest man that ever lived. His first impulse was naturally to
alarm the house. When he got on his feet, he saw his own razor--a
blood-stained razor on the bed by the side of the corp se. At
that discovery, he lost all control over himself. In a panic of
terror, he snatched up his knapsack, unfastened the yard door,
and fled from the house. Knowing him, as you and I know him, can
we wonder at it? Many a man has been hanged for murder, on
circumstantial evidence less direct than the evidence against
poor Miles. His horror of his own recollections was so
overpowering that he forbade me even to mention the inn at
Zeeland in my letters, while he was abroad. 'Never tell me (he
wrote) who that wretched murdered stranger was, if I only heard
of his name, I believe it would haunt me to my dying day. I ought
not to trouble you with these details--and yet, I am surely not
without excuse. In the absence of any proof, I cannot expect you
to believe as I do in my brother's innocence. But I may at least
hope to show you that there is some reason for doubt. Will you
give him the benefit of that doubt?"

"Willingly!" Emily replied. "Am I right in supposing that you
don't despair of proving his innocence, even yet'?"

"I don't quite despair. But my hopes have grown fainter and
fainter, as the years have gone on. There is a person associated
with his escape from Zeeland; a person named Jethro--"

"You mean Miss Jethro!"

"Yes. Do you know her?"

"I know her--and my father knew her. I have found a letter,
addressed to him, which I have no doubt was written by Miss
Jethro. It is barely possible that you may understand what it
means. Pray look at it."

"I am quite unable to help you," Mrs. Delvin answered, after
reading the letter. "All I know of Miss Jethro is that, but for
her interposition, my brother might have fallen into the hands of
the police. She saved him."

"Knowing him, of course?"

"That is the remarkable part of it: they were perfect strangers
to each other."

"But she must have had some motive."

"_There_ is the foundation of my hope for Miles. Miss Jethro
declared, when I wrote and put the question to her, that the one
motive by which she was actuated was the motive of mercy. I don't
believe her. To my mind, it is in the last degree improbable that
she would consent to protect a stranger from discovery, who owned
to her (as my brother did) that he was a fugitive suspected of
murder. She knows something, I am firmly convinced, of that
dreadful event at Zeeland--and she has some reason for keeping it
secret. Have you any influence over her?"

"Tell me where I can find her."

"I can't tell you. She has removed from the address at which my
brother saw her last. He has made every possible inquiry--without
result."

As she replied in those discouraging terms, the curtains which
divided Mrs. Delvin's bedroom from her sitting-room were drawn
aside. An elderly woman-servant approached her mistress's couch.

"Mr. Mirabel is awake, ma'am. He is very low; I can hardly feel
his pulse. Shall I give him some more brandy?"

Mrs. Delvin held out her hand to Emily. "Come to me to-morrow
morning," she said--and signed to the servant to wheel her couch
into the next room. As the curtain closed over them, Emily heard
Mirabel's voice. "Where am I?" he said faintly. "Is it all a
dream?"

The prospect of his recovery the next morning was gloomy indeed.
He had sunk into a state of deplorable weakness, in mind as well
as in body. The little memory of events that he still preserved
was regarded by him as the memory of a dream. He alluded to
Emily, and to his meeting with her unexpectedly. But from that
point his recollection failed him. They had talked of something
interesting, he said--but he was unable to remember what it was.
And they had waited together at a railway station--but for what
purpose he could not tell. He sighed and wondered when Emily
would marry him--and so fell asleep again, weaker than ever.

Not having any confidence in the doctor at Belford, Mrs. Delvin
had sent an urgent message to a physician at Edinburgh, famous
for his skill in treating diseases of the nervous system. "I
cannot expect him to reach this remote place, without some
delay," she said; "I must bear my suspense as well as I can."

"You shall not bear it alone," Emily answered. "I will wait with
you till the doctor comes."

Mrs. Delvin lifted her frail wasted hands to Emily's face, drew
it a little nearer--and kissed her.






The night was oppressively hot. Finding it impossible to sleep,
Francine lay quietly in her bed, thinking. The subject of her
reflections was a person who occupied the humble position of her
new servant.

Mrs. Ellmother looked wretchedly ill. Mrs. Ellmother had told
Emily that her object, in returning to domestic service, was to
try if change would relieve her from the oppression of her own
thoughts. Mrs. Ellmother believed in vulgar superstitions which
declared Friday to be an unlucky day; and which recommended
throwing a pinch over your left shoulder, if you happened to
spill the salt.

In themselves, these were trifling recollections. But they
assumed a certain importance, derived from the associations which
they called forth.

They reminded Francine, by some mental process which she was at a
loss to trace, of Sappho the slave, and of her life at St.
Domingo.

She struck a light, and unlocked her writing desk. From one of
the drawers she took out an old household account-book.

The first page contained some entries, relating to domestic
expenses, in her own handwriting. They recalled one of her
efforts to occupy her idle time, by relieving her mother of the
cares of housekeeping. For a day or two, she had persevered--and
then she had ceased to feel any interest in her new employment.
The remainder of the book was completely filled up, in a
beautifully clear handwriting, beginning on the second page. A
title had been found for the manuscript by Francine. She had
written at the top of the page: _Sappho's Nonsense_.

After reading the first few sentences she rapidly turned over the
leaves, and stopped at a blank space near the end of the book.
Here again she had added a title. This time it implied a
compliment to the writer: the page was headed: _Sappho's Sense_.

She read this latter part of the manuscript with the closest
attention.

"I entreat my kind and dear young mistress not to suppose that I
believe in witchcraft--after such an education as I have
received. When I wrote down, at your biding, all that I had told
you by word of mouth, I cannot imagine what delusion possessed
me. You say I have a negro side to my character, which I inherit
from my mother. Did you mean this, dear mistress, as a joke? I am
almost afraid it is sometimes not far off from the truth.

"Let me be careful, however, to avoid leading you into a mistake.
It is really true that the man-slave I spoke of did pine and die,
after the spell had been cast on him by my witch-mother's image
of wax. But I ought also to have told you that circumstances
favored the working of the spell: the fatal end was not brought
about by supernatural means.

"The poor wretch was not in good health at the time; and our
owner had occasion to employ him in the valley of the island far
inland. I have been told, and can well believe, that the climate
there is different from the climate on the coast--in which the
unfortunate slave had been accustomed to live. The overseer
wouldn't believe him when he said the valley air would be his
death--and the negroes, who might otherwise have helped him, all
avoided a man whom they knew to be under a spell.

"This, you see, accounts for what might appear incredible to
civilized persons. If you will do me a favor, you will burn this
little book, as soon as you have read what I have written here.
If my request is not granted, I can only implore you to let no
eyes but your own see these pages. My life might be in danger if
the blacks knew what I have now told you, in the interests of
truth."

Francine closed the book, and locked it up again in her desk.
"Now I know," she said to herself, "what reminded me of St.
Domingo."

When Francine rang her bell the next morning, so long a time
elapsed without producing an answer that she began to think of
sending one of the house-servants to make inquiries. Before she
could decide, Mrs. Ellmother presented herself, and offered her
apologies.

"It's the first time I have overslept myself, miss, since I was a
girl. Please to excuse me, it shan't happen again."

"Do you find that the air here makes you drowsy?" Francine asked.

Mrs. Ellmother shook her head. "I didn't get to sleep," she said,
"till morning, and so I was too heavy to be up in time. But air
has got nothing to do with it. Gentlefolks may have their whims
and fancies. All air is the same to people like me."

"You enjoy good health, Mrs. Ellmother?"

"Why not, miss? I have never had a doctor."

"Oh! That's your opinion of doctors, is it?"

"I won't have anything to do with them--if that's what you mean
by my opinion," Mrs. Ellmother answered doggedly. "How will you
have your hair done?"

"The same as yesterday. Have you seen anything of Miss Emily? She
went back to London the day after you left us."

"I haven't been in London. I'm thankful to say my lodgings are
let to a good tenant."

"Then where have you lived, while you were waiting to come here?"

"I had only one place to go to, miss; I went to the village where
I was born. A friend found a corner for me. Ah, dear heart, it's
a pleasant place, there!"

"A place like this?"

"Lord help you! As little like this as chalk is to cheese. A fine
big moor, miss, in Cumberland, without a tree in sight--look
where you may. Something like a wind, I can tell you, when it
takes to blowing there."

"Have you never been in this part of the country?"

"Not I! When I left the North, my new mistress took me to Canada.
Talk about air! If there was anything in it, the people in _that_
air ought to live to be a hundred. I liked Canada."

"And who was your next mistress?"

Thus far, Mrs. Ellmother had been ready enough to talk. Had she
failed to hear what Francine had just said to her? or had she
some reason for feeling reluctant to answer? In any case, a
spirit of taciturnity took sudden possession of her--she was
silent.

Francine (as usual) persisted. "Was your next place in service
with Miss Emily's aunt?"

"Yes."

"Did the old lady always live in London?"

"No."

"What part of the country did she live in?"

"Kent."

"Among the hop gardens?"

"No."

"In what other part, then?"

"Isle of Thanet."

"Near the sea coast?"

"Yes."

Even Francine could insist no longer: Mrs. Ellmother's reserve
had beaten her--for that day at least. "Go into the hall," she
said, "and see if there are any letters for me in the rack."

There was a letter bearing the Swiss postmark. Simple Cecilia was
flattered and delighted by the charming manner in which Francine
had written to her. She looked forward with impatience to the
time when their present acquaintance might ripen into friendship.
Would "Dear Miss de Sor" waive all ceremony, and consent to be a
guest (later in the autumn) at her father's house? Circumstances
connected with her sister's health would delay their return to
England for a little while. By the end of the month she hoped to
be at home again, and to hear if Francine was disengaged. Her
address, in England, was Monksmoor Park, Hants.

Having read the letter, Francine drew a moral from it: "There is
great use in a fool, when one knows how to manage her."

Having little appetite for her breakfast, she tried the
experiment of a walk on the terrace. Alban Morris was right; the
air at Netherwoods, in the summer time, _was_ relaxing. The
morning mist still hung over the lowest part of the valley,
between the village and the hills beyond. A little exercise
produced a feeling of fatigue. Francine returned to her room, and
trifled with her tea and toast.

Her next proceeding was to open her writing-desk, and look into
the old account-book once more. While it lay open on her lap, she
recalled what had passed that morning, between Mrs. Ellmother and
herself.

The old woman had been born and bred in the North, on an open
moor. She had been removed to the keen air of Canada when she
left her birthplace. She had been in service after that, on the
breezy eastward coast of Kent. Would the change to the climate of
Netherwoods produce any effect on Mrs. Ellmother? At her age, and
with her seasoned constitution, would she feel it as those
school-girls had felt it--especially that one among them, who
lived in the bracing air of the North, the air of Yorkshire?

Weary of solitary thinking on one subject, Francine returned to
the terrace with a vague idea of finding something to amuse
her--that is to say, something she could turn into ridicule--if
she joined the girls.

The next morning, Mrs. Ellmother answered her mistress's bell
without delay. "You have slept better, this time?" Francine said.

"No, miss. When I did get to sleep I was troubled by dreams.
Another bad night--and no mistake!"

"I suspect your mind is not quite at ease," Francine suggested.

"Why do you suspect that, if you please?"

"You talked, when I met you at Miss Emily's, of wanting to get
away from your own thoughts. Has the change to this place helped
you?"

"It hasn't helped me as I expected. Some people's thoughts stick
fast."

"Remorseful thoughts?" Francine inquired.

Mrs. Ellmother held up her forefinger, and shook it with a
gesture of reproof. "I thought we agreed, miss, that there was to
be no pumping."

The business of the toilet proceeded in silence.

A week passed. During an interval in the labors of the school,
Miss Ladd knocked at the door of Francine's room.

"I want to speak to you, my dear, about Mrs. Ellmother. Have you
noticed that she doesn't seem to be in good health?"

"She looks rather pale, Miss Ladd."

"It's more serious than that, Francine. The servants tell me that
she has hardly any appetite. She herself acknowledges that she
sleeps badly. I noticed her yesterday evening in the garden,
under the schoolroom window. One of the girls dropped a
dictionary. She started at that slight noise, as if it terrified
her. Her nerves are seriously out of order. Can you prevail upon
her to see the doctor?"

Francine hesitated--and made an excuse. "I think she would be
much more likely, Miss Ladd, to listen to you. Do you mind
speaking to her?"

"Certainly not!"

Mrs. Ellmother was immediately sent for. "What is your pleasure,
miss?" she said to Francine.

Miss Ladd interposed. "It is I who wish to speak to you, Mrs.
Ellmother. For some days past, I have been sorry to see you
looking ill."

"I never was ill in my life, ma'am."

Miss Ladd gently persisted. "I hear that you have lost your
appetite."

"I never was a great eater, ma'am."

It was evidently useless to risk any further allusion to Mrs.
Ellmother's symptoms. Miss Ladd tried another method of
persuasion. "I daresay I may be mistaken," she said; "but I do
really feel anxious about you. To set my mind at rest, will you
see the doctor?"

"The doctor! Do you think I'm going to begin taking physic, at my
time of life? Lord, ma'am! you amuse me--you do indeed!" She
burst into a sudden fit of laughter; the hysterical laughter
which is on the verge of tears. With a desperate effort, she
controlled herself. "Please, don't make a fool of me again," she
said--and left the room.

"What do you think now?" Miss Ladd asked.

Francine appeared to be still on her guard.

"I don't know what to think," she said evasively.

Miss Ladd looked at her in silent surprise, and withdrew.

Left by herself, Francine sat with her elbows on the table and
her face in her hands, absorbed in thought. After a long
interval, she opened her desk--and hesitated. She took a sheet of
note-paper--and paused, as if still in doubt. She snatched up her
pen, with a sudden recovery of resolution--and addressed these
lines to the wife of her father's agent in London:

"When I was placed under your care, on the night of my arrival
from the West Indies, you kindly said I might ask you for any
little service which might be within your power. I shall be
greatly obliged if you can obtain for me, and send to this place,
a supply of artists' modeling wax--sufficient for the product ion
of a small image."






Outside the bedroom the night was black and still.

The small rain fell too softly to be heard in the garden; not a
leaf stirred in the airless calm; the watch-dog was asleep, the
cats were indoors; far or near, under the murky heaven, not a
sound was stirring.

Inside the bedroom the night was black and still.

Miss Ladd knew her business as a schoolmistress too well to allow
night-lights; and Miss Ladd's young ladies were supposed to be
fast asleep, in accordance with the rules of the house. Only at
intervals the silence was faintly disturbed, when the restless
turning of one of the girls in her bed betrayed itself by a
gentle rustling between the sheets. In the long intervals of
stillness, not even the softly audible breathing of young
creatures asleep was to be heard.

The first sound that told of life and movement revealed the
mechanical movement of the clock. Speaking from the lower
regions, the tongue of Father Time told the hour before midnight.

A soft voice rose wearily near the door of the room. It counted
the strokes of the clock--and reminded one of the girls of the
lapse of time.

"Emily! eleven o'clock."

There was no reply. After an interval the weary voice tried
again, in louder tones:

"Emily!"

A girl, whose bed was at the inner end of the room, sighed under
the heavy heat of the night--and said, in peremptory tones, "Is
that Cecilia?"

"Yes."

"What do you want?"

"I'm getting hungry, Emily. Is the new girl asleep?"

The new girl answered promptly and spitefully, "No, she isn't."

Having a private object of their own in view, the five wise
virgins of Miss Ladd's first class had waited an hour, in wakeful
anticipation of the falling asleep of the stranger--and it had
ended in this way! A ripple of laughter ran round the room. The
new girl, mortified and offended, entered her protest in plain
words.

"You are treating me shamefully! You all distrust me, because I
am a stranger."

"Say we don't understand you," Emily answered, speaking for her
schoolfellows; "and you will be nearer the truth."

"Who expected you to understand me, when I only came here to-day?
I have told you already my name is Francine de Sor. If want to
know more, I'm nineteen years old, and I come from the West
Indies."

Emily still took the lead. "Why do you come _here?_" she asked.
"Who ever heard of a girl joining a new school just before the
holidays? You are nineteen years old, are you? I'm a year younger
than you--and I have finished my education. The next big girl in
the room is a year younger than me--and she has finished her
education. What can you possibly have left to learn at your age?"

"Everything!" cried the stranger from the West Indies, with an
outburst of tears. "I'm a poor ignorant creature. Your education
ought to have taught you to pity me instead of making fun of me.
I hate you all. For shame, for shame!"

Some of the girls laughed. One of them--the hungry girl who had
counted the strokes of the clock--took Francine's part.

"Never mind their laughing, Miss de Sor. You are quite right, you
have good reason to complain of us."

Miss de Sor dried her eyes. "Thank you--whoever you are," she
answered briskly.

"My name is Cecilia Wyvil," the other proceeded. "It was not,
perhaps, quite nice of you to say you hated us all. At the same
time we have forgotten our good breeding--and the least we can do
is to beg your pardon."

This expression of generous sentiment appeared to have an
irritating effect on the peremptory young person who took the
lead in the room. Perhaps she disapproved of free trade in
generous sentiment.

"I can tell you one thing, Cecilia," she said; "you shan't beat
ME in generosity. Strike a light, one of you, and lay the blame
on me if Miss Ladd finds us out. I mean to shake hands with the
new girl--and how can I do it in the dark? Miss de Sor, my name's
Brown, and I'm queen of the bedroom. I--not Cecilia--offer our
apologies if we have offended you. Cecilia is my dearest friend,
but I don't allow her to take the lead in the room. Oh, what a
lovely nightgown!"

The sudden flow of candle-light had revealed Francine, sitting up
in her bed, and displaying such treasures of real lace over her
bosom that the queen lost all sense of royal dignity in
irrepressible admiration. "Seven and sixpence," Emily remarked,
looking at her own night-gown and despising it. One after
another, the girls yielded to the attraction of the wonderful
lace. Slim and plump, fair and dark, they circled round the new
pupil in their flowing white robes, and arrived by common consent
at one and the same conclusion: "How rich her father must be!"

Favored by fortune in the matter of money, was this enviable
person possessed of beauty as well?

In the disposition of the beds, Miss de Sor was placed between
Cecilia on the right hand, and Emily on the left. If, by some
fantastic turn of events, a man--say in the interests of
propriety, a married doctor, with Miss Ladd to look after
him--had been permitted to enter the room, and had been asked
what he thought of the girls when he came out, he would not even
have mentioned Francine. Blind to the beauties of the expensive
night-gown, he would have noticed her long upper lip, her
obstinate chin, her sallow complexion, her eyes placed too close
together--and would have turned his attention to her nearest
neighbors. On one side his languid interest would have been
instantly roused by Cecilia's glowing auburn hair, her
exquisitely pure skin, and her tender blue eyes. On the other, he
would have discovered a bright little creature, who would have
fascinated and perplexed him at one and the same time. If he had
been questioned about her by a stranger, he would have been at a
loss to say positively whether she was dark or light: he would
have remembered how her eyes had held him, but he would not have
known of what color they were. And yet, she would have remained a
vivid picture in his memory when other impressions, derived at
the same time, had vanished. "There was one little witch among
them, who was worth all the rest put together; and I can't tell
you why. They called her Emily. If I wasn't a married man--"
There he would have thought of his wife, and would have sighed
and said no more.

While the girls were still admiring Francine, the clock struck
the half-hour past eleven.

Cecilia stole on tiptoe to the door--looked out, and
listened--closed the door again--and addressed the meeting with
the irresistible charm of her sweet voice and her persuasive
smile.

"Are none of you hungry yet?" she inquired. "The teachers are
safe in their rooms; we have set ourselves right with Francine.
Why keep the supper waiting under Emily's bed?"

Such reasoning as this, with such personal attractions to
recommend it, admitted of but one reply. The queen waved her hand
graciously, and said, "Pull it out."

Is a lovely girl--whose face possesses the crowning charm of
expression, whose slightest movement reveals the supple symmetry
of her figure--less lovely because she is blessed with a good
appetite, and is not ashamed to acknowledge it? With a grace all
her own, Cecilia dived under the bed, and produced a basket of
jam tarts, a basket of fruit and sweetmeats, a basket of
sparkling lemonade, and a superb cake--all paid for by general
subscriptions, and smuggled into the room by kind connivance of
the servants. On this occasion, the feast was especially
plentiful and expensive, in commemoration not only of the arrival
of the Midsummer holidays, but of the coming freedom of Miss
Ladd's two leading young ladies. With widely different destinies
before them, Emily and Cecilia had completed their school life,
and were now to go out into the world.

The contrast in the characters of the two girls showed itself,
even in such a trifle as the preparations for supper.

Gentle Cecilia, sitting on the floor surrounded by good things,
left it to the ingenuity of others to decide whether the baskets
should be all emptied at once, or handed round
 from bed to bed, one at a time. In the meanwhile, her lovely
blue eyes rested tenderly on the tarts.

Emily's commanding spirit seized on the reins of government, and
employed each of her schoolfellows in the occupation which she
was fittest to undertake. "Miss de Sor, let me look at your hand.
Ah! I thought so. You have got the thickest wrist among us; you
shall draw the corks. If you let the lemonade pop, not a drop of
it goes down your throat. Effie, Annis, Priscilla, you are three
notoriously lazy girls; it's doing you a true kindness to set you
to work. Effie, clear the toilet-table for supper; away with the
combs, the brushes, and the looking-glass. Annis, tear the leaves
out of your book of exercises, and set them out for plates. No!
I'll unpack; nobody touches the baskets but me. Priscilla, you
have the prettiest ears in the room. You shall act as sentinel,
my dear, and listen at the door. Cecilia, when you have done
devouring those tarts with your eyes, take that pair of scissors
(Miss de Sor, allow me to apologize for the mean manner in which
this school is carried on; the knives and forks are counted and
locked up every night)--I say take that pair of scissors,
Cecilia, and carve the cake, and don't keep the largest bit for
yourself. Are we all ready? Very well. Now take example by me.
Talk as much as you like, so long as you don't talk too loud.
There is one other thing before we begin. The men always propose
toasts on these occasions; let's be like the men. Can any of you
make a speech? Ah, it falls on me as usual. I propose the first
toast. Down with all schools and teachers--especially the new
teacher, who came this half year. Oh, mercy, how it stings!" The
fixed gas in the lemonade took the orator, at that moment, by the
throat, and effectually checked the flow of her eloquence. It
made no difference to the girls. Excepting the ease of feeble
stomachs, who cares for eloquence in the presence of a
supper-table? There were no feeble stomachs in that bedroom. With
what inexhaustible energy Miss Ladd's young ladies ate and drank!
How merrily they enjoyed the delightful privilege of talking
nonsense! And--alas! alas!--how vainly they tried, in after life,
to renew the once unalloyed enjoyment of tarts and lemonade!

In the unintelligible scheme of creation, there appears to be no
human happiness--not even the happiness of schoolgirls--which is
ever complete. Just as it was drawing to a close, the enjoyment
of the feast was interrupted by an alarm from the sentinel at the
door.

Put out the candle!" Priscilla whispered "Somebody on the
stairs."





A fortnight after the disappearance of Mrs. Ellmother, and the
dismissal of Mrs. Mosey, Doctor Allday entered his
consulting-room, punctual to the hour at which he was accustomed
to receive patients.

An occasional wrinkling of his eyebrows, accompanied by an
intermittent restlessness in his movements, appeared to indicate
some disturbance of this worthy man's professional composure. His
mind was indeed not at ease. Even the inexcitable old doctor had
felt the attraction which had already conquered three such
dissimilar people as Alban Morris, Cecilia Wyvil, and Francine de
Sor. He was thinking of Emily.

A ring at the door-bell announced the arrival of the first
patient.

The servant introduced a tall lady, dressed simply and elegantly
in dark apparel. Noticeable features, of a Jewish cast--worn and
haggard, but still preserving their grandeur of form--were
visible through her veil. She moved with grace and dignity; and
she stated her object in consulting Doctor Allday with the ease
of a well-bred woman.

"I come to ask your opinion, sir, on the state of my heart," she
said; "and I am recommended by a patient, who has consulted you
with advantage to herself." She placed a card on the doctor's
writing-desk, and added: "I have become acquainted with the lady,
by being one of the lodgers in her house."

The doctor recognized the name--and the usual proceedings ensued.
After careful examination, he arrived at a favorable conclusion.
"I may tell you at once," he said--"there is no reason to be
alarmed about the state of your heart."

"I have never felt any alarm about myself," she answered quietly.
"A sudden death is an easy death. If one's affairs are settled,
it seems, on that account, to be the death to prefer. My object
was to settle _my_ affairs--such as they are--if you had
considered my life to be in danger. "Is there nothing the matter
with me?"

"I don't say that," the doctor replied. "The action of your heart
is very feeble. Take the medicine that I shall prescribe; pay a
little more attention to eating and drinking than ladies usually
do; don't run upstairs, and don't fatigue yourself by violent
exercise--and I  see no reason wh y you shouldn't live to be an
old woman."

"God forbid!" the lady said to herself. She turned away, and
looked out of the window with a bitter smile.

Doctor Allday wrote his prescription. "Are you likely to make a
long stay in London?" he asked.

"I am here for a little while only. Do you wish to see me again?"

"I should like to see you once more, before you go away--if you
can make it convenient. What name shall I put on the
prescription?"

"Miss Jethro."

"A remarkable name," the doctor said, in his matter-of-fact way.

Miss Jethro's bitter smile showed itself again.

Without otherwise noticing what Doctor Allday had said, she laid
the consultation fee on the table. At the same moment, the
footman appeared with a letter. "From Miss Emily Brown," he said.
"No answer required."

He held the door open as he delivered the message, seeing that
Miss Jethro was about to leave the room. She dismissed him by a
gesture; and, returning to the table, pointed to the letter.

"Was your correspondent lately a pupil at Miss Ladd's school?"
she inquired.

"My correspondent has just left Miss Ladd," the doctor answered.
"Are you a friend of hers?"

"I am acquainted with her."

"You would be doing the poor child a kindness, if you would go
and see her. She has no friends in London."

"Pardon me--she has an aunt."

"Her aunt died a week since."

"Are there no other relations?"

"None. A melancholy state of things, isn't it? She would have
been absolutely alone in the house, if I had not sent one of my
women servants to stay with her for the present. Did you know her
father?"

Miss Jethro passed over the question, as if she had not heard it.
"Has the young lady dismissed her aunt's servants?" she asked.

"Her aunt kept but one servant, ma'am. The woman has spared Miss
Emily the trouble of dismissing her." He briefly alluded to Mrs.
Ellmother's desertion of her mistress. "I can't explain it," he
said when he had done. "Can _you_?"

"What makes you think, sir, that I can help you? I have never
even heard of the servant--and the mistress was a stranger to
me."

At Doctor Allday's age a man is not easily discouraged by
reproof, even when it is administered by a handsome woman. "I
thought you might have known Miss Emily's father," he persisted.

Miss Jethro rose, and wished him good-morning. "I must not occupy
any more of your valuable time," she said.

"Suppose you wait a minute?" the doctor suggested.

Impenetrable as ever, he rang the bell. "Any patients in the
waiting-room?" he inquired. "You see I have time to spare," he
resumed, when the man had replied in the negative. "I take an
interest in this poor girl; and I thought--"

"If you think that I take an interest in her, too," Miss Jethro
interposed, "you are perfectly right--I knew her father," she
added abruptly; the allusion to Emily having apparently reminded
her of the question which she had hitherto declined to notice.

"In that case," Doctor Allday proceeded, "I want a word of
advice. Won't you sit down?"

She took a chair in silence. An irregular movement in the lower
part of her veil seemed to indicate that she was breathing with
difficulty. The doctor observed her with close attention. "Let me
see my prescription again," he said. Having added an ingredient,
he handed it back with a word of explanation. "Your nerves are
more out of order than I supposed. The hardest disease to cure
that I know of is--worry."

The hint could hardly have been plainer; but it was lost on Miss
Jethro. Whatever her troubles might be, her medical adviser was
not made acquainted with them. Quietly folding up the
prescription, she reminded him that he had proposed to ask her
advice.

"In what way can I be of service to you?" she inquired.

"I am afraid I must try your patience," the doctor acknowledged,
"if I am to answer that question plainly."

With these prefatory words, he described the events that had
followed Mrs. Mosey's appearance at the cottage. "I am only doing
justice to this foolish woman," he continued, "when I tell you
that she came here, after she had left Miss Emily, and did her
best to set matters right. I went to the poor girl directly--and
I felt it my duty, after looking at her aunt, not to leave her
alone for that night. When I got home the next morning, whom do
you think I found waiting for me? Mrs. Ellmother!"

He stopped--in the expectation that Miss Jethro would express
some surprise. Not a word passed her lips.

"Mrs. Ellmother's object was to ask how her mistress was going
on," the doctor proceeded. "Every day while Miss Letitia still
lived, she came here to make the same inquiry--without a word of
explanation. On the day of the funeral, there she was at the
church, dressed in deep mourning; and, as I can personally
testify, crying bitterly. When the ceremony was over--can you
believe it?--she slipped away before Miss Emily or I could speak
to her. We have seen nothing more of her, and heard nothing more,
from that time to this."

He stopped again, the silent lady still listening without making
any remark.

"Have you no opinion to express?" the doctor asked bluntly.

"I am waiting," Miss Jethro answered.

"Waiting--for what?"

"I haven't heard yet, why you want my advice."

Doctor Allday's observation of humanity had hitherto reckoned
want of caution among the deficient moral qualities in the
natures of women. He set down Miss Jethro as a remarkable
exception to a general rule.

"I want you to advise me as to the right course to take with Miss
Emily," he said. "She has assured me she attaches no serious
importance to her aunt's wanderings, when the poor old lady's
fever was at its worst. I don't doubt that she speaks the
truth--but I have my own reasons for being afraid that she is
deceiving herself. Will you bear this in mind?"

"Yes--if it's necessary."

"In plain words, Miss Jethro, you think I am still wandering from
the point. I have got to the point. Yesterday, Miss Emily told me
that she hoped to be soon composed enough to examine the papers
left by her aunt."

Miss Jethro suddenly turned in her chair, and looked at Doctor
Allday.

"Are you beginning to feel interested?" the doctor asked
mischievously.

She neither acknowledged nor denied it. "Go on"--was all she
said.

"I don't know how _you_ feel," he proceeded; "_I_ am afraid of
the discoveries which she may make; and I am strongly tempted to
advise her to leave the proposed examination to her aunt's
lawyer. Is there anything in your knowledge of Miss Emily's late
father, which tells you that I am right?"

"Before I reply," said Miss Jethro, "it may not be amiss to let
the young lady speak for herself."

"How is she to do that?" the doctor asked.

Miss Jethro pointed to the writing table. "Look there," she said.
"You have not yet opened Miss Emily's letter."






"The information which I have obtained from Miss Jethro has been
communicated to me, on the condition that I shall not disclose
the place of her residence. 'Let me pass out of notice (she said)
as completely as if I had passed out of life; I wish to be
forgotten by some, and to be unknown by others.' With this one
stipulation, she left me free to write the present narrative of
what passed at the interview between us. I feel that the
discoveries which I have made are too important to the persons
interested to be trusted to memory.


1. _She Receives Me_.

"Finding Miss Jethro's place of abode, with far less difficulty
than I had anticipated (thanks to favoring circumstances), I
stated plainly the object of my visit. She declined to enter into
conversation with me on the subject of the murder at Zeeland.

"I was prepared to meet with this rebuke, and to take the
necessary measures for obtaining a more satisfactory reception.
'A person is suspected of having committed the murder,' I said;
'and there is reason to believe that you are in a position to say
whether the suspicion is justified or not. Do you refuse to
answer me, if I put the question?'

"Miss Jethro asked who the person was.

"I mentioned the name--Mr. Miles Mirabel.

"It is not necessary, and it would certainly be not agreeable to
me, to describe the effect which this reply produced on Miss
Jethro. After giving her time to compose herself, I entered into
certain explanations, in order to convince her at the outset of
my good faith. The result justified my anticipations. I was at
once admitted to her confidence.

"She said, 'I must not hesitate to do an act of justice to an
innocent man. But, in such a serious matter as this, you have a
right to judge for yourself whether the person who is now
speaking to you is a person whom you can trust. You may believe
that I tell the truth about others, if I begin--whatever it may
cost me--by telling the truth about myself.'


2. _She Speaks of Herself_.

"I shall not attempt to place on record the confession of a most
unhappy woman. It was the common story of sin bitterly repented,
and of vain effort to recover the lost place in social esteem.
Too well known a story, surely, to be told again.

"But I may with perfect propriety repeat what Miss Jethro said to
me, in allusion to later events in her life which are connected
with my own personal experience. She recalled to my memory a
visit which she had paid to me at Netherwoods, and a letter
addressed to her by Doctor Allday, which I had read at her
express request.

"She said, 'You may remember that the letter contained some
severe reflections on my conduct. Among other things, the doctor
mentions that he called at the lodging I occupied during my visit
to London, and found I had taken to flight: also that he had
reason to believe I had entered Miss Ladd's service, under false
pretenses.'

"I asked if the doctor had wronged her.

"She answered 'No: in one case, he is ignorant; in the other, he
is right. On leaving his house, I found myself followed in the
street by the man to whom I owe the shame and misery of my past
life. My horror of him is not to be described in words. The one
way of escaping was offered by an empty cab that passed me. I
reached the railway station safely, and went back to my home in
the country. Do you blame me?'

"It was impossible to blame her--and I said so.

"She then confessed the deception which she had practiced on Miss
Ladd. 'I have a cousin,' she said, 'who was a Miss Jethro like
me. Before her marriage she had been employed as a governess. She
pitied me; she sympathized with my longing to recover the
character that I had lost. With her permission, I made use of the
testimonials which she had earned as a teacher--I was betrayed
(to this day I don't know by whom)--and I was dismissed from
Netherwoods. Now you know that I deceived Miss Ladd, you may
reasonably conclude that I am likely to deceive You.'

"I assured her, with perfect sincerity, that I had drawn no such
conclusion. Encouraged by my reply, Miss Jethro proceeded as
follows.


3. _She Speaks of Mirabel_.

"'Four years ago, I was living near Cowes, in the Isle of
Wight--in a cottage which had been taken for me by a gentleman
who was the owner of a yacht. We had just returned from a short
cruise, and the vessel was under orders to sail for Cherbourg
with the next tide.

"'While I was walking in my garden, I was startled by the sudden
appearance Of a man (evidently a gentleman) who was a perfect
stranger to me. He was in a pitiable state of terror, and he
implored my protection. In reply to my first inquiries, he
mentioned the inn at Zeeland, and the dreadful death of a person
unknown to him; whom I recognized (partly by the description
given, and partly by comparison of dates) as Mr. James Brown. I
shall say nothing of the shock inflicted on me: you don't want to
know what I felt. What I did (having literally only a minute left
for decision) was to hide the fugitive from discovery, and to
exert my influence in his favor with the owner of the yacht. I
saw nothing more of him. He was put on board, as soon as the
police were out of sight, and was safely landed at Cherbourg.'

"I asked what induced her to run the risk of protecting a
stranger, who was under suspicion of having committed a murder.

"She said, 'You shall hear my explanation directly. Let us have
done with Mr. Mirabel first. We occasionally corresponded, during
the long absence on the continent; never alluding, at his express
request, to the horrible event at the inn. His last letter
reached me, after he had established himself at  Vale Regis.
Writing of the society in the neighborhood, he infor med me of
his introduction to Miss Wyvil, and of the invitation that he had
received to meet her friend and schoolfellow at Monksmoor. I knew
that Miss Emily possessed a Handbill describing personal
peculiarities in Mr. Mirabel, not hidden under the changed
appearance of his head and face. If she remembered or happened to
refer to that description, while she was living in the same house
with him, there was a possibility at least of her suspicion being
excited. The fear of this took me to you. It was a morbid fear,
and, as events turned out, an unfounded fear: but I was unable to
control it. Failing to produce any effect on you, I went to Vale
Regis, and tried (vainly again) to induce Mr. Mirabel to send an
excuse to Monksmoor. He, like you, wanted to know what my motive
was. When I tell you that I acted solely in Miss Emily's
interests, and that I knew how she had been deceived about her
father's death, need I say why I was afraid to acknowledge my
motive?'

"I understood that Miss Jethro might well be afraid of the
consequences, if she risked any allusion to Mr. Brown's horrible
death, and if it afterward chanced to reach his daughter's ears.
But this state of feeling implied an extraordinary interest in
the preservation of Emily's peace of mind. I asked Miss Jethro
how that interest had been excited?

"She answered, 'I can only satisfy you in one way. I must speak
of her father now.'"


Emily looked up from the manuscript. She felt Cecilia's arm
tenderly caressing her. She heard Cecilia say, "My poor dear,
there is one last trial of your courage still to come. I am
afraid of what you are going to read, when you turn to the next
page. And yet--"

"And yet," Emily replied gently, "it must be done. I have learned
my hard lesson of endurance, Cecilia, don't be afraid."

Emily turned to the next page.


4. _She Speaks of the Dead_.

"For the first time, Miss Jethro appeared to be at a loss how to
proceed. I could see that she was suffering. She rose, and
opening a drawer in her writing table, took a letter from it.

"She said, 'Will you read this? It was written by Miss Emily's
father. Perhaps it may say more for me than I can say for
myself?'

"I copy the letter. It was thus expressed:


"'You have declared that our farewell to-day is our farewell
forever. For the second time, you have refused to be my wife; and
you have done this, to use your own words, in mercy to Me.

"'In mercy to Me, I implore you to reconsider your decision.

"'If you condemn me to live without you--I feel it, I know
it--you condemn me to despair which I have not fortitude enough
to endure. Look at the passages which I have marked for you in
the New Testament. Again and again, I say it; your true
repentance has made you worthy of the pardon of God. Are you not
worthy of the love, admiration, and respect of man? Think! oh,
Sara, think of what our lives might be, and let them be united
for time and for eternity.

"'I can write no more. A deadly faintness oppresses me. My mind
is in a state unknown to me in past years. I am in such confusion
that I sometimes think I hate you. And then I recover from my
delusion, and know that man never loved woman as I love you.

"'You will have time to write to me by this evening's post. I
shall stop at Zeeland to-morrow, on my way back, and ask for a
letter at the post office. I forbid explanations and excuses. I
forbid heartless allusions to your duty. Let me have an answer
which does not keep me for a moment in suspense.

"'For the last time, I ask you: Do you consent to be my wife?
Say, Yes--or say, No.'


"I gave her back the letter--with the one comment on it, which
the circumstances permitted me to make:

"'You said No?'

"She bent her head in silence.

"I went on--not willingly, for I would have spared her if it had
been possible. I said, 'He died, despairing, by his own hand--and
you knew it?'

"She looked up. 'No! To say that I knew it is too much. To say
that I feared it is the truth.'

"'Did you love him?'

"She eyed me in stern surprise. 'Have _I_ any right to love?
Could I disgrace an honorable man by allowing him to marry me?
You look as if you held me responsible for his death.'

"'Innocently responsible,' I said.

"She still followed her own train of thought. 'Do you suppose I
could for a moment anticipate that he would destroy himself, when
I wrote my reply? He was a truly religious man. If he had been in
his right mind, he would have shrunk from the idea of suicide as
from the idea of a crime.'

"On reflection, I was inclined to agree with her. In his terrible
position, it was at least possible that the sight of the razor
(placed ready, with the other appliances of the toilet, for his
fellow-traveler's use) might have fatally tempted a man whose
last hope was crushed, whose mind was tortured by despair. I
should have been merciless indeed, if I had held Miss Jethro
accountable thus far. But I found it hard to sympathize with the
course which she had pursued, in permitting Mr. Brown's death to
be attributed to murder without a word of protest. 'Why were you
silent?' I said.

"She smiled bitterly.

"'A woman would have known why, without asking,' she replied. 'A
woman would have understood that I shrank from a public
confession of my shameful past life. A woman would have
remembered what reasons I had for pitying the man who loved me,
and for accepting any responsibility rather than associate his
memory, before the world, with an unworthy passion for a degraded
creature, ending in an act of suicide. Even if I had made that
cruel sacrifice, would public opinion have believed such a person
as I am--against the evidence of a medical man, and the verdict
of a jury? No, Mr. Morris! I said nothing, and I was resolved to
say nothing, so long as the choice of alternatives was left to
me. On the day when Mr. Mirabel implored me to save him, that
choice was no longer mine--and you know what I did. And now again
when suspicion (after all the long interval that had passed) has
followed and found that innocent man, you know what I have done.
What more do you ask of me?'

"'Your pardon,' I said, 'for not having understood you--and a
last favor. May I repeat what I have heard to the one person of
all others who ought to know, and who must know, what you have
told me?'

"It was needless to hint more plainly that I was speaking of
Emily. Miss Jethro granted my request.

"'It shall be as you please,' she answered. 'Say for me to _his_
daughter, that the grateful remembrance of her is my one refuge
from the thoughts that tortured me, when we spoke together on her
last night at school. She has made this dead heart of mine feel a
reviving breath of life, when I think of her. Never, in our
earthly pilgrimage, shall we meet again--I implore her to pity
and forget me. Farewell, Mr. Morris; farewell forever.'

"I confess that the tears came into my eyes. When I could see
clearly again, I was alone in the room."






During the first days of Mirabel's sojourn at his hotel in
London, events were in progress at Netherwoods, affecting the
interests of the man who was the especial object of his distrust.
Not long after Miss Ladd had returned to her school, she heard of
an artist who was capable of filling the place to be vacated by
Alban Morris. It was then the twenty-third of the month. In four
days more the new master would be ready to enter on his duties;
and Alban would be at liberty.

On the twenty-fourth, Alban received a telegram which startled
him. The person sending the message was Mrs. Ellmother; and the
words were: "Meet me at your railway station to-day, at two
o'clock."

He found the old woman in the waiting-room; and he met with a
rough reception.

"Minutes are precious, Mr. Morris," she said; "you are two
minutes late. The next train to London stops here in half an
hour--and I must go back by it."

"Good heavens, what brings you here? Is Emily--?"

"Emily is well enough in health--if that's what you mean? As to
why I come here, the reason is that it's a deal easier for me
(worse luck!) to take this journey than to write a letter. One
good turn deserves another. I don't forget how kind you were to
me, away there at the school--and I can't, and won't, see what's
going on at the cottage, behind your back, without letting you
know of it. Oh, you needn't be alarmed about _her!_ I've made an
excuse to get away for a few hours--but I haven't left her by
herself. Miss Wyvil has come to London again; and Mr. Mirabel
spends the best part of his time with her. Excuse me for a
moment, will you? I'm so thirsty after the journey, I can hardly
speak."

She presented herself at the counter in the waiting-room. "I'll
trouble you, young woman, for a glass of ale." She returned to
Alban in a better humor. "It's not bad stuff, that! When I have
said
 my say, I'll have a drop more--just to wash the taste of Mr.
Mirabel out of my mouth. Wait a bit; I have something to ask you.
How much longer are you obliged to stop here, teaching the girls
to draw?"

"I leave Netherwoods in three days more," Alban replied.

"That's all right! You may be in time to bring Miss Emily to her
senses, yet."

"What do you mean?"

"I mean--if you don't stop it--she will marry the parson."

"I can't believe it, Mrs. Ellmother! I won't believe it!"

"Ah, it's a comfort to him, poor fellow, to say that! Look here,
Mr. Morris; this is how it stands. You're in disgrace with Miss
Emily--and he profits by it. I was fool enough to take a liking
to Mr. Mirabel when I first opened the door to him; I know better
now. He got on the blind side of me; and now he has got on the
blind side of _her_. Shall I tell you how? By doing what you
would have done if you had had the chance. He's helping her--or
pretending to help her, I don't know which--to find the man who
murdered poor Mr. Brown. After four years! And when all the
police in England (with a reward to encourage them) did their
best, and it came to nothing!"

"Never mind that!" Alban said impatiently. "I want to know how
Mr. Mirabel is helping her?"

"That's more than I can tell you. You don't suppose they take me
into their confidence? All I can do is to pick up a word, here
and there, when fine weather tempts them out into the garden. She
tells him to suspect Mrs. Rook, and to make inquiries after Miss
Jethro. And he has his plans; and he writes them down, which is
dead against his doing anything useful, in my opinion. I don't
hold with your scribblers. At the same time I wouldn't count too
positively, in your place, on his being likely to fail. That
little Mirabel--if it wasn't for his beard, I should believe he
was a woman, and a sickly woman too; he fainted in our house the
other day--that little Mirabel is in earnest. Rather than leave
Miss Emily from Saturday to Monday, he has got a parson out of
employment to do his Sunday work for him. And, what's more, he
has persuaded her (for some reasons of his own) to leave London
next week."

"Is she going back to Monksmoor?"

"Not she! Mr. Mirabel has got a sister, a widow lady; she's a
cripple, or something of the sort. Her name is Mrs. Delvin. She
lives far away in the north country, by the sea; and Miss Emily
is going to stay with her."

"Are you sure of that?"

"Sure? I've seen the letter."

"Do you mean the letter of invitation?"

"Yes--I do. Miss Emily herself showed it to me. I'm to go with
her--'in attendance on my mistress,' as the lady puts it. This I
will say for Mrs. Delvin: her handwriting is a credit to the
school that taught her; and the poor bedridden creature words her
invitation so nicely, that I myself couldn't have resisted
it--and I'm a hard one, as you know. You don't seem to heed me,
Mr. Morris."

"I beg your pardon, I was thinking."

"Thinking of what--if I may make so bold?"

"Of going back to London with you, instead of waiting till the
new master comes to take my place."

"Don't do that, sir! You would do harm instead of good, if you
showed yourself at the cottage now. Besides, it would not be fair
to Miss Ladd, to leave her before the other man takes your girls
off your hands. Trust me to look after your interests; and don't
go near Miss Emily--don't even write to her--unless you have got
something to say about the murder, which she will be eager to
hear. Make some discovery in that direction, Mr. Morris, while
the parson is only trying to do it or pretending to do it--and
I'll answer for the result. Look at the clock! In ten minutes
more the train will be here. My memory isn't as good as it was;
but I do think I have told you all I had to tell."

"You are the best of good friends!" Alban said warmly.

"Never mind about that, sir. If you want to do a friendly thing
in return, tell me if you know what has become of Miss de Sor."

"She has returned to Netherwoods."

"Aha! Miss Ladd is as good as her word. Would you mind writing to
tell me of it, if Miss de Sor leaves the school again? Good Lord!
there she is on the platform with bag and baggage. Don't let her
see me, Mr. Morris! If she comes in here, I shall set the marks
of my ten finger-nails on that false face of hers, as sure as I
am a Christian woman."

Alban placed himself at the door, so as to hide Mrs. Ellmother.
There indeed was Francine, accompanied by one of the teachers at
the school. She took a seat on the bench outside the
booking-office, in a state of sullen indifference--absorbed in
herself--noticing nothing. Urged by ungovernable curiosity, Mrs.
Ellmother stole on tiptoe to Alban's side to look at her. To a
person acquainted with the circumstances there could be no
possible doubt of what had happened. Francine had failed to
excuse herself, and had been dismissed from Miss Ladd's house.

"I would have traveled to the world's end," Mrs. Ellmother said,
"to see _that!_"

She returned to her place in the waiting-room, perfectly
satisfied.

The teacher noticed Alban, on leaving the booking-office after
taking the tickets. "I shall be glad," she said, looking toward
Francine, "when I have resigned the charge of that young lady to
the person who is to receive her in London."

"Is she to be sent back to her parents?" Alban asked.

"We don't know yet. Miss Ladd will write to St. Domingo by the
next mail. In the meantime, her father's agent in London--the
same person who pays her allowance--takes care of her until he
hears from the West Indies."

"Does she consent to this?"

"She doesn't seem to care what becomes of her. Miss Ladd has
given her every opportunity of explaining and excusing herself,
and has produced no impression. You can see the state she is in.
Our good mistress--always hopeful even in the worst cases, as you
know--thinks she is feeling ashamed of herself, and is too proud
and self-willed to own it. My own idea is, that some secret
disappointment is weighing on her mind. Perhaps I am wrong."

No. Miss Ladd was wrong; and the teacher was right.

The passion of revenge, being essentially selfish in its nature,
is of all passions the narrowest in its range of view. In
gratifying her jealous hatred of Emily, Francine had correctly
foreseen consequences, as they might affect the other object of
her enmity--Alban Morris. But she had failed to perceive the
imminent danger of another result, which in a calmer frame of
mind might not have escaped discovery. In triumphing over Emily
and Alban, she had been the indirect means of inflicting on
herself the bitterest of all disappointments--she had brought
Emily and Mirabel together. The first forewarning of this
catastrophe had reached her, on hearing that Mirabel would not
return to Monksmoor. Her worst fears had been thereafter
confirmed by a letter from Cecilia, which had followed her to
Netherwoods. From that moment, she, who had made others wretched,
paid the penalty in suffering as keen as any that she had
inflicted. Completely prostrated; powerless, through ignorance of
his address in London, to make a last appeal to Mirabel; she was
literally, as had just been said, careless what became of her.
When the train approached, she sprang to her feet--advanced to
the edge of the platform--and suddenly drew back, shuddering. The
teacher looked in terror at Alban. Had the desperate girl
meditated throwing herself under the wheels of the engine? The
thought had been in both their minds; but neither of them
acknowledged it. Francine stepped quietly into the carriage, when
the train drew up, and laid her head back in a corner, and closed
her eyes. Mrs. Ellmother took her place in another compartment,
and beckoned to Alban to speak to her at the window.

"Where can I see you, when you go to London?" she asked.

"At Doctor Allday's house."

"On what day?"

"On Tuesday next."






Having revived his sinking energies in the fruit garden, Mirabel
seated himself under the shade of a tree, and reflected on the
critical position in which he was placed by Francine's jealousy.

If Miss de Sor continued to be Mr. Wyvil's guest, there seemed to
be no other choice before Mirabel than to leave Monksmoor--and to
trust to a favorable reply to his sister's invitation for the
free enjoyment of Emily's society under another roof. Try as he
might, he could arrive at no more satisfactory conclusion than
this. In his preoccupied state, time passed quickly. Nearly an
hour had elapsed before he rose to return to the house.

Entering the hall, he was startled by a cry of terror in a
woman's voice, coming from the upper regions. At the same time
Mr. Wyvil, passing along the bedroom corridor after leaving the
music-room, was confronted by his daughter, hurrying out of
Emily's bedchamber in such a state of alarm that she could hardly
speak.

"Gone!" she cried, the moment she saw her father.

Mr. Wyvil took her in his arms and tried to compose her. "Who has
gone?" he asked.

"Emily! Oh, papa, Emily has left us! She has heard dreadful
news--she told me so herself."

"What news? How did she hear it?"

"I don't know how she heard it. I went back to the drawing-room
to show her my roses--"

"Was she alone?"

"Yes! She frightened me--she seemed quite wild. She said, 'Let me
be by myself; I shall have to go home.' She kissed me--and ran up
to her room. Oh, I am such a fool! Anybody else would have taken
care not to lose sight of her."

"How long did you leave her by herself?"

"I can't say. I thought I would go and tell you. And then I got
anxious about her, and knocked at her door, and looked into the
room. Gone! Gone!"

Mr. Wyvil rang the bell and confided Cecilia to the care of her
maid. Mirabel had already joined him in the corridor. They went
downstairs together and consulted with Alban. He volunteered to
make immediate inquiries at the railway station. Mr. Wyvil
followed him, as far as the lodge gate which opened on the
highroad--while Mirabel went to a second gate, at the opposite
extremity of the park.

Mr. Wyvil obtained the first news of Emily. The lodge keeper had
seen her pass him, on her way out of the park, in the greatest
haste. He had called after her, "Anything wrong, miss?" and had
received no reply. Asked what time had elapsed since this had
happened, he was too confused to be able to answer with any
certainty. He knew that she had taken the road which led to the
station--and he knew no more.

Mr. Wyvil and Mirabel met again at the house, and instituted an
examination of the servants. No further discoveries were made.

The question which occurred to everybody was suggested by the
words which Cecilia had repeated to her father. Emily had said
she had "heard dreadful news"--how had that news reached her? The
one postal delivery at Monksmoor was in the morning. Had any
special messenger arrived, with a letter for Emily? The servants
were absolutely certain that no such person had entered the
house. The one remaining conclusion suggested that somebody must
have communicated the evil tidings by word of mouth. But here
again no evidence was to be obtained. No visitor had called
during the day, and no new guests had arrived. Investigation was
completely baffled.

Alban returned from the railway, with news of the fugitive.

He had reached the station, some time after the departure of the
London train. The clerk at the office recognized his description
of Emily, and stated that she had taken her ticket for London.
The station-master had opened the carriage door for her, and had
noticed that the young lady appeared to be very much agitated.
This information obtained, Alban had dispatched a telegram to
Emily--in Cecilia's name: "Pray send us a few words to relieve
our anxiety, and let us know if we can be of any service to you."

This was plainly all that could be done--but Cecilia was not
satisfied. If her father had permitted it, she would have
followed Emily. Alban comforted her. He apologized to Mr. Wyvil
for shortening his visit, and announced his inten tion of
traveling to London by the next train. "We may renew our
inquiries to some advantage," he added, after hearing what had
happened in his absence, "if we can find out who was the last
person who saw her, and spoke to her, before your daughter found
her alone in the drawing-room. When I went out of the room, I
left her with Miss de Sor."

The maid who waited on Miss de Sor was sent for. Francine had
been out, by herself, walking in the park. She was then in her
room, changing her dress. On hearing of Emily's sudden departure,
she had been (as the maid reported) "much shocked and quite at a
loss to understand what it meant."

Joining her friends a few minutes later, Francine presented, so
far as personal appearance went, a strong contrast to the pale
and anxious faces round her. She looked wonderfully well, after
her walk. In other respects, she was in perfect harmony with the
prevalent feeling. She expressed herself with the utmost
propriety; her sympathy moved poor Cecilia to tears.

"I am sure, Miss de Sor, you will try to help us?" Mr. Wyvil
began

"With the greatest pleasure," Francine answered.

"How long were you and Miss Emily Brown together, after Mr.
Morris left you?"

"Not more than a quarter of an hour, I should think."

"Did anything remarkable occur in the course of conversation?"

"Nothing whatever."

Alban interfered for the first time. "Did you say anything," he
asked, "which agitated or offended Miss Brown?"

"That's rather an extraordinary question," Francine remarked.

"Have you no other answer to give?" Alban inquired.

"I answer--No!" she said, with a sudden outburst of anger.

There, the matter dropped. While she spoke in reply to Mr. Wyvil,
Francine had confronted him without embarrassment. When Alban
interposed, she never looked at him--except when he provoked her
to anger. Did she remember that the man who was questioning her,
was also the man who had suspected her of writing the anonymous
letter? Alban was on his guard against himself, knowing how he
disliked her. But the conviction in his own mind was not to be
resisted. In some unimaginable way, Francine was associated with
Emily's flight from the house.

The answer to the telegram sent from the railway station had not
arrived, when Alban took his departure for London. Cecilia's
suspense began to grow unendurable: she looked to Mirabel for
comfort, and found none. His office was to console, and his
capacity for performing that office was notorious among his
admirers; but he failed to present himself to advantage, when Mr.
Wyvil's lovely daughter had need of his services. He was, in
truth, too sincerely anxious and distressed to be capable of
commanding his customary resources of ready-made sentiment and
fluently-pious philosophy. Emily's influence had awakened the
only earnest and true feeling which had ever ennobled the popular
preacher's life.

Toward evening, the long-expected telegram was received at last.
What could be said, under the circumstances, it said in these
words:

"Safe at home--don't be uneasy about me--will write soon."

With that promise they were, for the time, forced to be content.




Time at Monksmoor had advanced to the half hour before dinner, on
Saturday evening.

Cecilia and Francine, Mr. Wyvil and Mirabel, were loitering in
the conservatory. In the drawing-room, Emily had been
considerately left alone with Alban. He had missed the early
train from Netherwoods; but he had arrived in time to dress for
dinner, and to offer the necessary explanations.

If it had been possible for Alban to allude to the anonymous
letter, he might have owned that his first impulse had led him to
destroy it, and to assert his confidence in Emily by refusing Mr.
Wyvil's invitation. But try as he might to forget them, the base
words that he had read remained in his memory. Irritating him at
the outset, they had ended in rousing his jealousy. Under that
delusive influence, he persuaded himself that he had acted, in
the first instance, without due consideration. It was surely his
interest--it might even be his duty--to go to Mr. Wyvil's house,
and judge for himself. After some last wretched moments of
hesitation, he had decided on effecting a compromise with his own
better sense, by consulting Miss Ladd. That excellent lady did
exactly what he had expected her to do. She made arrangements
which granted him leave of absence, from the Saturday to the
Tuesday following. The excuse which had served him, in
telegraphing to Mr. Wyvil, must now be repeated, in accounting
for his unexpected appearance to Emily. "I found a person to take
charge of my class," be said; "and I gladly availed myself of the
opportunity of seeing you again."

After observing him attentively, while he was speaking to her,
Emily owned, with her customary frankness, that she had noticed
something in his manner which left her not quite at her ease.

"I wonder," she said, "if there is any foundation for a doubt
that has troubled me?" To his unutterable relief, she at once
explained what the doubt was. "I am afraid I offended you, in
replying to your letter about Miss Jethro."

In this case, Alban could enjoy the luxury of speaking
unreservedly. He confessed that Emily's letter had disappointed
him.

"I expected you to answer me with less reserve," he replied; "and
I began to think I had acted rashly in writing to you at all.
When there is a better opportunity, I may have a word to say--"
He was apparently interrupted by something that he saw in the
conservatory. Looking that way, Emily perceived that Mirabel was
the object which had attracted Alban's attention. The vile
anonymous letter was in his mind again. Without a preliminary
word to prepare Emily, he suddenly changed the subject. "How do
you like the clergyman?" he asked.

"Very much indeed," she replied, without the slightest
embarrassment. "Mr. Mirabel is clever and agreeable--and not at
all spoiled by his success. I am sure," she said innocently, "you
will like him too."

Alban's face answered her unmistakably in the negative sense--but
Emily's attention was drawn the other way by Francine. She joined
them at the moment, on the lookout for any signs of an
encouraging result which her treachery might already have
produced. Alban had been inclined to suspect her when he had
received the letter. He rose and bowed as she approached.
Something--he was unable to r ealize what it was--told him, in
the moment when they looked at each other, that his suspicion had
hit the mark.

In the conservatory the ever-amiable Mirabel had left his friends
for a while in search of flowers for Cecilia. She turned to her
father when they were alone, and asked him which of the gentlemen
was to take her in to dinner--Mr. Mirabel or Mr. Morris?

"Mr. Morris, of course," he answered. "He is the new guest--and
he turns out to be more than the equal, socially-speaking, of our
other friend. When I showed him his room, I asked if he was
related to a man who bore the same name--a fellow student of
mine, years and years ago, at college. He is my friend's younger
son; one of a ruined family--but persons of high distinction in
their day."

Mirabel returned with the flowers, just as dinner was announced.

"You are to take Emily to-day," Cecilia said to him, leading the
way out of the conservatory. As they entered the drawing-room,
Alban was just offering his arm to Emily. "Papa gives you to me,
Mr. Morris," Cecilia explained pleasantly. Alban hesitated,
apparently not understanding the allusion. Mirabel interfered
with his best grace: "Mr. Wyvil offers you the honor of taking
his daughter to the dining-room." Alban's face darkened
ominously, as the elegant little clergyman gave his arm to Emily,
and followed Mr. Wyvil and Francine out of the room. Cecilia
looked at her silent and surly companion, and almost envied her
lazy sister, dining--under cover of a convenient headache--in her
own room.

Having already made up his mind that Alban Morris required
careful handling, Mirabel waited a little before he led the
conversation as usual. Between the soup and the fish, he made an
interesting confession, addressed to Emily in the strictest
confidence.

"I have taken a fancy to your friend Mr. Morris," he said. "First
impressions, in my case, decide everything; I like people or
dislike them on impulse. That man appeals to my sympathies. Is he
a good talker?"

"I should say Yes," Emily answered prettily, "if _you_ were not
present."

Mirabel was not to be beaten, even by a woman, in the art of
paying compliments. He looked admiringly at Alban (sitting
opposite to him), and said: "Let us listen."

This flattering suggestion not only pleased Emily--it artfully
served Mirabel's purpose. That is to say, it secured him an
opportunity for observation of what was going on at the other
side of the table.

Alban's instincts as a gentleman had led him to control his
irritation and to regret that he had suffered it to appear.
Anxious to please, he presented himself at his best. Gentle
Cecilia forgave and forgot the angry look which had startled her.
Mr. Wyvil was delighted with the son of his old friend. Emily
felt secretly proud of the good opinions which her admirer was
gathering; and Francine saw with pleasure that he was asserting
his claim to Emily's preference, in the way of all others which
would be most likely to discourage his rival. These various
impressions--produced while Alban's enemy was ominously
silent--began to suffer an imperceptible change, from the moment
when Mirabel decided that his time had come to take the lead. A
remark made by Alban offered him the chance for which he had been
on the watch. He agreed with the remark; he enlarged on the
remark; he was brilliant and familiar, and instructive and
amusing--and still it was all due to the remark. Alban's temper
was once more severely tried. Mirabel's mischievous object had
not escaped his penetration. He did his best to put obstacles in
the adversary's way--and was baffled, time after time, with the
readiest ingenuity. If he interrupted--the sweet-tempered
clergyman submitted, and went on. If he differed--modest Mr.
Mirabel said, in the most amiable manner, "I daresay I am wrong,"
and handled the topic from his opponent's point of view. Never
had such a perfect Christian sat before at Mr. Wyvil's table: not
a hard word, not an impatient look, escaped him. The longer Alban
resisted, the more surely he lost ground in the general
estimation. Cecilia was disappointed; Emily was grieved; Mr.
Wyvil's favorable opinion began to waver; Francine was disgusted.
When dinner was over, and the carriage was waiting to take the
shepherd back to his flock by moonlight, Mirabel's triumph was
complete. He had made Alban the innocent means of publicly
exhibiting his perfect temper and perfect politeness, under their
best and brightest aspect.

So that day ended. Sunday promised to pass quietly, in the
absence of Mirabel. The morning came--and it seemed doubtful
whether the promise would be fulfilled.

Francine had passed an uneasy night. No such encouraging result
as she had anticipated had hitherto followed the appearance of
Alban Morris at Monksmoor. He had clumsily allowed Mirabel to
improve his position--while he had himself lost ground--in
Emily's estimation. If this first disastrous consequence of the
meeting between the two men was permitted to repeat itself on
future occasions, Emily and Mirabel would be brought more closely
together, and Alban himself would be the unhappy cause of it.
Francine rose, on the Sunday morning, before the table was laid
for breakfast--resolved to try the effect of a timely word of
advice.

Her bedroom was situated in the front of the house. The man she
was looking for presently passed within her range of view from
the window, on his way to take a morning walk in the park. She
followed him immediately.

"Good-morning, Mr. Morris."

He raised his hat and bowed--without speaking, and without
looking at her.

"We resemble each other in one particular," she proceeded,
graciously; "we both like to breathe the fresh air before
breakfast."

He said exactly what common politeness obliged him to say, and no
more--he said, "Yes."

Some girls might have been discouraged. Francine went on.

"It is no fault of mine, Mr. Morris, that we have not been better
friends. For some reason, into which I don't presume to inquire,
you seem to distrust me. I really don't know what I have done to
deserve it."

"Are you sure of that?" he asked--eying her suddenly and
searchingly as he spoke.

Her hard face settled into a rigid look; her eyes met his eyes
with a stony defiant stare. Now, for the first time, she knew
that he suspected her of having written the anonymous letter.
Every evil quality in her nature steadily defied him. A hardened
old woman could not have sustained the shock of discovery with a
more devilish composure than this girl displayed. "Perhaps you
will explain yourself," she said.

"I _have_ explained myself," he answered.

"Then I must be content," she rejoined, "to remain in the dark. I
had intended, out of my regard for Emily, to suggest that you
might--with advantage to yourself, and to interests that are very
dear to you--be more careful in your behavior to Mr. Mirabel. Are
you disposed to listen to me?"

"Do you wish me to answer that question plainly, Miss de Sor?"

"I insist on your answering it plainly."

"Then I am _not_ disposed to listen to you."

"May I know why? or am I to be left in the dark again?"

"You are to be left, if you please, to your own ingenuity."

Francine looked at him, with a malignant smile. "One of these
days, Mr. Morris--I will deserve your confidence in my
ingenuity." She said it, and went back to the house.

This was the only element of disturbance that troubled the
perfect tranquillity of the day. What Francine had proposed to
do, with the one idea of making Alban serve her purpose, was
accomplished a few hours later by Emily's influence for good over
the man who loved her.

They passed the afternoon together uninterruptedly in the distant
solitudes of the park. In the course of conversation Emily found
an opportunity of discreetly alluding to Mirabel. "You mustn't be
jealous of our clever little friend," she said; "I like him, and
admire him; but--"

"But you don't love him?"

She smiled at the eager way in which Alban put the question.

"There is no fear of that," she answered brightly.

"Not even if you discovered that he loves you?"

"Not even then. Are you content at last? Promise me not to be
rude to Mr. Mirabel again."

"For his sake?"

"No--for my sake. I don't like to see you place yourself at a
disadvantage toward another man; I don't like you to disappoint
me."

The happiness of hearing her say those words transfigured
him--the manly beauty of his earlier and happier years seemed to
have returned to Alban. He took her hand--he was too agitated to
speak.

"You are forgetting Mr. Mirabel," she reminded him gently.

"I will be all that is civil and kind to Mr. Mirabel; I will like
him and admire him as you do. Oh, Emily, are you a little, only a
very little, fond of me?"

"I don't quite know."

"May I try to find out?"

"How?" she asked.

Her fair cheek was very near to him. The softly-rising color on
it said, Answer me here--and he answered.






Miss de Sor began cautiously with an apology. "Excuse me, Mr.
Mirabel, for reminding you of my presence."

Mr. Mirabel made no reply.

"I beg to say," Francine proceeded, "that I didn't intentionally
see you kiss Emily's hand."

Mirabel stood, looking at the roses which Emily had left on her
chair, as completely absorbed in his own thoughts as if he had
been alone in the garden.

"Am I not even worth notice?" Francine asked. "Ah, I know to whom
I am indebted for your neglect!" She took him familiarly by the
arm, and burst into a harsh laugh. "Tell me now, in
confidence--do you think Emily is fond of you?"

The impression left by Emily's kindness was still fresh in
Mirabel's memory: he was in no humor to submit to the jealous
resentment of a woman whom he regarded with perfect indifference.
Through the varnish of politeness which overlaid his manner,
there rose to the surface the underlying insolence, hidden, on
all ordinary occasions, from all human eyes. He answered
Francine--mercilessly answered her--at last.

"It is the dearest hope of my life that she may be fond of me,"
he said.

Francine dropped his arm "And fortune favors your hopes," she
added, with an ironical assumption of interest in Mirabel's
prospects. "When Mr. Morris leaves us to-morrow, he removes the
only obstacle you have to fear. Am I right?"

"No; you are wrong."

"In what way, if you please?"

"In this way. I don't regard Mr. Morris as an obstacle. Emily is
too delicate and too kind to hurt his feelings--she is not in
love with him. There is no absorbing interest in her mind to
divert her thoughts from me. She is idle and happy; she
thoroughly enjoys her visit to this house, and I am associated
with her enjoyment. There is my chance--!"

He suddenly stopped. Listening to him thus far, unnaturally calm
and cold, Francine now showed that she felt the lash of his
contempt. A hideous smile passed slowly over her white face. It
threatened the vengeance which knows no fear, no pity, no
remorse--the vengeance of a jealous woman. Hysterical anger,
furious language, Mirabel was prepared for. The smile frightened
him.

"Well?" she said scornfully, "why don't you go on?"

A bolder man might still have maintained the audacious position
which he had assumed. Mirabel's faint heart shrank from it. He
was eager to shelter himself under the first excuse that he could
find. His ingenuity, paralyzed by his fears, was unable to invent
anything new. He feebly availed himself of the commonplace trick
of evasion which he had read of in novels, and seen in action on
the stage.

"Is it possible," he asked, with an overacted assumption of
surprise, "that you think I am in earnest?"

In the case of any other person, Francine would have instantly
seen through that flimsy pretense. But the love which accepts the
meanest crumbs of comfort that can be thrown to it--which fawns
and grovels and deliberately deceives itself, in its own
intensely selfish interests--was the love that burned in
Francine's breast. The wretched girl believed Mirabel with such
an ecstatic sense of belief that she trembled in every limb, and
dropped into the nearest chair.

"_I_ was in earnest," she said faintly. "Didn't you see it?"

He was perfectly shameless; he denied that he had seen it, in the
most positive manner. "Upon my honor, I thought you were
mystifying me, and I humored the joke."

She sighed, and looking at him with an expression of tender
reproach. "I wonder whether I can believe you," she said softly.

"Indeed you may believe me!" he assured her.

She hesitated--for the pleasure of hesitating. "I don't know.
Emily is very much admired by some men. Why not by you?"

"For the best of reasons," he answered "She is poor, and I am
poor. Those are facts which speak for themselves."

"Yes--but Emily is bent on attracting you. She would marry you
to-morrow, if you asked her. Don't attempt to deny it! Besides,
you kissed her hand."

"Oh, Miss de Sor!"

"Don't call me 'Miss de Sor'! Call me Francine. I want to know
why you kissed her hand."

He humored her with inexhaustible servility. "Allow me to kiss
_your_ hand, Francine!--and let me explain that kissing a lady's
hand is only a form of thanking her for her kindness. You must
own that Emily--"

She interrupted him for the third time. "Emily?" she repeated.
"Are you as familiar as that already? Does she call you 'Miles,'
when you are by yourselves? Is there any effort at fascination
which this charming creature has left untried? She told you no
doubt what a lonely life she leads in her poor little home?"

Even Mirabel felt that he must not permit this to pass.

"She has said nothing to me about herself," he answered. "What I
know of her, I know from Mr. Wyvil."

"Oh, indeed! You asked Mr. Wyvil about her family, of course?
What did he say?"

"He said she lost her mother when she was a child--and he told me
her father had died suddenly, a few years since, of heart
complaint."

"Well, and what else?--Never mind now! Here is somebody coming."

The person was only one of the servants. Mirabel felt grateful to
the man for interrupting them. Animated by sentiments of a
precisely opposite nature, Francine spoke to him sharply.

"What do you want here?"

"A message, miss."

"From whom?"

"From Miss Brown."

"For me?"

"No, miss." He turned to Mirabel. "Miss Brown wishes to speak to
you, sir, if you are not e ngaged."

Francine controlled herself until the man was out of hearing.

"Upon my word, this is too shameless!" she declared indignantly.
"Emily can't leave you with me for five minutes, without wanting
to see you again. If you go to her after all that you have said
to me," she cried, threatening Mirabel with her outstretched
hand, "you are the meanest of men!"

He _was_ the meanest of men--he carried out his cowardly
submission to the last extremity.

"Only say what you wish me to do," he replied.

Even Francine expected some little resistance from a creature
bearing the outward appearance of a man. "Oh, do you really mean
it?" she asked "I want you to disappoint Emily. Will you stay
here, and let me make your excuses?"

"I will do anything to please you."

Francine gave him a farewell look. Her admiration made a
desperate effort to express itself appropriately in words. "You
are not a man," she said, "you are an angel!"

Left by himself, Mirabel sat down to rest. He reviewed his own
conduct with perfect complacency. "Not one man in a hundred could
have managed that she-devil as I have done," he thought. "How
shall I explain matters to Emily?"

Considering this question, he looked by chance at the unfinished
crown of roses. "The very thing to help me!" he said--and took
out his pocketbook, and wrote these lines on a blank page: "I
have had a scene of jealousy with Miss de Sor, which is beyond
all description. To spare _you_ a similar infliction, I have done
violence to my own feelings. Instead of instantly obeying the
message which you have so kindly sent to me, I remain here for a
little while--entirely for your sake."

Having torn out the page, and twisted it up among the roses, so
that only a corner of the paper appeared in view, Mirabel called
to a lad who was at work in the garden, and gave him his
directions, accompanied by a shilling. "Take those flowers to the
servants' hall, and tell one of the maids to put them in Miss
Brown's room. Stop! Which is the way to the fruit garden?"

The lad gave the necessary directions. Mirabel walked away
slowly, with his hands in his pockets. His nerves had been
shaken; he thought a little fruit might refresh him.






The servant received Emily, on her return from the library, with
a sly smile. "Here he is again, miss, waiting to see you."

She opened the parlor door, and revealed Alban Morris, as
restless as ever, walking up and down the room.

"When I missed you at the Museum, I was afraid you might be ill,"
he said. "Ought I to have gone away, when my anxiety was
relieved? Shall I go away now?"

"You must take a chair, Mr. Morris, and hear what I have to say
for myself. When you left me after your last visit, I suppose I
felt the force of example. At any rate I, like you, had my
suspicions. I have been trying to confirm them--and I have
failed."

He paused, with the chair in his hand. "Suspicions of Me?" he
asked.

"Certainly! Can you guess how I have been employed for the last
two days? No--not even your ingenuity can do that. I have been
hard at work, in another reading-room, consulting the same back
numbers of the same newspaper, which you have been examining at
the British Museum. There is my confession--and now we will have
some tea."

She moved to the fireplace, to ring the bell, and failed to see
the effect produced on Alban by those lightly-uttered words. The
common phrase is the only phrase that can describe it. He was
thunderstruck.

"Yes," she resumed, "I have read the report of the inquest. If I
know nothing else, I know that the murder at Zeeland can't be the
discovery which you are bent on keeping from me. Don't be alarmed
for the preservation of your secret! I am too much discouraged to
try again."

The servant interrupted them by answering the bell; Alban once
more escaped detection. Emily gave her orders with an approach to
the old gayety of her school days. "Tea, as soon as possible--and
let us have the new cake. Are you too much of a man, Mr. Morris,
to like cake?"

In this state of agitation, he was unreasonably irritated by that
playful question. "There is one thing I like better than cake,"
he said; "and that one thing is a plain explanation."

His tone puzzled her. "Have I said anything to offend you?" she
asked. "Surely you can make allowance for a girl's curiosity? Oh,
you shall have your explanation--and, what is more, you shall
have it without reserve!"

She was as good as her word. What she had thought, and what she
had planned, when he left her after his last visit, was frankly
and fully told. "If you wonder how I discovered the library," she
went on, "I must refer you to my aunt's lawyer. He lives in the
City--and I wrote to him to help me. I don't consider that my
time has been wasted. Mr. M orris, we owe an apology to Mrs.
Rook."

Alban's astonishment, when he heard this, forced its way to
expression in words. "What can you possibly mean?" he asked.

The tea was brought in before Emily could reply. She filled the
cups, and sighed as she looked at the cake. "If Cecilia was here,
how she would enjoy it!" With that complimentary tribute to her
friend, she handed a slice to Alban. He never even noticed it.

"We have both of us behaved most unkindly to Mrs. Rook," she
resumed. "I can excuse your not seeing it; for I should not have
seen it either, but for the newspaper. While I was reading, I had
an opportunity of thinking over what we said and did, when the
poor woman's behavior so needlessly offended us. I was too
excited to think, at the time--and, besides, I had been upset,
only the night before, by what Miss Jethro said to me."

Alban started. "What has Miss Jethro to do with it?" he asked.

"Nothing at all," Emily answered. "She spoke to me of her own
private affairs. A long story--and you wouldn't be interested in
it. Let me finish what I had to say. Mrs. Rook was naturally
reminded of the murder, when she heard that my name was Brown;
and she must certainly have been struck--as I was--by the
coincidence of my father's death taking place at the same time
when his unfortunate namesake was killed. Doesn't this
sufficiently account for her agitation when she looked at the
locket? We first took her by surprise: and then we suspected her
of Heaven knows what, because the poor creature didn't happen to
have her wits about her, and to remember at the right moment what
a very common name 'James Brown' is. Don't you see it as I do?"

"I see that you have arrived at a remarkable change of opinion,
since we spoke of the subject in the garden at school."

"In my place, you would have changed your opinion too. I shall
write to Mrs. Rook by tomorrow's post."

Alban heard her with dismay. "Pray be guided by my advice!" he
said earnestly. "Pray don't write that letter!"

"Why not?"

It was too late to recall the words which he had rashly allowed
to escape him. How could he reply?

To own that he had not only read what Emily had read, but had
carefully copied the whole narrative and considered it at his
leisure, appeared to be simply impossible after what he had now
heard. Her peace of mind depended absolutely on his discretion.
In this serious emergency, silence was a mercy, and silence was a
lie. If he remained silent, might the mercy be trusted to atone
for the lie? He was too fond of Emily to decide that question
fairly, on its own merits. In other words, he shrank from the
terrible responsibility of telling her the truth.

"Isn't the imprudence of writing to such a person as Mrs. Rook
plain enough to speak for itself?" he suggested cautiously.

"Not to me."

She made that reply rather obstinately. Alban seemed (in her
view) to be trying to prevent her from atoning for an act of
injustice. Besides, he despised her cake. "I want to know why you
object," she said; taking back the neglected slice, and eating it
herself.

"I object," Alban answered, "because Mrs. Rook is a coarse
presuming woman. She may pervert your letter to some use of her
own, which you may have reason to regret."

"Is that all?"

"Isn't it enough?"

"It may be enough for _you_. When I have done a person an injury,
and wish to make an apology, I don't think it necessary to
inquire whether the person's manners happen to be vulgar or not."

Alban's patience was still equal to any demands that she could
make on it. "I can only offer you advice which is honestly
intended for your own good," he gently replied.

"You would have more influence over me, Mr. Morris, if you were a
little readier to take me into your confidence. I daresay I am
wrong--but I don't like following advice which is given to me in
the dark."

It was impossible to offend him. "Very naturally," he said; "I
don't blame you."

Her color deepened, and her voice rose. Alban's patient adherence
to his own view--so courteously and considerately urged--was
beginning to try her temper. "In plain words," she rejoined, "I
am to believe that you can't be mistaken in your judgment of
another person."

There was a ring at the door of the cottage while she was
speaking. But she was too warmly interested in confuting Alban to
notice it.

He was quite willing to be confuted. Even when she lost her
temper, she was still interesting to him. "I don't expect you to
think me infallible," he said. "Perhaps you will remember that I
have had some experience. I am unfortunately older than you are."

"Oh if wisdom comes with age," she smartly reminded him, "your
friend Miss Redwood is old enough to be your mother--and she
suspected Mrs. Rook of murder, because the poor woman looked at a
door, and disliked being in the next room to a fidgety old maid."

Alban's manner changed: he shrank from that chance allusion to
doubts and fears which he dare not acknowledge. "Let us talk of
something else," he said.

She looked at him with a saucy smile. "Have I driven you into a
corner at last? And is _that_ your way of getting out of it?"

Even his endurance failed. "Are you trying to provoke me?" he
asked. "Are you no better than other women? I wouldn't have
believed it of you, Emily."

"Emily?" She repeated the name in a tone of surprise, which
reminded him that he had addressed her with familiarity at a most
inappropriate time--the time when they were on the point of a
quarrel. He felt the implied reproach too keenly to be able to
answer her with composure.

"I think of Emily--I love Emily--my one hope is that Emily may
love me. Oh, my dear, is there no excuse if I forget to call you
'Miss' when you distress me?"

All that was tender and true in her nature secretly took his
part. She would have followed that better impulse, if he had only
been calm enough to understand her momentary silence, and to give
her time. But the temper of a gentle and generous man, once
roused, is slow to subside. Alban abruptly left his chair. "I had
better go!" he said.

"As you please," she answered. "Whether you go, Mr. Morris, or
whether you stay, I shall write to Mrs. Rook."

The ring at the bell was followed by the appearance of a visitor.
Doctor Allday opened the door, just in time to hear Emily's last
words. Her vehemence seemed to amuse him.

"Who is Mrs. Rook?" he asked.

"A most respectable person," Emily answered indignantly;
"housekeeper to Sir Jervis Redwood. You needn't sneer at her,
Doctor Allday! She has not always been in service--she was
landlady of the inn at Zeeland."

The doctor, about to put his hat on a chair, paused. The inn at
Zeeland reminded him of the Handbill, and of the visit of Miss
Jethro.

"Why are you so hot over it?" he inquired

"Because I detest prejudice!" With this assertion of liberal
feeling she pointed to Alban, standing quietly apart at the
further end of the room. "There is the most prejudiced man
living--he hates Mrs. Rook. Would you like to be introduced to
him? You're a philosopher; you may do him some good. Doctor
Allday--Mr. Alban Morris."

The doctor recognized the man, with the felt hat and the
objectionable beard, whose personal appearance had not impressed
him favorably.

Although they may hesitate to acknowledge it, there are
respectable Englishmen still left, who regard a felt hat and a
beard as symbols of republican disaffection to the altar and the
throne. Doctor Allday's manner might have expressed this curious
form of patriotic feeling, but for the associations which Emily
had revived. In his present frame of mind, he was outwardly
courteous, because he was inwardly suspicious. Mrs. Rook had been
described to him as formerly landlady of the inn at Zeeland. Were
there reasons for Mr. Morris's hostile feeling toward this woman
which might be referable to the crime committed in her house that
might threaten Emily's tranquillity if they were made known? It
would not be amiss to see a little more of Mr. Morris, on the
first convenient occasion.

"I am glad to make your acquaintance, sir."

"You are very kind, Doctor Allday."

The exchange of polite conventionalities having been
accomplished, Alban approache d Emily to take his leave, with
mingled feelings of regret and anxiety--regret for having allowed
himself to speak harshly; anxiety to part with her in kindness.

"Will you forgive me for differing from you?" It was all he could
venture to say, in the presence of a stranger.

"Oh, yes!" she said quietly.

"Will you think again, before you decide?"

"Certainly, Mr. Morris. But it won't alter my opinion, if I do."

The doctor, hearing what passed between them, frowned. On what
subject had they been differing? And what opinion did Emily
decline to alter?

Alban gave it up. He took her hand gently. "Shall I see you at
the Museum, to-morrow?" he asked.

She was politely indifferent to the last. "Yes--unless something
happens to keep me at home."

The doctor's eyebrows still expressed disapproval. For what
object was the meeting proposed? And why at a museum?

"Good-afternoon, Doctor Allday."

"Good-afternoon, sir."

For a moment after Alban's departure, the doctor stood
irresolute. Arriving suddenly at a decision, he snatched up his
hat, and turned to Emily in a hurry.

"I bring you news, my dear, which will surprise you. Who do you
think has just left my house? Mrs. Ellmother! Don't interrupt me.
She has made up her mind to go out to service again. Tired of
leading an idle life--that's her own account of it--and asks me
to act as her reference."

"Did you consent?"

"Consent! If I act as her reference, I shall be asked how she
came to leave her last place. A nice dilemma! Either I must own
that she deserted her mistress on her deathbed--or tell a lie.
When I put it to her in that way, she walked out of the house in
dead silence. If she applies to you next, receive her as I
did--or decline to see her, which would be better still."

"Why am I to decline to see her?"

"In consequence of her behavior to your aunt, to be sure! No: I
have said all I wanted to say--and I have no time to spare for
answering idle questions. Good-by."

Socially-speaking, doctors try the patience of their nearest and
dearest friends, in this respect--they are almost always in a
hurry. Doctor Allday's precipitate departure did not tend to
soothe Emily's irritated nerves. She began to find excuses for
Mrs. Ellmother in a spirit of pure contradiction. The old
servant's behavior might admit of justification: a friendly
welcome might persuade her to explain herself. "If she applies to
me," Emily determined, "I shall certainly receive her."

Having arrived at this resolution, her mind reverted to Alban.

Some of the sharp things she had said to him, subjected to
after-reflection in solitude, failed to justify themselves. Her
better sense began to reproach her. She tried to silence that
unwelcome monitor by laying the blame on Alban. Why had he been
so patient and so good? What harm was there in his calling her
"Emily"? If he had told her to call _him_ by his Christian name,
she might have done it. How noble he looked, when he got up to go
away; he was actually handsome! Women may say what they please
and write what they please: their natural instinct is to find
their master in a man--especially when they like him. Sinking
lower and lower in her own estimation, Emily tried to turn the
current of her thoughts in another direction. She took up a
book--opened it, looked into it, threw it across the room.

If Alban had returned at that moment, resolved on a
reconciliation--if he had said, "My dear, I want to see you like
yourself again; will you give me a kiss, and make it up"--would
he have left her crying, when he went away? She was crying now.






When Alban presented himself the next morning, the hours of the
night had exercised their tranquilizing influence over Emily. She
remembered sorrowfully how Doctor Allday had disturbed her belief
in the man who loved her; no feeling of irritation remained.
Alban noticed that her manner was unusually subdued; she received
him with her customary grace, but not with her customary smile.

"Are you not well?" he asked.

"I am a little out of spirits," she replied. "A
disappointment--that is all."

He waited a moment, apparently in the expectation that she might
tell him what the disappointment was. She remained silent, and
she looked away from him. Was he in any way answerable for the
depression of spirits to which she alluded? The doubt occurred to
him--but he said nothing.

"I suppose you have received my letter?" she resumed.

"I have come here to thank you for your letter."

"It was my duty to tell you of Sir Jervis's illness; I deserve no
thanks."

"You have written to me so kindly," Alban reminded her; "you have
referred to our difference of opinion, the last time I was here,
so gently and so forgivingly--"

"If I had written a little later," she interposed, "the tone of
my letter might have been less agreeable to you. I happened to
send it to the post, before I received a visit from a friend of
yours--a friend who had something to say to me after consulting
with you."

"Do you mean Doctor Allday?"

"Yes."

"What did he say?"

"What you wished him to say. He did his best; he was as obstinate
and unfeeling as you could possibly wish him to be; but he was
too late. I have written to Mrs. Rook, and I have received a
reply." She spoke sadly, not angrily--and pointed to the letter
lying on her desk.

Alban understood: he looked at her in despair. "Is that wretched
woman doomed to set us at variance every time we meet!" he
exclaimed.

Emily silently held out the letter.

He refused to take it. "The wrong you have done me is not to be
set right in that way," he said. "You believe the doctor's visit
was arranged between us. I never knew that he intended to call on
you; I had no interest in sending him here--and I must not
interfere again between you and Mrs. Rook."

"I don't understand you."

"You will understand me when I tell you how my conversation with
Doctor Allday ended. I have done with interference; I have done
with advice. Whatever my doubts may be, all further effort on my
part to justify them--all further inquiries, no matter in what
direction--are at an end: I made the sacrifice, for your sake.
No! I must repeat what you said to me just now; I deserve no
thanks. What I have done, has been done in deference to Doctor
Allday--against my own convictions; in spite of my own fears.
Ridiculous convictions! ridiculous fears! Men with morbid minds
are their own tormentors. It doesn't matter how I suffer, so long
as you are at ease. I shall never thwart you or vex you again.
Have you a better opinion of me now?"

She made the best of all answers--she gave him her hand.

"May I kiss it?" he asked, as timidly as if he had been a boy
addressing his first sweetheart.

She was half inclined to laugh, and half inclined to cry. "Yes,
if you like," she said softly.

"Will you let me come and see you again?"

"Gladly--when I return to London."

"You are going away?"

"I am going to Brighton this afternoon, to stay with Miss Ladd."

It was hard to lose her, on the happy day when they understood
each other at last. An expression of disappointment passed over
his face. He rose, and walked restlessly to the window. "Miss
Ladd?" he repeated, turning to Emily as if an idea had struck
him. "Did I hear, at the school, that Miss de Sor was to spend
the holidays under the care of Miss Ladd?"

"Yes."

"The same young lady," he went on, "who paid you a visit
yesterday morning?"

"The same."

That haunting distrust of the future, which he had first betrayed
and then affected to ridicule, exercised its depressing influence
over his better sense. He was unreasonable enough to feel
doubtful of Francine, simply because she was a stranger.

"Miss de Sor is a new friend of yours," he said. "Do you like
her?"

It was not an easy question to answer--without entering into
particulars which Emily's delicacy of feeling warned her to
avoid. "I must know a little more of Miss de Sor," she said,
"before I can decide."

Alban's misgivings were naturally encouraged by this evasive
reply. He began to regret having left the cottage, on the
previous day, when he had heard that Emily was engaged. He might
have sent in his card, and might have been admitted. It was an
opportunity lost of observing Francine. On the morning of her
first day at school, when they had accidentally met at the summer
house, she had left a disagreeable impression on his mind. Ought
he to allow his opinion to be influenced by this circumstance? or
ought he to follow Emily's prudent example, and suspend judgment
until he knew a little more of Francine?

"Is any day fixed for your return to London?" he asked.

"Not yet," she said; "I hardly know how long my visit will be."

"In little more than a fortnight," he continued, "I shall return
to my classes--they will be dreary classes, without you. Miss de
Sor goes back to the school with Miss Ladd, I suppose?"

Emily was at a loss to account for the depression in his looks
and tones, while he was making these unimportant inquiries. She
tried to rouse him by speaking lightly in reply.

"Miss de Sor returns in quite a new character; she is to be a
guest instead of a pupil. Do you wish to be better acquainted
with her?"

"Yes," he said grave ly, "now I know that she is a friend of
yours." He returned to his place near her. "A pleasant visit
makes the days pass quickly," he resumed. "You may remain at
Brighton longer than you anticipate; and we may not meet again
for some time to come. If anything happens--"

"Do you mean anything serious?" she asked.

"No, no! I only mean--if I can be of any service. In that case,
will you write to me?"

"You know I will!"

She looked at him anxiously. He had completely failed to hide
from her the uneasy state of his mind: a man less capable of
concealment of feeling never lived. "You are anxious, and out of
spirits," she said gently. "Is it my fault?"

"Your fault? oh, don't think that! I have my dull days and my
bright days--and just now my barometer is down at dull." His
voice faltered, in spite of his efforts to control it; he gave up
the struggle, and took his hat to go. "Do you remember, Emily,
what I once said to you in the garden at the school? I still
believe there is a time of fulfillment to come in our lives." He
suddenly checked himself, as if there had been something more in
his mind to which he hesitated to give expression--and held out
his hand to bid her good-by.

"My memory of what you said in the garden is better than yours,"
she reminded him. "You said 'Happen what may in the interval, I
trust the future.' Do you feel the same trust still?"

He sighed--drew her to him gently--and kissed her on the
forehead. Was that his own reply? She was not calm enough to ask
him the question: it remained in her thoughts for some time after
he had gone.

                                        . . . . . . . .

On the same day Emily was at Brighton.

Francine happened to be alone in the drawing-room. Her first
proceeding, when Emily was shown in, was to stop the servant.

"Have you taken my letter to the post?"

"Yes, miss."

"It doesn't matter." She dismissed the servant by a gesture, and
burst into such effusive hospitality that she actually insisted
on kissing Emily. "Do you know what I have been doing?" she said.
"I have been writing to Cecilia--directing to the care of her
father, at the House of Commons. I stupidly forgot that you would
be able to give me the right address in Switzerland. You don't
object, I hope, to my making myself agreeable to our dear,
beautiful, greedy girl? It is of such importance to me to
surround myself with influential friends--and, of course, I have
given her your love. Don't look disgusted! Come, and see your
room.--Oh, never mind Miss Ladd. You will see her when she wakes.
Ill? Is that sort of old woman ever ill? She's only taking her
nap after bathing. Bathing in the sea, at her age! How she must
frighten the fishes!"

Having seen her own bed-chamber, Emily was next introduced to the
room occupied by Francine.

One object that she noticed in it caused her some little
surprise--not unmingled with disgust. She discovered on the
toilet-table a coarsely caricatured portrait of Mrs. Ellmother.
It was a sketch in pencil--wretchedly drawn; but spitefully
successful as a likeness. "I didn't know you were an artist,"
Emily remarked, with an ironical emphasis on the last word.
Francine laughed scornfully--crumpled the drawing up in her
hand--and threw it into the waste-paper basket.

"You satirical creature!" she burst out gayly. "If you had lived
a dull life at St. Domingo, you would have taken to spoiling
paper too. I might really have turned out an artist, if I had
been clever and industrious like you. As it was, I learned a
little drawing--and got tired of it. I tried modeling in wax--and
got tired of it. Who do you think was my teacher? One of our
slaves."

"A slave!" Emily exclaimed.

"Yes--a mulatto, if you wish me to be particular; the daughter of
an English father and a negro mother. In her young time (at least
she said so herself) she was quite a beauty, in her particular
style. Her master's favorite; he educated her himself. Besides
drawing and painting, and modeling in wax, she could sing and
play--all the accomplishments thrown away on a slave! When her
owner died, my uncle bought her at the sale of the property."

A word of natural compassion escaped Emily--to Francine's
surprise.

"Oh, my dear, you needn't pity her! Sappho (that was her name)
fetched a high price, even when she was no longer young. She came
to us, by inheritance, with the estates and the rest of it; and
took a fancy to me, when she found out I didn't get on well with
my father and mother. 'I owe it to _my_ father and mother,' she
used to say, 'that I am a slave. When I see affectionate
daughters, it wrings my heart.' Sappho was a strange compound. A
woman with a white side to her character, and a black side. For
weeks together, she would be a civilized being. Then she used to
relapse, and become as complete a negress as her mother. At the
risk of her life she stole away, on those occasions, into the
interior of the island, and looked on, in hiding, at the horrid
witchcrafts and idolatries of the blacks; they would have
murdered a half-blood, prying into their ceremonies, if they had
discovered her. I followed her once, so far as I dared. The
frightful yellings and drummings in the darkness of the forests
frightened me. The blacks suspected her, and it came to my ears.
I gave her the warning that saved her life (I don't know what I
should have done without Sappho to amuse me!); and, from that
time, I do believe the curious creature loved me. You see I can
speak generously even of a slave!"

"I wonder you didn't bring her with you to England," Emily said.

"In the first place," Francine answered, "she was my father's
property, not mine. In the second place, she's dead. Poisoned, as
the other half-bloods supposed, by some enemy among the blacks.
She said herself, she was under a spell!"

"What did she mean?"

Francine was not interested enough in the subject to explain.
"Stupid superstition, my dear. The negro side of Sappho was
uppermost when she was dying--there is the explanation. Be off
with you! I hear the old woman on the stairs. Meet her before she
can come in here. My bedroom is my only refuge from Miss Ladd."

On the morning of the last day in the week, Emily had a little
talk in private with her old schoolmistress. Miss Ladd listened
to what she had to say of Mrs. Ellmother, and did her best to
relieve Emily's anxieties. "I think you are mistaken, my child,
in supposing that Francine is in earnest. It is her great fault
that she is hardly ever in earnest. You can trust to my
discretion; leave the rest to your aunt's old servant and to me."

Mrs. Ellmother arrived, punctual to the appointed time. She was
shown into Miss Ladd's own room. Francine--ostentatiously
resolved to take no personal part in the affair--went for a walk.
Emily waited to hear the result.

After a long interval, Miss Ladd returned to the drawing-room,
and announced that she had sanctioned the engagement of Mrs.
Ellmother.

"I have considered your wishes, in this respect," she said. "It
is arranged that a week's notice, on either side, shall end the
term of service, after the first month. I cannot feel justified
in doing more than that. Mrs. Ellmother is such a respectable
woman; she is so well known to you, and she was so long in your
aunt's service, that I am bound to consider the importance of
securing a person who is exactly fitted to attend on such a girl
as Francine. In one word, I can trust Mrs. Ellmother."

"When does she enter on her service?" Emily inquired.

"On the day after we return to the school," Miss Ladd replied.
"You will be glad to see her, I am sure. I will send her here."

"One word more before you go," Emily said.

"Did you ask her why she left my aunt?"

"My dear child, a woman who has been five-and-twenty years in one
place is entitled to keep her own secrets. I understand that she
had her reasons, and that she doesn't think it necessary to
mention them to anybody. Never trust people by halves--especially
when they are people like Mrs. Ellmother."

It was too late now to raise any objections. Emily felt relieved,
rather than disappointed, on discovering that Mrs. Ellmother was
in a hurry to get back to London by the next train. Sh e had
found an opportunity of letting her lodgings; and she was eager
to conclude the bargain. "You see I couldn't say Yes," she
explained, "till I knew whether I was to get this new place or
not--and the person wants to go in tonight."

Emily stopped her at the door. "Promise to write and tell me how
you get on with Miss de Sor."

"You say that, miss, as if you didn't feel hopeful about me."

"I say it, because I feel interested about you. Promise to
write."

Mrs. Ellmother promised, and hastened away. Emily looked after
her from the window, as long as she was in view. "I wish I could
feel sure of Francine!" she said to herself.

"In what way?" asked the hard voice of Francine, speaking at the
door.

It was not in Emily's nature to shrink from a plain reply. She
completed her half-formed thought without a moment's hesitation.

"I wish I could feel sure," she answered, "that you will be kind
to Mrs. Ellmother."

"Are you afraid I shall make her life one scene of torment?"
Francine inquired. "How can I answer for myself? I can't look
into the future."

"For once in your life, can you be in earnest?" Emily said.

"For once in your life, can you take a joke?" Francine replied.

Emily said no more. She privately resolved to shorten her visit
to Brighton.




Reaching the cottage at night, Emily found the card of a visitor
who had called during the day. It bore the name of "Miss Wyvil,"
and had a message written on it which strongly excited Emily's
curiosity.

"I have seen the telegra m which tells your servant that you
return to-night. Expect me early to-morrow morning--with news
that will deeply interest you."

To what news did Cecilia allude? Emily questioned the woman who
had been left in charge of the cottage, and found that she had
next to nothing to tell. Miss Wyvil had flushed up, and had
looked excited, when she read the telegraphic message--that was
all. Emily's impatience was, as usual, not to be concealed.
Expert Mrs. Ellmother treated the case in the right way--first
with supper, and then with an adjournment to bed. The clock
struck twelve, when she put out the young mistress's candle. "Ten
hours to pass before Cecilia comes here!" Emily exclaimed. "Not
ten minutes," Mrs. Ellmother reminded her, "if you will only go
to sleep."

Cecilia arrived before the breakfast-table was cleared; as
lovely, as gentle, as affectionate as ever--but looking unusually
serious and subdued.

"Out with it at once!" Emily cried. "What have you got to tell
me?'

"Perhaps, I had better tell you first," Cecilia said, "that I
know what you kept from me when I came here, after you left us at
Monksmoor. Don't think, my dear, that I say this by way of
complaint. Mr. Alban Morris says you had good reasons for keeping
your secret."

"Mr. Alban Morris! Did you get your information from _him?_"

"Yes. Do I surprise you?"

"More than words can tell!"

"Can you bear another surprise? Mr. Morris has seen Miss Jethro,
and has discovered that Mr. Mirabel has been wrongly suspected of
a dreadful crime. Our amiable little clergyman is guilty of being
a coward--and guilty of nothing else. Are you really quiet enough
to read about it?"

She produced some leaves of paper filled with writing. "There,"
she explained, "is Mr. Morris's own account of all that passed
between Miss Jethro and himself."

"But how do _you_ come by it?"

"Mr. Morris gave it to me. He said, 'Show it to Emily as soon as
possible; and take care to be with her while she reads it.' There
is a reason for this--" Cecilia's voice faltered. On the brink of
some explanation, she seemed to recoil from it. "I will tell you
by-and-by what the reason is," she said.

Emily looked nervously at the manuscript. "Why doesn't he tell me
himself what he has discovered? Is he--" The leaves began to
flutter in her trembling fingers--"is he angry with me?"

"Oh, Emily, angry with You! Read what he has written and you
shall know why he keeps away."

Emily opened the manuscript.






A decent elderly woman was seated at the bedside. She rose, and
spoke to Emily with a mingling of sorrow and confusion strikingly
expressed on her face. "It isn't my fault," she said, "that Mrs.
Rook receives you in this manner; I am obliged to humor her."

She drew aside, and showed Mrs. Rook with her head supported by
many pillows, and her face strangely hidden from view under a
veil. Emily started back in horror. "Is her face injured?" she
asked.

Mrs. Rook answered the question herself. Her voice was low and
weak; but she still spoke with the same nervous hurry of
articulation which had been remarked by Alban Morris, on the day
when she asked him to direct her to Netherwoods

"Not exactly injured," she explained; "but one's appearance is a
matter of some anxiety even on one's death-bed. I am disfigured
by a thoughtless use of water, to bring me to when I had my
fall--and I can't get at my toilet-things to put myself right
again. I don't wish to shock you. Please excuse the veil."

Emily remembered the rouge on her cheeks, and the dye on her
hair, when they had first seen each other at the school.
Vanity--of all human frailties the longest-lived--still held its
firmly-rooted place in this woman's nature; superior to torment
of conscience, unassailable by terror of death!

The good woman of the house waited a moment before she left the
room. "What shall I say," she asked, "if the clergyman comes?"

Mrs. Rook lifted her hand solemnly "Say," she answered, "that a
dying sinner is making atonement for sin. Say this young lady is
present, by the decree of an all-wise Providence. No mortal
creature must disturb us." Her hand dropped back heavily on the
bed. "Are we alone?" she asked.

"We are alone," Emily answered. "What made you scream just before
I came in?"

"No! I can't allow you to remind me of that," Mrs. Rook
protested. "I must compose myself. Be quiet. Let me think."

Recovering her composure, she also recovered that sense of
enjoyment in talking of herself, which was one of the marked
peculiarities in her character.

"You will excuse me if I exhibit religion," she resumed. "My dear
parents were exemplary people; I was most carefully brought up.
Are you pious? Let us hope so."

Emily was once more reminded of the past.

The bygone time returned to her memory--the time when she had
accepted Sir Jervis Redwood's offer of employment, and when Mrs.
Rook had arrived at the school to be her traveling companion to
the North. The wretched creature had entirely forgotten her own
loose talk, after she had drunk Miss Ladd's good wine to the last
drop in the bottle. As she was boasting now of her piety, so she
had boasted then of her lost faith and hope, and had mockingly
declared her free-thinking opinions to be the result of her
ill-assorted marriage. Forgotten--all forgotten, in this later
time of pain and fear. Prostrate under the dread of death, her
innermost nature--stripped of the concealments of her later
life--was revealed to view. The early religious training, at
which she had scoffed in the insolence of health and strength,
revealed its latent influence--intermitted, but a living
influence always from first to last. Mrs. Rook was tenderly
mindful of her exemplary parents, and proud of exhibiting
religion, on the bed from which she was never to rise again.

"Did I tell you that I am a miserable sinner?" she asked, after
an interval of silence.

Emily could endure it no longer. "Say that to the clergyman," she
answered--"not to me."

"Oh, but I must say it," Mrs. Rook insisted. "I _am_ a miserable
sinner. Let me give you an instance of it," she continued, with a
shameless relish of the memory of her own frailties. "I have been
a drinker, in my time. Anything was welcome, when the fit was on
me, as long as it got into my head. Like other persons in liquor,
I sometimes talked of things that had better have been kept
secret. We bore that in mind--my old man and I---when we were
engaged by Sir Jervis. Miss Redwood wanted to put us in the next
bedroom to hers--a risk not to be run. I might have talked of the
murder at the inn; and she might have heard me. Please to remark
a curious thing. Whatever else I might let out, when I was in my
cups, not a word about the pocketbook ever dropped from me. You
will ask how I know it. My dear, I should have heard of it from
my husband, if I had let _that_ out--and he is as much in the
dark as you are. Wonderful are the workings of the human mind, as
the poet says; and drink drowns care, as the proverb says. But
can drink deliver a person from fear by day, and fear by night? I
believe, if I had dropped a word about the pocketbook, it would
have sobered me in an instant. Have you any remark to make on
this curious circumstance?"

Thus far, Emily had allowed the woman to ramble on, in the hope
of getting information which direct inquiry might fail to
produce. It was impossible, however, to pass over the allusion to
the pocketbook. After giving her time to recover from the
exhaustion which her heavy breathing sufficiently revealed, Emily
put the question:

"Who did the pocketbook belong to?"

"Wait a little," said Mrs. Rook. "Everything in its right place,
is my motto. I mustn't begin with the pocketbook. Why did I begin
with it? Do you think this veil on my face confuses me? Suppose I
take it off. But you must promise first--solemnly promise you
won't look at my face. How can I tell you about the murder (the
murder is part of my confession, you know), with this lace
tickling my skin? Go away--and stand there with your back to me.
Thank you. Now I'll take it off. Ha! the air feels refreshing; I
know what I am about. Good heavens, I have forgotten something! I
have forgotten _him_. And after such a fright as he gave me! Did
you see him on the landing?"

"Who are you talking of?" Emily asked.

Mrs. Rook's failing voice sank lower still.

"Come closer," she said, "this must be whispered. Who am I
talking of?" she repeated. "I am talking of the man who slept in
the other bed at the inn; the man who did the deed with his own
razor. He was gone when I looked into the outhouse in the gray of
the morning. Oh, I have done my duty! I have told Mr. Rook to
keep an eye on him downstairs. You haven't an idea how obstinate
and stupid my husband is. He says I couldn't know the man,
because I didn't see him. Ha! there's such a thing as hearing,
when you don't see. I heard--and I knew it again."

Emily turned cold from head to foot.

"What did you know again?" she said.

"His voice," Mrs. Rook answered. "I'll swear to his voice before
all the judges in England."

Emily rushed to the bed. She looked at the woman who had said
those dreadful words, speechless with horror.

"You're breaking your promise!" cried Mrs. Rook. "You false girl,
you're breaking your promise!"

She snatched at the veil, and put it on again. The sight of her
face, momentary as it had been, reassured Emily. Her wild eyes,
made wilder still by the blurred stains of rouge below them, half
washed away--her disheveled hair, with streaks of gray showing
through the dye--presented a spectacle which would have been
grotesque under other circumstances, but which now reminded Emily
of Mr. Rook's last words; warning her not to believe what his
wife said, and even declaring his conviction that her intellect
was deranged. Emily drew back from the bed, conscious of an
overpowering sense of self-reproach. Although it was only for a
moment, she had allowed her faith in Mirabel to be shaken by a
woman who was out of her mind.

"Try to forgive me," she said. "I didn't willfully break my
promise; you frightened me."

Mrs. Rook began to cry. "I was a handsome woman in my time," she
murmured. "You would say I was handsome still, if the clumsy
fools about me had not spoiled my appearance. Oh, I do feel so
weak! Where's my medicine?"

The bottle was on the table. Emily gave her the prescribed dose,
and revived her failing strength.

"I am an extraordinary person," she resumed. "My resolution has
always been the admiration of every one who knew me. But my mind
feels--how shall I express it?--a little vacant. Have mercy on my
poor wicked soul! Help me."

"How can I help you?"

"I want to recollect. Something happened in the summer time, when
we were talking at Netherwoods. I mean when that impudent master
at the school showed his suspicions of me. (Lord! how he
frightened me, when he turned up afterward at Sir Jervis's
house.) You must have seen yourself he suspected me. How did he
show it?"

"He showed you my locket," Emily answered.

"Oh, the horrid reminder of the murder!" Mrs. Rook exclaimed.
"_I_ didn't mention it: don't blame Me. You poor innocent, I have
something dreadful to tell you."

Emily's horror of the woman forced her to speak. "Don't tell me!"
she cried. "I know more than you suppose; I know what I was
ignorant of when you saw the locket."

Mrs. Rook took offense at the interruption.

"Clever as you are, there's one thing you don't know," she said.
"You asked me, just now, who the pocketbook belonged to. It
belonged to your father. What's the matter? Are you crying?"

Emily was thinking of her father. The pocketbook was the last
present she had given to him--a present on his birthday. "Is it
lost?" she asked sadly.

"No; it's not lost. You will hear more of it directly. Dry your
eyes, and expect something interesting--I'm going to talk about
love. Love, my dear, means myself. Why shouldn't it? I'm not the
only nice-looking woman, married to an old man, who has had a
lover."

"Wretch! what has that got to do with it?"

"Everything, you rude girl! My lover was like the rest of them;
he would bet on race-horses, and he lost. He owned it to me, on
the day when your father came to our inn. He said, 'I must find
the money--or be off to America, and say good-by forever.' I was
fool enough to be fond of him. It broke my heart to hear him talk
in that way. I said, 'If I find the money, and more than the
money, will you take me with you wherever you go?' Of course, he
said Yes. I suppose you have heard of the inquest held at our old
place by the coroner and jury? Oh, what idiots! They believed I
was asleep on the night of the murder. I never closed my eyes--I
was so miserable, I was so tempted."

"Tempted? What tempted you?"

"Do you think I had any money to spare? Your father's pocketbook
tempted me. I had seen him open it, to pay his bill over-night.
It was full of bank-notes. Oh, what an overpowering thing love
is! Perhaps you have known it yourself."

Emily's indignation once more got the better of her prudence.
"Have you no feeling of decency on your death-bed!" she said.

Mrs. Rook forgot her piety; she was ready with an impudent
rejoinder. "You hot-headed little woman, your time will come,"
she answered. "But you're right--I am wandering from the point; I
am not sufficiently sensible of this solemn occasion. By-the-by,
do you notice my language? I inherit correct English from my
mother--a cultivated person, who married beneath her. My paternal
grandfather was a gentleman. Did I tell you that there came a
time, on that dreadful night, when I could stay in bed no longer?
The pocketbook--I did nothing but think of that devilish
pocketbook, full of bank-notes. My husband was fast asleep all
the time. I got a chair and stood on it. I looked into the place
where the two men were sleeping, through the glass in the top of
the door. Your father was awake; he was walking up and down the
room. What do you say? Was he agitated? I didn't notice. I don't
know whether the other man was asleep or awake. I saw nothing but
the pocketbook stuck under the pillow, half in and half out. Your
father kept on walking up and down. I thought to myself, 'I'll
wait till he gets tired, and then I'll have another look at the
pocketbook.' Where's the wine? The doctor said I might have a
glass of wine when I wanted it."

Emily found the wine and gave it to her. She shuddered as she
accidentally touched Mrs. Rook's hand.

The wine helped the sinking woman.

"I must have got up more than once," she resumed. "And more than
once my heart must have failed me. I don't clearly remember what
I did, till the gray of the morning came. I think that must have
been the last time I looked through the glass in the door."

She began to tremble. She tore the veil off her face. She cried
out piteously, "Lord, be merciful to me a sinner! Come here," she
said to Emily. "Where are you? No! I daren't tell you what I saw;
I daren't tell you what I did. When you're pos sessed by the
devil, there's nothing, nothing, nothing you can't do! Where did
I find the courage to unlock the door? Where did I find the
courage to go in? Any other woman would have lost her senses,
when she found blood on her fingers after taking the
pocketbook--"

Emily's head swam; her heart beat furiously--she staggered to the
door, and opened it to escape from the room.

"I'm guilty of robbing him; but I'm innocent of his blood!" Mrs.
Rook called after her wildly. "The deed was done--the yard door
was wide open, and the man was gone--when I looked in for the
last time. Come back, come back!"

Emily looked round.

"I can't go near you," she said, faintly.

"Come near enough to see this."

She opened her bed-gown at the throat, and drew up a loop of
ribbon over her head. 'The pocketbook was attached to the ribbon.
She held it out.

"Your father's book," she said. "Won't you take your father's
book?"

For a moment, and only for a moment, Emily was repelled by the
profanation associated with her birthday gift. Then, the loving
remembrance of the dear hands that had so often touched that
relic, drew the faithful daughter back to the woman whom she
abhorred. Her eyes rested tenderly on the book. Before it had
lain in that guilty bosom, it had been _his_ book. The beloved
memory was all that was left to her now; the beloved memory
consecrated it to her hand. She took the book.

"Open it," said Mrs. Rook.

There were two five-pound bank-notes in it.

"His?" Emily asked.

"No; mine--the little I have been able to save toward restoring
what I stole."

"Oh!" Emily cried, "is there some good in this woman, after all?"

"There's no good in the woman!" Mrs. Rook answered desperately.
"There's nothing but fear--fear of hell now; fear of the
pocketbook in the past time. Twice I tried to destroy it--and
twice it came back, to remind me of the duty that I owed to my
miserable soul. I tried to throw it into the fire. It struck the
bar, and fell back into the fender at my feet. I went out, and
cast it into the well. It came back again in the first bucket of
water that was drawn up. From that moment, I began to save what I
could. Restitution! Atonement! I tell you the book found a
tongue--and those were the grand words it dinned in my ears,
morning and night." She stooped to fetch her breath--stopped, and
struck her bosom. "I hid it here, so that no person should see
it, and no person take it from me. Superstition? Oh, yes,
superstition! Shall tell you something? _You_ may find yourself
superstitious, if you are ever cut to the heart as I was. He left
me! The man I had disgraced myself for, deserted me on the day
when I gave him the stolen money. He suspected it was stolen; he
took care of his own cowardly self--and left me to the hard mercy
of the law, if the theft was found out. What do you call that, in
the way of punishment? Haven't I suffered? Haven't I made
atonement? Be a Christian--say you forgive me."

"I do forgive you."

"Say you will pray for me."

"I will."

"Ah! that comforts me! Now you can go."

Emily looked at her imploringly. "Don't send me away, knowing no
more of the murder than I knew when I came here! Is there
nothing, really nothing, you can tell me?"

Mrs. Rook pointed to the door.

"Haven't I told you already? Go downstairs, and see the wretch
who escaped in the dawn of the morning!"

"Gently, ma'am, gently! You're talking too loud," cried a mocking
voice from outside.

"It's only the doctor," said Mrs. Rook. She crossed her hands
over her bosom with a deep-drawn sigh. "I want no doctor, now. My
peace is made with my Maker. I'm ready for death; I'm fit for
Heaven. Go away! go away!"






"I am making a little excursion from the Engadine, my dearest of
all dear friends. Two charming fellow-travelers take care of me;
and we may perhaps get as far as the Lake of Como.

"My sister (already much improved in health) remains at St.
Moritz with the old governess. The moment I know what exact
course we are going to take, I shall write to Julia to forward
any letters which arrive in my absence. My life, in this earthly
paradise, will be only complete when I hear from my darling
Emily.

"In the meantime, we are staying for the night at some
interesting place, the name of which I have unaccountably
forgotten; and here I am in my room, writing to you at
last--dying to know if Sir Jervis has yet thrown himself at your
feet, and offered to make you Lady Redwood with magnificent
settlements.

"But you are waiting to hear who my new friends are. My dear, one
of them is, next to yourself, the most delightful creature in
existence. Society knows her as Lady Janeaway. I love her
already, by her Christian name; she is my friend Doris. And she
reciprocates my sentiments.

"You will now understand that union of sympathies made us
acquainted with each other.

"If there is anything in me to be proud of, I think it must be my
admirable appetite. And, if I have a passion, the name of it is
Pastry. Here again, Lady Doris reciprocates my sentiments. We sit
next to each other at the _table d'hote_.

"Good heavens, I have forgotten her husband! They have been
married rather more than a month. Did I tell you that she is just
two years older than I am?

"I declare I am forgetting him again! He is Lord Janeaway. Such a
quiet modest man, and so easily amused. He carries with him
everywhere a dirty little tin case, with air holes in the cover.
He goes softly poking about among bushes and brambles, and under
rocks, and behind old wooden houses. When he has caught some
hideous insect that makes one shudder, he blushes with pleasure,
and looks at his wife and me, and says, with the prettiest lisp:
'This is what I call enjoying the day.' To see the manner in
which he obeys Her is, between ourselves, to feel proud of being
a woman.

"Where was I? Oh, at the _table d'hote_.

"Never, Emily--I say it with a solemn sense of the claims of
truth--never have I eaten such an infamous, abominable,
maddeningly bad dinner, as the dinner they gave us on our first
day at the hotel. I ask you if I am not patient; I appeal to your
own recollection of occasions when I have exhibited extraordinary
self-control. My dear, I held out until they brought the pastry
round. I took one bite, and committed the most shocking offense
against good manners at table that you can imagine. My
handkerchief, my poor innocent handkerchief, received the
horrid--please suppose the rest. My hair stands on end, when I
think of it. Our neighbors at the table saw me. The coarse men
laughed. The sweet young bride, sincerely feeling for me, said,
'Will you allow me to shake hands? I did exactly what you have
done the day before yesterday.' Such was the beginning of my
friendship with Lady Doris Janeaway.

"We are two resolute women--I mean that _she_ is resolute, and
that I follow her--and we have asserted our right of dining to
our own satisfaction, by means of an interview with the chief
cook.

"This interesting person is an ex-Zouave in the French army.
Instead of making excuses, he confessed that the barbarous tastes
of the English and American visitors had so discouraged him, that
he had lost all pride and pleasure in the exercise of his art. As
an example of what he meant, he mentioned his experience of two
young Englishmen who could speak no foreign language. The waiters
reported that they objected to their breakfasts, and especially
to the eggs. Thereupon (to translate the Frenchman's own way of
putting it) he exhausted himself in exquisite preparations of
eggs. _Eggs a la tripe, au gratin, a l'Aurore, a la Dauphine, a
la Poulette, a la Tartare, a la Venitienne, a la Bordelaise_, and
so on, and so on. Still the two young gentlemen were not
satisfied. The ex-Zouave, infuriated; wounded in his honor,
disgraced as a professor, insisted on an explanation. What, in
heaven's name, _did_ they want for breakfast? They wanted boiled
eggs; and a fish which they called a _Bloaterre_. It was
impossible, he said, to express his contempt for the English idea
of a breakfast, in the presence of ladies. You know how a cat
expresses herself in the presence of a dog--and you will
understand the allusion. Oh, Emily, what dinners we have had, in
our own room, since we spoke to that noble cook!

"Have I any more news to send you? Are you interested, my dear,
in eloquent young clergymen?

"On our first appearance at the public table we noticed a
remarkable air of depression among the ladies. Had some
adventurous gentleman tried to climb a mountain, and failed? Had
disastrous political news arrived from England; a defeat of the
Conservatives, for instance? Had a revolution in the fashions
broken out in Paris, and had all our best dresses become of no
earthly value to us? I applied for information to the only lady
present who shone on the company with a cheerful face--my friend
Doris, of course. "'What day was yesterday?' she asked.

"'Sunday,' I answered.

"'Of all melancholy Sundays,' she continued, the most melancholy
in the calendar. Mr. Miles Mirabel preached his farewell sermon,
in our temporary chapel upstairs.'

"'And you have not recovered it yet?'

"'We are all heart-broken, Miss Wyvil.'

"This naturally interested me. I asked what sort of sermons Mr.
Mirabel preached. Lady Janeaway said: 'Come up to our room after
dinner. The subject is too distressing to be discussed in
public.'

"She began by making me personally acquainted with the reverend
gentleman--that is to say, she showed me the photographic
portraits of him. They were two in number. One only presented his
face. The other exhibited him at full length, adorned in his
surplice. Every lady in the congregation had received the two
photographs as a farewell present. 'My portraits,' Lady Doris
remarked, 'are the only complete specimens. The others have been
irretrievably ruined by tears.'

"You will now expect a personal description of this fascinating
man. What the photographs failed to tell me, my friend was so
kind as to complete from the resources of her own experience.
Here is the result presented to the best of my ability.

"He is young--not yet thirty years of age. His complexion is
fair; his features are delicate, his eyes are clear blue. He has
pretty hands, and rings prettier still. And such a voice, and
such manners! You will say there are plen ty of pet parsons who
answer to this description. Wait a little--I have kept his chief
distinction till the last. His beautiful light hair flows in
profusion over his shoulders; and his glossy beard waves, at
apostolic length, down to the lower buttons of his waistcoat.

"What do you think of the Reverend Miles Mirabel now?

"The life and adventures of our charming young clergyman, bear
eloquent testimony to the saintly patience of his disposition,
under trials which would have overwhelmed an ordinary man. (Lady
Doris, please notice, quotes in this place the language of his
admirers; and I report Lady Doris.)

"He has been clerk in a lawyer's office--unjustly dismissed. He
has given readings from Shakespeare--infamously neglected . He
has been secretary to a promenade concert company--deceived by a
penniless manager. He has been employed in negotiations for
making foreign railways--repudiated by an unprincipled
Government. He has been translator to a publishing
house--declared incapable by envious newspapers and reviews. He
has taken refuge in dramatic criticism--dismissed by a corrupt
editor. Through all these means of purification for the priestly
career, he passed at last into the one sphere that was worthy of
him: he entered the Church, under the protection of influential
friends. Oh, happy change! From that moment his labors have been
blessed. Twice already he has been presented with silver tea-pots
filled with sovereigns. Go where he may, precious sympathies
environ him; and domestic affection places his knife and fork at
innumerable family tables. After a continental career, which will
leave undying recollections, he is now recalled to England--at
the suggestion of a person of distinction in the Church, who
prefers a mild climate. It will now be his valued privilege to
represent an absent rector in a country living; remote from
cities, secluded in pastoral solitude, among simple breeders of
sheep. May the shepherd prove worthy of the flock!

"Here again, my dear, I must give the merit where the merit is
due. This memoir of Mr. Mirabel is not of my writing. It formed
part of his farewell sermon, preserved in the memory of Lady
Doris--and it shows (once more in the language of his admirers)
that the truest humility may be found in the character of the
most gifted man.

"Let me only add, that you will have opportunities of seeing and
hearing this popular preacher, when circumstances permit him to
address congregations in the large towns. I am at the end of my
news; and I begin to feel--after this long, long letter--that it
is time to go to bed. Need I say that I have often spoken of you
to Doris, and that she entreats you to be her friend as well as
mine, when we meet again in England?

"Good-by, darling, for the present. With fondest love,
                                        Your CECILIA."

"P.S.--I have formed a new habit. In case of feeling hungry in
the night, I keep a box of chocolate under the pillow. You have
no idea what a comfort it is. If I ever meet with the man who
fulfills my ideal, I shall make it a condition of the marriage
settlement, that I am to have chocolate under the pillow."






Arriving at the cottage, Doctor Allday discovered a gentleman,
who was just closing the garden gate behind him.

"Has Miss Emily had a visitor?" he inquired, when the servant
admitted him.

"The gentleman left a letter for Miss Emily, sir."

"Did he ask to see her?"

"He asked after Miss Letitia's health. When he heard that she was
dead, he seemed to be startled, and went away immediately."

"Did he give his name?"

"No, sir."

The doctor found Emily absorbed over her letter. His anxiety to
forestall any possible discovery of the deception which had
concealed the terrible story of her father's death, kept Doctor
Allday's vigilance on the watch. He doubted the gentleman who had
abstained from giving his name; he even distrusted the other
unknown person who had written to Emily.

She looked up. Her face relieved him of his misgivings, before
she could speak.

"At last, I have heard from my dearest friend," she said. "You
remember what I told you about Cecilia? Here is a letter--a long
delightful letter--from the Engadine, left at the door by some
gentleman unknown. I was questioning the servant when you rang
the bell."

"You may question me, if you prefer it. I arrived just as the
gentleman was shutting your garden gate."

"Oh, tell me! what was he like?"

"Tall, and thin, and dark. Wore a vile republican-looking felt
hat. Had nasty ill-tempered wrinkles between his eyebrows. The
sort of man I distrust by instinct."

"Why?"

"Because he doesn't shave."

"Do you mean that he wore a beard?"

"Yes; a curly black beard."

Emily clasped her hands in amazement. "Can it be Alban Morris?"
she exclaimed.

The doctor looked at her with a sardonic smile; he thought it
likely that he had discovered her sweetheart.

"Who is Mr. Alban Morris?" he asked.

"The drawing-master at Miss Ladd's school."

Doctor Allday dropped the subject: masters at ladies' schools
were not persons who interested him. He returned to the purpose
which had brought him to the cottage--and produced the Handbill
that had been sent to him in Emily's letter.

"I suppose you want to have it back again?' he said.

She took it from him, and looked at it with interest.

"Isn't it strange," she suggested, "that the murderer should have
escaped, with such a careful description of him as this
circulated all over England?"

She read the description to the doctor.

"'Name not known. Supposed age, between twenty-five and thirty
years. A well-made man, of small stature. Fair complexion,
delicate features, clear blue eyes. Hair light, and cut rather
short. Clean shaven, with the exception of narrow half-whiskers.
Small, white, well-shaped hands. Wore valuable rings on the two
last fingers of the left hand. Dressed neatly--'"

"That part of the description is useless," the doctor remarked;
"he would change his clothes."

"But could he change his voice?" Emily objected. "Listen to this:
'Remarkably good voice, smooth, full, and persuasive.' And here
again! 'Ingratiating  manners.' Perhaps you will say he could put
on an appearance of rudeness?"

"I will say this, my dear. He would be able to disguise himself
so effectually that ninety-nine people out of a hundred would
fail to identify him, either by his voice or his manner."

"How?"

"Look back at the description: 'Hair cut rather short, clean
shaven, with the exception of narrow half-whiskers.' The wretch
was safe from pursuit; he had ample time at his disposal--don't
you see how he could completely alter the appearance of his head
and face? No more, my dear, of this disagreeable subject! Let us
get to something interesting. Have you found anything else among
your aunt's papers?"

"I have met with a great disappointment," Emily replied. "Did I
tell you how I discovered the Handbill?"

"No."

"I found it, with the scrap-book and the newspaper cuttings,
under a collection of empty boxes and bottles, in a drawer of the
washhand-stand. And I naturally expected to make far more
interesting discoveries in this room. My search was over in five
minutes. Nothing in the cabinet there, in the corner, but a few
books and some china. Nothing in the writing-desk, on that
side-table, but a packet of note-paper and some sealing-wax.
Nothing here, in the drawers, but tradesmen's receipts, materials
for knitting, and old photographs. She must have destroyed all
her papers, poor dear, before her last illness; and the Handbill
and the other things can only have escaped, because they were
left in a place which she never thought of examining. Isn't it
provoking?"

With a mind inexpressibly relieved, good Doctor Allday asked
permission to return to his patients: leaving Emily to devote
herself to her friend's letter.

On his way out, he noticed that the door of the bed-chamber on
the opposite side of the passage stood open. Since Miss Letitia's
death the room had not been used. Well within view stood the
washhand-stand to which Emily had alluded. The doctor advanced to
the house door--reflected--hesitated--and looked toward the empty
room.

It had struck him that there might be a second drawer which Emily
had overlooked. Would he be justified in setting this doubt at
rest? If he passed over ordinary scruples it would not be without
excuse. Miss Letitia had spoken to him of her affairs, and had
asked him to act (in Emily's interest) as co-executor with her
lawyer. The rapid progress of the illness had made it impossible
for her to execute the necessary codicil. But the doctor had been
morally (if not legally) taken into her confidence--and, for that
reason, he decided that he had a right in this serious matter to
satisfy his own mind.

A glance was enough to show him that no second drawer had been
overlooked.

There was no other discovery to detain the doctor. The wardrobe
only contained the poor old lady's clothes; the one cupboard was
open and empty. On the point of leaving the room, he went back to
the washhand-stand. While he had the opportunity, it might not be
amiss to make sure that Emily had thoroughly examined those old
boxes and bottles, which she had alluded to with some little
contempt.

The drawer was of considerable length. When he tried to pull it
completely out from the grooves in which it ran, it resisted him.
In his present frame of mind, this was a suspicious circumstance
in itself. He cleared away the litter so as to make room for the
introduction of his hand and arm into the drawer. In another
moment his fingers touched a piece of paper, jammed between the
inner end of the drawer and the bottom of the flat surface of the
washhand-stand. With a little care, he succeeded in extricating
the paper. Only pausing to satisfy himself that there was nothing
else to be found, and to close the drawer after replacing its
contents, he left the cottage.

The cab was waiting for him. On the drive back to his own house,
he opened the crumpled paper. It proved to be a letter addressed
to Miss Letitia; and it was signed by no less a person than
Emily's schoolmistress. Looking back from the end to the
beginning, Doctor Allday discovered, in the first sentence, the
name of--Miss Jethro.

But for the interview of that morning with his patient he might
have doubted the propriety of making himself further acquainted
with the letter. As things were, he read it without hesitation.

"DEAR MADAM--I cannot but regard it as providential circumstance
that your niece, in writing to you from my house, should have
mentioned, among other events of her school life, the arrival of
my new teacher, Miss Jethro.

"To say that I was surprised is to express very inadequately what
I felt when I read your letter, informing me confidentially that
I had employed a woman who was unworthy to associate with the
young persons placed under my care. It is impossible for me to
suppose that a lady in your position, and possessed of your high
principles, would make such a serious accusation as this, without
unanswerable reasons for doing so. At the same time I cannot,
consistently with my duty as a Christian, suffer my opinion of
Miss Jethro to be in any way modified, until proofs are laid
before me which it is impossible to dispute.

"Placing the same confidence in your discretion, which you have
placed in mine, I now inclose the references and testimonials
which Miss Jethro submitted to me, when she presented herself to
fill the vacant situation in my school.

"I earnestly request you to lose no time in instituting the
confidential inquiries which you have volunteered to make.
Whatever the result may be, pray return to me the inclosures
which I have trusted to your care, and believe me, dear madam, in
much suspense and anxiety, sincerely yours,

                                        AMELIA LADD."


It is needless to describe, at any length, the impression which
these lines produced on the doctor.

If he had heard what Emily had heard at the time of her aunt's
last illness, he would have called to mind Miss Letitia's
betrayal of her interest in some man unknown, whom she believed
to have been beguiled by Miss Jethro--and he would have perceived
that the vindictive hatred, thus produced, must have inspired the
letter of denunciation which the schoolmistress had acknowledged.
He would also have inferred that Miss Letitia's inquiries had
proved her accusation to be well founded--if he had known of the
new teacher's sudden dismissal from the school. As things were,
he was merely confirmed in his bad opinion of Miss Jethro; and he
was induced, on reflection, to keep his discovery to himself.

"If poor Miss Emily saw the old lady exhibited in the character
of an informer," he thought, "what a blow would be struck at her
innocent respect for the memory of her aunt!"






Alban returned to Netherwoods--to continue his services, until
another master could be found to take his place.

By a later train Miss Ladd followed him. Emily was too well aware
of the importance of the mistress's presence to the well-being of
the school, to permit her to remain at the cottage. It was
understood that they were to correspond, and that Emily's room
was waiting for her at Netherwoods, whenever she felt inclined to
occupy it

Mrs. Ellmother made the tea, that evening, earlier than usual.
Being alone again with Emily, it struck her that she might take
advantage of her position to say a word in Alban's favor. She had
chosen her time unfortunately. The moment she pronounced the
name, Emily checked her by a look, and spoke of another
person--that person being Miss Jethro.

Mrs. Ellmother at once entered her protest, in her own downright
way. "Whatever you do," she said, "don't go back to that! What
does Miss Jethro matter to you?"

"I am more interested in her than you suppose--I happen to know
why she left the school."

"Begging your pardon, miss, that's quite impossible!"

"She left the school," Emily persisted, "for a serious reason.
Miss Ladd discovered that she had used false references."

"Good Lord! who told you that?"

"You see I know it. I asked Miss Ladd how she got her
information. She was bound by a promise never to mention the
person's name. I didn't say it to her--but I may say it to you. I
am afraid I have an idea of who the person was."

"No," Mrs. Ellmother obstinately asserted, "you can't possibly
know who it was! How should you know?"

"Do you wish me to repeat what I heard in that room opposite,
when my aunt was dying?"

"Drop it, Miss Emily! For God's sake, drop it!"

"I can't drop it. It's dreadful to me to have suspicions of my
aunt--and no better reason for them than what she said in a state
of delirium. Tell me, if you love me, was it her wandering fancy?
or was it the truth?"

"As I hope to be saved, Miss Emily, I can only guess as you do--I
don't rightly know. My mistress trusted me half way, as it were.
I'm afraid I have a rough tongue of my own sometimes. I offended
her--and from that time she kept her own counsel. What she did,
she did in the dark, so far as I was concerned."

"How did you offend her?"

"I shall be obliged to speak of your father if I tell you how?"

"Speak of him."

"_He_ was not to blame--mind that!" Mrs. Ellmother said
earnestly. "If I wasn't certain of what I say now you wouldn't
get a word out of me. Good harmless man--there's no denying
it--he _was_ in love with Miss Jethro! What's the matter?"

Emily was thinking of her memorable conversation with the
disgraced teacher on her last night at school. "Nothing" she
answered. "Go on."

"If he had not tried to keep it secret from us, "Mrs. Ellmother
resumed, "your aunt might never have taken it into her head that
he was entangled in a love affair of the shameful sort. I don't
deny that I helped her in her inquiries; but it was only because
I felt sure from the first that the more she discovered the more
certainly my master's innocence would show itself. He used to go
away and visit Miss Jethro privately. In the time when your aunt
trusted me, we never could find out where. She made that
discovery afterward for herself (I can't tell you how long
afterward); and she spent money in employing mean wretches to pry
into Miss Jethro's past life. She had (if you will excuse me for
saying it) an old maid's hatred of the handsome young woman, who
lured your father away from home, and set up a secret (in a
manner of speaking) between her brother and herself. I won't tell
you how we looked at letters and other things which he forgot to
leave under lock and key. I will only say there was one bit, in a
journal he kept, which made me ashamed of myself. I read it out
to Miss Letitia; and I told her in so many words, not to count
any more on me. No; I haven't got a copy of the words--I can
remember them without a copy. 'Even if my religion did not forbid
me to peril my soul by leading a life of sin with this woman whom
I love'--that was how it began--'the thought of my daughter would
keep me pure. No conduct of mine shall ever make me unworthy of
my child's affection and respect.' There! I'm making you cry; I
won't stay here any longer. All that I had to say has been said.
Nobody but Miss Ladd knows for certain whether your aunt was
innocent or guilty in the matter of Miss Jethro's disgrace.
Please to excuse me; my work's waiting downstairs."


From time to time, as she pursued her domestic labors, Mrs.
Ellmother thought of Mirabel. Hours on hours had passed--and the
doctor had not appeared. Was he too busy to spare even a few
minutes of his time? Or had the handsome little gentleman, after
promising so fairly, failed to perform his errand? This last
doubt wronged Mirabel. He had engaged to return to the doctor's
house; and he kept his word.

Doctor Allday was at home again, and was seeing patients.
Introduced in his turn, Mirabel had no reason to complain of his
reception. At the same time, after he had stated the object of
his visit, something odd began to show itself in the doctor's
manner.

He looked at Mirabel with an appearance of uneasy curiosity; and
he contrived an excuse for altering the visitor's position in the
room, so that the light fell full on Mirabel's face.

"I fancy I must have seen you," the doctor said, "at some former
time."

"I am ashamed to say I don't remember it," Mirabel answered.

"Ah, very likely I'm wrong! I'll call on Miss Emily, sir, you may
depend on it."

Left in his consulting-room, Doctor Allday failed to ring the
bell which summoned the next patient who was waiting for him. He
took his diary from the table drawer, and turned to the daily
entries for the past month of July.

Arriving at the fifteenth day of the month, he glanced at the
first lines of writing: "A visit from a mysterious lady, calling
herself Miss Jethro. Our conference led to some very unexpected
results."

No: that was not what he was in search of. He looked a little
lower down: and read on regularly, from that point, as follows:

"Called on Miss Emily, in great anxiety about the discoveries
which she might make among her aunt's papers. Papers all
destroyed, thank God--except the Handbill, offering a reward for
discovery of the murderer, which she found in the scrap-book.
Gave her back the Handbill. Emily much surprised that the wretch
should have escaped, with such a careful description of him
circulated everywhere. She read the description aloud to me, in
her nice clear voice: 'Supposed age between twenty-five  and
thirty years. A well-made man of small stature. Fai r complexion,
delicate features, clear blue eyes. Hair light, and cut rather
short. Clean shaven, with the exception of narrow
half-whiskers'--and so on. Emily at a loss to understand how the
fugitive could disguise himself. Reminded her that he could
effectually disguise his head and face (with time to help him) by
letting his hair grow long, and cultivating his beard. Emily not
convinced, even by this self-evident view of the case. Changed
the subject."

The doctor put away his diary, and rang the bell.

"Curious," he thought. "That dandified little clergyman has
certainly reminded me of my discussion with Emily, more than two
months since. Was it his flowing hair, I wonder? or his splendid
beard? Good God! suppose it should turn out--?"

He was interrupted by the appearance of his patient. Other ailing
people followed. Doctor Allday's mind was professionally occupied
for the rest of the evening.






Emily's impulse was to avoid the drawing-master for the second
time. The moment afterward, a kinder feeling prevailed. The
farewell interview with Cecilia had left influences which pleaded
for Alban Morris. It was the day of parting good wishes and
general separations: he had only perhaps come to say good-by. She
advanced to offer her hand, when he stopped her by pointing to
Sir Jervis Redwood's card.

"May I say a word, Miss Emily, about that woman?" he asked

"Do you mean Mrs. Rook?"

"Yes. You know, of course, why she comes here?"

"She comes here by appointment, to take me to Sir Jervis
Redwood's house. Are you acquainted with her?"

"She is a perfect stranger to me. I met her by accident on her
way here. If Mrs. Rook had been content with asking me to direct
her to the school, I should not be troubling you at this moment.
But she forced her conversation on me. And she said something
which I think you ought to know. Have you heard of Sir Jervis
Redwood's housekeeper before to-day?"

"I have only heard what my friend--Miss Cecilia Wyvil--has told
me."

"Did Miss Cecilia tell you that Mrs. Rook was acquainted with
your father or with any members of your family?"

"Certainly not!"

Alban reflected. "It was natural enough," he resumed, "that Mrs.
Rook should feel some curiosity about You. What reason had she
for putting a question to me about your father--and putting it in
a very strange manner?"

Emily's interest was instantly excited. She led the way back to
the seats in the shade. "Tell me, Mr. Morris, exactly what the
woman said." As she spoke,
 she signed to him to be seated.

Alban observed the natural grace of her action when she set him
the example of taking a chair, and the little heightening of her
color caused by anxiety to hear what he had still to tell her.
Forgetting the restraint that he had hitherto imposed on himself,
he enjoyed the luxury of silently admiring her. Her manner
betrayed none of the conscious confusion which would have shown
itself, if her heart had been secretly inclined toward him. She
saw the man looking at her. In simple perplexity she looked at
the man.

"Are you hesitating on my account?" she asked. "Did Mrs. Rook say
something of my father which I mustn't hear?"

"No, no! nothing of the sort!"

"You seem to be confused."

Her innocent indifference tried his patience sorely. His memory
went back to the past time--recalled the ill-placed passion of
his youth, and the cruel injury inflicted on him--his pride was
roused. Was he making himself ridiculous? The vehement throbbing
of his heart almost suffocated him. And there she sat, wondering
at his odd behavior. "Even this girl is as cold-blooded as the
rest of her sex!" That angry thought gave him back his
self-control. He made his excuses with the easy politeness of a
man of the world.

"I beg your pardon, Miss Emily; I was considering how to put what
I have to say in the fewest and plainest words. Let me try if I
can do it. If Mrs. Rook had merely asked me whether your father
and mother were living, I should have attributed the question to
the commonplace curiosity of a gossiping woman, and have thought
no more of it. What she actually did say was this: 'Perhaps you
can tell me if Miss Emily's father--' There she checked herself,
and suddenly altered the question in this way: 'If Miss Emily's
_parents_ are living?' I may be making mountains out of
molehills; but I thought at the time (and think still) that she
had some special interest in inquiring after your father, and,
not wishing me to notice it for reasons of her own, changed the
form of the question so as to include your mother. Does this
strike you as a far-fetched conclusion?"

"Whatever it may be," Emily said, "it is my conclusion, too. How
did you answer her?"

"Quite easily. I could give her no information--and I said so."

"Let me offer you the information, Mr. Morris, before we say
anything more. I have lost both my parents."

Alban's momentary outbreak of irritability was at an end. He was
earnest and yet gentle, again; he forgave her for not
understanding how dear and how delightful to him she was. "Will
it distress you," he said, "if I ask how long it is since your
father died?"

"Nearly four years," she replied. "He was the most generous of
men; Mrs. Rook's interest in him may surely have been a grateful
interest. He may have been kind to her in past years--and she may
remember him thankfully. Don't you think so?"

Alban was unable to agree with her. "If Mrs. Rook's interest in
your father was the harmless interest that you have suggested,"
he said, "why should she have checked herself in that
unaccountable manner, when she first asked me if he was living?
The more I think of it now, the less sure I feel that she knows
anything at all of your family history. It may help me to decide,
if you will tell me at what time the death of your mother took
place."

"So long ago," Emily replied, "that I can't even remember her
death. I was an infant at the time."

"And yet Mrs. Rook asked me if your 'parents' were living! One of
two things," Alban concluded. "Either there is some mystery in
this matter, which we cannot hope to penetrate at present--or
Mrs. Rook may have been speaking at random; on the chance of
discovering whether you are related to some 'Mr. Brown' whom she
once knew."

"Besides," Emily added, "it's only fair to remember what a common
family name mine is, and how easily people may make mistakes. I
should like to know if my dear lost father was really in her mind
when she spoke to you. Do you think I could find it out?"

"If Mrs. Rook has any reasons for concealment, I believe you
would have no chance of finding it out--unless, indeed, you could
take her by surprise."

"In what way, Mr. Morris?"

"Only one way occurs to me just now," he said. "Do you happen to
have a miniature or a photograph of your father?"

Emily held out a handsome locket, with a monogram in diamonds,
attached to her watch chain. "I have his photograph here," she
rejoined; "given to me by my dear old aunt, in the days of her
prosperity. Shall I show it to Mrs. Rook?"

"Yes--if she happens, by good luck, to offer you an opportunity."

Impatient to try the experiment, Emily rose as he spoke. "I
mustn't keep Mrs. Rook waiting," she said.

Alban stopped her, on the point of leaving him. The confusion and
hesitation which she had already noticed began to show themselves
in his manner once more.

"Miss Emily, may I ask you a favor before you go? I am only one
of the masters employed in the school; but I don't think--let me
say, I hope I am not guilty of presumption--if I offer to be of
some small service to one of my pupils--"

There his embarrassment mastered him. He despised himself not
only for yielding to his own weakness, but for faltering like a
fool in the expression of a simple request. The next words died
away on his lips.

This time, Emily understood him.

The subtle penetration which had long since led her to the
discovery of his secret--overpowered, thus far, by the absorbing
interest of the moment--now recovered its activity. In an
instant, she remembered that Alban's motive for cautioning her,
in her coming intercourse with Mrs. Rook, was not the merely
friendly motive which might have actuated him, in the case of one
of the other girls. At the same time, her quickness of
apprehension warned her not to risk encouraging this persistent
lover, by betraying any embarrassment on her side. He was
evidently anxious to be present (in her interests) at the
interview with Mrs. Rook. Why not? Could he reproach her with
raising false hope, if she accepted his services, under
circumstances of doubt and difficulty which he had himself been
the first to point out? He could do nothing of the sort. Without
waiting until he had recovered himself, she answered him (to all
appearances) as composedly as if he had spoken to her in the
plainest terms.

"After all that you have told me," she said, "I shall indeed feel
obliged if you will be present when I see Mrs. Rook."

The eager brightening of his eyes, the flush of happiness that
made him look young on a sudden, were signs not to be mistaken.
The sooner they were in the presence of a third person (Emily
privately concluded) the better it might be for both of them. She
led the way rapidly to the house.






Emily entered the room. The door was immediately closed on her
from the outer side. Mrs. Ellmother's heavy steps were heard
retreating along the passage. Then the banging of the door that
led into the kitchen shook the flimsily-built cottage. Then,
there was silence.

The dim light of a lamp hidden away in a corner and screened by a
dingy green shade, just revealed the closely-curtained bed, and
the table near it bearing medicine-bottles and glasses. The only
objects on the chimney-piece were a clock that had been stopped
in mercy to the sufferer's irritable nerves, and an open case
containing a machine for pouring drops into the eyes. The smell
of fumigating pastilles hung heavily on the air. To Emily's
excited imagination, the silence was like the silence of death.
She approached the bed trembling. "Won't you speak to me, aunt?"

"Is that you, Emily? Who let you come in?"

"You said I might come in, dear. Are you thirsty? I see some
lemonade on the table. Shall I give it to you?"

"No! If you open the bed-curtains, you let in the light. My poor
eyes! Why are you here, my dear? Why are you not at the school?"

"It's holiday-time, aunt. Besides, I have left school for good."

"Left school?" Miss Letitia's memory made an effort, as she
repeated those words. "You were going somewhere when you left
school," she said, "and Cecilia Wyvil had something to do with
it. Oh, my love, how cruel of you to go away to a stranger, when
you might live here with me!" She paused--her sense of what she
had herself just said began to grow confused. "What stranger?"
she asked abruptly. "Was it a man? What name? Oh, my mind! Has
death got hold of my mind before my body?"

"Hush! hush! I'll tell you the name. Sir Jervis Redwood."

"I don't know him. I don't want to know him. Do you think he
means to send for you. Perhaps he _has_ sent for you. I won't
allow it! You shan't go!"

"Don't excite yourself, dear! I have refused to go; I mean to
stay here with you."

The fevered brain held to its last idea. "_Has_ he sent for you?"
she said again, louder than before.

Emily replied once more, in terms carefully chosen with the one
purpose of pacifying her. The attempt proved to be useless, and
worse--it seemed to make her suspicious. "I won't be deceived!"
she said; "I mean to know all about it. He did send for you. Whom
did he send?"

"His housekeeper."

"What name?" The tone in which she put the question told of
excitement that was rising to its climax. "Don't you know that
I'm curious about names?" she burst out. "Why do you provoke me?
Who is it?"

"Nobody you know, or need care about, dear aunt. Mrs. Rook."

Instantly on the utterance of that name, there followed an
unexpected result. Silence ensued.

Emily waited--hesitated--advanced, to part the curtains, and look
in at her aunt. She was stopped by a dreadful sound of
laughter--the cheerless laughter that is heard among the mad. It
suddenly ended in a dreary sigh.

Afraid to look in, she spoke, hardly knowing what she said. "Is
there anything you wish for? Shall I call--?"

Miss Letitia's voice interrupted her. Dull, low, rapidly
muttering, it was unlike, shockingly unlike, the familiar voice
of her aunt. It said strange words.

"Mrs. Rook? What does Mrs. Rook matter? Or her husband either?
Bony, Bony, you're frightened about nothing. Where's the danger
of those two people turning up? Do you know how many miles away
the village is? Oh, you fool--a hundred miles and more. Never
mind the coroner, the coroner must keep in his own district--and
the jury too. A risky deception? I call it a pious fraud. And I
have a tender conscience, and a cultivated mind. The newspaper?
How is _our_ newspaper to find its way to her, I should like to
know? You poor old Bony! Upon my word you do me good--you make me
laugh."

The cheerless laughter broke out again--and died away again
drearily in a sigh.

Accustomed to decide rapidly in the ordinary emergencies of her
life, Emily felt herself painfully embarrassed by the position in
which she was now placed.

After what she had already heard, could she reconcile it to her
sense of duty to her aunt to remain any longer in the room?

In the hopeless self-betrayal of delirium, Miss Letitia had
revealed some act of concealment, committed in her past life, and
confided to her faithful old servant. Under these circumstances,
had Emily made any discoveries which convicted her of taking a
base advantage of her position at the bedside? Most assuredly
not! The nature of the act of concealment; the causes that had
led to it; the person (or persons) affected by it--these were
mysteries which left her entirely in the dark. She had found out
that her aunt was acquainted with Mrs. Rook, and that was
literally all she knew.

Blameless, so far, in the line of conduct that she had pursued,
might she still remain in the bed-chamber--on this distinct
understanding with herself: that she would instantly return to
the sitting-room if she heard anything which could suggest a
doubt of Miss Letitia's claim to her affection and respect? After
some hesitation, she decided on leaving it to her conscience to
answer that question. Does conscience ever say, No--when
inclination says, Yes? Emily's conscience sided with her
reluctance to leave her aunt.

Throughout the time occupied by these reflections, the silence
had remained unbroken. Emily began to feel uneasy. She timidly
put her hand through the curtains, and took Miss Letitia's hand.
The contact with the burning skin startled her. She turned away
to the door, to call the servant--when the sound of her aunt's
voice hurried her back to the bed.

"Are you there, Bony?" the voice asked.

Was her mind getting clear again? Emily tried the experiment of
making a plain reply. "Your niece is with you," she said. "Shall
I call the servant?"

Miss Letitia's mind was still far away from Emily, and from the
present time.

"The servant?" she repeated. "All the servants but you, Bony,
have been sent away. London's the place for us. No gossiping
servants and no curious neighbors in London. Bury the horrid
truth in London. Ah, you may well say I look anxious and
wretched. I hate deception--and yet, it must be done. Why do you
waste time in talking? Why don't you find out where the vile
woman lives? Only let me get at her--and I'll make Sara ashamed
of herself."

Emily's heart beat fast when she heard the woman's name. "Sara"
(as she and her school-fellows knew) was the baptismal name of
Miss Jethro. Had her aunt alluded to the disgraced teacher, or to
some other woman?

She waited eagerly to hear more. There was nothing to be heard.
At this most interesting moment, the silence remained
undisturbed.

In the fervor of her anxiety to set her doubts at rest, Emily's
faith in her own good resolutions began to waver. The temptation
to say somethin g which might set her aunt talking again was too
strong to be resisted--if she remained at the bedside. Despairing
of herself she rose and turned to the door. In the moment that
passed while she crossed the room the very words occurred to her
that would suit her purpose. Her cheeks were hot with shame--she
hesitated--she looked back at the bed--the words passed her lips.

"Sara is only one of the woman's names," she said. "Do you like
her other name?"

The rapidly-muttering tones broke out again instantly--but not in
answer to Emily. The sound of a voice had encouraged Miss Letitia
to pursue her own confused train of thought, and had stimulated
the fast-failing capacity of speech to exert itself once more.

"No! no! He's too cunning for you, and too cunning for me. He
doesn't leave letters about; he destroys them all. Did I say he
was too cunning for us? It's false. We are too cunning for him.
Who found the morsels of his letter in the basket? Who stuck them
together? Ah, _we_ know! Don't read it, Bony. 'Dear Miss
Jethro'--don't read it again. 'Miss Jethro' in his letter; and
'Sara,' when he talks to himself in the garden. Oh, who would
have believed it of him, if we hadn't seen and heard it
ourselves!"

There was no more doubt now.

But who was the man, so bitterly and so regretfully alluded to?

No: this time Emily held firmly by the resolution which bound her
to respect the helpless position of her aunt. The speediest way
of summoning Mrs. Ellmother would be to ring the bell. As she
touched the handle a faint cry of suffering from the bed called
her back.

"Oh, so thirsty!" murmured the failing voice--so thirsty!"

She parted the curtains. The shrouded lamplight just showed her
the green shade over Miss Letitia s eyes--the hollow cheeks below
it--the arms laid helplessly on the bed-clothes. "Oh, aunt, don't
you know my voice? Don't you know Emily? Let me kiss you, dear!"
Useless to plead with her; useless to kiss her; she only
reiterated the words, "So thirsty! so thirsty!" Emily raised the
poor tortured body with a patient caution which spared it pain,
and put the glass to her aunt's lips. She drank the lemonade to
the last drop. Refreshed for the moment, she spoke again--spoke
to the visionary servant of her delirious fancy, while she rested
in Emily's arms.

"For God's sake, take care how you answer if she questions you.
If _she_ knew what _we_ know! Are men ever ashamed? Ha! the vile
woman! the vile woman!"

Her voice, sinking gradually, dropped to a whisper. The next few
words that escaped her were muttered inarticulately. Little by
little, the false energy of fever was wearing itself out. She lay
silent and still. To look at her now was to look at the image of
death. Once more, Emily kissed her--closed the curtains--and rang
the bell. Mrs. Ellmother failed to appear. Emily left the room to
call her.

Arrived at the top of the kitchen stairs, she noted a slight
change. The door below, which she had heard banged on first
entering her aunt's room, now stood open. She called to Mrs.
Ellmother. A strange voice answered her. Its accent was soft and
courteous; presenting the strongest imaginable contrast to the
harsh tones of Miss Letitia's crabbed old maid.

"Is there anything I can do for you, miss?"

The person making this polite inquiry appeared at the foot of the
stairs--a plump and comely woman of middle age. She looked up at
the young lady with a pleasant smile.

"I beg your pardon," Emily said; "I had no intention of
disturbing you. I called to Mrs. Ellmother."

The stranger advanced a little way up the stairs, and answered,
"Mrs. Ellmother is not here."

"Do you expect her back soon?"

"Excuse me, miss--I don't expect her back at all."

"Do you mean to say that she has left the house?"

"Yes, miss. She has left the house."






Mrs. Ellmother--left in charge of Emily's place of abode, and
feeling sensible of her lonely position from time to time--had
just thought of trying the cheering influence of a cup of tea,
when she heard a cab draw up at the cottage gate. A violent ring
at the bell followed. She opened the door--and found Emily on the
steps. One look at that dear and familiar face was enough for the
old servant.

"God help us," she cried, "what's wrong now?"

Without a word of reply, Emily led the way into the bedchamber
which had been the scene of Miss Letitia's death. Mrs. Ellmother
hesitated on the threshold.

"Why do you bring me in here?" she asked.

"Why did you try to keep me out?" Emily answered.

"When did I try to keep you out, miss?"

"When I came home from school, to nurse my aunt. Ah, you remember
now! Is it true--I ask you here, where your old mistress died--is
it true that my aunt deceived me about my father's death? And
that you knew it?"

There was dead silence. Mrs. Ellmother trembled horribly--her
lips dropped apart--her eyes wandered round the room with a stare
of idiotic terror. "Is it her ghost tells you that?" she
whispered. "Where is her ghost? The room whirls round and round,
miss--and the air sings in my ears."

Emily sprang forward to support her. She staggered to a chair,
and lifted her great bony hands in wild entreaty. "Don't frighten
me," she said. "Stand back."

Emily obeyed her. She dashed the cold sweat off her forehead.
"You were talking about your father's death just now," she burst
out, in desperate defiant tones. "Well! we know it and we are
sorry for it--your father died suddenly."

"My father died murdered in the inn at Zeeland! All the long way
to London, I have tried to doubt it. Oh, me, I know it now!"

Answering in those words, she looked toward the bed. Harrowing
remembrances of her aunt's delirious self-betrayal made the room
unendurable to her. She ran out. The parlor door was open.
Entering the room, she passed by a portrait of her father, which
her aunt had hung on the wall over the fireplace. She threw
herself on the sofa and burst into a passionate fit of crying.
"Oh, my father--my dear, gentle, loving father; my first, best,
truest friend--murdered! murdered! Oh, God, where was your
justice, where was your mercy, when he died that dreadful death?"

A hand was laid on her shoulder; a voice said to her, "Hush, my
child! God knows best."

Emily looked up, and saw that Mrs. Ellmother had followed her.
"You poor old soul," she said, suddenly remembering; "I
frightened you in the other room."

"I have got over it, my dear. I am old; and I have lived a hard
life. A hard life schools a person. I make no complaints." She
stopped, and began to shudder again. "Will you believe me if I
tell you something?" she asked. "I warned my self-willed
mistress. Standing by your father's coffin, I warned her. Hide
the truth as you may (I said), a time will come when our child
will know what you are keeping from her now. One or both of us
may live to see it. I am the one who has lived; no refuge in the
grave for me. I want to hear about it--there's no fear of
frightening or hurting me now. I want to hear how you found it
out. Was it by accident, my dear? or did a person tell you?"

Emily's mind was far away from Mrs. Ellmother. She rose from the
sofa, with her hands held fast over her aching heart.

"The one duty of my life," she said--"I am thinking of the one
duty of my life. Look! I am calm now; I am resigned to my hard
lot. Never, never again, can the dear memory of my father be what
it was! From this time, it is the horrid memory of a crime. The
crime has gone unpunished; the man has escaped others. He shall
not escape Me." She paused, and looked at Mrs. Ellmother
absently. "What did you say just now? You want to hear how I know
what I know? Naturally! naturally! Sit down here--sit down, my
old friend, on the sofa with me--and take your mind back to
Netherwoods. Alban Morris--"

Mrs. Ellmother recoiled from Emily in dismay. "Don't tell me _he_
had anything to do with it! The kindest of men; the best of men!"

"The man of all men living who least deserves your good opinion
or mine," Emily answered sternly.

"You!" Mrs. Ellmother exclaimed, "_you_ say that!"

"I say it. He--who won on me to like him--he was in the
conspiracy to deceive me; and you know it! He heard me talk of
the newspaper story of the murder of my father--I say, he heard
me talk of it composedly, talk of it carelessly, in the innocent
belief that it was the murder of a stranger--and he never opened
his lips to prevent that horrid profanation! He never even said,
speak of something else; I won't hear you! No more of him! God
forbid I should ever see him again. No! Do what I told you. Carry
your mind back to Netherwoods. One night you let Francine de Sor
frighten you. You ran away from her into the garden. Keep quiet!
At your age, must I set you an example of self-control?

"I want to know, Miss Emily, where Francine
 de Sor is now?"

"She is at the house in the country, which I have left."

"Where does she go next, if you please? Back to Miss Ladd?"

"I suppose so. What interest have you in knowing where she goes
next?"

"I won't interrupt you, miss. It's true that I ran away into the
garden. I can guess who followed me. How did she find her way to
me and Mr. Morris, in the dark?"

"The smell of tobacco guided her--she knew who smoked--she had
seen him talking to you, on that very day--she followed the
scent--she heard what you two said to each other--and she has
repeated it to me. Oh, my old friend, the malice of a revengeful
girl has enlightened me, when you, my nurse--and he, my
lover--left me in the dark: it has told me how my father died!"

"That's said bitterly, miss!"

"Is it said truly?"

"No. It isn't said truly of myself. God knows you would never
have been kept in the dark, if your aunt had listened to me. I
begged and prayed--I went down on my knees to her--I warned her,
as I told you just now. Must I tell _you_ what a headstrong woman
Miss Letitia was? She insisted. She put the choice before me of
leaving her at once and forever--or giving in. I wouldn't have
given in to any other creature on the face of this earth. I am
obstinate, as you have often told me. Well, your aunt's obstinacy
beat mine; I was too fond of her to say No. Besides, if you ask
me who was to blame in the first place, I tell you it wasn't your
aunt; she was frightened into it."

"Who frightened her?"

"Your godfather--the great London surgeon--he who was visiting in
our house at the time."

"Sir Richard?"

"Yes--Sir Richard. He said he wouldn't answer for the
consequences, in the delicate state of your health, if we told
you the truth. Ah, he had it all his own way after that. He went
with Miss Letitia to the inquest; he won over the coroner and the
newspaper men to his will; he kept your aunt's name out of the
papers; he took charge of the coffin; he hired the undertaker and
his men, strangers from London; he wrote the certificate--who but
he! Everybody was cap in hand to the famous man!"

"Surely, the servants and the neighbors asked questions?"

"Hundreds of questions! What did that matter to Sir Richard? They
were like so many children, in _his_ hands. And, mind you, the
luck helped him. To begin with, there was the common name. Who
was to pick out your poor father among the thousands of James
Browns? Then, again, the house and lands went to the male heir,
as they called him--the man your father quarreled with in the
bygone time. He brought his own establishment with him. Long
before you got back from the friends you were staying with--don't
you remember it?--we had cleared out of the house; we were miles
and miles away; and the old servants were scattered abroad,
finding new situations wherever they could. How could you suspect
us? We had nothing to fear in that way; but my conscience pricked
me. I made another attempt to prevail on Miss Letitia, when you
had recovered your health. I said, 'There's no fear of a relapse
now; break it to her gently, but tell her the truth.' No! Your
aunt was too fond of you. She daunted me with dreadful fits of
crying, when I tried to persuade her. And that wasn't the worst
of it. She bade me remember what an excitable man your father
was--she reminded me that the misery of your mother's death laid
him low with brain fever--she said, 'Emily takes after her
father; I have heard you say it yourself; she has his
constitution, and his sensitive nerves. Don't you know how she
loved him--how she talks of him to this day? Who can tell (if we
are not careful) what dreadful mischief we may do?' That was how
my mistress worked on me. I got infected with her fears; it was
as if I had caught an infection of disease. Oh, my dear, blame me
if it must be; but don't forget how I have suffered for it since!
I was driven away from my dying mistress, in terror of what she
might say, while you were watching at her bedside. I have lived
in fear of what you might ask me--and have longed to go back to
you--and have not had the courage to do it. Look at me now!"

The poor woman tried to take out her handkerchief; her quivering
hand helplessly entangled itself in her dress. "I can't even dry
my eyes," she said faintly. "Try to forgive me, miss!"

Emily put her arms round the old nurse's neck. "It is _you_," she
said sadly, "who must forgive me."

For a while they were silent. Through the window that was open to
the little garden, came the one sound that could be heard--the
gentle trembling of leaves in the evening wind.

The silence was harshly broken by the bell at the cottage door.
They both started.

Emily's heart beat fast. "Who can it be?" she said.

Mrs. Ellmother rose. "Shall I say you can't see anybody?" she
asked, before leaving the room.

"Yes! yes!"

Emily heard the door opened--heard low voices in the passage.
There was a momentary interval. Then, Mrs. Ellmother returned.
She said nothing. Emily spoke to her.

"Is it a visitor?"

"Yes."

"Have you said I can't see anybody?"

"I couldn't say it."

"Why not?"

"Don't be hard on him, my dear. It's Mr. Alban Morris."






In a moment more, the doctor came in--a brisk, smiling,
self-sufficient man--smartly dressed, with a flower in his
button-hole. A stifling odor of musk filled the room, as he drew
out his handkerchief with a flourish, and wiped his forehead.

"Plenty of hard work in my line, just now," he said. "Hullo, Mrs.
Rook! somebody has been allowing you to excite yourself. I heard
you, before I opened the door. Have you been encouraging her to
talk?" he asked, turning to Emily, and shaking his finger at her
with an air of facetious remonstrance.

Incapable of answering him; forgetful of the ordinary restraints
of social intercourse--with the one doubt that preserved her
belief in Mirabel, eager for confirmation--Emily signed to this
stranger to follow her into a corner of the room, out of hearing.
She made no excuses: she took no notice of his look of surprise.
One hope was all she could feel, one word was all she could say,
after that second assertion of Mirabel's guilt. Indicating Mrs.
Rook by a glance at the bed, she whispered the word:

"Mad?"

Flippant and familiar, the doctor imitated her; he too looked at
the bed.

"No more mad than you are, miss. As I said just now, my patient
has been exciting herself; I daresay she has talked a little
wildly in consequence. _Hers_ isn't a brain to give way, I can
tell you. But there's somebody else--"

Emily had fled from the room. He had destroyed her last fragment
of belief in Mirabel's innocence. She was on the landing trying
to console herself, when the doctor joined her.

"Are you acquainted with the gentleman downstairs?" he asked.

"What gentleman?"

"I haven't heard his name; he looks like a clergyman. If you know
him--"

"I do know him. I can't answer questions! My mind--"

"Steady your mind, miss! and take your friend home as soon as you
can. _He_ hasn't got Mrs. Rook's hard brain; he's in a state of
nervous prostration, which may end badly. Do you know where he
lives?"

"He is staying with his sister--Mrs. Delvin."

"Mrs. Delvin! she's a friend and patient of mine. Say I'll look
in to-morrow morning, and see what I can do for her brother. In
the meantime, get him to bed, and to rest; and don't be afraid of
giving him brandy."

The doctor returned to the bedroom. Emily heard Mrs. Ellmother's
voice below.

"Are you up there, miss?"

"Yes."

Mrs. Ellmother ascended the stairs. "It was an evil hour," she
said, "that you insisted on going to this place. Mr. Mirabel--"
The sight of Emily's face suspended the next words on her lips.
She took the poor young mistress in her motherly arms. "Oh, my
child! what has happened to you?"

"Don't ask me now. Give me your arm--let us go downstairs."

"You won't be startled when you see Mr. Mirabel--will you, my
dear? I wouldn't let them disturb you; I said nobody should speak
to you but myself. The truth is, Mr. Mirabel has had a dreadful
fright. What are you looking for?"

"Is there a garden here? Any place where we can breathe the fresh
air?"

There was a courtyard at the back of the house. They found their
way to it. A bench was placed against one of the walls. They sat
down.

"Shall I wait till you're better before I say any more?" Mrs.
Ellmother asked. "No? You want to hear about Mr. Mirabel? My
dear, he came into the parlor where I was; and Mr. Rook came in
too---and waited, looking at him. Mr. Mirabel sat down in a
corner, in a dazed state as I thought. It wasn't for long. He
jumped up, and clapped his hand on his heart as if his heart hurt
him. 'I must and will know what's going on upstairs,' he says.
Mr. Rook pulled him back, and told him to wait till the young
lady came down. Mr. Mirabel wouldn't hear of it. 'Your wife's
frightening her,' he says; 'your wife's telling her horrible
things about me.' He was taken on a sudden with a shivering fit;
his eyes rolled, and his teeth chattered. Mr. Rook made matters
worse; he lost his temper. 'I'm damned,' he says, 'if I don't
begin to think you _are_ the man, after all; I've half a mind to
send for the police.' Mr. Mirabel dropped into his chair. His
eyes stared, his mouth fell open. I took hold of his hand.
Cold--cold as ice. What it all meant I can't say. Oh, miss, _you_
know! Let me tell you the rest of it some other time."

Emily insisted on hearing more. "The end!" she cried. "How did it
end?"

"I don't know how it might have ended, if the doctor hadn't come
in--to pay his visit, you know, upstairs. He said some learned
words. When he came to plain English, he asked if anybody had
frig htened the gentleman. I said Mr. Rook had frightened him.
The doctor says to Mr. Rook, 'Mind what you are about. If you
frighten him again, you may have his death to answer for.' That
cowed Mr. Rook. He asked what he had better do. 'Give me some
brandy for him first,' says the doctor; 'and then get him home at
once.' I found the brandy, and went away to the inn to order the
carriage. Your ears are quicker than mine, miss--do I hear it
now?"

They rose, and went to the house door. The carriage was there.

Still cowed by what the doctor had said, Mr. Rook appeared,
carefully leading Mirabel out. He had revived under the action of
the stimulant. Passing Emily he raised his eyes to
her--trembled--and looked down again. When Mr. Rook opened the
door of the carriage he paused, with one of his feet on the step.
A momentary impulse inspired him with a false courage, and
brought a flush into his ghastly face. He turned to Emily.

"May I speak to you?" he asked.

She started back from him. He looked at Mrs. Ellmother. "Tell her
I am innocent," he said. The trembling seized on him again. Mr.
Rook was obliged to lift him into the carriage.

Emily caught at Mrs. Ellmother's arm. "You go with him," she
said. "I can't."

"How are you to get back, miss?"

She turned away and spoke to the coachman. "I am not very well. I
want the fresh air--I'll sit by you."

Mrs. Ellmother remonstrated and protested, in vain. As Emily had
determined it should be, so it was.

"Has he said anything?" she asked, when they had arrived at their
journey's end.

"He has been like a man frozen up; he hasn't said a word; he
hasn't even moved."

"Take him to his sister; and tell her all that you know. Be
careful to repeat what the doctor said. I can't face Mrs. Delvin.
Be patient, my good old friend; I have no secrets from you. Only
wait till to-morrow; and leave me by myself to-night."

Alone in her room, Emily opened her writing-case. Searching among
the letters in it, she drew out a printed paper. It was the
Handbill describing the man who had escaped from the inn, and
offering a reward for the discovery of him.

At the first line of the personal description of the fugitive,
the paper dropped from her hand. Burning tears forced their way
into her eyes. Feeling for her handkerchief, she touched the
pocketbook which she had received from Mrs. Rook. After a little
hesitation she took it out. She looked at it. She opened it.

The sight of the bank-notes repelled her; she hid them in one of
the pockets of the book. There was a second pocket which she had
not yet examined. She pat her hand into it, and, touching
something, drew out a letter.

The envelope (already open) was addressed to "James Brown, Esq.,
Post Office, Zeeland. "Would it be inconsistent with her respect
for her father's memory to examine the letter? No; a glance would
decide whether she ought to read it or not.

It was without date or address; a startling letter to look
at--for it only contained three words:

"I say No."

The words were signed in initials:

"S. J."

In the instant when she read the initials, the name occurred to
her.

Sara Jethro.






If Emily's eyes could have followed Alban as her thoughts were
following him, she would have seen him stop before he reached the
end of the road in which the cottage stood. His heart was full of
tenderness and sorrow: the longing to return to her was more than
he could resist. It would be easy to wait, within view of the
gate, until the doctor's visit came to an end. He had just
decided to go back and keep watch--when he heard rapid footsteps
approaching. There (devil take him!) was the doctor himself.

"I have something to say to you, Mr. Morris. Which way are you
walking?"

"Any way," Alban answered--not very graciously.

"Then let us take the turning that leads to my house. It's not
customary for strangers, especially when they happen to be
Englishmen, to place confidence in each other. Let me set the
example of violating that rule. I want to speak to you about Miss
Emily. May I take your arm? Thank you. At my age, girls in
general--unless they are my patients--are not objects of interest
to me. But that girl at the cottage--I daresay I am in my
dotage--I tell you, sir, she has bewitched me! Upon my soul, I
could hardly be more anxious about her, if I was her father. And,
mind, I am not an affectionate man by nature. Are you anxious
about her too?"

"Yes."

"In what way?"

"In what way are you anxious, Doctor Allday?"

The doctor smiled grimly.

"You don't trust me? Well, I have promised to set the example.
Keep your mask on, sir--mine is off, come what may of it. But,
observe: if you repeat what I am going to say--"

Alban would hear no more. "Whatever you may say, Doctor Allday,
is trusted to my honor. If you doubt my honor, be so good as to
let go my arm--I am not walking your way."

The doctor's hand tightened its grasp. "That little flourish of
temper, my dear sir, is all I want to set me at my ease. I feel I
have got hold of the right man. Now answer me this. Have you ever
heard of a person named Miss Jethro?"

Alban suddenly came to a standstill.

"All right!" said the doctor. "I couldn't have wished for a more
satisfactory reply."

"Wait a minute," Alban interposed. "I know Miss Jethro as a
teacher at Miss Ladd's school, who left her situation
suddenly--and I know no more."

The doctor's peculiar smile made its appearance again.

"Speaking in the vulgar tone," he said, "you seem to be in a
hurry to wash your hands of Miss Jethro."

"I have no reason to feel any interest in her," Alban replied.

"Don't be too sure of that, my friend. I have something to tell
you which may alter your opinion. That ex-teacher at the school,
sir, knows how the late Mr. Brown met his death, and how his
daughter has been deceived about it."

Alban listened with surprise--and with some little doubt, which
he thought it wise not to acknowledge.

"The report of the inquest alludes to a 'relative' who claimed
the body," he said. "Was that 'relative' the person who deceived
Miss Emily? And was the person her aunt?"

"I must leave you to take your own view," Doctor Allday replied.
"A promise binds me not to repeat the information that I have
received. Setting that aside, we have the same object in
view--and we must take care not to get in each other's way. Here
is my house. Let us go in, and make a clean breast of it on both
sides."

Established in the safe seclusion of his study, the doctor set
the example of confession in these plain terms:

"We only differ in opinion on one point," he said. "We both think
it likely (from our experience of the women) that the suspected
murderer had an accomplice. I say the guilty person is Miss
Jethro. You say--Mrs. Rook."

"When you have read my copy of the report," Alban answered, "I
think you will arrive at my conclusion. Mrs. Rook might have
entered the outhouse in which the two men slept, at any time
during the night, while her husband was asleep. The jury believed
her when she declared that she never woke till the morning. I
don't."

"I am open to conviction, Mr. Morris. Now about the future. Do
you mean to go on with your inquiries?"

"Even if I had no other motive than mere curiosity," Alban
answered, "I think I should go on. But I have a more urgent
purpose in view. All that I have done thus far, has been done in
Emily's interests. My object, from the first, has been to
preserve her from any association--in the past or in the
future--with the woman whom I believe to have been concerned in
her father's death. As I have already told you, she is innocently
doing all she can, poor thing, to put obstacles in my way."

"Yes, yes," said the doctor; "she means to write to Mrs.
 Rook--and you have nearly quarreled about it. Trust me to take
that matter in hand. I don't regard it as serious. But I am
mortally afraid of what you are doing in Emily's interests. I
wish you would give it up."

"Why?"

"Because I see a danger. I don't deny that Emily is as innocent
of suspicion as ever. But the chances, next time, may be against
us. How do you know to what lengths your curiosity may lead you?
Or on what shocking discoveries you may not blunder with the best
intentions? Some unforeseen accident may open her eyes to the
truth, before you can prevent it. I seem to surprise you?"

"You do, indeed, surprise me."

"In the old story, my dear sir, Mentor sometimes surprised
Telemachus. I am Mentor--without being, I hope, quite so
long-winded as that respectable philosopher. Let me put it in two
words. Emily's happiness is precious to you. Take care you are
not made the means of wrecking it! Will you consent to a
sacrifice, for her sake?"

"I will do anything for her sake."

"Will you give up your inquiries?"

"From this moment I have done with them!"

"Mr. Morris, you are the best friend she has."

"The next best friend to you, doctor."

In that fond persuasion they now parted--too eagerly devoted to
Emily to look at the prospect before them in its least hopeful
aspect. Both clever men, neither one nor the other asked himself
if any human resistance has ever yet obstructed the progress of
truth--when truth has once begun to force its way to the light.

For the second time Alban stopped, on his way home. The longing
to be reconciled with Emily was not to be resisted. He returned
to the cottage, only to find disappointment waiting for him. The
servant reported that her young mistress had gone to bed with a
bad headache.

Alban waited a day, in the hope that Emily might write to him. No
letter arrived. He repeated his visit the next morning. Fortune
was still against him. On this occasion, Emily was engaged.

"Engaged with a visitor?" he asked.

"Yes, sir. A young lady named Miss de Sor."

Where had he heard that name before? He remembered immediately
that he had heard it at the school. Miss de Sor was the
unattractive new pupil, whom the girls called Francine. Alban
looked at the parlor window as he left the cottage. It was of
serious importance that he should set himself right with Emily.
"And mere gossip," he thought contemptuously, "stands in my way!"

If he had been less absorbed in his own interests, he might have
remembered that mere gossip is not always to be despised. It has
worked fatal mischief in its time.






In the meanwhile Emily had been true to her promise to relieve
Mirabel's anxieties, on the subject of Miss Jethro. Entering the
drawing-room in search of Alban, she found him talking with
Cecilia, and heard her own name mentioned as she opened the door.

"Here she is at last!" Cecilia exclaimed. "What in the world has
kept you all this time in the rose garden?"

"Has Mr. Mirabel been more interesting than usual?" Alban asked
gayly. Whatever sense of annoyance he might have felt in Emily's
absence, was forgotten the moment she appeared; all traces of
trouble in his face vanished when they looked at each other.

"You shall judge for yourself," Emily replied with a smile. "Mr.
Mirabel has been speaking to me of a relative who is very dear to
him--his sister."

Cecilia was surprised. "Why has he never spoken to _us_ of his
sister?" she asked.

"It's a sad subject to speak of, my dear. His sister lives a life
of suffering--she has been for years a prisoner in her room. He
writes to her constantly. His letters from Monksmoor have
interested her, poor soul. It seems he said something about
me--and she has sent a kind message, inviting me to visit her one
of these days. Do you understand it now, Cecilia?"

"Of course I do! Tell me--is Mr. Mirabel's sister older or
younger than he is?"

"Older."

"Is she married?"

"She is a widow."

"Does she live with her brother?" Alban asked.

"Oh, no! She has her own house--far away in Northumberland."

"Is she near Sir Jervis Redwood?"

"I fancy not. Her house is on the coast."

"Any children?" Cecilia inquired.

"No; she is quite alone. Now, Cecilia, I have told you all I
know--and I have something to say to Mr. Morris. No, you needn't
leave us; it's a subject in which you are interested. A subject,"
she repeated, turning to Alban, "which you may have noticed is
not very agreeable to me."

"Miss Jethro?" Alban guessed.

"Yes; Miss Jethro."

Cecilia's curiosity instantly asserted itself.

"_We_ have tried to get Mr. Mirabel to enlighten us, and tried in
vain," she said. "You are a favorite. Have you succeeded?"

"I have made no attempt to succeed," Emily replied. "My only
object is to relieve Mr. Mirabel's anxiety, if I can--with your
help, Mr. Morris."

"In what way can I help you?"

"You mustn't be angry."

"Do I look angry?"

"You look serious. It is a very simple thing. Mr. Mirabel is
afraid that Miss Jethro may have said something disagreeable
about him, which you might hesitate to repeat. Is he making
himself uneasy without any reason?"

"Without the slightest reason. I have concealed nothing from Mr.
Mirabel."

"Thank you for the explanation." She turned to Cecilia. "May I
send one of the servants with a message? I may as well put an end
to Mr. Mirabel's suspense."

The man was summoned, and was dispatched with the message. Emily
would have done well, after this, if she had abstained from
speaking further of Miss Jethro. But Mirabel's doubts had,
unhappily, inspired a similar feeling of uncertainty in her own
mind. She was now disposed to attribute the tone of mystery in
Alban's unlucky letter to some possible concealment suggested by
regard for herself. "I wonder whether _I_ have any reason to feel
uneasy?" she said--half in jest, half in earnest.

"Uneasy about what?" Alban inquired.

"About Miss Jethro, of course! Has she said anything of me which
your kindness has concealed?"

Alban seemed to be a little hurt by the doubt which her question
implied. "Was that your motive," he asked, "for answering my
letter as cautiously as if you had been writing to a stranger?"

"Indeed you are quite wrong!" Emily earnestly assured him. "I was
perplexed and startled--and I took Mr. Wyvil's advice, before I
wrote to you. Shall we drop the subject?"

Alban would have willingly dropped the subject--but for that
unfortunate allusion to Mr. Wyvil. Emily had unconsciously
touched him on a sore place. He had already heard from Cecilia of
the consultation over his letter, and had disapproved of it. "I
think you were wrong to trouble Mr. Wyvil," he said.

The altered tone of his voice suggested to Emily that he would
have spoken more severely, if Cecilia had not been in the room.
She thought him needlessly ready to complain of a harmless
proceeding--and she too returned to the subject, after having
proposed to drop it not a minute since!

"You didn't tell me I was to keep your letter a secret," she
replied.

Cecilia made matters worse--with the best intentions. "I'm sure,
Mr. Morris, my father was only too glad to give Emily his
advice."

Alban remained silent--ungraciously silent as Emily thought,
after Mr. Wyvil's kindness to him.

"The thing to regret," she remarked, "is that Mr. Morris allowed
Miss Jethro to leave him without explaining herself. In his
place, I should have insisted on knowing why she wanted to
prevent me from meeting Mr. Mirabel in this house."

Cecilia made another unlucky attempt at judicious interference.
This time, she tried a gentle remonstrance.

"Remember, Emily, how Mr. Morris was situated. He could hardly be
rude to a lady. And I daresay Miss Jethro had good reasons for
not wishing to explain herself."

Francine opened the drawing-room door and heard Cecilia's last
words.

"Miss Jethro again!" she exclaimed.

"Where is Mr. Mirabel?" Emily asked. "I sent him a message."

"He regrets to say he is otherwise engaged for the present,"
Francine replied with spiteful politeness. "Don't let me
interrupt the conversation. Who is this Miss Jethro, whose name
is on everybody's lips?"

Alban could keep silent no longer. "We have done with the
subject," he said sharply.

"Because I am here?"

"Because we have said more than enough about Miss Jethro
already."

"Speak for yourself, Mr. Morris," Emily answered, resenting the
masterful tone which Alban's interference had assumed. "I have
not done with Miss Jethro yet, I can assure you."

"My dear, you don't know where she lives," Cecilia reminded her.

"Leave me to discover i t!" Emily answered hotly. "Perhaps Mr.
Mirabel knows. I shall ask Mr. Mirabel."

"I thought you would find a reason for returning to Mr. Mirabel,"
Francine remarked.

Before Emily could reply, one of the maids entered the room with
a wreath of roses in her hand.

"Mr. Mirabel sends you these flowers, miss," the woman said,
addressing Emily. "The boy told me they were to be taken to your
room. I thought it was a mistake, and I have brought them to you
here."

Francine, who happened to be nearest to the door, took the roses
from the girl on pretense of handing them to Emily. Her jealous
vigilance detected the one visible morsel of Mirabel's letter,
twisted up with the flowers. Had Emily entrapped him into a
secret correspondence with her? "A scrap of waste paper among
your roses," she said, crumpling it up in her hand as if she
meant to throw it away.

But Emily was too quick for her. She caught Francine by the
wrist. "Waste paper or not," she said; "it was among my flowers
and it belongs to me."

Francine gave up the letter, with a look which might have
startled Emily if she had noticed it. She handed the roses to
Cecilia. "I was making a wreath for you to wear this evening, my
dear--and I left it in the garden. It's not quite finished yet."

Cecilia was delighted. "How lovely it is!" she exclaimed. "And
how very kind of you! I'll finish it myself." She turned away to
the conservatory.

"I had no idea I was interfering with a letter," said Francine;
watching Emily with fiercely-attentive eyes, while she smoothed
out the crumpled paper.

Having read what Mirabel had written to her, Emily looked up, and
saw that Alban was on the point of following Cecilia into the
conservatory. He had noticed something in Francine's face which
he was at a loss to understand, but which made her presence in
the room absolutely hateful to him. Emily followed and spoke to
him.

"I am going back to the rose garden," she said.

"For any particular purpose?" Alban inquired

"For a purpose which, I am afraid, you won't approve of. I mean
to ask Mr. Mirabel if he knows Miss Jethro's address."

"I hope he is as ignorant of it as I am," Alban answered gravely.

"Are we going to quarrel over Miss Jethro, as we once quarreled
over Mrs. Rook?" Emily asked--with the readiest recovery of her
good humor. "Come! come! I am sure you are as anxious, in your
own private mind, to have this matter cleared up as I am."

"With one difference--that I think of consequences, and you
don't." He said it, in his gentlest and kindest manner, and
stepped into the conservatory.

"Never mind the consequences," she called after him, "if we can
only get at the truth. I hate being deceived!"

"There is no person living who has better reason than you have to
say that."

Emily looked round with a start. Alban was out of hearing. It was
Francine who had answered her.

"What do you mean?" she said.

Francine hesitated. A ghastly paleness overspread her face.

"Are you ill?" Emily asked.

"No--I am thinking."

After waiting for a moment in silence, Emily moved away toward
the door of the drawing-room. Francine suddenly held up her hand.

"Stop!" she cried.

Emily stood still.

"My mind is made up," Francine said.

"Made up--to what?"

"You asked what I meant, just now."

"I did."

"Well, my mind is made up to answer you. Miss Emily Brown, you
are leading a sadly frivolous life in this house. I am going to
give you something more serious to think about than your
flirtation with Mr. Mirabel. Oh, don't be impatient! I am coming
to the point. Without knowing it yourself, you have been the
victim of deception for years past--cruel deception--wicked
deception that puts on the mask of mercy."

"Are you alluding to Miss Jethro?" Emily asked, in astonishment.
"I thought you were strangers to each other. Just now, you wanted
to know who she was."

"I know nothing about her. I care nothing about her. I am not
thinking of Miss Jethro."

"Who are you thinking of?"

"I am thinking," Francine answered, "of your dead father."






Absorbed in the effort to overcome his patient's reserve, the
doctor had forgotten Emily's letter. He opened it immediately.

After reading the first sentence, he looked up with an expression
of annoyance. "She has begun the examination of the papers
already," he said.

"Then I can be of no further use to you," Miss Jethro rejoined.
She made a second attempt to leave the room.

Doctor Allday turned to the next page of the letter. "Stop!" he
cried. "She has found something--and here it is."

He held up a small printed Handbill, which had been placed
between the first and second pages. "Suppose you look at it?" he
said.

"Whether I am interested in it or not?" Miss Jethro asked.

"You may be interested in what Miss Emily says about it in her
letter."

"Do you propose to show me her letter?"

"I propose to read it to you."

Miss Jethro took the Handbill without further objection. It was
expressed in these words:

"MURDER. 100 POUNDS REWARD.--Whereas a murder was committed on
the thirtieth September, 1877, at the Hand-in-Hand Inn, in the
village of Zeeland, Hampshire, the above reward will be paid to
any person or persons whose exertions shall lead to the arrest
and conviction of the suspected murderer. Name not known.
Supposed age, between twenty and thirty years. A well-made man,
of small stature. Fair complexion, delicate features, clear blue
eye s. Hair light, and cut rather short. Clean shaven, with the
exception of narrow half-whiskers. Small, white, well-shaped
hands. Wore valuable rings on the two last fingers of the left
hand. Dressed neatly in a dark-gray tourist-suit. Carried a
knapsack, as if on a pedestrian excursion. Remarkably good voice,
smooth, full, and persuasive. Ingratiating manners. Apply to the
Chief Inspector, Metropolitan Police Office, London."

Miss Jethro laid aside the Handbill without any visible
appearance of agitation. The doctor took up Emily's letter, and
read as follows:

"You will be as much relieved as I was, my kind friend, when you
look at the paper inclosed. I found it loose in a blank book,
with cuttings from newspapers, and odd announcements of lost
property and other curious things (all huddled together between
the leaves), which my aunt no doubt intended to set in order and
fix in their proper places. She must have been thinking of her
book, poor soul, in her last illness. Here is the origin of those
'terrible words' which frightened stupid Mrs. Mosey! Is it not
encouraging to have discovered such a confirmation of my opinion
as this? I feel a new interest in looking over the papers that
still remain to be examined--"

Before he could get to the end of the sentence Miss Jethro's
agitation broke through her reserve.

"Do what you proposed to do!" she burst out vehemently. "Stop her
at once from carrying her examination any further! If she
hesitates, insist on it!"

At last Doctor Allday had triumphed! "It has been a long time
coming," he remarked, in his cool way; "and it's all the more
welcome on that account. You dread the discoveries she may make,
Miss Jethro, as I do. And _you_ know what those discoveries may
be."

"What I do know, or don't know, is of no importance." she
answered sharply.

"Excuse me, it is of very serious importance. I have no authority
over this poor girl--I am not even an old friend. You tell me to
insist. Help me to declare honestly that I know of circumstances
which justify me; and I may insist to some purpose."

Miss Jethro lifted her veil for the first time, and eyed him
searchingly.

"I believe I can trust you," she said. "Now listen! The one
consideration on which I consent to open my lips, is
consideration for Miss Emily's tranquillity. Promise me absolute
secrecy, on your word of honor."

He gave the promise.

"I want to know one thing, first," Miss Jethro proceeded. "Did
she tell you--as she once told me--that her father had died of
heart-complaint?"

"Yes."

"Did you put any questions to her?"

"I asked how long ago it was."

"And she told you?"

"She told me."

"You wish to know, Doctor Allday, what discoveries Miss Emily may
yet make, among her aunt's papers. Judge for yourself, when I
tell you that she has been deceived about her father's death."

"Do you mean that he is still living?"

"I mean that she has been deceived--purposely deceived--about the
_manner_ of his death."

"Who was the wretch who did it?"

"You are wronging the dead, sir! The truth can only have been
concealed out of the purest motives of love and pity. I don't
desire to disguise the conclusion at which I have arrived after
what I have heard from yourself. The person responsible must be
Miss Emily's aunt--and the old servant must have been in her
confidence. Remember! You are bound in honor not to repeat to any
living creature what I have just said."

The doctor followed Miss Jethro to the door. "You have not yet
told me," he said, "_how_ her father died."

"I have no more to tell you."

With those words she left him.

He rang for his servant. To wait until the hour at which he was
accustomed to go out, might be to leave Emily's peace of mind at
the mercy of an accident. "I am going to the cottage," he said.
"If anybody wants me, I shall be back in a quarter of an hour."

On the point of leaving the house, he remembered that Emily would
probably expect him to return the Handbill. As he took it up, the
first lines caught his eye: he read the date at which the murder
had been committed, for the second time. On a sudden the ruddy
color left his face.

"Good God!" he cried, "her father was murdered--and that woman
was concerned in it."

Following the impulse that urged him, he secured the Handbill in
his pocketbook--snatched up the card which his patient had
presented as her introduction--and instantly left the house. He
called the first cab that passed him, and drove to Miss Jethro's
lodgings.

"Gone"--was the servant's answer when he inquired for her. He
insisted on speaking to the landlady. "Hardly ten minutes have
passed," he said, "since she left my house."

"Hardly ten minutes have passed," the landlady replied, "since
that message was brought here by a boy."

The message had been evidently written in great haste: "I am
unexpectedly obliged to leave London. A bank note is inclosed in
payment of my debt to you. I will send for my luggage."

The doctor withdrew.

"Unexpectedly obliged to leave London," he repeated, as he got
into the cab again. "Her flight condemns her: not a doubt of it
now. As fast as you can!" he shouted to the man; directing him to
drive to Emily's cottage.






Mirabel left Francine to enter the lodge by herself. His mind was
disturbed: he felt the importance of gaining time for reflection
before he and Emily met again.

The keeper's garden was at the back of the lodge. Passing through
the wicket-gate, he found a little summer-house at a turn in the
path. Nobody was there: he went in and sat down.

At intervals, he had even yet encouraged himself to underrate the
true importance of the feeling which Emily had awakened in him.
There was an end to all self-deception now. After what Francine
had said to him, this shallow and frivolous man no longer
resisted the all-absorbing influence of love. He shrank under the
one terrible question that forced itself on his mind:--Had that
jealous girl spoken the truth?

In what process of investigation could he trust, to set this
anxiety at rest? To apply openly to Emily would be to take a
liberty, which Emily was the last person in the world to permit.
In his recent intercourse with her he had felt more strongly than
ever the importance of speaking with reserve. He had been
scrupulously careful to take no unfair advantage of his
opportunity, when he had removed her from the meeting, and when
they had walked together, with hardly a creature to observe them,
in the lonely outskirts of the town. Emily's gaiety and good
humor had not led him astray: he knew that these were bad signs,
viewed in the interests of love. His one hope of touching her
deeper sympathies was to wait for the help that might yet come
from time and chance. With a bitter sigh, he resigned himself to
the necessity of being as agreeable and amusing as ever: it was
just possible that he might lure her into alluding to Alban
Morris, if he began innocently by making her laugh.

As he rose to return to the lodge, the keeper's little terrier,
prowling about the garden, looked into the summer-house. Seeing a
stranger, the dog showed his teeth and growled.

Mirabel shrank back against the wall behind him, trembling in
every limb. His eyes stared in terror as the dog came nearer:
barking in high triumph over the discovery of a frightened man
whom he could bully. Mirabel called out for help. A laborer at
work in the garden ran to the place--and stopped with a broad
grin of amusement at seeing a grown man terrified by a barking
dog. "Well," he said to himself, after Mirabel had passed out
under protection, "there goes a coward if ever there was one
yet!"

Mirabel waited a minute behind the lodge to recover himself. He
had been so completely unnerved that his hair was wet with
perspiration. While he used his handkerchief, he shuddered at
other recollections than the recollection of the dog. "After that
night at the inn," he thought, "the least thing frightens me!"

He was received by the young ladies with cries of derisive
welcome. "Oh, for shame! for shame! here are the potatoes already
cut, and nobody to fry them!"

Mirabel assumed the mask of cheerfulness--with the desperate
resolution of an actor, amusing his audience at a time of
domestic distress. He astonished the keeper's wife by showin g
that he really knew how to use her frying-pan. Cecilia's omelet
was tough--but the young ladies ate it. Emily's mayonnaise sauce
was almost as liquid as water--they swallowed it nevertheless by
the help of spoons. The potatoes followed, crisp and dry and
delicious--and Mirabel became more popular than ever. "He is the
only one of us," Cecilia sadly acknowledged, "who knows how to
cook."

When they all left the lodge for a stroll in the park, Francine
attached herself to Cecilia and Miss Plym. She resigned Mirabel
to Emily--in the happy belief that she had paved the way for a
misunderstanding between them.

The merriment at the luncheon table had revived Emily's good
spirits. She had a light-hearted remembrance of the failure of
her sauce. Mirabel saw her smiling to herself. "May I ask what
amuses you?" he said.

"I was thinking of the debt of gratitude that we owe to Mr.
Wyvil," she replied. "If he had not persuaded you to return to
Monksmoor, we should never have seen the famous Mr. Mirabel with
a frying pan in his hand, and never have tasted the only good
dish at our luncheon."

Mirabel tried vainly to adopt his companion's easy tone. Now that
he was alone with her, the doubts that Francine had aroused shook
the prudent resolution at which he had arrived in the garden. He
ran the risk, and told Emily plainly why he had returned to Mr.
Wyvil's house.

"Although I am sensible of our host's kindness," he answered, "I
should have gone back to my parsonage--but for You."

She declined to understand him seriously. "Then the affairs of
your parish are neglected--and I am to blame!" she said.

"Am I the first man who has neglected his duties for your sake?"
he asked. "I wonder whether the masters at school had the heart
to report you when you neglected your lessons?"

She thought of Alban--and betrayed herself by a heightened color.
The moment after, she changed the subject. Mirabel could no
longer resist the conclusion that Francine had told him the
truth.

"When do you leave us," she inquired.

"To-morrow is Saturday--I must go back as usual."

"And how will your deserted parish receive you?"

He made a desperate effort to be as amusing as usual.

"I am sure of preserving my popularity," he said, "while I have a
cask in the cellar, and a few spare sixpences in my pocket. The
public spirit of my parishioners asks for nothing but money and
beer. Before I went to that wearisome meeting, I told my
housekeeper that I was going to make a speech about reform. She
didn't know what I meant. I explained that reform might increase
the number of British citizens who had the right of voting at
elections for parliament. She brightened up directly. 'Ah,' she
said, 'I've heard my husband talk about elections. The more there
are of them (_he_ says) the more money he'll get for his vote.
I'm all for reform.' On my way out of the house, I tried the man
who works in my garden on the same subject. He didn't look at the
matter from the housekeeper's sanguine point of view. 'I don't
deny that parliament once gave me a good dinner for nothing at
the public-house,' he admitted. 'But that was years ago--and
(you'll excuse me, sir) I hear nothing of another dinner to come.
It's a matter of opinion, of course. I don't myself believe in
reform.' There are specimens of the state of public spirit in our
village!" He paused. Emily was listening--but he had not
succeeded in choosing a subject that amused her. He tried a topic
more nearly connected with his own interests; the topic of the
future. "Our good friend has asked me to prolong my visit, after
Sunday's duties are over," he said. "I hope I shall find you
here, next week?"

"Will the affairs of your parish allow you to come back?" Emily
asked mischievously.

"The affairs of my parish--if you force me to confess it--were
only an excuse."

"An excuse for what?"

"An excuse for keeping away from Monksmoor--in the interests of
my own tranquillity. The experiment has failed. While you are
here, I can't keep away."

She still declined to understand him seriously. "Must I tell you
in plain words that flattery is thrown away on me?" she said.

"Flattery is not offered to you," he answered gravely. "I beg
your pardon for having led to the mistake by talking of myself."
Having appealed to her indulgence by that act of submission, he
ventured on another distant allusion to the man whom he hated and
feared. "Shall I meet any friends of yours," he resumed, "when I
return on Monday?"

"What do you mean?"

"I only meant to ask if Mr. Wyvil expects any new guests?"

As he put the question, Cecilia's voice was heard behind them,
calling to Emily. They both turned round. Mr. Wyvil had joined
his daughter and her two friends. He advanced to meet Emily.

"I have some news for you that you little expect," he said. "A
telegram has just arrived from Netherwoods. Mr. Alban Morris has
got leave of absence, and is coming here to-morrow."





The woman's lean, long-fingered hand pointed to the candle.

"Don't put it out." Saying those words, she looked round the
room, and satisfied herself that the other girls were asleep.

Emily laid down the extinguisher. "You mean to report us, of
course," she said. "I am the only one awake, Miss Jethro; lay the
blame on me."

"I have no intention of reporting you. But I have something to
say."

She paused, and pushed her thick black hair (already streaked
with gray) back from her temples. Her eyes, large and dark and
dim, rested on Emily with a sorrowful interest. "When your young
friends wake to-morrow morning," she went on, "you can tell them
that the new teacher, whom nobody likes, has left the school."

For once, even quick-witted Emily was bewildered. "Going away,"
she said, "when you have only been here since Easter!"

Miss Jethro advanced, not noticing Emily's expression of
surprise. "I am not very strong at the best of times," she
continued, "may I sit down on your bed?" Remarkable on other
occasions for her cold composure, her voice trembled as she made
that request--a strange request surely, when there were chairs at
her disposal.

Emily made room for her with the dazed look of a girl in a dream.
"I beg your pardon, Miss Jethro, one of the things I can't endure
is being puzzled. If you don't mean to report us, why did you
come in and catch me with the light?"

Miss Jethro's explanation was far from relieving the perplexity
which her conduct had caused.

"I have been mean enough," she answered, "to listen at the door,
and I heard you talking of your father. I want to hear more about
him. That is why I came in."

"You knew my father!" Emily exclaimed.

"I believe I knew him. But his name is so common--there are so
many thousands of 'James Browns' in England--that I am in fear of
making a mistake. I heard you say that he died nearly four years
since. Can you mention any particulars which might help to
enlighten me? If you think I am taking a liberty--"

Emily stopped her. "I would help you if I could," she said. "But
I was in poor health at the time; and I was staying with friends
far away in Scotland, to try change of air. The news of my
father's death brought on a relapse. Weeks passed before I was
strong enough to travel--weeks and weeks before I saw his grave!
I can only tell you what I know from my aunt. He died of
heart-complaint."

Miss Jethro started.

Emily looked at her for the first time, with eyes that betrayed a
feeling of distrust. "What have I said to startle you?" she
asked.

"Nothing! I am nervous in stormy weather--don't notice me." She
went on abruptly with her inquiries. "Will you tell me the date
of your father's death?"

"The date was the thirtieth of September, nearly four years
since."

She waited, after that reply.

Miss Jethro was silent.

"And this," Emily continued, "is the thirtieth of June, eighteen
hundred and eighty-one. You can now judge for yourself. Did you
know my father?"

Miss Jethro answered mechanically, using the same words.

"I did know your father."

Emily's feeling of distrust was not set at rest. "I never heard
him speak of you," she said.

In her younger days the teacher must have been a handsome woman.
Her grandly-formed features still suggested the idea of imperial
beauty--perhaps Jewish in its origin. When Emily said, "I never
heard him speak of you," the color flew into her pallid cheeks:
her dim eyes became alive again with a momentary light. She left
her seat on the bed, and, turning away, mastered the emotion that
shook her.

"How hot the night is!" she said: and sighed, and resumed the
subject with a steady countenance. "I am not surprised that your
father never mentioned me--to _you_." She spoke quietly, but her
face was paler than ever. She sat down again on the bed. "Is
there anything I can do for you," she asked, "before I go away?
Oh, I only mean some trifling service that would lay you under no
obligation, and would not oblige you to keep up your acquaintance
with me."

Her eyes--the dim black eyes that must once have been
irresistibly beautiful--looked at Emily so sadly that the
generous girl reproached herself for having doubted her father's
friend. "Are you thinking of _him_," she said gently, "when you
ask if you can be of service to me?"

Miss Jethro made no direct reply. "You were fond of your father?"
she added, in a whisper. "You told your schoolfellow that your
heart still aches when you speak of him."

"I only told her the truth," Emily answered simply.

Miss Jethro shuddered--on that hot night!--shuddered as if a
chill had struck her.

Emily held out her hand; the kind feeling that had been roused in
her glittered prettily in her eyes. "I am afraid I have not done
you justice," she said. "Will you forgive me and shake hands?"

Miss Jethro rose, and drew back. "Look at the light!" she
exclaimed.

The candle was all burned out. Emily still offered her hand--and
still Miss Jethro refused to see it.

"There is just light enough left," she said, "to show me my way
to the door. Good-night--and good-by."

Emily caught at her dress, and stopped her. "Why won't you shake
hands with me?" she asked.

The wick of the candle fell over in the socket, and left them in
the dark. Emily resolutely held the teacher's dress. With or
without light, she was still bent on making Miss Jethro explain
herself.

They had throughout spoken in guarded tones, fearing to disturb
the sleeping girls. The sudden darkness had its inevitable
effect. Their voices sank to whispers now. "My father's friend,"
Emily pleaded, "is surely my friend?"

"Drop the subject."

"Why?"

"You can never be _my_ friend."

"Why not?"

"Let me go!"

Emily's sense of self-respect forbade her to persist any longer.
"I beg your pardon for having kept you here against your will,"
she said--and dropped her hold on the dress.

Miss Jethro instantly yielded on her side. "I am sorry to have
been obstinate," she answered. "If you do despise me, it is after
all no more than I have deserved." Her hot breath beat on Emily's
face: the unhappy woman must have bent over the bed as she made
her confession. "I am not a fit person for you to associate
with."

"I don't believe it!"

Miss Jethro sighed bitterly. "Young and warm hearted--I was once
like you!" She controlled that outburst of despair. Her next
words were spoken in steadier tones. "You _will_ have it--you
_shall_ have it!" she said. "Some one (in this house or out of
it; I don't know which) has betrayed me to the mistress of the
school. A wretch in my situation suspects everybody, and worse
still, does it without reason or excuse. I heard you girls
talking when you ought to have been asleep. You all dislike me.
How did I know it mightn't be one of you? Absurd, to a person
with a well-balanced mind! I went halfway up the stairs, and felt
ashamed of myself, and went back to my room. If I could only have
got some rest! Ah, well, it was not to be done. My own vile
suspicions kept me awake; I left my bed again. You know what I
heard on the other side of that door, and why I was interested in
hearing it. Your father never told me he had a daughter. 'Miss
Brown,' at this school, was any 'Miss Brown,' to me. I had no
idea of who you really were until to-night. I'm wandering. What
does all this matter to you? Miss Ladd has been merciful; she
lets me go without exposing me. You can guess what has happened.
No? Not even yet? Is it innocence or kindness that makes you so
slow to understand? My dear, I have obtained admission to this
respectable house by means of false references, and I have been
discovered. _Now_ you know why you must not be the friend of such
a woman as I am! Once more, good-night--and good-by."

Emily shrank from that miserable farewell.

"Bid me good-night," she said, "but don't bid me good-by. Let me
see you again."

"Never!"

The sound of the softly-closed door was just audible in the
darkness. She had spoken--she had gone--never to be seen by Emily
again.

Miserable, interesting, unfathomable creature--the problem that
night of Emily's waking thoughts: the phantom of her dreams.
"Bad? or good?" she asked herself. "False; for she listened at
the door. True; for she told me the tale of her own disgrace. A
friend of my father; and she never knew that he had a daughter.
Refined, accomplished, lady-like; and she stoops to use a false
reference. Who is to reconcile such contradictions as these?"

Dawn looked in at the window--dawn of the memorable day which
was, for Emily, the beginning of a new life. The years were
before her; and the years in their course reveal baffling
mysteries of life and death.


Banford was a small, thin, delicate thing with spectacles.  She,
however, was the principal investor, for March had little or no
money.  Banford's father, who was a tradesman in Islington, gave
his daughter the start, for her health's sake, and because he loved
her, and because it did not look as if she would marry.  March was
more robust.  She had learned carpentry and joinery at the evening
classes in Islington.  She would be the man about the place.  They
had, moreover, Banford's old grandfather living with them at the
start.  He had been a farmer.  But unfortunately the old man died
after he had been at Bailey Farm for a year.  Then the two girls
were left alone.They were neither of them young: that is, they were near thirty.
But they certainly were not old.  They set out quite gallantly with
their enterprise.  They had numbers of chickens, black Leghorns and
white Leghorns, Plymouths and Wyandottes; also some ducks; also two
heifers in the fields.  One heifer, unfortunately, refused
absolutely to stay in the Bailey Farm closes.  No matter how March
made up the fences, the heifer was out, wild in the woods, or
trespassing on the neighbouring pasture, and March and Banford were
away, flying after her, with more haste than success.  So this
heifer they sold in despair.  Then, just before the other beast was
expecting her first calf, the old man died, and the girls, afraid
of the coming event, sold her in a panic, and limited their
attentions to fowls and ducks.In spite of a little chagrin, it was a relief to have no more
cattle on hand.  Life was not made merely to be slaved away.  Both
girls agreed in this.  The fowls were quite enough trouble.  March
had set up her carpenter's bench at the end of the open shed.  Here
she worked, making coops and doors and other appurtenances.  The
fowls were housed in the bigger building, which had served as barn
and cow-shed in old days.  They had a beautiful home, and should
have been perfectly content.  Indeed, they looked well enough.  But
the girls were disgusted at their tendency to strange illnesses, at
their exacting way of life, and at their refusal, obstinate refusal
to lay eggs.March did most of the outdoor work.  When she was out and about, in
her puttees and breeches, her belted coat and her loose cap, she
looked almost like some graceful, loose-balanced young man, for her
shoulders were straight, and her movements easy and confident, even
tinged with a little indifference or irony.  But her face was not a
man's face, ever.  The wisps of her crisp dark hair blew about her
as she stooped, her eyes were big and wide and dark, when she
looked up again, strange, startled, shy and sardonic at once.  Her
mouth, too, was almost pinched as if in pain and irony.  There was
something odd and unexplained about her.  She would stand balanced
on one hip, looking at the fowls pattering about in the obnoxious
fine mud of the sloping yard, and calling to her favourite white
hen, which came in answer to her name.  But there was an almost
satirical flicker in March's big, dark eyes as she looked at her
three-toed flock pottering about under her gaze, and the same
slight dangerous satire in her voice as she spoke to the favoured
Patty, who pecked at March's boot by way of friendly demonstration.Fowls did not flourish at Bailey Farm, in spite of all that March
did for them.  When she provided hot food for them in the morning,
according to rule, she noticed that it made them heavy and dozy for
hours.  She expected to see them lean against the pillars of the
shed in their languid processes of digestion.  And she knew quite
well that they ought to be busily scratching and foraging about, if
they were to come to any good.  So she decided to give them their
hot food at night, and let them sleep on it.  Which she did.  But
it made no difference.War conditions, again, were very unfavourable to poultry-keeping.
Food was scarce and bad.  And when the Daylight Saving Bill was
passed, the fowls obstinately refused to go to bed as usual, about
nine o'clock in the summer-time.  That was late enough, indeed, for
there was no peace till they were shut up and asleep.  Now they
cheerfully walked around, without so much as glancing at the barn,
until ten o'clock or later.  Both Banford and March disbelieved in
living for work alone.  They wanted to read or take a cycle-ride in
the evening, or perhaps March wished to paint curvilinear swans on
porcelain, with green background, or else make a marvellous fire-
screen by processes of elaborate cabinet work.  For she was a
creature of odd whims and unsatisfied tendencies.  But from all
these things she was prevented by the stupid fowls.One evil there was greater than any other.  Bailey Farm was a
little homestead, with ancient wooden barn and low-gabled farm-
house, lying just one field removed from the edge of the wood.
Since the war the fox was a demon.  He carried off the hens under
the very noses of March and Banford.  Banford would start and stare
through her big spectacles with all her eyes, as another squawk and
flutter took place at her heels.  Too late!  Another white Leghorn
gone.  It was disheartening.They did what they could to remedy it.  When it became permitted to
shoot foxes, they stood sentinel with their guns, the two of them,
at the favoured hours.  But it was no good.  The fox was too quick
for them.  So another year passed, and another, and they were
living on their losses, as Banford said.  They let their farm-house
one summer, and retired to live in a railway-carriage that was
deposited as a sort of out-house in a corner of the field.  This
amused them, and helped their finances.  None the less, things
looked dark.Although they were usually the best of friends, because Banford,
though nervous and delicate, was a warm, generous soul, and March,
though so odd and absent in herself, had a strange magnanimity,
yet, in the long solitude, they were apt to become a little
irritable with one another, tired of one another.  March had four-
fifths of the work to do, and though she did not mind, there seemed
no relief, and it made her eyes flash curiously sometimes.  Then
Banford, feeling more nerve-worn than ever, would become
despondent, and March would speak sharply to her.  They seemed to
be losing ground, somehow, losing hope as the months went by.
There alone in the fields by the wood, with the wide country
stretching hollow and dim to the round hills of the White Horse, in
the far distance, they seemed to have to live too much off
themselves.  There was nothing to keep them up - and no hope.The fox really exasperated them both.  As soon as they had let the
fowls out, in the early summer mornings, they had to take their
guns and keep guard: and then again as soon as evening began to
mellow, they must go once more.  And he was so sly.  He slid along
in the deep grass; he was difficult as a serpent to see.  And he
seemed to circumvent the girls deliberately.  Once or twice March
had caught sight of the white tip of his brush, or the ruddy shadow
of him in the deep grass, and she had let fire at him.  But he made
no account of this.One evening March was standing with her back to the sunset, her gun
under her arm, her hair pushed under her cap.  She was half
watching, half musing.  It was her constant state.  Her eyes were
keen and observant, but her inner mind took no notice of what she
saw.  She was always lapsing into this odd, rapt state, her mouth
rather screwed up.  It was a question whether she was there,
actually conscious present, or not.The trees on the wood-edge were a darkish, brownish green in the
full light - for it was the end of August.  Beyond, the naked,
copper-like shafts and limbs of the pine trees shone in the air.
Nearer the rough grass, with its long, brownish stalks all agleam,
was full of light.  The fowls were round about - the ducks were
still swimming on the pond under the pine trees.  March looked at
it all, saw it all, and did not see it.  She heard Banford speaking
to the fowls in the distance - and she did not hear.  What was she
thinking about?  Heaven knows.  Her consciousness was, as it were,
held back.She lowered her eyes, and suddenly saw the fox.  He was looking up
at her.  Her chin was pressed down, and his eyes were looking up.
They met her eyes.  And he knew her.  She was spellbound - she knew
he knew her.  So he looked into her eyes, and her soul failed her.
He knew her, he was not daunted.She struggled, confusedly she came to herself, and saw him making
off, with slow leaps over some fallen boughs, slow, impudent jumps.
Then he glanced over his shoulder, and ran smoothly away.  She saw
his brush held smooth like a feather, she saw his white buttocks
twinkle.  And he was gone, softly, soft as the wind.She put her gun to her shoulder, but even then pursed her mouth,
knowing it was nonsense to pretend to fire.  So she began to
walk slowly after him, in the direction he had gone, slowly,
pertinaciously.  She expected to find him.  In her heart she was
determined to find him.  What she would do when she saw him again
she did not consider.  But she was determined to find him.  So she
walked abstractedly about on the edge of the wood, with wide, vivid
dark eyes, and a faint flush in her cheeks.  She did not think.  In
strange mindlessness she walked hither and thither.At last she became aware that Banford was calling her.  She made an
effort of attention, turned, and gave some sort of screaming call
in answer.  Then again she was striding off towards the homestead.
The red sun was setting, the fowls were retiring towards their
roost.  She watched them, white creatures, black creatures,
gathering to the barn.  She watched them spellbound, without seeing
them.  But her automatic intelligence told her when it was time to
shut the door.She went indoors to supper, which Banford had set on the table.
Banford chatted easily.  March seemed to listen, in her distant,
manly way.  She answered a brief word now and then.  But all the
time she was as if spellbound.  And as soon as supper was over, she
rose again to go out, without saying why.She took her gun again and went to look for the fox.  For he had
lifted his eyes upon her, and his knowing look seemed to have
entered her brain.  She did not so much think of him: she was
possessed by him.  She saw his dark, shrewd, unabashed eye looking
into her, knowing her.  She felt him invisibly master her spirit.
She knew the way he lowered his chin as he looked up, she knew his
muzzle, the golden brown, and the greyish white.  And again she saw
him glance over his shoulder at her, half inviting, half
contemptuous and cunning.  So she went, with her great startled
eyes glowing, her gun under her arm, along the wood edge.
Meanwhile the night fell, and a great moon rose above the pine
trees.  And again Banford was calling.So she went indoors.  She was silent and busy.  She examined her
gun, and cleaned it, musing abstractedly by the lamplight.  Then
she went out again, under the great moon, to see if everything was
right.  When she saw the dark crests of the pine trees against the
blood-red sky, again her heart beat to the fox, the fox.  She
wanted to follow him, with her gun.It was some days before she mentioned the affair to Banford.  Then
suddenly one evening she said:'The fox was right at my feet on Saturday night.''Where?' said Banford, her eyes opening behind her spectacles.'When I stood just above the pond.''Did you fire?' cried Banford.'No, I didn't.''Why not?''Why, I was too much surprised, I suppose.'It was the same old, slow, laconic way of speech March always had.
Banford stared at her friend for a few moments.'You saw him?' she cried.'Oh yes!  He was looking up at me, cool as anything.''I tell you,' cried Banford - 'the cheek!  They're not afraid of us,
Nellie.''Oh, no,' said March.'Pity you didn't get a shot at him,' said Banford.'Isn't it a pity!  I've been looking for him ever since.  But I
don't suppose he'll come so near again.''I don't suppose he will,' said Banford.And she proceeded to forget about it, except that she was more
indignant than ever at the impudence of the beggar.  March also was
not conscious that she thought of the fox.  But whenever she fell
into her half-musing, when she was half rapt and half intelligently
aware of what passed under her vision, then it was the fox which
somehow dominated her unconsciousness, possessed the blank half of
her musing.  And so it was for weeks, and months.  No matter
whether she had been climbing the trees for the apples, or beating
down the last of the damsons, or whether she had been digging out
the ditch from the duck-pond, or clearing out the barn, when she
had finished, or when she straightened herself, and pushed the
wisps of her hair away again from her forehead, and pursed up her
mouth again in an odd, screwed fashion, much too old for her years,
there was sure to come over her mind the old spell of the fox, as
it came when he was looking at her.  It was as if she could smell
him at these times.  And it always recurred, at unexpected moments,
just as she was going to sleep at night, or just as she was pouring
the water into the tea-pot to make tea - it was the fox, it came
over her like a spell.So the months passed.  She still looked for him unconsciously when
she went towards the wood.  He had become a settled effect in her
spirit, a state permanently established, not continuous, but always
recurring.  She did not know what she felt or thought: only the
state came over her, as when he looked at her.The months passed, the dark evenings came, heavy, dark November,
when March went about in high boots, ankle deep in mud, when the
night began to fall at four o'clock, and the day never properly
dawned.  Both girls dreaded these times.  They dreaded the almost
continuous darkness that enveloped them on their desolate little
farm near the wood.  Banford was physically afraid.  She was afraid
of tramps, afraid lest someone should come prowling around.  March
was not so much afraid as uncomfortable, and disturbed.  She felt
discomfort and gloom in all her physique.Usually the two girls had tea in the sitting-room.  March lighted a
fire at dusk, and put on the wood she had chopped and sawed during
the day.  Then the long evening was in front, dark, sodden, black
outside, lonely and rather oppressive inside, a little dismal.
March was content not to talk, but Banford could not keep still.
Merely listening to the wind in the pines outside or the drip of
water, was too much for her.One evening the girls had washed up the tea-cups in the kitchen,
and March had put on her house-shoes, and taken up a roll of
crochet-work, which she worked at slowly from time to time.  So she
lapsed into silence.  Banford stared at the red fire, which, being
of wood, needed constant attention.  She was afraid to begin to
read too early, because her eyes would not bear any strain.  So she
sat staring at the fire, listening to the distant sounds, sound of
cattle lowing, of a dull, heavy moist wind, of the rattle of the
evening train on the little railway not far off.  She was almost
fascinated by the red glow of the fire.Suddenly both girls started, and lifted their heads.  They heard a
footstep - distinctly a footstep.  Banford recoiled in fear.  March
stood listening.  Then rapidly she approached the door that led
into the kitchen.  At the same time they heard the footsteps
approach the back door.  They waited a second.  The back door
opened softly.  Banford gave a loud cry.  A man's voice said
softly:'Hello!'March recoiled, and took a gun from a corner.'What do you want?' she cried, in a sharp voice.Again the soft, softly-vibrating man's voice said:'Hello!  What's wrong!''I shall shoot!' cried March.  'What do you want?''Why, what's wrong?  What's wrong?' came the soft, wondering,
rather scared voice: and a young soldier, with his heavy kit on his
back, advanced into the dim light.'Why,' he said, 'who lives here then?''We live here,' said March.  'What do you want?''Oh!' came the long, melodious, wonder-note from the young soldier.
'Doesn't William Grenfel live here then?''No - you know he doesn't.''Do I?  Do I?  I don't, you see.  He did LIVE here, because he was
my grandfather, and I lived here myself five years ago.  What's
become of him then?'The young man - or youth, for he would not be more than twenty - now
advanced and stood in the inner doorway.  March, already under the
influence of his strange, soft, modulated voice, stared at him
spellbound.  He had a ruddy, roundish face, with fairish hair,
rather long, flattened to his forehead with sweat.  His eyes were
blue, and very bright and sharp.  On his cheeks, on the fresh ruddy
skin were fine, fair hairs, like a down, but sharper.  It gave him
a slightly glistening look.  Having his heavy sack on his
shoulders, he stooped, thrusting his head forward.  His hat was
loose in one hand.  He stared brightly, very keenly from girl to
girl, particularly at March, who stood pale, with great dilated
eyes, in her belted coat and puttees, her hair knotted in a big
crisp knot behind.  She still had the gun in her hand.  Behind her,
Banford, clinging to the sofa-arm, was shrinking away, with half-
averted head.'I thought my grandfather still lived here?  I wonder if he's
dead.''We've been here for three years,' said Banford, who was beginning
to recover her wits, seeing something boyish in the round head with
its rather long, sweaty hair.'Three years!  You don't say so!  And you don't know who was here
before you?''I know it was an old man, who lived by himself.''Ay!  Yes, that's him!  And what became of him then?''He died.  I know he died.''Ay!  He's dead then!'The youth stared at them without changing colour or expression.  If
he had any expression, besides a slight baffled look of wonder, it
was one of sharp curiosity concerning the two girls; sharp,
impersonal curiosity, the curiosity of that round young head.But to March he was the fox.  Whether it was the thrusting forward
of his head, or the glisten of fine whitish hairs on the ruddy
cheek-bones, or the bright, keen eyes, that can never be said: but
the boy was to her the fox, and she could not see him otherwise.'How is it you didn't know if your grandfather was alive or dead?'
asked Banford, recovering her natural sharpness.'Ay, that's it,' replied the softly-breathing youth.  'You see, I
joined up in Canada, and I hadn't heard for three or four years.  I
ran away to Canada.''And now have you just come from France?''Well - from Salonika really.'There was a pause, nobody knowing quite what to say.'So you've nowhere to go now?' said Banford rather lamely.'Oh, I know some people in the village.  Anyhow, I can go to the
&quot;Swan&quot;.''You came on the train, I suppose.  Would you like to sit down a
bit?''Well - I don't mind.'He gave an odd little groan as he swung off his kit.  Banford
looked at March.'Put the gun down,' she said.  'We'll make a cup of tea.''Ay,' said the youth.  'We've seen enough of rifles.'He sat down rather tired on the sofa, leaning forward.March recovered her presence of mind, and went into the kitchen.
There she heard the soft young voice musing:'Well, to think I should come back and find it like this!'  He did
not seem sad, not at all - only rather interestedly surprised.'And what a difference in the place, eh?' he continued, looking
round the room.'You see a difference, do you?' said Banford.'Yes - don't I!'His eyes were unnaturally clear and bright, though it was the
brightness of abundant health.March was busy in the kitchen preparing another meal.  It was about
seven o'clock.  All the time, while she was active, she was
attending to the youth in the sitting-room, not so much listening
to what he said as feeling the soft run of his voice.  She primmed
up her mouth tighter and tighter, puckering it as if it were sewed,
in her effort to keep her will uppermost.  Yet her large eyes
dilated and glowed in spite of her; she lost herself.  Rapidly and
carelessly she prepared the meal, cutting large chunks of bread and
margarine - for there was no butter.  She racked her brain to think
of something else to put on the tray - she had only bread,
margarine, and jam, and the larder was bare.  Unable to conjure
anything up, she went into the sitting-room with her tray.She did not want to be noticed.  Above all, she did not want him to
look at her.  But when she came in, and was busy setting the table
just behind him, he pulled himself up from his sprawling, and
turned and looked over his shoulder.  She became pale and wan.The youth watched her as she bent over the table, looked at her
slim, well-shapen legs, at the belted coat dropping around her
thighs, at the knot of dark hair, and his curiosity, vivid and
widely alert, was again arrested by her.The lamp was shaded with a dark-green shade, so that the light was
thrown downwards and the upper half of the room was dim.  His face
moved bright under the light, but March loomed shadowy in the
distance.She turned round, but kept her eyes sideways, dropping and lifting
her dark lashes.  Her mouth unpuckered as she said to Banford:'Will you pour out?'Then she went into the kitchen again.'Have your tea where you are, will you?' said Banford to the youth - 
'unless you'd rather come to the table.''Well,' said he, 'I'm nice and comfortable here, aren't I?  I will
have it here, if you don't mind.''There's nothing but bread and jam,' she said.  And she put his
plate on a stool by him.  She was very happy now, waiting on him.
For she loved company.  And now she was no more afraid of him than
if he were her own younger brother.  He was such a boy.'Nellie,' she called.  'I've poured you a cup out.'March appeared in the doorway, took her cup, and sat down in a
corner, as far from the light as possible.  She was very sensitive
in her knees.  Having no skirts to cover them, and being forced to
sit with them boldly exposed, she suffered.  She shrank and shrank,
trying not to be seen.  And the youth sprawling low on the couch,
glanced up at her, with long, steady, penetrating looks, till she
was almost ready to disappear.  Yet she held her cup balanced, she
drank her tea, screwed up her mouth and held her head averted.  Her
desire to be invisible was so strong that it quite baffled the
youth.  He felt he could not see her distinctly.  She seemed like a
shadow within the shadow.  And ever his eyes came back to her,
searching, unremitting, with unconscious fixed attention.Meanwhile he was talking softly and smoothly to Banford, who loved
nothing so much as gossip, and who was full of perky interest, like
a bird.  Also he ate largely and quickly and voraciously, so that
March had to cut more chunks of bread and margarine, for the
roughness of which Banford apologized.'Oh, well,' said March, suddenly speaking, 'if there's no butter to
put on it, it's no good trying to make dainty pieces.'Again the youth watched her, and he laughed, with a sudden, quick
laugh, showing his teeth and wrinkling his nose.'It isn't, is it,' he answered in his soft, near voice.It appeared he was Cornish by birth and upbringing.  When he was
twelve years old he had come to Bailey Farm with his grandfather,
with whom he had never agreed very well.  So he had run away to
Canada, and worked far away in the West.  Now he was here - and that
was the end of it.He was very curious about the girls, to find out exactly what they
were doing.  His questions were those of a farm youth; acute,
practical, a little mocking.  He was very much amused by their
attitude to their losses: for they were amusing on the score of
heifers and fowls.'Oh, well,' broke in March, 'we don't believe in living for nothing
but work.''Don't you?' he answered.  And again the quick young laugh came
over his face.  He kept his eyes steadily on the obscure woman in
the corner.'But what will you do when you've used up all your capital?' he
said.'Oh, I don't know,' answered March laconically.  'Hire ourselves
out for land-workers, I suppose.''Yes, but there won't be any demand for women land-workers now the
war's over,' said the youth.'Oh, we'll see.  We shall hold on a bit longer yet,' said March,
with a plangent, half-sad, half-ironical indifference.'There wants a man about the place,' said the youth softly.Banford burst out laughing.'Take care what you say,' she interrupted.  'We consider ourselves
quite efficient.''Oh,' came March's slow plangent voice, 'it isn't a case of
efficiency, I'm afraid.  If you're going to do farming you must be
at it from morning till night, and you might as well be a beast
yourself.''Yes, that's it,' said the youth.  'You aren't willing to put
yourselves into it.''We aren't,' said March, 'and we know it.''We want some of our time for ourselves,' said Banford.The youth threw himself back on the sofa, his face tight with
laughter, and laughed silently but thoroughly.  The calm scorn of
the girls tickled him tremendously.'Yes,' he said, 'but why did you begin then?''Oh,' said March, 'we had a better opinion of the nature of fowls
then than we have now.''Of Nature altogether, I'm afraid,' said Banford.  'Don't talk to
me about Nature.'Again the face of the youth tightened with delighted laughter.'You haven't a very high opinion of fowls and cattle, have you?' he
said.'Oh no - quite a low one,' said March.He laughed out.'Neither fowls nor heifers,' said Banford, 'nor goats nor the
weather.'The youth broke into a sharp yap of laughter, delighted.  The girls
began to laugh too, March turning aside her face and wrinkling her
mouth in amusement.'Oh, well,' said Banford, 'we don't mind, do we, Nellie?''No,' said March, 'we don't mind.'The youth was very pleased.  He had eaten and drunk his fill.
Banford began to question him.  His name was Henry Grenfel - no, he
was not called Harry, always Henry.  He continued to answer with
courteous simplicity, grave and charming.  March, who was not
included, cast long, slow glances at him from her recess, as he sat
there on the sofa, his hands clasping his knees, his face under the
lamp bright and alert, turned to Banford.  She became almost
peaceful at last.  He was identified with the fox - and he was here
in full presence.  She need not go after him any more.  There in
the shadow of her corner she gave herself up to a warm, relaxed
peace, almost like sleep, accepting the spell that was on her.  But
she wished to remain hidden.  She was only fully at peace whilst he
forgot her, talking to Banford.  Hidden in the shadow of the
corner, she need not any more be divided in herself, trying to keep
up two planes of consciousness.  She could at last lapse into the
odour of the fox.For the youth, sitting before the fire in his uniform, sent a faint
but distinct odour into the room, indefinable, but something like a
wild creature.  March no longer tried to reserve herself from it.
She was still and soft in her corner like a passive creature in its
cave.At last the talk dwindled.  The youth relaxed his clasp of his
knees, pulled himself together a little, and looked round.  Again
he became aware of the silent, half-invisible woman in the corner.'Well,' he said unwillingly, 'I suppose I'd better be going, or
they'll be in bed at the &quot;Swan &quot;.''I'm afraid they're in bed, anyhow,' said Banford.  'They've all
got this influenza.''Have they!' he exclaimed.  And he pondered.  'Well,' he continued,
'I shall find a place somewhere.''I'd say you could stay here, only - ' Banford began.He turned and watched her, holding his head forward.'What?' he asked.'Oh, well,' she said, 'propriety, I suppose.'  She was rather
confused.'It wouldn't be improper, would it?' he said, gently surprised.'Not as far as we're concerned,' said Banford.'And not as far as I'M concerned,' he said, with grave naivete.
'After all, it's my own home, in a way.'Banford smiled at this.'It's what the village will have to say,' she said.There was a moment's blank pause.'What do you say, Nellie?' asked Banford.'I don't mind,' said March, in her distinct tone.  'The village
doesn't matter to me, anyhow.''No,' said the youth, quick and soft.  'Why should it?  I mean,
what should they say?''Oh, well,' came March's plangent, laconic voice, 'they'll easily
find something to say.  But it makes no difference what they say.
We can look after ourselves.''Of course you can,' said the youth.'Well then, stop if you like,' said Banford.  'The spare room is
quite ready.'His face shone with pleasure.'If you're quite sure it isn't troubling you too much,' he said,
with that soft courtesy which distinguished him.'Oh, it's no trouble,' they both said.He looked, smiling with delight, from one to another.'It's awfully nice not to have to turn out again, isn't it?' he
said gratefully.'I suppose it is,' said Banford.March disappeared to attend the room.  Banford was as pleased and
thoughtful as if she had her own young brother home from France.
It gave her just the same kind of gratification to attend on him,
to get out the bath for him, and everything.  Her natural warmth
and kindliness had now an outlet.  And the youth luxuriated in her
sisterly attention.  But it puzzled him slightly to know that March
was silently working for him too.  She was so curiously silent and
obliterated.  It seemed to him he had not really seen her.  He felt
he should not know her if he met her in the road.That night March dreamed vividly.  She dreamed she heard a singing
outside which she could not understand, a singing that roamed round
the house, in the fields, and in the darkness.  It moved her so
that she felt she must weep.  She went out, and suddenly she knew
it was the fox singing.  He was very yellow and bright, like corn.
She went nearer to him, but he ran away and ceased singing.  He
seemed near, and she wanted to touch him.  She stretched out her
hand, but suddenly he bit her wrist, and at the same instant, as
she drew back, the fox, turning round to bound away, whisked his
brush across her face, and it seemed his brush was on fire, for it
seared and burned her mouth with a great pain.  She awoke with the
pain of it, and lay trembling as if she were really seared.In the morning, however, she only remembered it as a distant
memory.  She arose and was busy preparing the house and attending
to the fowls.  Banford flew into the village on her bicycle to try
and buy food.  She was a hospitable soul.  But alas, in the year
1918 there was not much food to buy.  The youth came downstairs in
his shirt-sleeves.  He was young and fresh, but he walked with his
head thrust forward, so that his shoulders seemed raised and
rounded, as if he had a slight curvature of the spine.  It must
have been only a manner of bearing himself, for he was young and
vigorous.  He washed himself and went outside, whilst the women
were preparing breakfast.He saw everything, and examined everything.  His curiosity was
quick and insatiable.  He compared the state of things with that
which he remembered before, and cast over in his mind the effect of
the changes.  He watched the fowls and the ducks, to see their
condition; he noticed the flight of wood-pigeons overhead: they
were very numerous; he saw the few apples high up, which March had
not been able to reach; he remarked that they had borrowed a draw-
pump, presumably to empty the big soft-water cistern which was on
the north side of the house.'It's a funny, dilapidated old place,' he said to the girls, as he
sat at breakfast.His eyes were wise and childish, with thinking about things.  He
did not say much, but ate largely.  March kept her face averted.
She, too, in the early morning could not be aware of him, though
something about the glint of his khaki reminded her of the
brilliance of her dream-fox.During the day the girls went about their business.  In the morning
he attended to the guns, shot a rabbit and a wild duck that was
flying high towards the wood.  That was a great addition to the
empty larder.  The girls felt that already he had earned his keep.
He said nothing about leaving, however.  In the afternoon he went
to the village.  He came back at tea-time.  He had the same alert,
forward-reaching look on his roundish face.  He hung his hat on a
peg with a little swinging gesture.  He was thinking about
something.'Well,' he said to the girls, as he sat at table.  'What am I going
to do?''How do you mean - what are you going to do?' said Banford.'Where am I going to find a place in the village to stay?' he said.'I don't know,' said Banford.  'Where do you think of staying?''Well' - he hesitated - 'at the &quot;Swan&quot; they've got this flu, and at
the &quot;Plough and Harrow&quot; they've got the soldiers who are collecting
the hay for the army: besides, in the private houses, there's ten
men and a corporal altogether billeted in the village, they tell
me.  I'm not sure where I could get a bed.'He left the matter to them.  He was rather calm about it.  March
sat with her elbows on the table, her two hands supporting her
chin, looking at him unconsciously.  Suddenly he lifted his clouded
blue eyes, and unthinking looked straight into March's eyes.  He
was startled as well as she.  He, too, recoiled a little.  March
felt the same sly, taunting, knowing spark leap out of his eyes, as
he turned his head aside, and fall into her soul, as it had fallen
from the dark eyes of the fox.  She pursed her mouth as if in pain,
as if asleep too.'Well, I don't know,' Banford was saying.  She seemed reluctant, as
if she were afraid of being imposed upon.  She looked at March.
But, with her weak, troubled sight, she only saw the usual semi-
abstraction on her friend's face.  'Why don't you speak, Nellie?'
she said.But March was wide-eyed and silent, and the youth, as if fascinated,
was watching her without moving his eyes.'Go on - answer something,' said Banford.  And March turned her head
slightly aside, as if coming to consciousness, or trying to come to
consciousness.'What do you expect me to say?' she asked automatically.'Say what you think,' said Banford.'It's all the same to me,' said March.And again there was silence.  A pointed light seemed to be on the
boy's eyes, penetrating like a needle.'So it is to me,' said Banford.  'You can stop on here if you
like.'A smile like a cunning little flame came over his face, suddenly
and involuntarily.  He dropped his head quickly to hide it, and
remained with his head dropped, his face hidden.'You can stop on here if you like.  You can please yourself,
Henry,' Banford concluded.Still he did not reply, but remained with his head dropped.  Then
he lifted his face.  It was bright with a curious light, as if
exultant, and his eyes were strangely clear as he watched March.
She turned her face aside, her mouth suffering as if wounded, and
her consciousness dim.Banford became a little puzzled.  She watched the steady, pellucid
gaze of the youth's eyes as he looked at March, with the invisible
smile gleaming on his face.  She did not know how he was smiling,
for no feature moved.  It seemed only in the gleam, almost the
glitter of the fine hairs on his cheeks.  Then he looked with quite
a changed look at Banford.'I'm sure,' he said in his soft, courteous voice, 'you're awfully
good.  You're too good.  You don't want to be bothered with me, I'm
sure.''Cut a bit of bread, Nellie,' said Banford uneasily, adding:  'It's
no bother, if you like to stay.  It's like having my own brother
here for a few days.  He's a boy like you are.''That's awfully kind of you,' the lad repeated.  'I should like to
stay ever so much, if you're sure I'm not a trouble to you.''No, of course you're no trouble.  I tell you, it's a pleasure to
have somebody in the house beside ourselves,' said warmhearted
Banford.'But Miss March?' he said in his soft voice, looking at her.'Oh, it's quite all right as far as I'm concerned,' said March
vaguely.His face beamed, and he almost rubbed his hands with pleasure.'Well then,' he said, 'I should love it, if you'd let me pay my
board and help with the work.''You've no need to talk about board,' said Banford.One or two days went by, and the youth stayed on at the farm.
Banford was quite charmed by him.  He was so soft and courteous in
speech, not wanting to say much himself, preferring to hear what
she had to say, and to laugh in his quick, half-mocking way.  He
helped readily with the work - but not too much.  He loved to be out
alone with the gun in his hands, to watch, to see.  For his sharp-
eyed, impersonal curiosity was insatiable, and he was most free
when he was quite alone, half-hidden, watching.Particularly he watched March.  She was a strange character to him.
Her figure, like a graceful young man's, piqued him.  Her dark eyes
made something rise in his soul, with a curious elate excitement,
when he looked into them, an excitement he was afraid to let be
seen, it was so keen and secret.  And then her odd, shrewd speech
made him laugh outright.  He felt he must go further, he was
inevitably impelled.  But he put away the thought of her and went
off towards the wood's edge with the gun.The dusk was falling as he came home, and with the dusk, a fine,
late November rain.  He saw the fire-light leaping in the window of
the sitting-room, a leaping light in the little cluster of the dark
buildings.  And he thought to himself it would be a good thing to
have this place for his own.  And then the thought entered him
shrewdly:  Why not marry March?  He stood still in the middle of
the field for some moments, the dead rabbit hanging still in his
hand, arrested by this thought.  His mind waited in amazement - it
seemed to calculate - and then he smiled curiously to himself in
acquiescence.  Why not?  Why not indeed?  It was a good idea.  What
if it was rather ridiculous?  What did it matter?  What if she was
older than he?  It didn't matter.  When he thought of her dark,
startled, vulnerable eyes he smiled subtly to himself.  He was
older than she, really.  He was master of her.He scarcely admitted his intention even to himself.  He kept it as
a secret even from himself.  It was all too uncertain as yet.  He
would have to see how things went.  Yes, he would have to see how
things went.  If he wasn't careful, she would just simply mock at
the idea.  He knew, sly and subtle as he was, that if he went to
her plainly and said:  'Miss March, I love you and want you to
marry me,' her inevitable answer would be:  'Get out.  I don't want
any of that tomfoolery.'  This was her attitude to men and their
'tomfoolery'.  If he was not careful, she would turn round on him
with her savage, sardonic ridicule, and dismiss him from the farm
and from her own mind for ever.  He would have to go gently.  He
would have to catch her as you catch a deer or a woodcock when you
go out shooting.  It's no good walking out into the forest and
saying to the deer:  'Please fall to my gun.'  No, it is a slow,
subtle battle.  When you really go out to get a deer, you gather
yourself together, you coil yourself inside yourself, and you
advance secretly, before dawn, into the mountains.  It is not so
much what you do, when you go out hunting, as how you feel.  You
have to be subtle and cunning and absolutely fatally ready.  It
becomes like a fate.  Your own fate overtakes and determines the
fate of the deer you are hunting.  First of all, even before you
come in sight of your quarry, there is a strange battle, like
mesmerism.  Your own soul, as a hunter, has gone out to fasten on
the soul of the deer, even before you see any deer.  And the soul
of the deer fights to escape.  Even before the deer has any wind of
you, it is so.  It is a subtle, profound battle of wills which
takes place in the invisible.  And it is a battle never finished
till your bullet goes home.  When you are REALLY worked up to the
true pitch, and you come at last into range, you don't then aim as
you do when you are firing at a bottle.  It is your own WILL which
carries the bullet into the heart of your quarry.  The bullet's
flight home is a sheer projection of your own fate into the fate of
the deer.  It happens like a supreme wish, a supreme act of
volition, not as a dodge of cleverness.He was a huntsman in spirit, not a farmer, and not a soldier stuck
in a regiment.  And it was as a young hunter that he wanted to
bring down March as his quarry, to make her his wife.  So he
gathered himself subtly together, seemed to withdraw into a kind of
invisibility.  He was not quite sure how he would go on.  And March
was suspicious as a hare.  So he remained in appearance just the
nice, odd stranger-youth, staying for a fortnight on the place.He had been sawing logs for the fire in the afternoon.  Darkness
came very early.  It was still a cold, raw mist.  It was getting
almost too dark to see.  A pile of short sawed logs lay beside the
trestle.  March came to carry them indoors, or into the shed, as he
was busy sawing the last log.  He was working in his shirt-sleeves,
and did not notice her approach; she came unwillingly, as if shy.
He saw her stooping to the bright-ended logs, and he stopped
sawing.  A fire like lightning flew down his legs in the nerves.'March?' he said in his quiet, young voice.She looked up from the logs she was piling.'Yes!' she said.He looked down on her in the dusk.  He could see her not too
distinctly.'I wanted to ask you something,' he said.'Did you?  What was it?' she said.  Already the fright was in her
voice.  But she was too much mistress of herself.'Why' - his voice seemed to draw out soft and subtle, it penetrated
her nerves - 'why, what do you think it is?'She stood up, placed her hands on her hips, and stood looking at
him transfixed, without answering.  Again he burned with a sudden
power.'Well,' he said, and his voice was so soft it seemed rather like a
subtle touch, like the merest touch of a cat's paw, a feeling
rather than a sound.'  Well - I wanted to ask you to marry me.'March felt rather than heard him.  She was trying in vain to turn
aside her face.  A great relaxation seemed to have come over her.
She stood silent, her head slightly on one side.  He seemed to be
bending towards her, invisibly smiling.  It seemed to her fine
sparks came out of him.Then very suddenly she said:'Don't try any of your tomfoolery on me.'A quiver went over his nerves.  He had missed.  He waited a moment
to collect himself again.  Then he said, putting all the strange
softness into his voice, as if he were imperceptibly stroking her:'Why, it's not tomfoolery.  It's not tomfoolery.  I mean it.  I
mean it.  What makes you disbelieve me?'He sounded hurt.  And his voice had such a curious power over her;
making her feel loose and relaxed.  She struggled somewhere for her
own power.  She felt for a moment that she was lost - lost - lost.
The word seemed to rock in her as if she were dying.  Suddenly
again she spoke.'You don't know what you are talking about,' she said, in a brief
and transient stroke of scorn.  'What nonsense!  I'm old enough to
be your mother.''Yes, I do know what I'm talking about.  Yes, I do,' he persisted
softly, as if he were producing his voice in her blood.  'I know
quite well what I'm talking about.  You're not old enough to be my
mother.  That isn't true.  And what does it matter even if it was.
You can marry me whatever age we are.  What is age to me?  And what
is age to you!  Age is nothing.'A swoon went over her as he concluded.  He spoke rapidly - in the
rapid Cornish fashion - and his voice seemed to sound in her
somewhere where she was helpless against it.  'Age is nothing!'
The soft, heavy insistence of it made her sway dimly out there in
the darkness.  She could not answer.A great exultance leaped like fire over his limbs.  He felt he had
won.'I want to marry you, you see.  Why shouldn't I?' he proceeded,
soft and rapid.  He waited for her to answer.  In the dusk he saw
her almost phosphorescent.  Her eyelids were dropped, her face
half-averted and unconscious.  She seemed to be in his power.  But
he waited, watchful.  He dared not yet touch her.'Say then,' he said, 'say then you'll marry me.  Say - say!'  He was
softly insistent.'What?' she asked, faint, from a distance, like one in pain.  His
voice was now unthinkably near and soft.  He drew very near to her.'Say yes.''Oh, I can't,' she wailed helplessly, half-articulate, as if
semiconscious, and as if in pain, like one who dies.  'How can I?''You can,' he said softly, laying his hand gently on her shoulder
as she stood with her head averted and dropped, dazed.  'You can.
Yes, you can.  What makes you say you can't?  You can.  You can.'
And with awful softness he bent forward and just touched her neck
with his mouth and his chin.'Don't!' she cried, with a faint mad cry like hysteria, starting
away and facing round on him.  'What do you mean?'  But she had no
breath to speak with.  It was as if she was killed.'I mean what I say,' he persisted softly and cruelly.  'I want you
to marry me.  I want you to marry me.  You know that, now, don't
you?  You know that, now?  Don't you?  Don't you?''What?' she said.'Know,' he replied.'Yes,' she said.  'I know you say so.''And you know I mean it, don't you?''I know you say so.''You believe me?' he said.She was silent for some time.  Then she pursed her lips.'I don't know what I believe,' she said.'Are you out there?' came Banford's voice, calling from the house.'Yes, we're bringing in the logs,' he answered.'I thought you'd gone lost,' said Banford disconsolately.  'Hurry
up, do, and come and let's have tea.  The kettle's boiling.'He stooped at once to take an armful of little logs and carry them
into the kitchen, where they were piled in a corner.  March also
helped, filling her arms and carrying the logs on her breast as if
they were some heavy child.  The night had fallen cold.When the logs were all in, the two cleaned their boots noisily on
the scraper outside, then rubbed them on the mat.  March shut the
door and took off her old felt hat - her farm-girl hat.  Her thick,
crisp, black hair was loose, her face was pale and strained.  She
pushed back her hair vaguely and washed her hands.  Banford came
hurrying into the dimly-lighted kitchen, to take from the oven the
scones she was keeping hot.'Whatever have you been doing all this time?' she asked fretfully.
'I thought you were never coming in.  And it's ages since you
stopped sawing.  What were you doing out there?''Well,' said Henry, 'we had to stop that hole in the barn to keeps
the rats out.''Why, I could see you standing there in the shed.  I could see your
shirt-sleeves,' challenged Banford.'Yes, I was just putting the saw away.'They went in to tea.  March was quite mute.  Her face was pale and
strained and vague.  The youth, who always had the same ruddy,
self-contained look on his face, as though he were keeping himself
to himself, had come to tea in his shirt-sleeves as if he were at
home.  He bent over his plate as he ate his food.'Aren't you cold?' said Banford spitefully.  'In your shirtsleeves.'He looked up at her, with his chin near his plate, and his eyes
very clear, pellucid, and unwavering as he watched her.'No, I'm not cold,' he said with his usual soft courtesy.  'It's
much warmer in here than it is outside, you see.''I hope it is,' said Banford, feeling nettled by him.  He had a
strange, suave assurance and a wide-eyed bright look that got on
her nerves this evening.'But perhaps,' he said softly and courteously, 'you don't like me
coming to tea without my coat.  I forgot that.''Oh, I don't mind,' said Banford: although she DID.'I'll go and get it, shall I?' he said.March's dark eyes turned slowly down to him.'No, don't you bother,' she said in her queer, twanging tone.  'If
you feel all right as you are, stop as you are.'  She spoke with a
crude authority.'Yes,' said he, 'I FEEL all right, if I'm not rude.''It's usually considered rude,' said Banford.  'But we don't mind.''Go along, &quot;considered rude&quot;,' ejaculated March.  'Who considers it
rude?''Why, you do, Nellie, in anybody else,' said Banford, bridling a
little behind her spectacles, and feeling her food stick in her
throat.But March had again gone vague and unheeding, chewing her food as
if she did not know she was eating at all.  And the youth looked
from one to another, with bright, watching eyes.Banford was offended.  For all his suave courtesy and soft voice,
the youth seemed to her impudent.  She did not like to look at him.
She did not like to meet his clear, watchful eyes, she did not like
to see the strange glow in his face, his cheeks with their delicate
fine hair, and his ruddy skin that was quite dull and yet which
seemed to burn with a curious heat of life.  It made her feel a
little ill to look at him: the quality of his physical presence was
too penetrating, too hot.After tea the evening was very quiet.  The youth rarely went into
the village.  As a rule, he read: he was a great reader, in his own
hours.  That is, when he did begin, he read absorbedly.  But he was
not very eager to begin.  Often he walked about the fields and
along the hedges alone in the dark at night, prowling with a queer
instinct for the night, and listening to the wild sounds.Tonight, however, he took a Captain Mayne Reid book from Banford's
shelf and sat down with knees wide apart and immersed himself in
his story.  His brownish fair hair was long, and lay on his head
like a thick cap, combed sideways.  He was still in his shirt-
sleeves, and bending forward under the lamplight, with his knees
stuck wide apart and the book in his hand and his whole figure
absorbed in the rather strenuous business of reading, he gave
Banford's sitting-room the look of a lumber-camp.  She resented
this.  For on her sitting-room floor she had a red Turkey rug and
dark stain round, the fire-place had fashionable green tiles, the
piano stood open with the latest dance music: she played quite
well: and on the walls were March's hand-painted swans and water-
lilies.  Moreover, with the logs nicely, tremulously burning in the
grate, the thick curtains drawn, the doors all shut, and the pine
trees hissing and shuddering in the wind outside, it was cosy, it
was refined and nice.  She resented the big, raw, long-legged youth
sticking his khaki knees out and sitting there with his soldier's
shirt-cuffs buttoned on his thick red wrists.  From time to time he
turned a page, and from time to time he gave a sharp look at the
fire, settling the logs.  Then he immersed himself again in the
intense and isolated business of reading.March, on the far side of the table, was spasmodically crocheting.
Her mouth was pursed in an odd way, as when she had dreamed the
fox's brush burned it, her beautiful, crisp black hair strayed in
wisps.  But her whole figure was absorbed in its bearing, as if she
herself was miles away.  In a sort of semi-dream she seemed to be
hearing the fox singing round the house in the wind, singing wildly
and sweetly and like a madness.  With red but well-shaped hands she
slowly crocheted the white cotton, very slowly, awkwardly.Banford was also trying to read, sitting in her low chair.  But
between those two she felt fidgety.  She kept moving and looking
round and listening to the wind, and glancing secretly from one to
the other of her companions.  March, seated on a straight chair,
with her knees in their close breeches crossed, and slowly,
laboriously crocheting, was also a trial.'Oh dear!' said Banford, 'My eyes are bad tonight.'  And she
pressed her fingers on her eyes.The youth looked up at her with his clear, bright look, but did not
speak.'Are they, Jill?' said March absently.Then the youth began to read again, and Banford perforce returned
to her book.  But she could not keep still.  After a while she
looked up at March, and a queer, almost malignant little smile was
on her thin face.'A penny for them, Nell,' she said suddenly.March looked round with big, startled black eyes, and went pale as
if with terror.  She had been listening to the fox singing so
tenderly, so tenderly, as he wandered round the house.'What?' she said vaguely.'A penny for them,' said Banford sarcastically.  'Or twopence, if
they're as deep as all that.'The youth was watching with bright, clear eyes from beneath the
lamp.'Why,' came March's vague voice, 'what do you want to waste your
money for?''I thought it would be well spent,' said Banford.'I wasn't thinking of anything except the way the wind was
blowing,' said March.'Oh dear,' replied Banford, 'I could have had as original thought
as that myself.  I'm afraid I HAVE wasted my money this time.''Well, you needn't pay,' said March.The youth suddenly laughed.  Both women looked at him: March rather
surprised-looking, as if she had hardly known he was there.'Why, do you ever pay up on these occasions?' he asked.'Oh yes,' said Banford.  'We always do.  I've sometimes had to pass
a shilling a week to Nellie, in the winter-time.  It costs much
less in summer.''What, paying for each other's thoughts?' he laughed.'Yes, when we've absolutely come to the end of everything else.'He laughed quickly, wrinkling his nose sharply like a puppy and
laughing with quick pleasure, his eyes shining.'It's the first time I ever heard of that,' he said.'I guess you'd hear of it often enough if you stayed a winter on
Bailey Farm,' said Banford lamentably.'Do you get so tired, then?' he asked.'So bored,' said Banford.'Oh!' he said gravely.  'But why should you be bored?''Who wouldn't be bored?' said Banford.'I'm sorry to hear that,' he said gravely.'You must be, if you were hoping to have a lively time here,' said
Banford.He looked at her long and gravely.'Well,' he said, with his odd, young seriousness, 'it's quite
lively enough for me.''I'm glad to hear it,' said Banford.And she returned to her book.  In her thin, frail hair were already
many threads of grey, though she was not yet thirty.  The boy did
not look down, but turned his eyes to March, who was sitting with
pursed mouth laboriously crocheting, her eyes wide and absent.  She
had a warm, pale, fine skin and a delicate nose.  Her pursed mouth
looked shrewish.  But the shrewish look was contradicted by the
curious lifted arch of her dark brows, and the wideness of her
eyes; a look of startled wonder and vagueness.  She was listening
again for the fox, who seemed to have wandered farther off into the
night.From under the edge of the lamp-light the boy sat with his face
looking up, watching her silently, his eyes round and very clear
and intent.  Banford, biting her fingers irritably, was glancing at
him under her hair.  He sat there perfectly still, his ruddy face
tilted up from the low level under the light, on the edge of the
dimness, and watching with perfect abstract intentness.  March
suddenly lifted her great, dark eyes from her crocheting and saw
him.  She started, giving a little exclamation.'There he is!' she cried involuntarily, as if terribly startled.Banford looked round in amazement, sitting up straight.'Whatever has got you, Nellie?' she cried.But March, her face flushed a delicate rose colour, was looking
away to the door.'Nothing!  Nothing!' she said crossly.  'Can't one speak?''Yes, if you speak sensibly,' said Banford.  'What ever did you
mean?''I don't know what I meant,' cried March testilyOh, Nellie, I hope you aren't going jumpy and nervy.  I feel I
can't stand another THING!  Whoever did you mean?  Did you mean
Henry?' cried poor, frightened Banford.'Yes.  I suppose so,' said March laconically.  She would never
confess to the fox.'Oh dear, my nerves are all gone for tonight,' wailed Banford.At nine o'clock March brought in a tray with bread and cheese and
tea - Henry had confessed that he liked a cup of tea.  Banford drank
a glass of milk and ate a little bread.  And soon she said:'I'm going to bed, Nellie, I'm all nerves tonight.  Are you
coming?''Yes, I'm coming the minute I've taken the tray away,' said March.'Don't be long then,' said Banford fretfully.  'Good-night, Henry.
You'll see the fire is safe, if you come up last, won't you?''Yes, Miss Banford, I'll see it's safe,' he replied in his
reassuring way.March was lighting the candle to go to the kitchen.  Banford took
her candle and went upstairs.  When March came back to the fire,
she said to him:'I suppose we can trust you to put out the fire and everything?'
She stood there with her hand on her hip, and one knee loose, her
head averted shyly, as if she could not look at him.  He had his
face lifted, watching her.'Come and sit down a minute,' he said softly.'No, I'll be going.  Jill will be waiting, and she'll get upset, if
I don't come.''What made you jump like that this evening?' he asked.'When did I jump?' she retorted, looking at him.'Why, just now you did,' he said.  'When you cried out.''Oh!' she said.  'Then! - Why, I thought you were the fox!'  And her
face screwed into a queer smile, half-ironic.'The fox!  Why the fox?' he asked softly.'Why, one evening last summer when I was out with the gun I saw the
fox in the grass nearly at my feet, looking straight up at me.  I
don't know - I suppose he made an impression on me.'  She turned
aside her head again and let one foot stray loose, self-
consciously.'And did you shoot him?' asked the boy.'No, he gave me such a start, staring straight at me as he did, and
then stopping to look back at me over his shoulder with a laugh on
his face.''A laugh on his face!' repeated Henry, also laughing.  'He
frightened you, did he?''No, he didn't frighten me.  He made an impression on me, that's
all.''And you thought I was the fox, did you?' he laughed, with the same
queer, quick little laugh, like a puppy wrinkling his nose.'Yes, I did, for the moment,' she said.  'Perhaps he'd been in my
mind without my knowing.''Perhaps you think I've come to steal your chickens or something,'
he said, with the same young laugh.But she only looked at him with a wide, dark, vacant eye.'It's the first time,' he said, 'that I've ever been taken for a
fox.  Won't you sit down for a minute?'  His voice was very soft
and cajoling.'No,' she said.  'Jill will be waiting.'  But still she did not go,
but stood with one foot loose and her face turned aside, just
outside the circle of light.'But won't you answer my question?' he said, lowering his voice
still more.'I don't know what question you mean.''Yes, you do.  Of course you do.  I mean the question of you
marrying me.''No, I shan't answer that question,' she said flatly.'Won't you?'  The queer, young laugh came on his nose again.  'Is
it because I'm like the fox?  Is that why?'  And still he laughed.She turned and looked at him with a long, slow look.'I wouldn't let that put you against me,' he said.  'Let me turn
the lamp low, and come and sit down a minute.'He put his red hand under the glow of the lamp and suddenly made
the light very dim.  March stood there in the dimness quite
shadowy, but unmoving.  He rose silently to his feet, on his long
legs.  And now his voice was extraordinarily soft and suggestive,
hardly audible.'You'll stay a moment,' he said.  'Just a moment.'  And he put his
hand on her shoulder.  She turned her face from him.  'I'm sure you
don't really think I'm like the fox,' he said, with the same
softness and with a suggestion of laughter in his tone, a subtle
mockery.  'Do you now?'  And he drew her gently towards him and
kissed her neck, softly.  She winced and trembled and hung away.
But his strong, young arm held her, and he kissed her softly again,
still on the neck, for her face was averted.'Won't you answer my question?  Won't you now?' came his soft,
lingering voice.  He was trying to draw her near to kiss her face.
And he kissed her cheek softly, near the ear.At that moment Banford's voice was heard calling fretfully, crossly
from upstairs.'There's Jill!' cried March, starting and drawing erect.And as she did so, quick as lightning he kissed her on the mouth,
with a quick, brushing kiss.  It seemed to burn through her every
fibre.  She gave a queer little cry.'You will, won't you?  You will?' he insisted softly.'Nellie!  NELLIE!  What ever are you so long for?' came Banford's
faint cry from the outer darkness.But he held her fast, and was murmuring with that intolerable
softness and insistency:'You will, won't you?  Say yes!  Say yes!'March, who felt as if the fire had gone through her and scathed
her, and as if she could do no more, murmured:'Yes!  Yes!  Anything you like!  Anything you like!  Only let me
go!  Only let me go!  Jill's calling.''You know you've promised,' he said insidiously.'Yes!  Yes!  I do!'  Her voice suddenly rose into a shrill cry.
'All right, Jill, I'm coming.'Startled, he let her go, and she went straight upstairs.In the morning at breakfast, after he had looked round the place
and attended to the stock and thought to himself that one could
live easily enough here, he said to Banford:'Do you know what, Miss Banford?''Well, what?' said the good-natured, nervy Banford.He looked at March, who was spreading jam on her bread.'Shall I tell?' he said to her.She looked up at him, and a deep pink colour flushed over her face.'Yes, if you mean Jill,' she said.  'I hope you won't go talking
all over the village, that's all.'  And she swallowed her dry bread
with difficulty.'Whatever's coming?' said Banford, looking up with wide, tired,
slightly reddened eyes.  She was a thin, frail little thing, and
her hair, which was delicate and thin, was bobbed, so it hung
softly by her worn face in its faded brown and grey.'Why, what do you think?' he said, smiling like one who has a
secret.'How do I know!' said Banford.'Can't you guess?' he said, making bright eyes and smiling, pleased
with himself.'I'm sure I can't.  What's more, I'm not going to try.''Nellie and I are going to be married.'Banford put down her knife out of her thin, delicate fingers, as if
she would never take it up to eat any more.  She stared with blank,
reddened eyes.'You what?' she exclaimed.'We're going to get married.  Aren't we, Nellie?' and he turned to
March.'You say so, anyway,' said March laconically.  But again she
flushed with an agonized flush.  She, too, could swallow no more.Banford looked at her like a bird that has been shot: a poor,
little sick bird.  She gazed at her with all her wounded soul in
her face, at the deep-flushed March.'Never!' she exclaimed, helpless.'It's quite right,' said the bright and gloating youth.Banford turned aside her face, as if the sight of the food on the
table made her sick.  She sat like this for some moments, as if she
were sick.  Then, with one hand on the edge of the table, she rose
to her feet.'I'll NEVER believe it, Nellie,' she cried.  'It's absolutely
impossible!'Her plaintive, fretful voice had a thread of hot anger and despair.'Why?  Why shouldn't you believe it?' asked the youth, with all his
soft, velvety impertinence in his voice.Banford looked at him from her wide, vague eyes, as if he were some
creature in a museum.'Oh,' she said languidly, 'because she can never be such a fool.
She can't lose her self-respect to such an extent.'  Her voice was
cold and plaintive, drifting.'In what way will she lose her self-respect?' asked the boy.Banford looked at him with vague fixity from behind her spectacles.'If she hasn't lost it already,' she said.He became very red, vermilion, under the slow, vague stare from
behind the spectacles.'I don't see it at all,' he said.'Probably you don't.  I shouldn't expect you would,' said Banford,
with that straying, mild tone of remoteness which made her words
even more insulting.He sat stiff in his chair, staring with hot, blue eyes from his
scarlet face.  An ugly look had come on his brow.'My word, she doesn't know what she's letting herself in for,' said
Banford, in her plaintive, drifting, insulting voice.'What has it got to do with you, anyway?' said the youth, in a
temper.'More than it has to do with you, probably,' she replied, plaintive
and venomous.'Oh, has it!  I don't see that at all,' he jerked out.'No, you wouldn't,' she answered, drifting.'Anyhow,' said March, pushing back her hair and rising uncouthly.
'It's no good arguing about it.'  And she seized the bread and the
tea-pot and strode away to the kitchen.Banford let her fingers stray across her brow and along her hair,
like one bemused.  Then she turned and went away upstairs.Henry sat stiff and sulky in his chair, with his face and his eyes
on fire.  March came and went, clearing the table.  But Henry sat
on, stiff with temper.  He took no notice of her.  She had regained
her composure and her soft, even, creamy complexion.  But her mouth
was pursed up.  She glanced at him each time as she came to take
things from the table, glanced from her large, curious eyes, more
in curiosity than anything.  Such a long, red-faced, sulky boy!
That was all he was.  He seemed as remote from her as if his red
face were a red chimney-pot on a cottage across the fields, and she
looked at him just as objectively, as remotely.At length he got up and stalked out into the fields with the gun.
He came in only at dinner-time, with the devil still in his face,
but his manners quite polite.  Nobody said anything particular;
they sat each one at the sharp corner of a triangle, in obstinate
remoteness.  In the afternoon he went out again at once with the
gun.  He came in at nightfall with a rabbit and a pigeon.  He
stayed in all the evening, but hardly opened his mouth.  He was in
the devil of a temper, feeling he had been insulted.Banford's eyes were red, she had evidently been crying.  But her
manner was more remote and supercilious than ever; the way she
turned her head if he spoke at all, as if he were some tramp or
inferior intruder of that sort, made his blue eyes go almost black
with rage.  His face looked sulkier.  But he never forgot his
polite intonation, if he opened his mouth to speak.  March seemed
to flourish in this atmosphere.  She seemed to sit between the two
antagonists with a little wicked smile on her face, enjoying
herself.  There was even a sort of complacency in the way she
laboriously crocheted this evening.When he was in bed, the youth could hear the two women talking and
arguing in their room.  He sat up in bed and strained his ears to
hear what they said.  But he could hear nothing, it was too far
off.  Yet he could hear the soft, plaintive drip of Banford's
voice, and March's deeper note.The night was quiet, frosty.  Big stars were snapping outside,
beyond the ridge-tops of the pine trees.  He listened and listened.
In the distance he heard a fox yelping: and the dogs from the farms
barking in answer.  But it was not that he wanted to hear.  It was
what the two women were saying.He got stealthily out of bed and stood by his door.  He could hear
no more than before.  Very, very carefully he began to lift the
door latch.  After quite a time he had his door open.  Then he
stepped stealthily out into the passage.  The old oak planks were
cold under his feet, and they creaked preposterously.  He crept
very, very gently up the one step, and along by the wall, till he
stood outside their door.  And there he held his breath and
listened.  Banford's voice:'No, I simply couldn't stand it.  I should be dead in a month.
Which is just what he would be aiming at, of course.  That would
just be his game, to see me in the churchyard.  No, Nellie, if you
were to do such a thing as to marry him, you could never stop here.
I couldn't, I couldn't live in the same house with him.  Oh! - oh! I
feel quite sick with the smell of his clothes.  And his red face
simply turns me over.  I can't eat my food when he's at the table.
What a fool I was ever to let him stop.  One ought NEVER to try to
do a kind action.  It always flies back in your face like a
boomerang.''Well, he's only got two more days,' said March.'Yes, thank heaven.  And when he's gone he'll never come in this
house again.  I feel so bad while he's here.  And I know, I know
he's only counting what he can get out of you.  I KNOW that's all
it is.  He's just a good-for-nothing, who doesn't want to work, and
who thinks he'll live on us.  But he won't live on me.  If you're
such a fool, then it's your own lookout.  Mrs Burgess knew him all
the time he was here.  And the old man could never get him to do
any steady work.  He was off with the gun on every occasion, just
as he is now.  Nothing but the gun!  Oh, I do hate it.  You don't
know what you're doing, Nellie, you don't.  If you marry him he'll
just make a fool of you.  He'll go off and leave you stranded.  I
know he will, if he can't get Bailey Farm out of us - and he's not
going to, while I live.  While I live he's never going to set foot
here.  I know what it would be.  He'd soon think he was master of
both of us, as he thinks he's master of you already.''But he isn't,' said Nellie.'He thinks he is, anyway.  And that's what he wants: to come and be
master here.  Yes, imagine it!  That's what we've got the place
together for, is it, to be bossed and bullied by a hateful, red-
faced boy, a beastly labourer.  Oh, we DID make a mistake when we
let him stop.  We ought never to have lowered ourselves.  And I've
had such a fight with all the people here, not to be pulled down to
their level.  No, he's not coming here.  And then you see - if he
can't have the place, he'll run off to Canada or somewhere again,
as if he'd never known you.  And here you'll be, absolutely ruined
and made a fool of.  I know I shall never have any peace of mind
again.''We'll tell him he can't come here.  We'll tell him that,' said
March.'Oh, don't you bother; I'm going to tell him that, and other things
as well, before he goes.  He's not going to have all his own way
while I've got the strength left to speak.  Oh, Nellie, he'll
despise you, he'll despise you, like the awful little beast he is,
if you give way to him.  I'd no more trust him than I'd trust a cat
not to steal.  He's deep, he's deep, and he's bossy, and he's
selfish through and through, as cold as ice.  All he wants is to
make use of you.  And when you're no more use to him, then I pity
you.''I don't think he's as bad as all that,' said March.'No, because he's been playing up to you.  But you'll find out, if
you see much of him.  Oh, Nellie, I can't bear to think of it.''Well, it won't hurt you, Jill, darling.''Won't it!  Won't it!  I shall never know a moment's peace again
while I live, nor a moment's happiness.  No, Nellie - ' and Banford
began to weep bitterly.The boy outside could hear the stifled sound of the woman's
sobbing, and could hear March's soft, deep, tender voice
comforting, with wonderful gentleness and tenderness, the weeping
woman.His eyes were so round and wide that he seemed to see the whole
night, and his ears were almost jumping off his head.  He was
frozen stiff.  He crept back to bed, but felt as if the top of his
head were coming off.  He could not sleep.  He could not keep
still.  He rose, quietly dressed himself, and crept out on to the
landing once more.  The women were silent.  He went softly
downstairs and out to the kitchen.Then he put on his boots and his overcoat and took the gun.  He did
not think to go away from the farm.  No, he only took the gun.  As
softly as possible he unfastened the door and went out into the
frosty December night.  The air was still, the stars bright, the
pine trees seemed to bristle audibly in the sky.  He went
stealthily away down a fence-side, looking for something to shoot.
At the same time he remembered that he ought not to shoot and
frighten the women.So he prowled round the edge of the gorse cover, and through the
grove of tall old hollies, to the woodside.  There he skirted the
fence, peering through the darkness with dilated eyes that seemed
to be able to grow black and full of sight in the dark, like a
cat's.  An owl was slowly and mournfully whooing round a great oak
tree.  He stepped stealthily with his gun, listening, listening,
watching.As he stood under the oaks of the wood-edge he heard the dogs from
the neighbouring cottage up the hill yelling suddenly and
startlingly, and the wakened dogs from the farms around barking
answer.  And suddenly it seemed to him England was little and
tight, he felt the landscape was constricted even in the dark, and
that there were too many dogs in the night, making a noise like a
fence of sound, like the network of English hedges netting the
view.  He felt the fox didn't have a chance.  For it must be the
fox that had started all this hullabaloo.Why not watch for him, anyhow!  He would, no doubt, be coming
sniffing round.  The lad walked downhill to where the farmstead
with its few pine trees crouched blackly.  In the angle of the long
shed, in the black dark, he crouched down.  He knew the fox would
be coming.  It seemed to him it would be the last of the foxes in
this loudly-barking, thick-voiced England, tight with innumerable
little houses.He sat a long time with his eyes fixed unchanging upon the open
gateway, where a little light seemed to fall from the stars or from
the horizon, who knows.  He was sitting on a log in a dark corner
with the gun across his knees.  The pine trees snapped.  Once a
chicken fell off its perch in the barn with a loud crawk and cackle
and commotion that startled him, and he stood up, watching with all
his eyes, thinking it might be a rat.  But he FELT it was nothing.
So he sat down again with the gun on his knees and his hands tucked
in to keep them warm, and his eyes fixed unblinking on the pale
reach of the open gateway.  He felt he could smell the hot, sickly,
rich smell of live chickens on the cold air.And then - a shadow.  A sliding shadow in the gateway.  He gathered
all his vision into a concentrated spark, and saw the shadow of the
fox, the fox creeping on his belly through the gate.  There he
went, on his belly like a snake.  The boy smiled to himself and
brought the gun to his shoulder.  He knew quite well what would
happen.  He knew the fox would go to where the fowl door was
boarded up and sniff there.  He knew he would lie there for a
minute, sniffing the fowls within.  And then he would start again
prowling under the edge of the old barn, waiting to get in.The fowl door was at the top of a slight incline.  Soft, soft as a
shadow the fox slid up this incline, and crouched with his nose to
the boards.  And at the same moment there was the awful crash of a
gun reverberating between the old buildings, as if all the night
had gone smash.  But the boy watched keenly.  He saw even the white
belly of the fox as the beast beat his paws in death.  So he went
forward.There was a commotion everywhere.  The fowls were scuffling and
crawking, the ducks were quark-quarking, the pony had stamped
wildly to his feet.  But the fox was on his side, struggling in his
last tremors.  The boy bent over him and smelt his foxy smell.There was a sound of a window opening upstairs, then March's voice
calling:'Who is it?''It's me,' said Henry; 'I've shot the fox.''Oh, goodness!  You nearly frightened us to death.''Did I?  I'm awfully sorry.''Whatever made you get up?''I heard him about.''And have you shot him?''Yes, he's here,' and the boy stood in the yard holding up the
warm, dead brute.  'You can't see, can you?  Wait a minute.'  And
he took his flash-light from his pocket and flashed it on to the
dead animal.  He was holding it by the brush.  March saw, in the
middle of the darkness, just the reddish fleece and the white belly
and the white underneath of the pointed chin, and the queer,
dangling paws.  She did not know what to say.'He's a beauty,' he said.  'He will make you a lovely fur.''You don't catch me wearing a fox fur,' she replied.'Oh!' he said.  And he switched off the light.'Well, I should think you'll come in and go to bed again now,' she
said.'Probably I shall.  What time is it?''What time is it, Jill?' called March's voice.  It was a quarter to
one.That night March had another dream.  She dreamed that Banford was
dead, and that she, March, was sobbing her heart out.  Then she had
to put Banford into her coffin.  And the coffin was the rough wood-
box in which the bits of chopped wood were kept in the kitchen, by
the fire.  This was the coffin, and there was no other, and March
was in agony and dazed bewilderment, looking for something to line
the box with, something to make it soft with, something to cover up
the poor, dead darling.  Because she couldn't lay her in there just
in her white, thin nightdress, in the horrible wood-box.  So she
hunted and hunted, and picked up thing after thing, and threw it
aside in the agony of dream-frustration.  And in her dream-despair
all she could find that would do was a fox-skin.  She knew that it
wasn't right, that this was not what she should have.  But it was
all she could find.  And so she folded the brush of the fox, and
laid her darling Jill's head on this, and she brought round the
skin of the fox and laid it on the top of the body, so that it
seemed to make a whole ruddy, fiery coverlet, and she cried and
cried, and woke to find the tears streaming down her face.The first thing that both she and Banford did in the morning was to
go out to see the fox.  Henry had hung it up by the heels in the
shed, with its poor brush falling backwards.  It was a lovely dog-
fox in its prime, with a handsome, thick, winter coat: a lovely
golden-red colour, with grey as it passed to the belly, and belly
all white, and a great full brush with a delicate black and grey
and pure white tip.'Poor brute!' said Banford.  'If it wasn't such a thieving wretch,
you'd feel sorry for it.'March said nothing, but stood with her foot trailing aside, one hip
out; her face was pale and her eyes big and black, watching the
dead animal that was suspended upside down.  White and soft as snow
his belly: white and soft as snow.  She passed her hand softly down
it.  And his wonderful black-glinted brush was full and frictional,
wonderful.  She passed her hand down this also, and quivered.  Time
after time she took the full fur of that thick tail between her
fingers, and passed her hand slowly downwards.  Wonderful, sharp,
thick, splendour of a tail.  And he was dead!  She pursed her lips,
and her eyes went black and vacant.  Then she took the head in her
hand.Henry was sauntering up, so Banford walked rather pointedly away.
March stood there bemused, with the head of the fox in her hand.
She was wondering, wondering, wondering over his long, fine muzzle.
For some reason it reminded her of a spoon or a spatula.  She felt
she could not understand it.  The beast was a strange beast to her,
incomprehensible, out of her range.  Wonderful silver whiskers he
had, like ice-threads.  And pricked ears with hair inside.  But
that long, long, slender spoon of a nose! - and the marvellous white
teeth beneath!  It was to thrust forward and bite with, deep, deep,
deep into the living prey, to bite and bite the blood.'He's a beauty, isn't he?' said Henry, standing by.'Oh yes, he's a fine big fox.  I wonder how many chickens he's
responsible for,' she replied.'A good many.  Do you think he's the same one you saw in the
summer?''I should think very likely he is,' she replied.He watched her, but he could make nothing of her.  Partly she was
so shy and virgin, and partly she was so grim, matter-of-fact,
shrewish.  What she said seemed to him so different from the look
of her big, queer, dark eyes.'Are you going to skin him?' she asked.'Yes, when I've had breakfast, and got a board to peg him on.''My word, what a strong smell he's got!  Pooo!  It'll take some
washing off one's hands.  I don't know why I was so silly as to
handle him.'  And she looked at her right hand, that had passed
down his belly and along his tail, and had even got a tiny streak
of blood from one dark place in his fur.'Have you seen the chickens when they smell him, how frightened
they are?' he said.'Yes, aren't they!''You must mind you don't get some of his fleas.''Oh, fleas!' she replied, nonchalant.Later in the day she saw the fox's skin nailed flat on a board, as
if crucified.  It gave her an uneasy feeling.The boy was angry.  He went about with his mouth shut, as if he had
swallowed part of his chin.  But in behaviour he was polite and
affable.  He did not say anything about his intention.  And he left
March alone.That evening they sat in the dining-room.  Banford wouldn't have
him in her sitting-room any more.  There was a very big log on the
fire.  And everybody was busy.  Banford had letters to write.
March was sewing a dress, and he was mending some little
contrivance.Banford stopped her letter-writing from time to time to look round
and rest her eyes.  The boy had his head down, his face hidden over
his job.'Let's see,' said Banford.  'What train do you go by, Henry?'He looked up straight at her.'The morning train.  In the morning,' he said.'What, the eight-ten or the eleven-twenty?''The eleven-twenty, I suppose,' he said.'That is the day after tomorrow?' said Banford.'Yes, the day after tomorrow.''Mm!' murmured Banford, and she returned to her writing.  But as
she was licking her envelope, she asked:'And what plans have you made for the future, if I may ask?''Plans?' he said, his face very bright and angry.'I mean about you and Nellie, if you are going on with this
business.  When do you expect the wedding to come off?'  She spoke
in a jeering tone.'Oh, the wedding!' he replied.  'I don't know.''Don't you know anything?' said Banford.  'Are you going to clear
out on Friday and leave things no more settled than they are?''Well, why shouldn't I?  We can always write letters.''Yes, of course you can.  But I wanted to know because of this
place.  If Nellie is going to get married all of a sudden, I shall
have to be looking round for a new partner.''Couldn't she stay on here if she were married?' he said.  He knew
quite well what was coming.'Oh,' said Banford, 'this is no place for a married couple.
There's not enough work to keep a man going, for one thing.  And
there's no money to be made.  It's quite useless your thinking of
staying on here if you marry.  Absolutely!''Yes, but I wasn't thinking of staying on here,' he said.'Well, that's what I want to know.  And what about Nellie, then?
How long is SHE going to be here with me, in that case?'The two antagonists looked at one another.'That I can't say,' he answered.'Oh, go along,' she cried petulantly.  'You must have some idea
what you are going to do, if you ask a woman to marry you.  Unless
it's all a hoax.''Why should it be a hoax?  I am going back to Canada.''And taking her with you?''Yes, certainly.''You hear that, Nellie?' said Banford.March, who had had her head bent over her sewing, now looked up
with a sharp, pink blush on her face, and a queer, sardonic laugh
in her eyes and on her twisted mouth.'That's the first time I've heard that I was going to Canada,' she
said.'Well, you have to hear it for the first time, haven't you?' said
the boy.'Yes, I suppose I have,' she said nonchalantly.  And she went back
to her sewing.'You're quite ready, are you, to go to Canada?  Are you, Nellie?'
asked Banford.March looked up again.  She let her shoulders go slack, and let her
hand that held the needle lie loose in her lap.'It depends on HOW I'm going,' she said.  'I don't think I want to
go jammed up in the steerage, as a soldier's wife.  I'm afraid I'm
not used to that way.'The boy watched her with bright eyes.'Would you rather stay over here while I go first?' he asked.'I would, if that's the only alternative,' she replied.'That's much the wisest.  Don't make it any fixed engagement,' said
Banford.  'Leave yourself free to go or not after he's got back and
found you a place, Nellie.  Anything else is madness, madness.''Don't you think,' said the youth, 'we ought to get married before
I go - and then go together, or separate, according to how it
happens?''I think it's a terrible idea,' cried Banford.But the boy was watching March.'What do you think?' he asked her.She let her eyes stray vaguely into space.'Well, I don't know,' she said.  'I shall have to think about it.''Why?' he asked pertinently.'Why?'  She repeated his question in a mocking way and looked at
him laughing, though her face was pink again.  'I should think
there's plenty of reasons why.'He watched her in silence.  She seemed to have escaped him.  She
had got into league with Banford against him.  There was again the
queer, sardonic look about her; she would mock stoically at
everything he said or which life offered.'Of course,' he said, 'I don't want to press you to do anything you
don't wish to do.''I should think not, indeed,' cried Banford indignantly.At bed-time Banford said plaintively to March:'You take my hot bottle up for me, Nellie, will you?''Yes, I'll do it,' said March, with the kind of willing
unwillingness she so often showed towards her beloved but uncertain
Jill.The two women went upstairs.  After a time March called from the
top of the stairs:  'Good-night, Henry.  I shan't be coming down.
You'll see to the lamp and the fire, won't you?'The next day Henry went about with the cloud on his brow and his
young cub's face shut up tight.  He was cogitating all the time.
He had wanted March to marry him and go back to Canada with him.
And he had been sure she would do it.  Why he wanted her he didn't
know.  But he did want her.  He had set his mind on her.  And he
was convulsed with a youth's fury at being thwarted.  To be
thwarted, to be thwarted!  It made him so furious inside that he
did not know what to do with himself.  But he kept himself in hand.
Because even now things might turn out differently.  She might come
over to him.  Of course she might.  It was her business to do so.Things drew to a tension again towards evening.  He and Banford had
avoided each other all day.  In fact, Banford went in to the little
town by the 11.20 train.  It was market day.  She arrived back on
the 4.25.  Just as the night was falling Henry saw her little
figure in a dark-blue coat and a dark-blue tam-o'-shanter hat
crossing the first meadow from the station.  He stood under one of
the wild pear trees, with the old dead leaves round his feet.  And
he watched the little blue figure advancing persistently over the
rough winter-ragged meadow.  She had her arms full of parcels, and
advanced slowly, frail thing she was, but with that devilish little
certainty which he so detested in her.  He stood invisible under
the pear tree, watching her every step.And if looks could have affected her, she would have felt a log of
iron on each of her ankles as she made her way forward.  'You're a
nasty little thing, you are,' he was saying softly, across the
distance.  'You're a nasty little thing.  I hope you'll be paid
back for all the harm you've done me for nothing.  I hope you will - 
you nasty little thing.  I hope you'll have to pay for it.  You
will, if wishes are anything.  You nasty little creature that you
are.'She was toiling slowly up the slope.  But if she had been slipping
back at every step towards the Bottomless Pit, he would not have
gone to help her with her parcels.  Aha, there went March, striding
with her long, land stride in her breeches and her short tunic!
Striding downhill at a great pace, and even running a few steps now
and then, in her great solicitude and desire to come to the rescue
of the little Banford.  The boy watched her with rage in his heart.
See her leap a ditch, and run, run as if a house was on fire, just
to get to that creeping, dark little object down there!  So, the
Banford just stood still and waited.  And March strode up and took
ALL the parcels except a bunch of yellow chrysanthemums.  These the
Banford still carried - yellow chrysanthemums!'Yes, you look well, don't you?' he said softly into the dusk air.
'You look well, pottering up there with a bunch of flowers, you do.
I'd make you eat them for your tea if you hug them so tight.  And
I'd give them you for breakfast again, I would.  I'd give you
flowers.  Nothing but flowers.'He watched the progress of the two women.  He could hear their
voices: March always outspoken and rather scolding in her
tenderness, Banford murmuring rather vaguely.  They were evidently
good friends.  He could not hear what they said till they came to
the fence of the home meadow, which they must climb.  Then he saw
March manfully climbing over the bars with all her packages in her
arms, and on the still air he heard Banford's fretful:'Why don't you let me help you with the parcels?'  She had a queer,
plaintive hitch in her voice.  Then came March's robust and
reckless:'Oh, I can manage.  Don't you bother about me.  You've all you can
do to get yourself over.''Yes, that's all very well,' said Banford fretfully.  'You say,
Don't you bother about me, and then all the while you feel injured
because nobody thinks of you.''When do I feel injured?' said March.'Always.  You always feel injured.  Now you're feeling injured
because I won't have that boy to come and live on the farm.''I'm not feeling injured at all,' said March.  'I know you are.
When he's gone you'll sulk over it.  I know you will.''Shall I?' said March.  'We'll see.''Yes, we SHALL see, unfortunately.  I can't think how you can make
yourself so cheap.  I can't IMAGINE how you can lower yourself like
it.''I haven't lowered myself,' said March.'I don't know what you call it, then.  Letting a boy like that come
so cheeky and impudent and make a mug of you.  I don't know what
you think of yourself.  How much respect do you think he's going to
have for you afterwards?  My word, I wouldn't be in your shoes, if
you married him.''Of course you wouldn't.  My boots are a good bit too big for you,
and not half dainty enough,' said March, with rather a misfire
sarcasm.'I thought you had too much pride, really I did.  A woman's got to
hold herself high, especially with a youth like that.  Why, he's
impudent.  Even the way he forced himself on us at the start.''We asked him to stay,' said March.'Not till he'd almost forced us to.  And then he's so cocky and
self-assured.  My word, he puts my back up.  I simply can't imagine
how you can let him treat you so cheaply.''I don't let him treat me cheaply,' said March.  'Don't you worry
yourself, nobody's going to treat me cheaply.  And even you aren't,
either.'  She had a tender defiance and a certain fire in her
voice.'Yes, it's sure to come back to me,' said Banford bitterly.
'That's always the end of it.  I believe you only do it to spite
me.'They went now in silence up the steep, grassy slope and over the
brow, through the gorse bushes.  On the other side of the hedge the
boy followed in the dusk, at some little distance.  Now and then,
through the huge ancient hedge of hawthorn, risen into trees, he
saw the two dark figures creeping up the hill.  As he came to the
top of the slope he saw the homestead dark in the twilight, with a
huge old pear tree leaning from the near gable, and a little yellow
light twinkling in the small side windows of the kitchen.  He heard
the clink of the latch and saw the kitchen door open into light as
the two women went indoors.  So they were at home.And so! - this was what they thought of him.  It was rather in his
nature to be a listener, so he was not at all surprised whatever he
heard.  The things people said about him always missed him
personally.  He was only rather surprised at the women's way with
one another.  And he disliked the Banford with an acid dislike.
And he felt drawn to the March again.  He felt again irresistibly
drawn to her.  He felt there was a secret bond, a secret thread
between him and her, something very exclusive, which shut out
everybody else and made him and her possess each other in secret.He hoped again that she would have him.  He hoped with his blood
suddenly firing up that she would agree to marry him quite quickly:
at Christmas, very likely.  Christmas was not far off.  He wanted,
whatever else happened, to snatch her into a hasty marriage and a
consummation with him.  Then for the future, they could arrange
later.  But he hoped it would happen as he wanted it.  He hoped
that tonight she would stay a little while with him, after Banford
had gone upstairs.  He hoped he could touch her soft, creamy cheek,
her strange, frightened face.  He hoped he could look into her
dilated, frightened dark eyes, quite near.  He hoped he might even
put his hand on her bosom and feel her soft breasts under her
tunic.  His heart beat deep and powerful as he thought of that.  He
wanted very much to do so.  He wanted to make sure of her soft
woman's breasts under her tunic.  She always kept the brown linen
coat buttoned so close up to her throat.  It seemed to him like
some perilous secret, that her soft woman's breasts must be
buttoned up in that uniform.  It seemed to him, moreover, that they
were so much softer, tenderer, more lovely and lovable, shut up in
that tunic, than were the Banford's breasts, under her soft blouses
and chiffon dresses.  The Banford would have little iron breasts,
he said to himself.  For all her frailty and fretfulness and
delicacy, she would have tiny iron breasts.  But March, under her
crude, fast, workman's tunic, would have soft, white breasts, white
and unseen.  So he told himself, and his blood burned.When he went in to tea, he had a surprise.  He appeared at the
inner door, his face very ruddy and vivid and his blue eyes
shining, dropping his head forward as he came in, in his usual way,
and hesitating in the doorway to watch the inside of the room,
keenly and cautiously, before he entered.  He was wearing a long-
sleeved waistcoat.  His face seemed extraordinarily like a piece of
the out-of-doors come indoors: as holly-berries do.  In his second
of pause in the doorway he took in the two women sitting at table,
at opposite ends, saw them sharply.  And to his amazement March was
dressed in a dress of dull, green silk crape.  His mouth came open
in surprise.  If she had suddenly grown a moustache he could not
have been more surprised.'Why,' he said, 'do you wear a dress, then?'She looked up, flushing a deep rose colour, and twisting her mouth
with a smile, said:'Of course I do.  What else do you expect me to wear but a dress?''A land girl's uniform, of course,' said he.'Oh,' she cried, nonchalant, 'that's only for this dirty, mucky
work about here.''Isn't it your proper dress, then?' he said.'No, not indoors it isn't,' she said.  But she was blushing all the
time as she poured out his tea.  He sat down in his chair at table,
unable to take his eyes off her.  Her dress was a perfectly simple
slip of bluey-green crape, with a line of gold stitching round the
top and round the sleeves, which came to the elbow.  It was cut
just plain and round at the top, and showed her white, soft throat.
Her arms he knew, strong and firm muscled, for he had often seen
her with her sleeves rolled up.  But he looked her up and down, up
and down,Banford, at the other end of the table, said not a word, but
piggled with the sardine on her plate.  He had forgotten her
existence.  He just simply stared at March while he ate his bread
and margarine in huge mouthfuls, forgetting even his tea.'Well, I never knew anything make such a difference!' he murmured,
across his mouthfuls.'Oh, goodness!' cried March, blushing still more.  'I might be a
pink monkey!'And she rose quickly to her feet and took the tea-pot to the fire,
to the kettle.  And as she crouched on the hearth with her green
slip about her, the boy stared more wide-eyed than ever.  Through
the crape her woman's form seemed soft and womanly.  And when she
stood up and walked he saw her legs move soft within her modernly
short skirt.  She had on black silk stockings, and small patent
shoes with little gold buckles.No, she was another being.  She was something quite different.
Seeing her always in the hard-cloth breeches, wide on the hips,
buttoned on the knee, strong as armour, and in the brown puttees
and thick boots, it had never occurred to him that she had a
woman's legs and feet.  Now it came upon him.  She had a woman's
soft, skirted legs, and she was accessible.  He blushed to the
roots of his hair, shoved his nose in his tea-cup and drank his tea
with a little noise that made Banford simply squirm: and strangely,
suddenly he felt a man, no longer a youth.  He felt a man, with all
a man's grave weight of responsibility.  A curious quietness and
gravity came over his soul.  He felt a man, quiet, with a little of
the heaviness of male destiny upon him.She was soft and accessible in her dress.  The thought went home in
him like an everlasting responsibility.'Oh, for goodness' sake, say something, somebody,' cried Banford
fretfully.  'It might be a funeral.'  The boy looked at her, and
she could not bear his face.'A funeral!' said March, with a twisted smile.  'Why, that breaks
my dream.'Suddenly she had thought of Banford in the wood-box for a coffin.'What, have you been dreaming of a wedding?' said Banford
sarcastically.'Must have been,' said March.'Whose wedding?' asked the boy.'I can't remember,' said March.She was shy and rather awkward that evening, in spite of the fact
that, wearing a dress, her bearing was much more subdued than in
her uniform.  She felt unpeeled and rather exposed.  She felt
almost improper.They talked desultorily about Henry's departure next morning, and
made the trivial arrangement.  But of the matter on their minds,
none of them spoke.  They were rather quiet and friendly this
evening; Banford had practically nothing to say.  But inside
herself she seemed still, perhaps kindly.At nine o'clock March brought in the tray with the everlasting tea
and a little cold meat which Banford had managed to procure.  It
was the last supper, so Banford did not want to be disagreeable.
She felt a bit sorry for the boy, and felt she must be as nice as
she could.He wanted her to go to bed.  She was usually the first.  But she
sat on in her chair under the lamp, glancing at her book now and
then, and staring into the fire.  A deep silence had come into the
room.  It was broken by March asking, in a rather small tone:'What time is it, Jill?''Five past ten,' said Banford, looking at her wrist.And then not a sound.  The boy had looked up from the book he was
holding between his knees.  His rather wide, cat-shaped face had
its obstinate look, his eyes were watchful.'What about bed?' said March at last.'I'm ready when you are,' said Banford.'Oh, very well,' said March.  'I'll fill your bottle.'She was as good as her word.  When the hot-water bottle was ready,
she lit a candle and went upstairs with it.  Banford remained in
her chair, listening acutely.  March came downstairs again.'There you are, then,' she said.  'Are you going up?''Yes, in a minute,' said Banford.  But the minute passed, and she
sat on in her chair under the lamp.Henry, whose eyes were shining like a cat's as he watched from
under his brows, and whose face seemed wider, more chubbed and cat-
like with unalterable obstinacy, now rose to his feet to try his
throw.'I think I'll go and look if I can see the she-fox,' he said.  'She
may be creeping round.  Won't you come as well for a minute,
Nellie, and see if we see anything?''Me!' cried March, looking up with her startled, wondering face.'Yes.  Come on,' he said.  It was wonderful how soft and warm and
coaxing his voice could be, how near.  The very sound of it made
Banford's blood boil.  'Come on for a minute,' he said, looking
down into her uplifted, unsure face.And she rose to her feet as if drawn up by his young, ruddy face
that was looking down on her.'I should think you're never going out at this time of night,
Nellie!' cried Banford.'Yes, just for a minute,' said the boy, looking round on her, and
speaking with an odd, sharp yelp in his voice.March looked from one to the other, as if confused, vague.  Banford
rose to her feet for battle.'Why, it's ridiculous.  It's bitter cold.  You'll catch your death
in that thin frock.  And in those slippers.  You're not going to do
any such thing.'There was a moment's pause.  Banford turtled up like a little
fighting cock, facing March and the boy.'Oh, I don't think you need worry yourself,' he replied.  'A moment
under the stars won't do anybody any damage.  I'll get the rug off
the sofa in the dining-room.  You're coming, Nellie.'His voice had so much anger and contempt and fury in it as he spoke
to Banford: and so much tenderness and proud authority as he spoke
to March, that the latter answered:'Yes, I'm coming.'And she turned with him to the door.Banford, standing there in the middle of the room, suddenly burst
into a long wail and a spasm of sobs.  She covered her face with
her poor, thin hands, and her thin shoulders shook in an agony of
weeping.  March looked back from the door.'Jill!' she cried in a frantic tone, like someone just coming
awake.  And she seemed to start towards her darling.But the boy had March's arm in his grip, and she could not move.
She did not know why she could not move.  It was as in a dream when
the heart strains and the body cannot stir.'Never mind,' said the boy softly.  'Let her cry.  Let her cry.
She will have to cry sooner or later.  And the tears will relieve
her feelings.  They will do her good.'So he drew March slowly through the doorway.  But her last look was
back to the poor little figure which stood in the middle of the
room with covered face and thin shoulders shaken with bitter
weeping.In the dining-room he picked up the rug and said:'Wrap yourself up in this.'She obeyed - and they reached the kitchen door, he holding her soft
and firm by the arm, though she did not know it.  When she saw the
night outside she started back.'I must go back to Jill,' she said.  'I MUST!  Oh yes, I must.'Her tone sounded final.  The boy let go of her and she turned
indoors.  But he seized her again and arrested her.'Wait a minute,' he said.  'Wait a minute.  Even if you go, you're
not going yet.''Leave go!  Leave go!' she cried.  'My place is at Jill's side.
Poor little thing, she's sobbing her heart out.''Yes,' said the boy bitterly.  'And your heart too, and mine as
well.''Your heart?' said March.  He still gripped her and detained her.'Isn't it as good as her heart?' he said.  'Or do you think it's
not?''Your heart?' she said again, incredulous.'Yes, mine!  Mine!  Do you think I haven't GOT a heart?'  And with
his hot grasp he took her hand and pressed it under his left
breast.  'There's my heart,' he said, 'if you don't believe in it.'It was wonder which made her attend.  And then she felt the deep,
heavy, powerful stroke of his heart, terrible, like something from
beyond.  It was like something from beyond, something awful from
outside, signalling to her.  And the signal paralysed her.  It beat
upon her very soul, and made her helpless.  She forgot Jill.  She
could not think of Jill any more.  She could not think of her.
That terrible signalling from outside!The boy put his arm round her waist.'Come with me,' he said gently.  'Come and let us say what we've
got to say.'And he drew her outside, closed the door.  And she went with him
darkly down the garden path.  That he should have a beating heart!
And that he should have his arm round her, outside the blanket!
She was too confused to think who he was or what he was.He took her to a dark corner of the shed, where there was a tool-
box with a lid, long and low.'We'll sit here a minute,' he said.And obediently she sat down by his side.'Give me your hand,' he said.She gave him both her hands, and he held them between his own.  He
was young, and it made him tremble.'You'll marry me.  You'll marry me before I go back, won't you?' he
pleaded.'Why, aren't we both a pair of fools?' she said.He had put her in the corner, so that she should not look out and
see the lighted window of the house across the dark garden.  He
tried to keep her all there inside the shed with him.'In what way a pair of fools?' he said.  'If you go back to Canada
with me, I've got a job and a good wage waiting for me, and it's a
nice place, near the mountains.  Why shouldn't you marry me?  Why
shouldn't we marry?  I should like to have you there with me.  I
should like to feel I'd got somebody there, at the back of me, all
my life.''You'd easily find somebody else who'd suit you better,' she said.'Yes, I might easily find another girl.  I know I could.  But not
one I really wanted.  I've never met one I really wanted for good.
You see, I'm thinking of all my life.  If I marry, I want to feel
it's for all my life.  Other girls: well, they're just girls, nice
enough to go a walk with now and then.  Nice enough for a bit of
play.  But when I think of my life, then I should be very sorry to
have to marry one of them, I should indeed.''You mean they wouldn't make you a good wife.''Yes, I mean that.  But I don't mean they wouldn't do their duty by
me.  I mean - I don't know what I mean.  Only when I think of my
life, and of you, then the two things go together.''And what if they didn't?' she said, with her odd, sardonic touch.'Well, I think they would.'They sat for some time silent.  He held her hands in his, but he
did not make love to her.  Since he had realized that she was a
woman, and vulnerable, accessible, a certain heaviness had
possessed his soul.  He did not want to make love to her.  He
shrank from any such performance, almost with fear.  She was a
woman, and vulnerable, accessible to him finally, and he held back
from that which was ahead, almost with dread.  It was a kind of
darkness he knew he would enter finally, but of which he did not
want as yet even to think.  She was the woman, and he was
responsible for the strange vulnerability he had suddenly realized
in her.'No,' she said at last, 'I'm a fool.  I know I'm a fool.''What for?' he asked.'To go on with this business.''Do you mean me?' he asked.'No, I mean myself.  I'm making a fool of myself, and a big one.''Why, because you don't want to marry me, really?''Oh, I don't know whether I'm against it, as a matter of fact.
That's just it.  I don't know.'He looked at her in the darkness, puzzled.  He did not in the least
know what she meant.'And don't you know whether you like to sit here with me this
minute or not?' he asked.'No, I don't really.  I don't know whether I wish I was somewhere
else, or whether I like being here.  I don't know, really.''Do you wish you were with Miss Banford?  Do you wish you'd gone to
bed with her?' he asked, as a challenge.She waited a long time before she answered:'No,' she said at last.  'I don't wish that.''And do you think you would spend all your life with her - when your
hair goes white, and you are old?' he said.'No,' she said, without much hesitation.  'I don't see Jill and me
two old women together.''And don't you think, when I'm an old man and you're an old woman,
we might be together still, as we are now?' he said.'Well, not as we are now,' she replied.  'But I could imagine - no,
I can't.  I can't imagine you an old man.  Besides, it's dreadful!''What, to be an old man?''Yes, of course.''Not when the time comes,' he said.  'But it hasn't come.  Only it
will.  And when it does, I should like to think you'd be there as
well.''Sort of old age pensions,' she said dryly.Her kind of witless humour always startled him.  He never knew what
she meant.  Probably she didn't quite know herself.'No,' he said, hurt.'I don't know why you harp on old age,' she said.  'I'm not
ninety.''Did anybody ever say you were?' he asked, offended.They were silent for some time, pulling different ways in the
silence.'I don't want you to make fun of me,' he said.'Don't you?' she replied, enigmatic.'No, because just this minute I'm serious.  And when I'm serious, I
believe in not making fun of it.''You mean nobody else must make fun of you,' she replied.'Yes, I mean that.  And I mean I don't believe in making fun of it
myself.  When it comes over me so that I'm serious, then - there it
is, I don't want it to be laughed at.'She was silent for some time.  Then she said, in a vague, almost
pained voice:'No, I'm not laughing at you.'A hot wave rose in his heart.'You believe me, do you?' he asked.'Yes, I believe you,' she replied, with a twang of her old, tired
nonchalance, as if she gave in because she was tired.  But he
didn't care.  His heart was hot and clamorous.'So you agree to marry me before I go? - perhaps at Christmas?''Yes, I agree.''There!' he exclaimed.  'That's settled it.'And he sat silent, unconscious, with all the blood burning in all
his veins, like fire in all the branches and twigs of him.  He only
pressed her two hands to his chest, without knowing.  When the
curious passion began to die down, he seemed to come awake to the
world.'We'll go in, shall we?' he said: as if he realized it was cold.She rose without answering.'Kiss me before we go, now you've said it,' he said.And he kissed her gently on the mouth, with a young, frightened
kiss.  It made her feel so young, too, and frightened, and
wondering: and tired, tired, as if she were going to sleep.They went indoors.  And in the sitting-room, there, crouched by the
fire like a queer little witch, was Banford.  She looked round with
reddened eyes as they entered, but did not rise.  He thought she
looked frightening, unnatural, crouching there and looking round at
them.  Evil he thought her look was, and he crossed his fingers.Banford saw the ruddy, elate face on the youth: he seemed strangely
tall and bright and looming.  And March had a delicate look on her
face; she wanted to hide her face, to screen it, to let it not be
seen.'You've come at last,' said Banford uglily.'Yes, we've come,' said he.'You've been long enough for anything,' she said.'Yes, we have.  We've settled it.  We shall marry as soon as
possible,' he replied.'Oh, you've settled it, have you!  Well, I hope you won't live to
repent it,' said Banford.'I hope so too,' he replied.'Are you going to bed NOW, Nellie?' said Banford.'Yes, I'm going now.''Then for goodness' sake come along.'March looked at the boy.  He was glancing with his very bright eyes
at her and at Banford.  March looked at him wistfully.  She wished
she could stay with him.  She wished she had married him already,
and it was all over.  For oh, she felt suddenly so safe with him.
She felt so strangely safe and peaceful in his presence.  If only
she could sleep in his shelter, and not with Jill.  She felt afraid
of Jill.  In her dim, tender state, it was agony to have to go with
Jill and sleep with her.  She wanted the boy to save her.  She
looked again at him.And he, watching with bright eyes, divined something of what she
felt.  It puzzled and distressed him that she must go with Jill.'I shan't forget what you've promised,' he said, looking clear into
her eyes, right into her eyes, so that he seemed to occupy all
herself with his queer, bright look.She smiled to him faintly, gently.  She felt safe again - safe with
him.But in spite of all the boy's precautions, he had a setback.  The
morning he was leaving the farm he got March to accompany him to
the market-town, about six miles away, where they went to the
registrar and had their names stuck up as two people who were going
to marry.  He was to come at Christmas, and the wedding was to take
place then.  He hoped in the spring to be able to take March back
to Canada with him, now the war was really over.  Though he was so
young, he had saved some money.'You never have to be without SOME money at the back of you, if you
can help it,' he said.So she saw him off in the train that was going West: his camp was
on Salisbury Plain.  And with big, dark eyes she watched him go,
and it seemed as if everything real in life was retreating as the
train retreated with his queer, chubby, ruddy face, that seemed so
broad across the cheeks, and which never seemed to change its
expression, save when a cloud of sulky anger hung on the brow, or
the bright eyes fixed themselves in their stare.  This was what
happened now.  He leaned there out of the carriage window as the
train drew off, saying good-bye and staring back at her, but his
face quite unchanged.  There was no emotion on his face.  Only his
eyes tightened and became fixed and intent in their watching like a
cat's when suddenly she sees something and stares.  So the boy's
eyes stared fixedly as the train drew away, and she was left
feeling intensely forlorn.  Failing his physical presence, she
seemed to have nothing of him.  And she had nothing of anything.
Only his face was fixed in her mind: the full, ruddy, unchanging
cheeks, and the straight snout of a nose and the two eyes staring
above.  All she could remember was how he suddenly wrinkled his
nose when he laughed, as a puppy does when he is playfully
growling.  But him, himself, and what he was - she knew nothing, she
had nothing of him when he left her.On the ninth day after he had left her he received this letter.Dear Henry,I have been over it all again in my mind, this business of me and
you, and it seems to me impossible.  When you aren't there I see
what a fool I am.  When you are there you seem to blind me to
things as they actually are.  You make me see things all unreal,
and I don't know what.  Then when I am along again with Jill I seem
to come to my own senses and realise what a fool I am making of
myself, and how I am treating you unfairly.  Because it must be
unfair to you for me to go on with this affair when I can't feel in
my heart that I really love you.  I know people talk a lot of stuff
and nonsense about love, and I don't want to do that.  I want to
keep to plain facts and act in a sensible way.  And that seems to
me what I'm not doing.  I don't see on what grounds I am going to
marry you.  I know I am not head over heels in love with you, as I
have fancied myself to be with fellows when I was a young fool of a
girl.  You are an absolute stranger to me, and it seems to me you
will always be one.  So on what grounds am I going to marry you?
When I think of Jill, she is ten times more real to me.  I know her
and I'm awfully fond of her, and I hate myself for a beast if I
ever hurt her little finger.  We have a life together.  And even if
it can't last for ever, it is a life while it does last.  And it
might last as long as either of us lives.  Who knows how long we've
got to live?  She is a delicate little thing, perhaps nobody but me
knows how delicate.  And as for me, I feel I might fall down the
well any day.  What I don't seem to see at all is you.  When I
think of what I've been and what I've done with you, I'm afraid I
am a few screws loose.  I should be sorry to think that softening
of the brain is setting in so soon, but that is what it seems like.
You are such an absolute stranger, and so different from what I'm
used to, and we don't seem to have a thing in common.  As for love,
the very word seems impossible.  I know what love means even in
Jill's case, and I know that in this affair with you it's an
absolute impossibility.  And then going to Canada.  I'm sure I must
have been clean off my chump when I promised such a thing.  It
makes me feel fairly frightened of myself.  I feel I might do
something really silly that I wasn't responsible for - and end my
days in a lunatic asylum.  You may think that's all I'm fit for
after the way I've gone on, but it isn't a very nice thought for
me.  Thank goodness Jill is here, and her being here makes me feel
sane again, else I don't know what I might do; I might have an
accident with the gun one evening.  I love Jill, and she makes me
feel safe and sane, with her loving anger against me for being such
a fool.  Well, what I want to say is, won't you let us cry the
whole thing off?  I can't marry you, and really, I won't do such a
thing if it seems to me wrong.  It is all a great mistake.  I've
made a complete fool of myself, and all I can do is to apologise to
you and ask you please to forget it, and please to take no further
notice of me.  Your fox-skin is nearly ready, and seems all right,
I will post it to you if you will let me know if this address is
still right, and if you will accept my apology for the awful and
lunatic way I have behaved with you, and then let the matter rest.Jill sends her kindest regards.  Her mother and father are staying
with us over Christmas,Yours very sincerely,ELLEN MARCH.The boy read this letter in camp as he was cleaning his kit.  He
set his teeth, and for a moment went almost pale, yellow round the
eyes with fury.  He said nothing and saw nothing and felt nothing
but a livid rage that was quite unreasoning.  Balked!  Balked
again!  Balked!  He wanted the woman, he had fixed like doom upon
having her.  He felt that was his doom, his destiny, and his
reward, to have this woman.  She was his heaven and hell on earth,
and he would have none elsewhere.  Sightless with rage and thwarted
madness he got through the morning.  Save that in his mind he was
lurking and scheming towards an issue, he would have committed some
insane act.  Deep in himself he felt like roaring and howling and
gnashing his teeth and breaking things.  But he was too
intelligent.  He knew society was on top of him, and he must
scheme.  So with his teeth bitten together, and his nose curiously
slightly lifted, like some creature that is vicious, and his eyes
fixed and staring, he went through the morning's affairs drunk with
anger and suppression.  In his mind was one thing - Banford.  He
took no heed of all March's outpouring: none.  One thorn rankled,
stuck in his mind.  Banford.  In his mind, in his soul, in his
whole being, one thorn rankling to insanity.  And he would have to
get it out.  He would have to get the thorn of Banford out of his
life, if he died for it.With this one fixed idea in his mind, he went to ask for twenty-
four hours' leave of absence.  He knew it was not due to him.  His
consciousness was supernaturally keen.  He knew where he must go - 
he must go to the captain.  But how could he get at the captain?
In that great camp of wooden huts and tents he had no idea where
his captain was.But he went to the officers' canteen.  There was his captain
standing talking with three other officers.  Henry stood in the
doorway at attention.'May I speak to Captain Berryman?'  The captain was Cornish like
himself.'What do you want?' called the captain.'May I speak to you, Captain?''What do you want?' replied the captain, not stirring from among
his group of fellow officers.Henry watched his superior for a minute without speaking.'You won't refuse me, sir, will you?' he asked gravely.'It depends what it is.''Can I have twenty-four hours' leave?''No, you've no business to ask.''I know I haven't.  But I must ask you.''You've had your answer.''Don't send me away, Captain.'There was something strange about the boy as he stood there so
everlasting in the doorway.  The Cornish captain felt the
strangeness at once, and eyed him shrewdly.'Why, what's afoot?' he said, curious.'I'm in trouble about something.  I must go to Blewbury,' said the
boy.'Blewbury, eh?  After the girls?''Yes, it is a woman, Captain.'  And the boy, as he stood there with
his head reaching forward a little, went suddenly terribly pale, or
yellow, and his lips seemed to give off pain.  The captain saw and
paled a little also.  He turned aside.'Go on, then,' he said.  'But for God's sake don't cause any
trouble of any sort.''I won't, Captain, thank you.'He was gone.  The captain, upset, took a gin and bitters.  Henry
managed to hire a bicycle.  It was twelve o'clock when he left the
camp.  He had sixty miles of wet and muddy crossroads to ride.  But
he was in the saddle and down the road without a thought of food.At the farm, March was busy with a work she had had some time in
hand.  A bunch of Scotch fir trees stood at the end of the open
shed, on a little bank where ran the fence between two of the
gorse-shaggy meadows.  The farthest of these trees was dead - it had
died in the summer, and stood with all its needles brown and sere
in the air.  It was not a very big tree.  And it was absolutely
dead.  So March determined to have it, although they were not
allowed to cut any of the timber.  But it would make such splendid
firing, in these days of scarce fuel.She had been giving a few stealthy chops at the trunk for a week or
more, every now and then hacking away for five minutes, low down,
near the ground, so no one should notice.  She had not tried the
saw, it was such hard work, alone.  Now the tree stood with a great
yawning gap in his base, perched, as it were, on one sinew, and
ready to fall.  But he did not fall.It was late in the damp December afternoon, with cold mists
creeping out of the woods and up the hollows, and darkness waiting
to sink in from above.  There was a bit of yellowness where the sun
was fading away beyond the low woods of the distance.  March took
her axe and went to the tree.  The small thud-thud of her blows
resounded rather ineffectual about the wintry homestead.  Banford
came out wearing her thick coat, but with no hat on her head, so
that her thin, bobbed hair blew on the uneasy wind that sounded in
the pines and in the wood.'What I'm afraid of,' said Banford, 'is that it will fall on the
shed and we sh'll have another job repairing that.''Oh, I don't think so,' said March, straightening herself and
wiping her arm over her hot brow.  She was flushed red, her eyes
were very wide open and queer, her upper lip lifted away from her
two white, front teeth with a curious, almost rabbit look.A little stout man in a black overcoat and a bowler hat came
pottering across the yard.  He had a pink face and a white beard
and smallish, pale-blue eyes.  He was not very old, but nervy, and
he walked with little short steps.'What do you think, father?' said Banford.  'Don't you think it
might hit the shed in falling?''Shed, no!' said the old man.  'Can't hit the shed.  Might as well
say the fence.''The fence doesn't matter,' said March, in her high voice.'Wrong as usual, am I!' said Banford, wiping her straying hair from
her eyes.The tree stood as it were on one spelch of itself, leaning, and
creaking in the wind.  It grew on the bank of a little dry ditch
between the two meadows.  On the top of the bank straggled one
fence, running to the bushes up-hill.  Several trees clustered
there in the corner of the field near the shed and near the gate
which led into the yard.  Towards this gate, horizontal across the
weary meadows, came the grassy, rutted approach from the high road.
There trailed another rickety fence, long split poles joining the
short, thick, wide-apart uprights.  The three people stood at the
back of the tree, in the corner of the shed meadow, just above the
yard gate.  The house, with its two gables and its porch, stood
tidy in a little grassed garden across the yard.  A little, stout,
rosy-faced woman in a little red woollen shoulder shawl had come
and taken her stand in the porch.'Isn't it down yet?' she cried, in a high little voice.'Just thinking about it,' called her husband.  His tone towards the
two girls was always rather mocking and satirical.  March did not
want to go on with her hitting while he was there.  As for him, he
wouldn't lift a stick from the ground if he could help it,
complaining, like his daughter, of rheumatics in his shoulder.  So
the three stood there a moment silent in the cold afternoon, in the
bottom corner near the yard.They heard the far-off taps of a gate, and craned to look.  Away
across, on the green horizontal approach, a figure was just
swinging on to a bicycle again, and lurching up and down over the
grass, approaching.'Why, it's one of our boys - it's Jack,' said the old man.'Can't be,' said Banford.March craned her head to look.  She alone recognized the khaki
figure.  She flushed, but said nothing.'No, it isn't Jack, I don't think,' said the old man, staring with
little round blue eyes under his white lashes.In another moment the bicycle lurched into sight, and the rider
dropped off at the gate.  It was Henry, his face wet and red and
spotted with mud.  He was altogether a muddy sight.'Oh!' cried Banford, as if afraid.  'Why, it's Henry!''What?' muttered the old man.  He had a thick, rapid, muttering way
of speaking, and was slightly deaf.  'What?  What?  Who is it?  Who
is it, do you say?  That young fellow?  That young fellow of
Nellie's?  Oh!  Oh!'  And the satiric smile came on his pink face
and white eyelashes.Henry, pushing the wet hair off his steaming brow, had caught sight
of them and heard what the old man said.  His hot, young face
seemed to flame in the cold light.'Oh, are you all there!' he said, giving his sudden, puppy's little
laugh.  He was so hot and dazed with cycling he hardly knew where
he was.  He leaned the bicycle against the fence and climbed over
into the corner on to the bank, without going into the yard.'Well, I must say, we weren't expecting YOU,' said Banford
laconically.'No, I suppose not,' said he, looking at March.She stood aside, slack, with one knee drooped and the axe resting
its head loosely on the ground.  Her eyes were wide and vacant, and
her upper lip lifted from her teeth in that helpless, fascinated
rabbit look.  The moment she saw his glowing, red face it was all
over with her.  She was as helpless as if she had been bound.  The
moment she saw the way his head seemed to reach forward.'Well, who is it?  Who is it, anyway?' asked the smiling, satiric
old man in his muttering voice.'Why, Mr Grenfel, whom you've heard us tell about, father,' said
Banford coldly.'Heard you tell about, I should think so.  Heard of nothing else
practically,' muttered the elderly man, with his queer little
jeering smile on his face.  'How do you do,' he added, suddenly
reaching out his hand to Henry.The boy shook hands just as startled.  Then the two men fell apart.'Cycled over from Salisbury Plain, have you?' asked the old man.'Yes.''Hm!  Longish ride.  How long d'it take you, eh?  Some time, eh?
Several hours, I suppose.''About four.''Eh?  Four!  Yes, I should have thought so.  When are you going
back, then?''I've got till tomorrow evening.''Till tomorrow evening, eh?  Yes.  Hm!  Girls weren't expecting
you, were they?'And the old man turned his pale-blue, round little eyes under their
white lashes mockingly towards the girls.  Henry also looked round.
He had become a little awkward.  He looked at March, who was still
staring away into the distance as if to see where the cattle were.
Her hand was on the pommel of the axe, whose head rested loosely on
the ground.'What were you doing there?' he asked in his soft, courteous voice.
'Cutting a tree down?'March seemed not to hear, as if in a trance.'Yes,' said Banford.  'We've been at it for over a week.''Oh!  And have you done it all by yourselves then?''Nellie's done it all, I've done nothing,' said Banford.'Really!  You must have worked quite hard,' he said, addressing
himself in a curious gentle tone direct to March.  She did not
answer, but remained half averted staring away towards the woods
above as if in a trance.'NELLIE!' cried Banford sharply.  'Can't you answer?''What - me?' cried March, starting round and looking from one to the
other.  'Did anyone speak to me?''Dreaming!' muttered the old man, turning aside to smile.  'Must be
in love, eh, dreaming in the daytime!''Did you say anything to me?' said March, looking at the boy as
from a strange distance, her eyes wide and doubtful, her face
delicately flushed.'I said you must have worked hard at the tree,' he replied
courteously.'Oh, that!  Bit by bit.  I thought it would have come down by now.''I'm thankful it hasn't come down in the night, to frighten us to
death,' said Banford.'Let me just finish it for you, shall I?' said the boy.March slanted the axe-shaft in his direction.'Would you like to?' she said.'Yes, if you wish it,' he said.'Oh, I'm thankful when the thing's down, that's all,' she replied,
nonchalant.'Which way is it going to fall?' said Banford.  'Will it hit the
shed?''No, it won't hit the shed,' he said.  'I should think it will fall
there - quite clear.  Though it might give a twist and catch the
fence.''Catch the fence!' cried the old man.  'What, catch the fence!
When it's leaning at that angle?  Why, it's farther off than the
shed.  It won't catch the fence.''No,' said Henry, 'I don't suppose it will.  It has plenty of room
to fall quite clear, and I suppose it will fall clear.''Won't tumble backwards on top of US, will it?' asked the old man,
sarcastic.'No, it won't do that,' said Henry, taking off his short overcoat
and his tunic.  'Ducks!  Ducks!  Go back!'A line of four brown-speckled ducks led by a brown-and-green drake
were stemming away downhill from the upper meadow, coming like
boats running on a ruffled sea, cockling their way top speed
downwards towards the fence and towards the little group of people,
and cackling as excitedly as if they brought news of the Spanish
Armada.'Silly things!  Silly things!' cried Banford, going forward to turn
them off.  But they came eagerly towards her, opening their yellow-
green beaks and quacking as if they were so excited to say
something.'There's no food.  There's nothing here.  You must wait a bit,'
said Banford to them.  'Go away.  Go away.  Go round to the yard.'They didn't go, so she climbed the fence to swerve them round under
the gate and into the yard.  So off they waggled in an excited
string once more, wagging their rumps like the stems of little
gondolas, ducking under the bar of the gate.  Banford stood on the
top of the bank, just over the fence, looking down on the other
three.Henry looked up at her, and met her queer, round-pupilled, weak
eyes staring behind her spectacles.  He was perfectly still.  He
looked away, up at the weak, leaning tree.  And as he looked into
the sky, like a huntsman who is watching a flying bird, he thought
to himself:  'If the tree falls in just such a way, and spins just
so much as it falls, then the branch there will strike her exactly
as she stands on top of that bank.'He looked at her again.  She was wiping the hair from her brow
again, with that perpetual gesture.  In his heart he had decided
her death.  A terrible still force seemed in him, and a power that
was just his.  If he turned even a hair's breadth in the wrong
direction, he would lose the power.'Mind yourself, Miss Banford,' he said.  And his heart held
perfectly still, in the terrible pure will that she should not
move.'Who, me, mind myself?' she cried, her father's jeering tone in her
voice.  'Why, do you think you might hit me with the axe?''No, it's just possible the tree might, though,' he answered
soberly.  But the tone of his voice seemed to her to imply that he
was only being falsely solicitous, and trying to make her move
because it was his will to move her.'Absolutely impossible,' she said.He heard her.  But he held himself icy still, lest he should lose
his power.'No, it's just possible.  You'd better come down this way.''Oh, all right.  Let us see some crack Canadian tree-felling,' she
retorted.'Ready, then,' he said, taking the axe, looking round to see he was
clear.There was a moment of pure, motionless suspense, when the world
seemed to stand still.  Then suddenly his form seemed to flash up
enormously tall and fearful, he gave two swift, flashing blows, in
immediate succession, the tree was severed, turning slowly,
spinning strangely in the air and coming down like a sudden
darkness on the earth.  No one saw what was happening except
himself.  No one heard the strange little cry which the Banford
gave as the dark end of the bough swooped down, down on her.  No
one saw her crouch a little and receive the blow on the back of the
neck.  No one saw her flung outwards and laid, a little twitching
heap, at the foot of the fence.  No one except the boy.  And he
watched with intense bright eyes, as he would watch a wild goose he
had shot.  Was it winged or dead?  Dead!Immediately he gave a loud cry.  Immediately March gave a wild
shriek that went far, far down the afternoon.  And the father
started a strange bellowing sound.The boy leapt the fence and ran to the fringe.  The back of the
neck and head was a mass of blood, of horror.  He turned it over.
The body was quivering with little convulsions.  But she was dead
really.  He knew it, that it was so.  He knew it in his soul and
his blood.  The inner necessity of his life was fulfilling itself,
it was he who was to live.  The thorn was drawn out of his bowels.
So he put her down gently.  She was dead.He stood up.  March was standing there petrified and absolutely
motionless.  Her face was dead white, her eyes big black pools.
The old man was scrambling horribly over the fence.'I'm afraid it's killed her,' said the boy.The old man was making curious, blubbering noises as he huddled
over the fence.  'What!' cried March, starting electric.'Yes, I'm afraid,' repeated the boy.March was coming forward.  The boy was over the fence before she
reached it.'What do you say, killed her?' she asked in a sharp voice.'I'm afraid so,' he answered softly.She went still whiter, fearful.  The two stood facing one another.
Her black eyes gazed on him with the last look of resistance.  And
then in a last agonized failure she began to grizzle, to cry in a
shivery little fashion of a child that doesn't want to cry, but
which is beaten from within, and gives that little first shudder of
sobbing which is not yet weeping, dry and fearful.He had won.  She stood there absolutely helpless, shuddering her
dry sobs and her mouth trembling rapidly.  And then, as in a child,
with a little crash came the tears and the blind agony of sightless
weeping.  She sank down on the grass, and sat there with her hands
on her breast and her face lifted in sightless, convulsed weeping.
He stood above her, looking down on her, mute, pale, and
everlasting seeming.  He never moved, but looked down on her.  And
among all the torture of the scene, the torture of his own heart
and bowels, he was glad, he had won.After a long time he stooped to her and took her hands.'Don't cry,' he said softly.  'Don't cry.'She looked up at him with tears running from her eyes, a senseless
look of helplessness and submission.  So she gazed on him as if
sightless, yet looking up to him.  She would never leave him again.
He had won her.  And he knew it and was glad, because he wanted her
for his life.  His life must have her.  And now he had won her.  It
was what his life must have.But if he had won her, he had not yet got her.  They were married
at Christmas as he had planned, and he got again ten days' leave.
They went to Cornwall, to his own village, on the sea.  He realized
that it was awful for her to be at the farm any more.But though she belonged to him, though she lived in his shadow, as
if she could not be away from him, she was not happy.  She did not
want to leave him: and yet she did not feel free with him.
Everything round her seemed to watch her, seemed to press on her.
He had won her, he had her with him, she was his wife.  And she - 
she belonged to him, she knew it.  But she was not glad.  And he
was still foiled.  He realized that though he was married to her
and possessed her in every possible way, apparently, and though she
WANTED him to possess her, she wanted it, she wanted nothing else,
now, still he did not quite succeed.Something was missing.  Instead of her soul swaying with new life,
it seemed to droop, to bleed, as if it were wounded.  She would sit
for a long time with her hand in his, looking away at the sea.  And
in her dark, vacant eyes was a sort of wound, and her face looked a
little peaked.  If he spoke to her, she would turn to him with a
faint new smile, the strange, quivering little smile of a woman who
has died in the old way of love, and can't quite rise to the new
way.  She still felt she ought to DO something, to strain herself
in some direction.  And there was nothing to do, and no direction
in which to strain herself.  And she could not quite accept the
submergence which his new love put upon her.  If she was in love,
she ought to EXERT herself, in some way, loving.  She felt the
weary need of our day to EXERT herself in love.  But she knew that
in fact she must no more exert herself in love.  He would not have
the love which exerted itself towards him.  It made his brow go
black.  No, he wouldn't let her exert her love towards him.  No,
she had to be passive, to acquiesce, and to be submerged under the
surface of love.  She had to be like the seaweeds she saw as she
peered down from the boat, swaying forever delicately under water,
with all their delicate fibrils put tenderly out upon the flood,
sensitive, utterly sensitive and receptive within the shadowy sea,
and never, never rising and looking forth above water while they
lived.  Never.  Never looking forth from the water until they died,
only then washing, corpses, upon the surface.  But while they
lived, always submerged, always beneath the wave.  Beneath the wave
they might have powerful roots, stronger than iron; they might be
tenacious and dangerous in their soft waving within the flood.
Beneath the water they might be stronger, more indestructible than
resistant oak trees are on land.  But it was always under-water,
always under-water.  And she, being a woman, must be like that.And she had been so used to the very opposite.  She had had to take
all the thought for love and for life, and all the responsibility.
Day after day she had been responsible for the coming day, for the
coming year: for her dear Jill's health and happiness and well-
being.  Verily, in her own small way, she had felt herself
responsible for the well-being of the world.  And this had been her
great stimulant, this grand feeling that, in her own small sphere,
she was responsible for the well-being of the world.And she had failed.  She knew that, even in her small way, she had
failed.  She had failed to satisfy her own feeling of responsibility.
It was so difficult.  It seemed so grand and easy at first.  And the
more you tried, the more difficult it became.  It had seemed so easy
to make one beloved creature happy.  And the more you tried, the
worse the failure.  It was terrible.  She had been all her life
reaching, reaching, and what she reached for seemed so near, until
she had stretched to her utmost limit.  And then it was always
beyond her.Always beyond her, vaguely, unrealizably beyond her, and she was
left with nothingness at last.  The life she reached for, the
happiness she reached for, the well-being she reached for all
slipped back, became unreal, the farther she stretched her hand.
She wanted some goal, some finality - and there was none.  Always
this ghastly reaching, reaching, striving for something that might
be just beyond.  Even to make Jill happy.  She was glad Jill was
dead.  For she had realized that she could never make her happy.
Jill would always be fretting herself thinner and thinner, weaker
and weaker.  Her pains grew worse instead of less.  It would be so
for ever.  She was glad she was dead.And if Jill had married a man it would have been just the same.
The woman striving, striving to make the man happy, striving within
her own limits for the well-being of her world.  And always
achieving failure.  Little, foolish successes in money or in
ambition.  But at the very point where she most wanted success, in
the anguished effort to make some one beloved human being happy and
perfect, there the failure was almost catastrophic.  You wanted to
make your beloved happy, and his happiness seemed always achievable.
If only you did just this, that, and the other.  And you did this,
that, and the other, in all good faith, and every time the failure
became a little more ghastly.  You could love yourself to ribbons
and strive and strain yourself to the bone, and things would go from
bad to worse, bad to worse, as far as happiness went.  The awful
mistake of happiness.Poor March, in her good-will and her responsibility, she had
strained herself till it seemed to her that the whole of life and
everything was only a horrible abyss of nothingness.  The more you
reached after the fatal flower of happiness, which trembles so blue
and lovely in a crevice just beyond your grasp, the more fearfully
you became aware of the ghastly and awful gulf of the precipice
below you, into which you will inevitably plunge, as into the
bottomless pit, if you reach any farther.  You pluck flower after
flower - it is never THE flower.  The flower itself - its calyx is a
horrible gulf, it is the bottomless pit.That is the whole history of the search for happiness, whether it
be your own or somebody else's that you want to win.  It ends, and
it always ends, in the ghastly sense of the bottomless nothingness
into which you will inevitably fall if you strain any farther.And women? - what goal can any woman conceive, except happiness?
Just happiness for herself and the whole world.  That, and nothing
else.  And so, she assumes the responsibility and sets off towards
her goal.  She can see it there, at the foot of the rainbow.  Or
she can see it a little way beyond, in the blue distance.  Not far,
not far.But the end of the rainbow is a bottomless gulf down which you can
fall forever without arriving, and the blue distance is a void pit
which can swallow you and all your efforts into its emptiness, and
still be no emptier.  You and all your efforts.  So, the illusion
of attainable happiness!Poor March, she had set off so wonderfully towards the blue goal.
And the farther and farther she had gone, the more fearful had
become the realization of emptiness.  An agony, an insanity at
last.She was glad it was over.  She was glad to sit on the shore and
look westwards over the sea, and know the great strain had ended.
She would never strain for love and happiness any more.  And Jill
was safely dead.  Poor Jill, poor Jill.  It must be sweet to be
dead.For her own part, death was not her destiny.  She would have to
leave her destiny to the boy.  But then, the boy.  He wanted more
than that.  He wanted her to give herself without defences, to sink
and become submerged in him.  And she - she wanted to sit still,
like a woman on the last milestone, and watch.  She wanted to see,
to know, to understand.  She wanted to be alone: with him at her
side.And he!  He did not want her to watch any more, to see any more, to
understand any more.  He wanted to veil her woman's spirit, as
Orientals veil the woman's face.  He wanted her to commit herself
to him, and to put her independent spirit to sleep.  He wanted to
take away from her all her effort, all that seemed her very raison
d'etre.  He wanted to make her submit, yield, blindly pass away out
of all her strenuous consciousness.  He wanted to take away her
consciousness, and make her just his woman.  Just his woman.And she was so tired, so tired, like a child that wants to go to
sleep, but which fights against sleep as if sleep were death.  She
seemed to stretch her eyes wider in the obstinate effort and
tension of keeping awake.  She WOULD keep awake.  She WOULD know.
She WOULD consider and judge and decide.  She would have the reins
of her own life between her own hands.  She WOULD be an independent
woman to the last.  But she was so tired, so tired of everything.
And sleep seemed near.  And there was such rest in the boy.Yet there, sitting in a niche of the high, wild, cliffs of West
Cornwall, looking over the westward sea, she stretched her eyes
wider and wider.  Away to the West, Canada, America.  She WOULD
know and she WOULD see what was ahead.  And the boy, sitting beside
her, staring down at the gulls, had a cloud between his brows and
the strain of discontent in his eyes.  He wanted her asleep, at
peace in him.  He wanted her at peace asleep in him.  And THERE she
was, dying with the strain of her own wakefulness.  Yet she would
not sleep: no, never.  Sometimes he thought bitterly that he ought
to have left her.  He ought never to have killed Banford.  He
should have left Banford and March to kill one another.But that was only impatience: and he knew it.  He was waiting,
waiting to go West.  He was aching almost in torment to leave
England, to go West, to take March away.  To leave this shore!  He
believed that as they crossed the seas, as they left this England
which he so hated, because in some way it seemed to have stung him
with poison, she would go to sleep.  She would close her eyes at
last and give in to him.And then he would have her, and he would have his own life at last.
He chafed, feeling he hadn't got his own life.  He would never have
it till she yielded and slept in him.  Then he would have all his
own life as a young man and a male, and she would have all her own
life as a woman and a female.  There would be no more of this awful
straining.  She would not be a man any more, an independent woman
with a man's responsibility.  Nay, even the responsibility for her
own soul she would have to commit to him.  He knew it was so, and
obstinately held out against her, waiting for the surrender.'You'll feel better when once we get over the seas to Canada over
there,' he said to her as they sat among the rocks on the cliff.She looked away to the sea's horizon, as if it were not real.  Then
she looked round at him, with the strained, strange look of a child
that is struggling against sleep.'Shall I?' she said.'Yes,' he answered quietly.And her eyelids dropped with the slow motion, sleep weighing them
unconscious.  But she pulled them open again to say:'Yes, I may.  I can't tell.  I can't tell what it will be like over
there.''If only we could go soon!' he said, with pain in his voice.>



THE Somers-Callcott acquaintance did not progress very rapidly, after
the affair of the dahlias. Mrs. Callcott asked Mrs. Somers across to
look at their cottage, and Mrs. Somers went. Then Mrs. Somers asked Mrs.
Callcott back again. But both times Mr. Somers managed to be out of the
way, and managed to cast an invisible frost over the rencontre. He was
not going to be dragged in, no, he was not. He very much wanted to
borrow a pair of pincers and a chopper for an hour, to pull out a few
nails, and to split his little chunks of kindling that the dealer had
sent too thick. And the Callcotts were very ready to lend anything, if
they were only asked for it. But no, Richard Lovat wasn't going to ask.
Neither would he buy a chopper, because the travelling expenses had
reduced him to very low water. He preferred to wrestle with the chunks
of jarrah every morning.Mrs. Somers and Mrs. Callcott continued, however, to have a few friendly
words across the fence. Harriet learned that Jack was foreman in a
motor-works place, that he had been wounded in the jaw in the war, that
the surgeons had not been able to extract the bullet, because there was
nothing for it to &quot;back up against&quot; - and so he had carried the chunk of
lead in his gizzard for ten months, till suddenly it had rolled into his
throat and he had coughed it out. The jeweller had wanted Mrs. Callcott
to have it mounted in a brooch or a hatpin. It was a round ball of lead,
from a shell, as big as a marble, and weighing three or four ounces.
Mrs. Callcott had recoiled from this suggestion, so an elegant little
stand had been made, like a little lamp-post on a polished wood base,
and the black little globe of lead dangled by a fine chain like an
arc-lamp from the top of the toy lamp-post. It was now a mantelpiece
ornament.All this Harriet related to the indignant Lovat, though she wisely
suppressed the fact that Mrs. Callcott had suggested that &quot;perhaps Mr.
Somers might like to have a look at it.&quot;Lovat was growing more used to Australia - or to the &quot;cottage&quot; in Murdoch
Road, and the view of the harbour from the tub-top of his summer-house.
You couldn't call that all &quot;Australia&quot; - but then one man can't bite off
a continent in a mouthful, and you must start to nibble somewhere. He
and Harriet took numerous trips in the ferry steamers to the many nooks
and corners of the harbour. One day their ferry steamer bumped into a
collier that was heading for the harbour outlet - or rather, their ferry
boat headed across the nose of the collier, so the collier bumped into
them and had his nose put out of joint. There was a considerable amount
of yelling, but the ferry boat slid flatly away towards Manly, and
Harriet's excitement subsided.It was Sunday, and a lovely sunny day of Australian winter. Manly is the
bathing suburb of Sydney - one of them. You pass quite close to the wide
harbour gate, The Heads, on the ferry steamer. Then you land on the
wharf, and walk up the street, like a bit of Margate with sea-side shops
and restaurants, till you come out on a promenade at the end, and there
is the wide Pacific rolling in on the yellow sand: the wide fierce sea,
that makes all the built-over land dwindle into non-existence. At least
there was a heavy swell on, so the Pacific belied its name and crushed
the earth with its rollers. Perhaps the heavy, earth-despising swell is
part of its pacific nature.Harriet, of course, was enraptured, and declared she could not be happy
till she had lived beside the Pacific. They bought food and ate it by
the sea. Then Harriet was chilled, so they went to a restaurant for a
cup of soup. When they were again in the street Harriet realized that
she hadn't got her yellow scarf: her big, silky yellow scarf that was so
warm and lovely. She declared she had left it in the eating-house, and
they went back at once for it. The girls in the eating-house - the
waitresses - said, in their cheeky Cockney Australian that they &quot;hedn't
seen it&quot;, and that the &quot;next people who kyme arfter must 'ev tyken it&quot;.Anyhow, it was gone - and Harriet furious, feeling as if there had been a
thief in the night. In this unhappy state of affairs Somers suggested
they should sit on the tram-car and go somewhere. They sat on the
tram-car and ran for miles along a coast with ragged bush loused over
with thousands of small promiscuous bungalows, built of everything from
patchwork of kerosene tin up to fine red brick and stucco, like Margate.
Not far off the Pacific boomed. But fifty yards inland started these
bits of swamp, and endless promiscuity of &quot;cottages&quot;.The tram took them five or six miles, to the terminus. This was the end
of everywhere, with new &quot;stores&quot; - that is, flyblown shops with
corrugated iron roofs - and with a tramshelter, and little house-agents'
booths plastered with signs - and more &quot;cottages&quot;; that is, bungalows of
corrugated iron or brick - and bits of swamp or &quot;lagoon&quot; where the sea
had got in and couldn't get out. The happy couple had a drink of sticky
aerated waters in one of the &quot;stores&quot;, then walked up a wide sand-road
dotted on either side with small bungalows, beyond the backs of which
lay a whole aura of rusty tin cans chucked over the back fence. They
came to the ridge of sand, and again the pure, long-rolling Pacific.&quot;I love the sea,&quot; said Harriet.&quot;I wish,&quot; said Lovat, &quot;it would send a wave about fifty feet high round
the whole coast of Australia.&quot;&quot;You are so bad-tempered,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;Why don't you see the lovely
things!&quot;&quot;I do, by contrast.&quot;So they sat on the sands, and he peeled pears and buried the peel in the
yellow sand. It was winter, and the shore was almost deserted. But the
sun was warm as an English May.Harriet felt she absolutely must live by the sea, so they wandered along
a wide, rutted space of deep sand, looking at the &quot;cottages&quot; on either
side. They had impossible names. But in themselves, many of them were
really nice. Yet there they stood like so many forlorn chicken-houses,
each on its own oblong patch of land, with a fence between it and its
neighbour. There was something indescribably weary and dreary about it.
The very ground the houses stood on seemed weary and drabbled, almost
asking for rusty tin cans. And so many pleasant little bungalows set
there in an improvised road, wide and weary - and then the effort had
lapsed. The tin shacks were almost a relief. They did not call for
geraniums and lobelias, as did the pretty Hampstead Garden Suburb
&quot;cottages&quot;. And these latter might call, but they called in vain. They
got bits of old paper and tins.Yet Harriet absolutely wanted to live by the sea, so they stopped before
each bungalow that was to be let furnished. The estate agents went in
for abbreviations. On the boards at the corner of the fences it said
either &quot;4 Sale&quot; or &quot;2 Let&quot;. Probably there was a colonial intention of
jocularity. But it was almost enough for Somers. He would have died
rather than have put himself into one of those cottages.The road ended on the salt pool where the sea had ebbed in. Across was a
state reserve - a bit of aboriginal Australia, with gum trees and empty
spaces beyond the flat salt waters. Near at hand a man was working away,
silently loading a boat with beach-sand, upon the lagoon. To the right
the sea was rolling on the shore, and spurting high on some brown rocks.
Two men in bathing suits were running over the spit of sand from the
lagoon to the surf, where two women in &quot;waders&quot;, those rubber
paddling-drawers into which we bundle our children at the seaside, were
paddling along the fringe of the foam. A blond young man wearing a
jacket over his bathing suit walked by with two girls. He had huge
massive legs, astonishing. And near at hand Somers saw another youth
lying on the warm sand-hill in the sun. He had rolled in the dry sand
while he was wet, so he was hardly distinguishable. But he lay like an
animal on his face in the sun, and again Somers wondered at the thick
legs. They seemed to run to leg, these people. Three boys, one a lad of
fifteen or so, came out of the warm lagoon in their bathing suits to
roll in the sand and play. The big lad crawled on all fours and the
little one rode on his back, and pitched off into the sand. They were
extraordinarily like real young animals, mindless as opossums, lunging
about.This was Sunday afternoon. The sun was warm. The lonely man was just
pushing off his boat on the lagoon. It sat deep in the water, half full
of sand. Somers and Harriet lay on the sand-bank. Strange it was. And it
HAD a sort of fascination. Freedom! That's what they always say. &quot;You
feel free in Australia.&quot; And so you do. There is a great relief in the
atmosphere, a relief from tension, from pressure. An absence of control
or will or form. The sky is open above you, and the air is open around
you. Not the old closing-in of Europe.But what then? The VACANCY of this freedom is almost terrifying. In the
openness and the freedom this new chaos, this litter of bungalows and
tin cans scattered for miles and miles, this Englishness all crumbled
out into formlessness and chaos. Even the heart of Sydney itself - an
imitation of London and New York, without any core or pith of meaning.
Business going on full speed: but only because it is the other end of
English and American business.The absence of any inner meaning: and at the same time the great sense
of vacant spaces. The sense of irresponsible freedom. The sense of
do-as-you-please liberty. And all utterly uninteresting. What is more
hopelessly uninteresting than accomplished liberty? Great swarming,
teeming Sydney flowing out into these myriads of bungalows, like shallow
waters spreading, undyked. And what then? Nothing. No inner life, no
high command, no interest in anything, finally.Somers turned over and shut his eyes. New countries were more
problematic than old ones. One loved the sense of release from old
pressure and old tight control, from the old world of water-tight
compartments. This was Sunday afternoon, but with none of the surfeited
dreariness of English Sunday afternoons. It was still a raw loose world.
All Sydney would be out by the sea or in the bush, a roving, unbroken
world. They all rushed from where they were to somewhere else, on
holidays. And to-morrow they'd all be working away, with just as little
meaning, working without any meaning, playing without any meaning; and
yet quite strenuous at it all. It was just dazing. Even the rush for
money had no real pip in it. They really cared very little for the power
that money can give. And except for the sense of power, that had no real
significance here. When all is said and done, even money is not much
good where there is no genuine culture. Money is a means to rising to a
higher, subtler, fuller state of consciousness, or nothing. And when you
flatly don't want a fuller consciousness, what good is your money to
you? Just to chuck about and gamble with. Even money is a European
invention - European and American. It has no real magic in Australia.Poor Richard Lovat wearied himself to death struggling with the problem
of himself, and calling it Australia. There was no actual need for him
to struggle with Australia: he must have done it in the hedonistic
sense, to please himself. But it wore him to rags.Harriet sat up and began dusting the sand from her coat - Lovat did
likewise. Then they rose to be going back to the tram-car. There was a
motor-car standing on the sand of the road near the gate of the end
house. The end house was called St. Columb, and Somers' heart flew to
Cornwall. It was quite a nice little place, standing on a bluff of sand
sideways above the lagoon.&quot;I wouldn't mind that,&quot; said Harriet, looking up at St. Columb.But Somers did not answer. He was shut against any of these humiliating
little bungalows. &quot;Love's Harbour&quot; he was just passing by, and it was &quot;4
Sale&quot;. It would be. He ploughed grimly through the sand.
&quot;Arcady&quot; - &quot;Stella Maris&quot; - &quot;Racketty-Coo.&quot;&quot;I say!&quot; called a voice from behind.It was Mrs. Callcott running unevenly over the sand after them, the
colour high in her cheeks. She wore a pale grey crepe de chine dress and
grey suede shoes. Some distance behind her Jack Callcott was following,
in his shirt-sleeves.&quot;Fancy you being here!&quot; gasped Mrs. Callcott, and Harriet was so
flustered she could only cry:&quot;Oh, how do you do!&quot; - and effusively shake hands, as if she were meeting
some former acquaintance on Piccadilly. The shaking hands quite put Mrs.
Callcott off her track. She felt it almost an affront, and went red. Her
husband sauntered up and put his hands in his pockets, to avoid
mistakes.&quot;Ha, what are YOU doing here,&quot; he said to the Somers pair. &quot;Wouldn't you
like a cup of tea?&quot;Harriet glanced at Richard Lovat. He was smiling faintly.&quot;Oh, we should LOVE it,&quot; she replied to Mr. Callcott. &quot;But where? - have
you got a house here?&quot;&quot;My sister has the end house,&quot; said he.&quot;Oh, but - will she want us?&quot; cried Harriet, backing out.The Callcotts stood for a moment silent.&quot;Yes, if you like to come,&quot; said Jack. And it was evident he was aware
of Somers' desire to avoid contact.&quot;Well, I should be awfully grateful,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;Wouldn't you,
Lovat?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; he said, smiling to himself, feeling Jack's manly touch of
contempt for all this hedging.So off they went to &quot;St. Columb&quot;. The sister was a brown-eyed Australian
with a decided manner, kindly, but a little suspicious of the two
newcomers. Her husband was a young Cornishman, rather stout and short
and silent. He had his hair cut round at the back, in a slightly rounded
line above a smooth, sunburnt, reddened nape of the neck. Somers found
out later that this young Cornishman - his name was Trewhella - had
married his brother's widow. Mrs. Callcott supplied Harriet later on
with all the information concerning her sister-in-law. The first
Trewhella, Alfred John, had died two years ago, leaving his wife with a
neat sum of money and this house, &quot;St. Columb&quot;, and also with a little
girl named Gladys, who came running in shaking her long brown hair just
after the Somers appeared. So the present Trewhellas were a
newly-married couple. The present husband, William James, went round in
a strange, silent fashion helping his wife Rose to prepare tea.The bungalow was pleasant, a large room facing the sea, with verandahs
and other little rooms opening off. There were many family photographs,
and a framed medal and ribbon and letter praising the first Trewhella.
Mrs. Trewhella was alert and watchful, and decided to be genteel. So the
party sat around in the basket chairs and on the settles under the
windows, instead of sitting at table for tea. And William James silently
but willingly carried round the bread and butter and the cakes.He was a queer young man, with an Irish-looking face, rather pale, an
odd kind of humour in his grey eye and in the corners of his pursed
mouth. But he spoke never a word. It was hard to decide his
age - probably about thirty - a little younger than his wife. He seemed
silently pleased about something - perhaps his marriage. Somers noticed
that the whites of his eyes were rather bloodshot. He had been in
Australia since he was a boy of fifteen - he had come with his
brother - from St. Columb, near Newquay - St. Columb Major. So much Somers
elicited.&quot;Well, how do you like Sydney?&quot; came the inevitable question from Mrs.
Trewhella.&quot;The harbour, I think, is wonderful,&quot; came Somers' invariable answer.&quot;It is a fine harbour, isn't it. And Sydney is a fine town. Oh yes, I've
lived there all my life.&quot;The conversation languished. Callcott was silent, and William James
seemed as if he were never anything else. Even the little girl fluttered
into a whisper and went still again. Everybody was a little embarrassed,
rather stiff: too genteel, or not genteel enough. And the men seemed
absolute logs.&quot;You don't think much of Australia, then?&quot; said Jack to Somers.&quot;Why,&quot; answered the latter, &quot;how am I to judge! I haven't even seen the
fringe of it.&quot;&quot;Oh, it's mostly fringe,&quot; said Jack. &quot;But it hasn't made a good
impression on you?&quot;&quot;I don't know yet. My feelings are mixed. The COUNTRY seems to me to
have a fascination - strange - .&quot;&quot;But you don't take to the Aussies, at first sight. Bit of a collision
between their aura and yours,&quot; smiled Jack.&quot;Maybe that's what it is,&quot; said Somers. &quot;That's a useful way of putting
it. I can't help my aura colliding, can I?&quot;&quot;Of course you can't. And if it's a tender sort of aura, of course it
feels the bump.&quot;&quot;Oh, don't talk about it,&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;He must be just one big bump,
by the way he grumbles.&quot;They all laughed - perhaps a trifle uneasily.&quot;I thought so,&quot; said Jack. &quot;What made you come here? Thought you'd like
to write about it?&quot;&quot;I thought I might like to live here - and write here,&quot; replied Somers
smiling.&quot;Write about the bushrangers and the heroine lost in the bush and
wandering into a camp of bullies?&quot; said Jack.&quot;Maybe,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Do you mind if I ask you what sort of things you do write?&quot; said Jack,
with some delicacy.&quot;Oh - poetry - essays.&quot;&quot;Essays about what?&quot;&quot;Oh - rubbish mostly.&quot;There was a moment's pause.&quot;Oh, Lovat, don't be so silly. You KNOW you don't think your essays
rubbish,&quot; put in Harriet. &quot;They're about life, and democracy, and
equality, and all that sort of thing,&quot; Harriet explained.&quot;Oh, yes?&quot; said Jack. &quot;I'd like to read some.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; hesitated Harriet, &quot;He can lend you a volume - you've got some
with you, haven't you?&quot; she added, turning to Somers.&quot;I've got one,&quot; admitted that individual, looking daggers at her.&quot;Well, you'll lend it to Mr. Callcott, won't you?&quot;&quot;If he wants it. But it will only bore him.&quot;&quot;I might rise up to it, you know,&quot; said Jack laconically, &quot;if I bring
all my mental weight to bear on it.&quot;Somers flushed, and laughed at the contradiction in metaphor.&quot;It's not the loftiness,&quot; he said, rather amused. &quot;It's that people just
don't care to hear some things.&quot;&quot;Well, let me try,&quot; said Jack. &quot;We're a new country - and we're out to
learn.&quot;&quot;That's exactly what we're not,&quot; broke out William James, with a Cornish
accent and a blurt of a laugh. &quot;We're out to show to everybody that we
know everything there is to be known.&quot;&quot;That's some of us,&quot; said Jack.&quot;And most of us,&quot; said William James.&quot;Have it your own way, boy. But let us speak for the minority. And
there's a minority that knows we've got to learn a big lesson - and
that's willing to learn it.&quot;Again there was silence. The women seemed almost effaced.&quot;There's one thing,&quot; thought Somers to himself, &quot;when these Colonials DO
speak seriously, they speak like men, not like babies.&quot; He looked up at
Jack.&quot;It's the world that's got to learn a lesson,&quot; he said. &quot;Not only
Australia.&quot; His tone was acid and sinister. And he looked with his hard,
pale blue eyes at Callcott. Callcott's eyes, brown and less
concentrated, less hard, looked back curiously at the other man.&quot;Possibly it is,&quot; he said. &quot;But my job is Australia.&quot;Somers watched him. Callcott had a pale, clean-shaven, lean face with
close-shut lips. But his lips weren't bitten in until they just formed a
slit, as they so often are in Colonials. And his eyes had a touch of
mystery, of aboriginal darkness.&quot;Do you care very much for Australia?&quot; said Somers, a little wistfully.&quot;I believe I do,&quot; said Jack. &quot;But if I was out of a job like plenty of
other unlucky diggers, I suppose I should care more about getting a
job.&quot;&quot;But you care very much about your Australia?&quot;&quot;My Australia? Yes, I own about seven acres of it, all told. I suppose I
care very much about that. I pay my taxes on it, all right.&quot;&quot;No, but the future of Australia.&quot;&quot;You'll never see me on a platform shouting about it.&quot;The Lovats said they must be going.&quot;If you like to crowd in,&quot; said Jack, &quot;we can take you in the car. We
can squeeze in Mr. Somers in front, and there'll be plenty of room for
the others at the back, if Gladys sits on her Dad's knee.&quot;This time Somers accepted at once. He felt the halting refusals were
becoming ridiculous.They left at sunset. The west, over the land, was a clear gush of light
up from the departed sun. The east, over the Pacific, was a tall concave
of rose-coloured clouds, a marvellous high apse. Now the bush had gone
dark and spectral again, on the right hand. You might still imagine
inhuman presences moving among the gum trees. And from time to time, on
the left hand, they caught sight of the long green rollers of the
Pacific, with the star-white foam, and behind that the dusk-green sea
glimmered over with smoky rose, reflected from the eastern horizon where
the bank of flesh-rose colour and pure smoke-blue lingered a long time,
like magic, as if the sky's rim were cooling down. It seemed to Somers
characteristic of Australia, this far-off flesh-rose bank of colour on
the sky's horizon, so tender and unvisited, topped with the smoky,
beautiful blueness. And then the thickness of the night's stars
overhead, and one star very brave in the last effulgence of sunset,
westward over the continent. As soon as night came, all the raggletaggle
of amorphous white settlements disappeared, and the continent of the
Kangaroo reassumed its strange, unvisited glamour, a kind of virgin
sensual aloofness.Somers sat in front between Jack and Victoria Callcott, because he was
so slight. He made himself as small as he could, like the ham in the
sandwich. When he looked her way, he found Victoria watching him under
her lashes, and as she met his eyes, she flared into a smile that filled
him with wonder. She had such a charming, innocent look, like an
innocent girl, naive and a little gawky. Yet the strange exposed smile
she gave him in the dusk. It puzzled him to know what to make of it.
Like an offering - and yet innocent. Perhaps like the sacred prostitutes
of the temple: acknowledgement of the sacredness of the act. He chose
not to think of it, and stared away across the bonnet of the car at the
fading land.Queer, thought Somers, this girl at once sees perhaps the most real me,
and most women take me for something I am not at all. Queer to be
recognized at once, as if one were of the same family.He had to admit that he was flattered also. She seemed to see the wonder
in him. And she had none of the European women's desire to make a
conquest of him, none of that feminine rapacity which is so hateful in
the old world. She seemed like an old Greek girl bringing an offering to
the altar of the mystic Bacchus. The offering of herself.Her husband sat steering the car and smoking his short pipe in silence.
He seemed to have something to think about. At least he had considerable
power of silence, a silence which made itself felt. Perhaps he knew his
wife much better than anyone else. At any rate he did not feel it
necessary to keep an eye on her. If she liked to look at Somers with a
strange, exposed smile, that was her affair. She could do as she liked
in that direction, so far as he, Jack Callcott, was concerned. She was
his wife: she knew it, and he knew it. And it was quite established and
final. So long as she did not betray what was between her and him, as
husband and wife, she could do as she liked with the rest of herself.
And he could, quite rightly, trust her to be faithful to that
undefinable relation which subsisted between them as man and wife. He
didn't pretend and didn't want to occupy the whole field of her
consciousness.And in just the same way, that bond which connected himself with her, he
would always keep unbroken for his part. But that did not mean that he
was sworn body and soul to his wife. Oh no. There was a good deal of him
which did not come into the marriage bond, and with all this part of
himself he was free to make the best he could, according to his own
idea. He loved her, quite sincerely, for her naive sophisticated
innocence which allowed him to be unknown to her, except in so far as
they were truly and intimately related. It was the innocence which has
been through the fire, and knows its own limitations. In the same way he
quite consciously chose not to know anything more about her than just so
much as entered into the absolute relationship between them. He quite
definitely did not want to absorb her, or to occupy the whole field of
her nature. He would trust her to go her own way, only keeping her to
the pledge that was between them. What this pledge consisted in he did
not try to define. It was something indefinite: the field of contact
between their two personalities. Where their two personalities met and
joined, they were one, and pledged to permanent fidelity. But that part
in each of them which did not belong to the other was free from all
enquiry or even from knowledge. Each silently consented to leave the
other in large part unknown, unknown in word and deed and very being.
They didn't WANT to know - too much knowledge would be like shackles.Such marriage is established on a very subtle sense of honour and of
individual integrity. It seems as if each race and continent has its own
marriage instinct. And the instinct that develops in Australia will
certainly not be the same as the instinct that develops in America. And
each people must follow its own instinct, if it is to live, not matter
whether the marriage law be universal or not.The Callcotts had come to no agreement, verbally, as to their marriage.
They had not thought it out. They were Australians, of strongly,
subtly-developed desire for freedom, and with considerable indifference
to old formulae and the conventions based thereon. So they took their
stand instinctively and calmly. Jack had defined his stand as far as he
found necessary. If his wife was good to him and satisfied him in so far
as HE went, then he was pledged to trust her to do as she liked outside
his ken, outside his range. He would make a cage for nobody. This he
openly propounded to his mates: to William James, for example, and later
to Somers. William James said yes, but thought the more. Somers was
frankly disturbed, not liking the thought of applying the same
prescription to his own marriage.They put down the Trewhellas at their house in North Sydney, and went on
to Murdoch Road over the ferry. Jack had still to take the car down to
the garage in town. Victoria said she would prepare the high tea which
takes the place of dinner and supper in Australia, against his return.
So Harriet boldly invited them to this high tea - a real substantial meal
in her own house. Victoria was to help her prepare it, and Jack was to
come straight back to Torestin. Victoria was as pleased as a lamb with
two tails over this arrangement, and went in to change her dress.Somers knew why Harriet had launched this invitation. It was because she
had had a wonderfully successful cooking morning. Like plenty of other
women Harriet had learned to cook during war-time, and now she loved it,
once in a while. This had been one of the whiles. Somers had stoked the
excellent little stove, and peeled the apples and potatoes and onions
and pumpkin, and looked after the meat and the sauces, while Harriet had
lashed out in pies and tarts and little cakes and baked custard. She now
surveyed her prize Beeton shelf with love, and began to whisk up a
mayonnaise for potato salad.Victoria appeared in a pale gauze dress of pale pink with little dabs of
gold - a sort of tea-party dress - and with her brown hair loosely knotted
behind, and with innocent sophistication pulled a bit untidy over her
womanly forehead, she looked winsome. Her colour was very warm, and she
was gawkily excited. Harriet put on an old yellow silk frock, and Somers
changed into a dark suit. For tea there was cold roast pork with
first-class brown crackling on it, and potato salad, beetroot, and
lettuce, and apple chutney; then a dressed lobster - or crayfish, very
good, pink and white; and then apple pie and custard-tarts and cakes and
a dish of apples and passion fruits and oranges, a pine-apple and some
bananas: and of course big cups of tea, breakfast-cups.Victoria and Harriet were delighted, Somers juggled with colour-schemes
on the table, the one central room in the bungalow was brilliantly
lighted, and the kettle sang on the hearth. After months of India, with
all the Indian decorum and two silent men-servants waiting at table: and
after the old-fashioned gentility of the P. and O. steamer, Somers and
Harriet felt this show rather a come-down maybe, but still good fun.
Victoria felt it was almost &quot;society&quot;. They waited for Jack.Jack arrived bending forward rather in the doorway, a watchful look on
his pale, clean-shaven face, and that atmosphere of silence about him
which is characteristic of many Australians.&quot;Kept you waiting?&quot; he asked.&quot;We were just ready for you,&quot; said Harriet.Jack had to carve the meat, because Somers was so bad at it and didn't
like doing it. Harriet poured the great cups of tea. Callcott looked
with a quick eye round the table to see exactly what he wanted to eat,
and Victoria peeped through her lashes to see exactly how Harriet
behaved. As Harriet always behaved in the vaguest manner possible, and
ate her sweets with her fish-fork and her soup with her pudding spoon, a
study of her table manners was not particularly profitable.To Somers it was like being back twenty-five years, back in an English
farm-house in the Midlands, at Sunday tea. He had gone a long way from
the English Midlands, and got out of the way of them. Only to find them
here again, with hardly a change. To Harriet it was all novel and fun.
But Richard Lovat felt vaguely depressed.The pleasant heartiness of the life he had known as a boy now depressed
him. He hated the promiscuous mixing in of all the company, the lack of
reserve in manner. He had preferred India for that: the gulf between the
native servants and the whites kept up a sort of tone. He had learned to
be separate, to talk across a slight distance. And that was an immense
relief to him, because it was really more his nature. Now he found
himself soused again in the old familiar jolly and cosy, spirit of his
childhood and boyhood, and he was depressed.Jack, of course, had a certain reserve. But of a different sort. Not a
physical reserve. He did keep his coat on, but he might as well have sat
there in his shirt-sleeves. His very silence was, so to speak, in its
shirt-sleeves.There was a curious battle in silence going on between the two men. To
Harriet, all this familiar shirt-sleeve business was just fun, the
charades. In her most gushing genial moments she was still only
masquerading inside her class - the &quot;upper&quot; class of Europe. But Somers
was of the people himself, and he had that alert INSTINCT of the common
people, the instinctive knowledge of what his neighbour was wanting and
thinking, and the instinctive necessity to answer. With the other
classes, there is a certain definite breach between individual and
individual, and not much goes across except what is intended to go
across. But with the common people, and with most Australians, there is
no breach. The communication is silent and involuntary, the give and
take flows like waves from person to person, and each one knows: unless
he is foiled by speech. Each one knows in silence, reciprocates in
silence, and the talk as a rule just babbles on, on the surface. This is
the common people among themselves. But there is this difference in
Australia. Each individual seems to feel himself pledged to put himself
aside, to keep himself at least half out of count. The whole geniality
is based on a sort of code of &quot;You put yourself aside, and I'll put
myself aside.&quot; This is done with a watchful will: a sort of duel. And
above this, a great geniality. But the continual holding most of himself
aside, out of count, makes a man go blank in his withheld self. And
that, too, is puzzling.Probably this is more true of the men than of the women. Probably women
change less, from land to land, play fewer &quot;code&quot; tricks with
themselves. At any rate, Harriet and Victoria got on like a house on
fire, and as they were both beautiful women, and both looking well as
they talked, everything seemed splendid. But Victoria was really paying
just a wee bit of homage all the time, homage to the superior class.As for the two men: Somers SEEMED a gentleman, and Jack didn't want to
be a gentleman. Somers SEEMED a real gentleman. And yet Jack recognized
in him at once the intuitive response which only subsists, normally,
between members of the same class: between the common people. Perhaps
the best of the upper classes have the same intuitive understanding of
their fellow-man: but there is always a certain reserve in the response,
a preference for the non-intuitive forms of communication, for
deliberate speech. What is not said is supposed not to exist: that is
almost code of honour with the other classes. With the true common
people, only that which is NOT said is of any vital significance.Which brings us back to Jack and Somers. The one thing Somers had kept,
and which he possessed in a very high degree, was the power of intuitive
communication with others. Much as he wanted to be alone, to stand clear
from the weary business of unanimity with everybody, he had never chosen
really to suspend this power of intuitive response: not till he was
personally offended, and then it switched off and became a blank wall.
But the smallest act of real kindness would call it back to life again.Jack had been generous, and Somers liked him. Therefore he could not
withhold his soul from responding to him, in a measure. And Jack, what
did he want? He saw this other little fellow, a gentleman, apparently,
and yet different, not exactly a gentleman. And he wanted to know him,
to talk to him. He wanted to get at the bottom of him. For there was
something about Somers - he might be a German, he might be a bolshevist,
he might be anything, and he MUST be something, because he was
different, a gentleman and not a gentleman. He was different because,
when he looked at you, he knew you more or less in your own terms, not
as an outsider. He looked at you as if he were one of your own sort. He
answered you intuitively as if he were one of your own sort. And yet he
had the speech and the clear definiteness of a gentleman. Neither one
thing nor the other. And he seemed to know a lot, Jack was sure that
Somers knew a lot, and could tell him a lot, if he would but let it out.If he had been just a gentleman, of course, Jack would never have
thought of wanting him to open out. Because a gentleman has nothing to
open towards a man of the people. He can only talk, and the working man
can only listen across a distance. But seeing that this little fellow
was born a gentleman and not a gentleman; seeing he was just like one of
yourselves, and yet had all the other qualities of a gentleman: why, you
might just as well get the secret out of him.Somers knew the attitude, and was not going to be drawn. He talked
freely and pleasantly enough - but never as Jack wanted. He knew well
enough what Jack wanted: which was that they should talk together as man
to man - as pals, you know, with a little difference. But Somers would
never be pals with any man. It wasn't in his nature. He talked
pleasantly and familiarly - fascinating to Victoria, who sat with her
brown eyes watching him, while she clung to Jack's arm on the sofa. When
Somers was talking and telling, it was fascinating, and his quick,
mobile face changed and seemed full of magic. Perhaps it was difficult
to locate any definite SOMERS, any one individual in all this ripple of
animation and communication. The man himself seemed lost in the bright
aura of his rapid consciousness. This fascinated Victoria: she of course
imagined some sort of God in the fiery bush. But Jack was mistrustful.
He mistrusted all this bright quickness. If there was an individual
inside the brightly-burning bush of consciousness, let him come out, man
to man. Even if it was a sort of God in the bush, let him come out, man
to man. Otherwise let him be considered a sort of mountebank, a
show-man, too clever by half.Somers knew pretty well Jack's estimation of him. Jack, sitting there
smoking his little short pipe, with his lovely wife in her pink
georgette frock hanging on to his side, and the watchful look on his
face, was the manly man, the consciously manly man. And he had just a
bit of contempt for the brilliant little fellow opposite, and he felt
just a bit uneasy because the same little fellow laughed at his
&quot;manliness&quot;, knowing it didn't go right through. It takes more than
&quot;manliness&quot; to make a man.Somers' very brilliance had an overtone of contempt in it, for the other
man. The women, of course, not demanding any orthodox &quot;manliness&quot;,
didn't mind the knock at Jack's particular sort. And to them Somers'
chief fascination lay in the fact that he was never &quot;pals&quot;. They were
too deeply women to care for the sham of pals.So Jack went home after a whisky and soda with his nose a little bit out
of joint. The little man was never going to be pals, that was the first
fact to be digested. And he couldn't be despised as a softy, he was too
keen; he just laughed at the other man's attempt at despising him. Yet
Jack did want to get at him, somehow or other.>



Chapter follows chapter, and nothing doing. But man is a
thought-adventurer, and his falls into the Charybdis of ointment, and
his shipwrecks on the rock of ages, and his kisses across chasms, and
his silhouette on a minaret: surely these are as thrilling as most
things.To be brief, there was a Harriet, a Kangaroo, a Jack and a Jaz and a
Vicky, let alone a number of mere Australians. But you know as well as I
do that Harriet is quite happy rubbing her hair with hair-wash and
brushing it over her forehead in the sun and looking at the threads of
gold and gun-metal, and the few threads, alas, of silver and tin, with
admiration. And Kangaroo has just got a very serious brief, with
thousands and thousands of pounds at stake in it. Of course he is fully
occupied keeping them at stake, till some of them wander into his
pocket. And Jack and Vicky have gone down to her father's for the
week-end, and he's out fishing, and has already landed a rock-cod, a
leather-jacket, a large schnapper, a rainbow-fish, seven black-fish, and
a cuttlefish. So what's wrong with him? While she is trotting over on a
pony to have a look at an old sweetheart who is much too young to be
neglected. And Jaz is arguing with a man about the freight-rates. And
all the scattered Australians are just having a bet on something or
other. So what's wrong with Richard's climbing a mental minaret or two
in the interim? Of course there isn't any interim. But you KNOW that
Harriet is brushing her hair in the sun, and Kangaroo looking at huge
sums of money on paper, and Jack fishing, and Vicky flirting and Jaz
bargaining, so what more do you want to know? We can't be at a stretch
of tension ALL the time, like the E string on a fiddle. If you don't
like the novel, don't read it. If the pudding doesn't please you, leave
it, leave it.Idon't mind your saucy plate. I know too well that you
can bring an ass to water, etc.As for gods, thought Richard, there are gods of vengeance. &quot;For I, the
Lord thy God, am a jealous God.&quot; So true. A jealous God, and a
vengeful - &quot;Visiting the sins of the fathers upon the children, unto the
third and fourth generation of them that hate me.&quot; Of course. The
fathers get off. You don't begin to pay the penalty till the second and
third generation. That is something for US to put in our pipes and
smoke. Because WE are the second generation, and it was our fathers who
had a nice rosy time among the flesh-pots, cooking themselves the
tit-bits of this newly-gutted globe of ours. They cooked the tit-bits,
we are left with the carrion.&quot;The Lord thy God am a jealous God.&quot;So he is. The Lord thy God is the invisible stranger at the gate in the
night, knocking. He is the mysterious life-suggestion, tapping for
admission. And the wondrous Victorian Age managed to fasten the door so
tight, and light up the compound so brilliantly with electric light,
that really, there WAS no outside, it was all in. The unknown became a
joke: is still a joke.Yet there it is, outside the gate, getting angry. &quot;Behold I stand at the
gate and knock.&quot; &quot;Knock away,&quot; said complacent, benevolent humanity,
which had just discovered its own monkey origin to account for its own
monkey tricks. &quot;Knock away, nobody will hinder you from knocking.&quot;And Holman Hunt paints a pretty picture of a man with a
Stars-and-Stripes lantern and a red beard, knocking. But whoever it is
that's knocking had been knocking for three generations now, and he's
got sick of it. He'll be kicking the door in just now.&quot;For I the Lord thy God am a jealous God.&quot;It is not that He is jealous of Thor or Zeus or Bacchus or Venus. The
great dark God outside the gate is all these gods. You open the gate,
and sometimes in rushes Thor and gives you a bang on the head with a
hammer; or Bacchus comes mysteriously through, and your mind goes dark
and your knees and thighs begin to glow; or it is Venus, and you close
your eyes and open your nostrils to a perfume, like a bull. All the
gods. When they come through the gate they are personified. But outside
the gate it is one dark God, the Unknown. And the Unknown is a terribly
jealous God, and vengeful. A fearfully vengeful god: Moloch, Astarte,
Ashtaroth, and Baal. That is why we dare not open now. It would be a
hell-god, and we know it. We are the second generation. Our children are
the third. And our children's children are the fourth. Eheu! Eheu! Who
knocks?Jack trotted over to Coo-ee on the Sunday afternoon, when he was staying
with his wife's people. He knew Richard and Harriet would most probably
be at home: they didn't like going out on Sundays, when all the world
and his wife in their exceedingly Sunday clothes, swarmed on the face of
the earth.Yes, they were at home: sitting on the verandah, a bit of rain spitting
from the grey sky, and the sea gone colourless and small. Suddenly,
there stood Jack. He had come round the corner on to the grass. Somers
started as if an enemy were upon him. Jack looked very tall and wiry, in
an old grey suit. He hesitated before coming forward, as if measuring
the pair of unsuspecting turtle doves on the loggia, and on his face was
a faint grin. His eyes were dark and grinning too, as he hung back
there. Somers watched him quickly. Harriet looked over her shoulder.&quot;Oh, Mr. Callcott - why - how do you do?&quot; And she got up, startled, and
went across the loggia holding out her hand, to shake hands. So Jack had
to come forward. Richard, very silent, shook hands also, and went
indoors to fetch a chair and a cup and a plate, while Jack made his
explanation to Harriet. He was quite friendly with her.&quot;Such a long time since we saw you,&quot; she was saying. &quot;Why didn't Mrs.
Callcott come, I should have liked so much to see her?&quot;&quot;Ah - you see I came over on the pony. Doesn't look very promising
weather.&quot; And he looked away across the sea, averting his face.&quot;No - and the TERRIBLE cold winds! I'm so glad if it will rain. I simply
love the smell of rain in the air: especially here in Australia. It
makes the air seem so much KINDER, not so dry and savage - .&quot;&quot;Ah - yes - it does,&quot; he said vaguely, still averting his face from her.
He seemed strange to her. And his face looked different - as if he had
been drinking, or as if he had indigestion.The two men were aloof like two strange tom-cats.&quot;Were you disgusted with Lovat when he didn't turn up the other
Saturday?&quot; said Harriet. &quot;I do hope you weren't sitting waiting for
him.&quot;&quot;Well - er - yes, we did wait up a while for him.&quot;&quot;Oh, but what a shame! But you know by now he's the most undependable
creature on earth. I wish you'd be angry with him. It's no good whatIsay.&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said he - the peculiar slow Cockney no - &quot;I'm not angry with him.&quot;&quot;But you should be,&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;It would be good for him.&quot;&quot;Would it?&quot; smiled Jack. His eyes were dark and inchoate, and there
seemed a devil in his long, wiry body. He did not look at Somers.&quot;You know of course what happened?&quot;&quot;Er - when?&quot;&quot;When Lovat went to see Mr. Cooley.&quot;&quot;Er - no.&quot;Again that peculiar Australian no, like a scorpion that stings with its
tail.&quot;Didn't Mr. Cooley tell you?&quot; cried Harriet.&quot;No.&quot; There was indescribable malice in the monosyllable.&quot;Didn't he - !&quot; cried Harriet, and she hesitated.&quot;You be quiet,&quot; said Lovat crossly to her. &quot;Of course YOU'D have to rush
in.&quot;&quot;You think angels would fear to tread in such a delicate mess?&quot; said
Harriet, with a flash of mocking wit that sent a faint smile up Jack's
face, like a red flame. His nose, his mouth were curiously reddened. He
liked Harriet's attacks. He looked at her with dark, attentive eyes.
Then he turned vaguely to Somers.&quot;What was it?&quot; he asked.&quot;Nothing at all new,&quot; said Somers. &quot;You know he and I start to quarrel
the moment we set eyes on one another.&quot;&quot;They might be man and wife,&quot; mocked Harriet, and again Jack turned to
her a look of black, smiling, malicious recognition.&quot;Another quarrel?&quot; he said quietly.But Somers was almost SURE he knew all about it, and had only come like
a spy to take soundings.&quot;Another quarrel,&quot; he replied, smiling, fencing. &quot;And once more shown
the door.&quot;&quot;I should think,&quot; said Harriet, &quot;you'd soon know that door when you see
it.&quot;&quot;Oh, yes,&quot; said Richard. He had not told her the worst of the encounter.
He never told her the worst, nor her nor anybody.Jack was looking from one to the other to see how much each knew.&quot;Was it a specially bad blow-up?&quot; he said, in his quiet voice, that had
a lurking tone of watchfulness in it.&quot;Oh, yes, final,&quot; laughed Richard. &quot;I am even going to leave Australia.&quot;&quot;When?&quot;&quot;I think in six weeks.&quot;There was silence for some moments.&quot;You've not booked your berths yet?&quot; asked Jack.&quot;No. I must go up to Sydney.&quot;Again Jack waited before he spoke. Then he said:&quot;What's made you settle on going?&quot;&quot;I don't know. I feel it's my fate to go now.&quot;&quot;Ha, your fate!&quot; said Harriet. &quot;It's always your fate with you. If it
was me it would be my foolish restlessness.&quot;Jack looked at her with another quick smile, and a curious glance of
dark recognition in his eyes, almost like a caress. Strangely apart,
too, as if he and she were in an inner dark circle, and Somers was away
outside.&quot;Don't you want to go, Mrs. Somers?&quot; he asked.&quot;Of course I don't. I love Australia,&quot; she protested.&quot;Then don't you go,&quot; said Jack. &quot;You stop behind.&quot;When he lowered his voice it took on a faint, indescribable huskiness.
It made Harriet a little uneasy. She watched Lovat. She did not like
Jack's new turn of husky intimacy. She wanted Richard to rescue her.&quot;Ha!&quot; she said. &quot;He'd never be able to get through the world without
me.&quot;&quot;Does it matter?&quot; said Jack, grinning faintly at her and keeping the
husky note in his voice. &quot;He knows his own mind - or his fate. You stop
here. We'll look after you.&quot;But she watched Richard. He was hardly listening. He was thinking again
that Jack was feeling malevolent towards him, wanting to destroy him, as
in those early days when they used to play chess together.&quot;No,&quot; said Harriet, watching Lovat's face. &quot;I suppose I shall have to
trail myself along, poor woman, till I see the end of him.&quot;&quot;He'll lead you many a dance before that happens,&quot; grinned Richard. He
rather enjoyed Jack's malevolence this time.&quot;Ha, you've led me all your dances that you know,&quot; she retorted. &quot;I know
there'll be nothing new, unfortunately.&quot;&quot;Why don't you stay in Australia?&quot; Jack said to her, with the same
quiet, husky note of intimacy, insistency, and the reddish light on his
face.She was somewhat startled and offended. Wasn't the man sober, or what?&quot;Oh, he wouldn't give me any money, and I haven't a sou of my own,&quot; she
said lightly, laughing it off.&quot;You wouldn't be short of money,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Plenty of money.&quot;&quot;You see I couldn't just live on charity, could I?&quot; she replied,
delicately.&quot;It wouldn't be charity.&quot;&quot;What then?&quot;There was a very awkward pause. Then a wicked redness came into Jack's
face, and a flicker into his voice.&quot;Appreciation. You'd be appreciated.&quot; He seemed to speak with muted
lips. There was a cold silence. Harriet was offended now.&quot;I'll just clear the table,&quot; she said, rising briskly.Jack sat rather slack in his chair, his long, malevolent body half sunk,
and his chin dropped.&quot;What boat do you think you'll catch?&quot; he asked.&quot;The Manganui. Why?&quot;But Jack did not speak. He sat there with his head sunk on his chin, his
body half-turgid, as if he were really not quite sober.&quot;You won't be honouring Australia long with your presence,&quot; he said
ironically.&quot;Nor dishonouring it,&quot; said Richard. He was like a creature that is
going to escape. Some of the fear he had felt for Kangaroo he now felt
for Jack. Jack was really very malevolent. There was hell in his
reddened face, and in his black, inchoate eyes, and in his long, pent-up
body. But he kept an air of quiescence, of resignation, as if he were
still really benevolent.&quot;Oh, I don't say that,&quot; he remarked in answer to Richard's last, but in
a tone which said so plainly what he felt: an insulting tone.Said Richard to himself: &quot;I wouldn't like to fall into your clutches, my
friend, altogether: or to give your benevolence a chance to condemn me.&quot;Aloud, he said to Jack:&quot;If I can't join in with what you're doing here, heart and soul, I'd
better take myself off, hadn't I? You've all been good to me, and in a
measure, trusted me. I shall always owe you a debt of gratitude, and
keep your trust inviolable. You know that. But I am one of those who
must stand and wait - though I don't pretend that by so doing I also
serve.&quot;&quot;You take no risks,&quot; said Jack quietly.Another home-thrust.&quot;Why - I would take risks - if only I felt it was any good.&quot;&quot;What does it matter about it's being any good? You can't tell what good
a thing will be or won't be. All you can do is to take a bet on it.&quot;&quot;You see it isn't my nature to bet.&quot;&quot;Not a sporting nature, you mean?&quot;&quot;No, not a sporting nature.&quot;&quot;Like a woman - you like to feel safe all round,&quot; said Jack, slowly
raising his dark eyes to Somers in a faint smile of contempt and
malevolence. And Richard had to acknowledge to himself that he WAS
cutting a poor figure: nosing in, like a Mr. Nosy Parker, then drawing
back quickly if he saw two sparks fly.&quot;Do you think I've let you down? I never pledged myself,&quot; he said
coldly.&quot;Oh, no, you never pledged yourself&quot; said Jack laconically.&quot;You see I don't BELIEVE in these things,&quot; said Somers, flushing.&quot;What's that you don't believe in?&quot;And Jack watched him with two black round eyes, with a spark dancing
slowly in each, in a slow gaze putting forth all his power. But Somers
now looked back into the two dark, malevolent pools.&quot;In revolutions - and public love and benevolence and feeling righteous,&quot;
he said.&quot;What love, what benevolence and righteousness?&quot; asked Jack, vaguely,
still watching with those black, sardonic eyes. &quot;I never said anything
about them.&quot;&quot;You know you want to be the saviours of Australia,&quot; said Richard.&quot;I didn't know. But what's wrong with it?&quot;&quot;I'm no good at saving.&quot;&quot;We don't pretend to be saviours. We want to do our best for Australia,
it being our own country. And the Pommies come out from England to try
to upset us. But they won't. They may as well stop in their
dead-and-rotten old country.&quot;&quot;I'm sorry it looks to you like that,&quot; said Richard.&quot;Oh, don't apologise,&quot; said Jack, with a faint, but even more malevolent
smile. &quot;It's pretty well always the same. You come out from the old
countries very cocksure, with a lot of criticism to you. But when it
comes to doing anything, you sort of fade out, you're nowhere. We're
used to it, we don't mind.&quot;There was a silence of hate.&quot;No, we don't mind,&quot; Jack continued. &quot;It's quite right, you haven't let
us down, because we haven't given you a chance. That's all. In so far as
you've had any chance to, you've let us down, and we know it.&quot;Richard was silent. Perhaps it was true. And he hated such a truth.&quot;All right,&quot; he said. &quot;I've let you down. I suppose I shall have to
admit it. I'm sorry - but I can't help myself.&quot;Jack took not the slightest notice of this admission, sat as if he had
not heard it.&quot;I'm sorry I've sort of fizzled out so quickly,&quot; said Richard. &quot;But you
wouldn't have me pretend, would you? I'd better be honest at the
beginning.&quot;Jack looked at him slowly, with slow, inchoate eyes, and a look of
contempt on his face. The contempt on Jack's face, the contempt of the
confident he-man for the shifty she-man, made Richard flush with anger,
and drove him back on his deeper self once more.&quot;What do you call honest?&quot; said Jack, sneering.Richard became very silent, very still. He realised that Jack would like
to give him a thrashing. The thought was horrible to Richard Lovat, who
could never bear to be touched, physically. And the other man sitting
there as if he were drunk was very repugnant to him. It was a bad
moment.&quot;Why,&quot; he replied, in answer to the question, while Jack's eyes fixed
him with a sort of jeering malevolence: &quot;I can't honestly say I feel at
one with you, you and Kangaroo, so I say so, and stand aside.&quot;&quot;You've found out all you wanted to know, I suppose?&quot; said Jack.&quot;I didn't WANT to know anything. I didn't come asking or seeking. It was
you who chose to tell me.&quot;&quot;You didn't try drawing us out, in your own way?&quot;&quot;Why, no, I don't think so.&quot;Again Jack looked at him with a faint contemptuous smile of derision.&quot;I should have said myself you did. And you got what you wanted, and now
are clearing out with it. Exactly like a spy, in my opinion.&quot;Richard opened wide eyes, and went pale.&quot;A spy!&quot; he exclaimed. &quot;But it's just absurd.&quot;Jack did not vouchsafe any answer, but sat there as if he had come for
some definite purpose, something menacing, and was going to have it out
with the other man.&quot;Kangaroo doesn't think I came spying, does he?&quot; asked Richard, aghast.
&quot;It's too impossible.&quot;&quot;I don't know what he thinks,&quot; said Jack. &quot;But it isn't 'too impossible'
at all. It looks as if it had happened.&quot;Richard was now dumb. He realised the depths of the other man's
malevolence, and was aghast. Just aghast. Some fear too - and a certain
horror, as if human beings had suddenly become horrible to him. Another
gulf opened in front of him.&quot;Then what do you want of me now?&quot; he asked, very coldly. &quot;Some sort of
security, I suppose,&quot; said Jack, looking away at the sea.Richard was silent with rage and cold disgust, and a sort of
police-fear.&quot;Pray what sort of security?&quot; he replied, coldly.&quot;That's for you to say, maybe. But we want some sort of security that
you'll keep quiet, before - we let you leave Australia.&quot;Richard's heart blazed in him with anger and disgust.&quot;You need not be afraid,&quot; he said. &quot;You've made it all too repulsive to
me now, for me ever to want to open my mouth about it all. You can be
quite assured: nothing will ever come out through me.&quot;Jack looked up with a faint, sneering smile.&quot;And you think we shall be satisfied with your bare word?&quot; he said
uglily.But now Richard looked him square in the eyes.&quot;Either that or nothing,&quot; he replied.And unconscious of what he was doing, he sat looking direct down into
the dark, shifting malice of Jack's eyes. Till Jack turned aside.
Richard was now so angry and insulted he felt only pure indignation.&quot;We'll see,&quot; said Jack.Somers did not even heed him. He was too indignant to think of him any
more. He only retreated into his own soul, and turned aside, invoking
his own soul: &quot;Oh, dark God, smite him over the mouth for insulting me.
Be with me, gods of the other world, and strike down these liars.&quot;Harriet came out on to the verandah.&quot;What are you two men talking about?&quot; she said. &quot;I hear two very cross
and snarling voices, though I can't tell what they say.&quot;&quot;I was just saying Mr. Somers can't expect to have it all his own way,&quot;
said Jack in his low, intense, slightly husky voice, that was now
jeering viciously.&quot;He'll try his best to,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;But whatever have you both got
so furious about. Just look at Lovat, green with fury. It's really
shameful. Men are like impish children - you daren't leave them together
for a minute.&quot;&quot;It was about time you came to throw cold water over us,&quot; smiled Jack
sardonically. Ah, how sardonic he could be: deep, deep and devilish. He
too must have a very big devil in his soul. But he never let it out. Or
did he? Harriet looked at him, and shuddered slightly. He scared her,
she had a revulsion from him. He was a bit repulsive to her. And she
knew he had always been so.&quot;Ah, well!&quot; said Jack. &quot;Cheery-o! We aren't such fools as we seem. The
milk's spilt, we won't sulk over it.&quot;&quot;No, don't,&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;I hate sulky people.&quot;&quot;So do I, Mrs. Somers, worse than water in my beer,&quot; said Jack genially.
&quot;You and me, we're not going to fall out, are we?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;I don't fall out with people - and I don't let them
fall out with me.&quot;Quite right. Don't give 'em a chance, eh? You're right of it. You and
me are pals, aren't we?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Harriet easily, as if she were talking to some child she
must soothe. &quot;We're pals. But why didn't you bring your wife? I'm so
fond of her.&quot;&quot;Oh, Vicky's all right. She's A1 stuff. She thinks the world of you, you
know. By golly, she does; she thinks the world of you.&quot;&quot;Then why didn't you bring her to see me?&quot;&quot;Eh? Why didn't I? Oh - let me see - why, she'd got her married sister and
so forth come to see her, so she couldn't leave them. But she sent her
love, and all that sort of sweet nothing, you know. I told her I should
never have the face to repeat it, you know. I was to give you HEAPS of
love. &quot;Heaps of love to Mrs. Somers!&quot; Damn it, I said, how do I know she
wants me dumping down heaps of love on her. But that was the
message - heaps of love to Mrs. Somers, and don't you forget it. I'm not
likely to forget it, by gee! There aren't two Mrs. Somers in the
universe: I'm ready to bet all I've got on that. Ay, and a bit over.
Now, look here, Mrs. Somers, between you and me and the bed-post - .&quot;&quot;Do you mean Lovat is the bed-post?&quot; put in Harriet. &quot;He's silent enough
for one.&quot;Jack glanced at Somers, and also relapsed into silence.>



The following day Somers felt savage with himself again. &quot;Fool that I
am, fool!&quot; he said, mentally kicking himself. And he looked at the big
pink spread of his Sydney Bulletin viciously. The Bulletin was the only
periodical in the world that really amused him. The horrible stuffiness
of English newspapers he could not stand: they had the same effect on
him as fish-balls in a restaurant, loathsome stuffy fare. English
magazines were too piffling, too imbecile. But the &quot;Bully&quot;, even if it
was made up all of bits, and had neither head nor tail nor feet nor
wings, was still a lively creature. He liked its straightforwardness and
the kick in some of its tantrums. It beat no solemn drums. It had no
deadly earnestness. It was just stoical, and spitefully humorous. Yes,
at the moment he liked the Bulletin better than any paper he knew,
though even the Bulletin tried a dowdy bit of swagger sometimes,
especially on the pink page. But then the pink page was just &quot;literary&quot;,
and who cares?Who cares, anyhow? Perhaps a bit sad, after all. But more fool you for
being sad.So he rushed to read the &quot;bits&quot;. They would make Bishop Latimer forget
himself and his martyrdom at the stake.1805: The casual Digger of war-days has carried it into civvies. Sighted
one of the original Tenth at the Outer Harbour (Adelaide) wharf last
week fishing. His sinker was his 1914 Star.Yes, couldn't Somers just see that forlorn Outer Harbour at Adelaide,
and the digger, like some rag of sea-weed dripping over the edge of the
wharf fishing, and using his medal for a weight?Wilfrido: A recent advertisement for the Wellington (New Zealand) Art
Gallery attracted 72 applicants. Among them were two solicitors (One an
Oxford M.A.); five sheepfarmers, on whose lands the mortgagee had
foreclosed; and a multitude of clerks. The post is not exactly a
sinecure, either; it demands attendance on seven days a week at 150
pounds per annum.Then a little cartoon of Ivan, the Russian workman, going for a
tram-drive, and taking huge bundles of money with him, sackfuls of
roubles, to pay the fare. The &quot;Bully&quot; was sardonic about Bolshevism.Ned Kelly: Hearing the deuce of a racket in the abo (aborigines) camp
near our place, we strolled over to see what was wrong, and saw a young
Binghi giving his gin a father of a hiding for making eyes at another
buck. Every respectable Binghi has the right to wallop his missis, but
this one laid it on so much that he knocked her senseless. This enraged
her relatives, and they went for him en masse, while two or three gins
applied restoratives to the battered wife. She soon came round, and,
seeing how things were, grabbed a waddy and went to the assistance of
her lord and master. In the end the twain routed the phalanxed
relations. Same old woman, whatever her line.Bits about bullock drivers and the biggest loads on record, about the
biggest piece of land ploughed by a man in a day, recipes for mange in
horses, twins, turnips, accidents to reverend clergymen, and so on.Pick: In the arid parts out back the wild birds infallibly indicate to
the wayfarer when the water in his bag must be vigorously conserved. If
in the early morning they descend in flocks to the plain, and there
collect the globules of dew among the dry stalks of grass, it means that
every tank, gilgal and puddle-hole within a bird's drinking flight has
gone dry.Cellu Lloyd: Before you close down on mangey horses here's a cure I've
never known to fail. To one bullock's gall add kerosene to make up a
full pint. Heat sufficiently to enable it to mix well, not forgetting,
of course, that half of it is kerosene. When well mixed add one
teaspoonful of chrysophanic acid. Bottle and shake well. Before applying
take a hard scrubbing brush and thoroughly scrub the part with carbolic
soap and hot water, and when applying the mixture use the brush again.
In one case I struck a pair of buggie ponies that had actually bitten
pieces from each other, and rubbed down a hundred yards or so of fence
in trying to allay the burning itch. Two months afterwards they were
growing hair and gaining condition, and not a trace of mange remained.
It is wonderful, however, how lightly some horse-owners treat the
matter. When a horse works hard all day, and spends the night rubbing a
fence flat in his itch frenzy, he at once loses condition and
usefulness; but in most cases the owner builds the fence stronger
instead of giving the unfortunate animal the necessary attention.This recipe brought many biting comments in later issues.Somers liked the concise, laconic style. It seemed to him manly and
without trimmings. Put ship-shape in the office, no doubt. Sometimes the
drawings were good, and sometimes they weren't.Lady (who has just opened door to country girl carrying suitcase): &quot;I am
suited. A country girl has been engaged, and I'm getting her to-morrow.&quot;Girl: &quot;I'm her; and you're not. The 'ouse is too big.&quot;There, thought Somers, you have the whole spirit of Australian labour.K. Sped: A week or two back a Mildura (Victoria) motor-cyclist ran over
a tiger-snake while travelling at 35 m.p.h. Ten minutes later the leg
became itchy, and shortly afterwards, feeling giddy, he started back to
the local hospital. He made a wobbly passage and collapsed at the
hospital gates. He was bad for a week, and was told that if the reptile
had not struck him on the bone he would never have reached the ward. The
snake must have doubled up when the wheel struck it, and by the merest
fluke struck the rider's leg in mid-air.Fraoch: I knew another case of a white girl marrying an aboriginal about
an years ago on the Northern Rivers (New South Wales). She was rather
pretty, a descendant of an English family. Binghi was a landed
proprietor, having acquired a very decent estate on the death of a
former spinster employer. (Binghi must have had &quot;a way wid 'im&quot;). He
owned a large, well-furnished house, did himself well, and had a fair
education, and was a good rough-rider. But every year the &quot;call of the
wild&quot; came to him, and he would leave his wife and kids (they had three)
and take himself to an old tumble-down hut in the bush, and there for a
month or two live in solitude on his natural tucker. Under the will of
the aforesaid spinster, upon Binghi's demise the estate was to revert to
her relatives. With an optimism that was not without a pathos of its
own, they used to trot out every outlaw in the district for their dusky
friend to ride; but his neck was still intact when I left.Sucre: Peering through her drawing-room window shortly before lunch, the
benevolent old suburban lady saw a shivering man in a ruined overcoat.
Not all the members of the capitalist classes are iron-souled creatures
bent on grinding the faces of the afflicted, yet virtuous poor. Taking a
ten shilling note from a heavily-beaded bag, she scribbled on a piece of
paper the words: &quot;Cheer Up&quot;, put both in an envelope, and told the maid
to give it to the outcast from her. While the family was at dinner that
evening a ring sounded at the front door. Argument followed in the hall
between a hoarse male voice and that of the maid. &quot;You can't come in.
They're at dinner.&quot; &quot;I'd RATHER come in miss. Always like for to fix
these things up in person.&quot; &quot;You can't come.&quot; Another moment and the
needy wayfarer was in the diningroom. He carefully laid five filthy 1
pound notes on the table before his benefactress. &quot;There you are, mum,&quot;
he said, with a rough salute. &quot;Cheer Up won all right. I'm mostly on the
corner, race days, as your cook will tell you; an' I'd like to say that
if any uv your FRIENDS - .&quot;Bits, bits, bits. Yet Richard Lovat read on. It was not mere anecdotage.
It was the sheer momentaneous life of the continent. There was no
consecutive thread. Only the laconic courage of experience.All the better. He could have kicked himself for wanting to help
mankind, join in revolutions or reforms or any of that stuff. And he
kicked himself still harder thinking of his frantic struggles with the
&quot;soul&quot; and the &quot;dark god&quot; and the &quot;listener&quot; and the &quot;answerer&quot;.
Blarney - blarney - blarney! He was a preacher and a blatherer, and he
hated himself for it. Damn the &quot;soul&quot;, damn the &quot;dark god&quot;, damn the
&quot;listener&quot; and the &quot;answerer&quot;, and above all, damn his own interfering,
nosy self.What right had he to go nosing round Kangaroo, and making up to Jaz or
to Jack? Why couldn't he keep off it all? Let the whole show go its own
gay course to hell, without Mr. Richard Lovat Somers trying to show it
the way it should go.A very strong wind had got up from the west. It blew down from the dark
hills in a fury, and was cold as flat ice. It blew the sea back until
the great water looked like dark, ruffled mole-fur. It blew it back till
the waves got littler and littler, and could hardly uncurl the least
swish of a rat-tail of foam.On such a day his restlessness had driven them on a trip along the coast
to Wolloona. They got to the lost little town just before mid-day, and
looked at the shops. The sales were on, and prices were &quot;smashed to
bits&quot;, &quot;Prices Smashed to Bits&quot;, in big labels. Harriet, of course,
fascinated in the Main Street, that ran towards the sea, with the steep
hills at the back. &quot;Hitch your motor to a star - Star Motor Company.&quot;
&quot;Your piano is the most important article of furniture in your
drawing-room. You will not be proud of your drawing-room unless your
piano has a HANDSOME APPEARANCE and a BEAUTIFUL TONE. Both these
requisites - .&quot;It was a wonderful Main Street, and, thank heaven, out of the wind.
There were several large but rather scaring brown hotels; with balconies
all round: there was a yellow stucco church with a red-painted tin
steeple, like a weird toy: there were high roofs and low roofs, all
corrugated iron: and you came to an opening, and there, behold, were one
or two forlorn bungalows inside their wooden palings, and then the void.
The naked bush, sinking in a hollow to a sort of marsh, and then down
the coast some sort of &quot;works&quot;, brick-works or something, smoking. All
as if it had tumbled haphazard off the pantechnicon of civilisation as
it dragged round the edges of this wild land, and there lay, busy but
not rooted in. As if none of the houses had any foundations.Bright the sun, the air of marvellous clarity, tall stalks of cabbage
palms rising in the hollow, and far off, tufted gum trees against a
perfectly new sky, the tufts at the end of wire branches. And farther
off, blue, blue hills. In the Main Street, large and expensive
motor-cars and women in fuzzy fur coats; long, quiescent Australian men
in tired-out-looking navy blue suits trotting on brown ponies, with a
carpet-bag in one hand, doing the shopping; girls in very much-made
hats, also flirtily shopping; three boys with big, magnificent bare
legs, lying in a sunny corner in the dust; a lonely white pony hitched
as if forever to a post at a street-corner.&quot;I like it,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;It doesn't feel FINISHED.&quot;&quot;Not even begun,&quot; he laughed.But he liked it too: even the slummyness of some of the bungalows inside
their wooden palings, drab-wood, decrepit houses, old tins, broken pots,
a greeny-white pony reminding one of a mildewed old shoe, two half-naked
babies sitting like bits of live refuse in the dirt, but with bonny,
healthy bare legs: the awful place called &quot;The Travellers' Rest - Mrs.
Coddy's Boarding Home&quot; - a sort of blind, squalid, corner building made
of wood and tin, with flat pieces of old lace curtain nailed inside the
windows, and the green blinds hermetically drawn. What must it have been
like inside? Then an open space, and coral-trees bristling with red
crest-flowers on their bare, cold boughs: and the hollow space of the
open country, and the marvellous blue hills of the distance.The wind was cold enough to make you die. Harriet was disgusted at
having been dragged away from home. They trailed to the sea to try and
get out of it, for it blew from the land, and the sun was hot. On the
bay one lone man flinging a line into the water, on the edge of the
conch-shaped, sloping sands. Dark-blue water, ruffled like mole-fur, and
flicked all over with froth as with bits of feather-fluff. And many
white gannets turning in the air like a snow-storm and plunging down
into the water like bombs. And fish leaped in the furry water, as if the
wind had turned them upside-down. And the gannets dropping and exploding
into the wave, and disappearing. On the sea's horizon, so perfectly
clear, a steamer like a beetle walking slowly along. Clear, with a
non-earthly clarity.Harriet and Somers sat and ate sandwiches with a little sand, she dazed
but still expostulating. Then they went to walk on the sea's edge, where
the sands might be firm. But the beach sloped too much, and they were
not firm. The lonely fisherman held up his thin silvery line for them to
pass under.&quot;Don't bother,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Right O!&quot; said he.He had a sad, beery moustache, a very cold-looking face, and, of course,
a little boy, his son, no doubt, for a satellite.There were little, exquisite pink shells, like Venetian pink glass with
white veins or black veins round their sharp little steeples. Harriet
loved them, among her grumbles, and they began to gather them: &quot;for
trimmings&quot;, said Harriet. So, in the flat-icy wind, that no life had
ever softened and no god ever tempered, they crouched on the sea's edge
picking these marvellous little shells.Suddenly, with a cry, to find the water rushing round their ankles and
surging up their legs, they dragged their way wildly forward with the
wave, and out and up the sand. Where immediately a stronger blast seized
Lovat's hat and sent it spinning to the sea again, and he after it like
a bird. He caught it as the water lifted it, and then the waste of
waters enveloped him. Above his knees swirled the green flood, there was
water all around him swaying, he looked down at it in amazement, reeling
and clutching his hat.Then once more he clambered out. Harriet had fallen on her knees on the
sand in a paroxysm of laughter, and there she was doubled up like a
sack, shrieking between her gasps:&quot;His hat! His hat! He wouldn't let it go&quot; - shrieks, and her head like a
sand-bag flops to the sand - &quot;no - not if he had to swim&quot; - shrieks - &quot;swim
to Samoa.&quot;He was looking at his wet legs and chuckling with his inward laughter.
Vivid, the blue sky: intensely clear, the dark sea, the yellow sands,
the swoop of the bay, the low headlands: clear like a miracle. And the
water bubbling in his shoes as he walked rolling up the sands.At last she recovered enough to crawl after him. They sat in a
sand-hollow under a big bush with odd red berries, and he wrung out his
socks, and all he could of his underpants and trousers. Then he put on
his socks and shoes again, and they set off for the station.&quot;The Pacific water,&quot; he said, &quot;is so very seaey, it is almost warm.&quot;At which, looking at his wet legs and wet hat, she went off into shrieks
again. But she made him be quick, because there was a train they could
catch.However in the Main Street they thought they would buy another pair of
socks. So he bought them, and changed in the shop. And they missed the
train, and Harriet expostulated louder.They went home in a motor-bus and a cloud of dust, with the heaven bluer
than blue above, the hills dark and fascinating, and the land so remote
seeming. Everything so clear, so very distinct, and yet so marvellously
aloof.All the miles alongside the road tin bungalows in their paling fences:
and a man on a pony, in a long black overcoat and a cold nose, driving
three happy, fleecy cows, long men in jerseys and white kerchiefs round
their necks, a la Buffalo Bill, riding nice slim horses; a woman riding
astride top speed on the roadside grass. A motor-car at the palings of
one of the bungalows. A few carts coming.And the occupants of the bus bouncing and bobbing like a circus, because
of the very bumpy road.&quot;Shakes your dinner down,&quot; said the old woman with the terribly
home-made hat - oh, such difficult, awful hats.&quot;It does, if you've had any,&quot; laughed Harriet.&quot;Why, you've 'ad your dinner, 'aven't you?&quot;As concerned as if Harriet was her own stomach, such a nice old woman.
And a lovely little boy with the bright, wide, gentle eyes of these
Australians. So alert and alive and with that lovableness that almost
hurts one. Absolute trust in the &quot;niceness&quot; of the world. A tall,
stalky, ginger man with the same bright eyes and a turned-up nose and
long stalky legs. An elderly man with bright, friendly, elderly eyes and
careless hair and careless clothing. He was Joe, and the other was Alf.
Real careless Australians, careless of their appearance, careless of
their speech, of their money, of everything - except of their
happy-go-lucky, democratic friendliness. Really nice, with bright,
quick, willing eyes. Then a young man, perhaps a commercial traveller,
with a suit-case. He was quite smartly dressed, and had fancy socks. He
was one of those with the big, heavy legs, heavy thighs and calves that
showed even in his trousers. And he was physically very self-conscious,
very self-conscious of Lovat and Harriet. The driver's face was long and
deep red. He was absolutely laconic. And yet, absolutely willing, as if
life held no other possibility than that of being an absolutely willing
citizen. A fat man with a fat little girl waiting at one of the corners.&quot;Up she goes!&quot; he said as he lifted her in.A perpetual, unchanging willingness, and an absolute equality. The same
good-humoured, right-you-are approach from everybody to everybody.
&quot;Right-you-are! Right-O!&quot; Somers had been told so many hundreds of
times, Right-he-was, Right-O!, that he almost had dropped into the way
of it. It was like sleeping between blankets - so cosy. So cosy.They were really awfully nice. There was a winsome charm about them.
They none of them seemed mean, or tight, or petty.The young man with the fine suit and the great legs put down his money,
gently and shyly as a girl, beside the driver on the little
window-ledge. Then he got out and strode off, shy and quick, with his
suit-case.&quot;Hey!&quot;The young man turned at the driver's summons, and came back.&quot;Did yer pay me?&quot;The question was put briskly, good-humouredly, with a touch even of
tenderness. The young man pointed to the money. The driver glanced round
and saw it.&quot;Oh! Right you are! Right-O!&quot;A faint little smile of almost tender understanding, and the young man
turned again. And the driver bustled to carry out some goods. The way he
stooped to pick up the heavy wooden box in his arms; so WILLING to stoop
to burdens. So long, of course, as his Rights of Man were fully
recognised. You mustn't try any superior tricks with him.Well, it was really awfully nice. It was touching. And it made life so
easy, so easy.Of course these were not government servants. Government servants have
another sort of feeling. They feel their office, even in New South
Wales - even a railway-clerk. Oh, yes.So nice, so nice, so gentle. The strange, bright-eyed gentleness. Of
course, really rub him the wrong way, and you've got a Tartar. But not
before you've asked for one. Gentle as a Kangaroo, or a wallaby, with
that wide-eyed, bright-eyed alert, RESPONSIBLE gentleness Somers had
never known in Europe. It had a great beauty. And at the same time it
made his spirits sink.It made him feel so sad underneath, or uneasy, like an impending
disaster. Such a charm. He was so tempted to commit himself to this
strange continent and its strange people. It was so fascinating. It
seemed so free, an absence of any form of stress whatsoever. No strain
in any way, once you could accept it.He was so tempted, save for a sense of impending disaster at the bottom
of his soul. And there a voice kept saying: &quot;No, no. No, no. It won't
do. You've got to have a reversion. You can't carry this mode any
further. You've got to have a recognition of the innate, sacred
separateness.&quot;So when they were walking home in a whirl of the coldest, most
flat-edged wind they had ever known, he stopped in front of her to
remark:&quot;Of course you can't go on with a soft, oh-so-friendly life like this
here. You've got to have an awakening of the old recognition of the
aristocratic principle, the INNATE difference between people.&quot;&quot;Aristocratic principle!&quot; she shrieked on the wind. &quot;You should have
seen yourself, flying like a feather into the sea after your hat.
Aristocratic PRINCIPLE!&quot; She shrieked with laughter.&quot;There you are, you see,&quot; he said to himself. &quot;I'm at it again&quot;. And he
laughed too.The wind blew them home. He made a big fire, and changed, and they drank
coffee made with milk, and ate buns.&quot;Thank heaven for a home,&quot; he said, as they sat in the dark, big rooms
at Coo-ee, and ate their buns, and looked out of the windows and saw
here as well a whirl of gannets like a snowstorm, and a dark sea
littered with white fluffs. The wind roared in the chimney, and for the
first time the sea was inaudible.&quot;You see,&quot; she said, &quot;how thankful you are for a home.&quot;&quot;Chilled to the bone!&quot; he said. &quot;I'm chilled to the bone with my day's
pleasure-outing.&quot;So they drew up the couch before the fire, and he piled rugs on her and
jarrah chunks on the fire, and at last it was toastingly warm. He sat on
a little barrel which he had discovered in the shed, and in which he
kept the coal for the fire. He had been at a loss for a lid to this
barrel, till he had found a big tin-lid thrown out on the waste lot. And
now the wee barrel with the slightly rusty tin lid was his perch when he
wanted to get quite near the fire. Harriet hated it, and had moments
when she even carried the lid to the cliff to throw it in the sea. But
she brought it back, because she knew he would be so indignant. She
reviled him, however.&quot;Shameful! Hideous! Old tin lids! How can you SIT on it? How you can
bring yourself to sit on such a thing, and not feel humiliated. Is that
your aristocratic principle?&quot;&quot;I put a cushion on it,&quot; he said.As he squatted on his tub this evening in the fire-corner, she suddenly
turned from her book and cried:&quot;There he is, on his throne! Sitting on his aristocratic principle!&quot; And
again she roared with laughter.He, however, shook some coal out of the little tub on to the fire,
replaced the tin lid and the cushion, and resumed his thoughts. The fire
was very warm. She lay stretched in front of it on the sofa, covered
with an eiderdown, and reading a Nat Gould novel, to get the real tang
of Australia.&quot;Of course,&quot; he said, &quot;this land always gives me the feeling that it
doesn't WANT to be touched, it doesn't WANT men to get hold of it.&quot;She looked up from her Nat Gould.&quot;Yes,&quot; she admitted slowly. &quot;And my ideal has always been a farm. But I
know now. The farms don't really belong to the land. They only scratch
it and irritate it, and are never at one with it.&quot;Whereupon she returned to her Nat Gould, and there was silence save for
the hollow of the wind. When she had finished her paper-backed book she
said:&quot;It's just like them - just like they THINK they are.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; he said vaguely.&quot;But, bah!&quot; she added, &quot;they make me sick. So absolutely dull - worse
than an 'At Home' in the middle classes.&quot;And after a silence, another shriek of laughter suddenly.&quot;Like a flying-fish! Like a flying-fish dashing into the waves! Dashing
into the waves after his hat - .&quot;He giggled on his tub.&quot;Fancy, that I'm here in Coo-ee after my day's outing! I can't believe
it. I shall call you the flying-fish. It's hard to believe that one was
so many things in one day. Suddenly the water! Won't you go now and do
the tailor? Twenty to eight! The bold buccaneer!&quot;The tailor was a fish that had cost a shilling, and which he was to
prepare for supper.Globe: There can't be much telepathy about bullocks, anyhow. In
Gippsland (Victoria) last season a score of them were put into a strange
paddock, and the whole 20 were found drowned in a hole next morning.
Tracks showed that they had gone each on his own along a path,
overbalanced one after the other, and were unable to clamber up the
rocky banks.That, thought Richard at the close of the day, is a sufficient comment
on herd-unity, equality, domestication, and civilisation. He felt he
would have liked to climb down into that hole in which the bullocks were
drowning and beat them all hard before they expired, for being such
mechanical logs of life.Telepathy! Think of the marvellous vivid communication of the huge sperm
whales. Huge, grand, phallic beasts! Bullocks! Geldings! Men! R.L.
wished he could take to the sea and be a whale, a great surge of living
blood: away from these all-too-white people, who ought ALL to be called
Cellu Lloyd, not only the horse-mange man.Man is a thought-adventurer. Man is more, he is a life-adventurer. Which
means he is a thought-adventurer, an emotion-adventurer, and a
discoverer of himself and of the outer universe. A discoverer.&quot;I am a fool,&quot; said Richard Lovat, which was the most frequent discovery
he made. It came, moreover, every time with a new shock of surprise and
chagrin. Every time he climbed a new mountain range and looked over, he
saw, not only a new world, but a big anticipatory fool on this side of
it, namely, himself.Now a novel is supposed to be a mere record of emotion-adventures,
flounderings in feelings. We insist that a novel is, or should be, also
a thought-adventure, if it is to be anything at all complete.&quot;I am a fool,&quot; thought Richard to himself, &quot;to imagine that I can
flounder in a sympathetic universe like a fly in the ointment.&quot; We think
of ourselves, we think of the ointment, but we do not consider the fly.
It fell into the ointment, crying: &quot;Ah, here is a pure and balmy element
in which all is unalloyed goodness. Here is attar of roses without a
thorn.&quot; Hence the fly in the ointment: embalmed in balm. And our
repugnance.&quot;I am a fool,&quot; said Richard to himself, &quot;to be floundering round in this
easy, cosy, all-so-friendly world. I feel like a fly in the ointment.
For heaven's sake let me get out. I suffocate.&quot;Where to? If you're going to get out you must have something to get out
on to. Stifling in unctuous sympathy of a harmless humanity.&quot;Oh,&quot; cried the stifling R. &quot;Where is my Rock of Ages?&quot;He knew well enough. It was where it always has been: in the middle of
him.&quot;Let me get back to my own self,&quot; he panted, &quot;hard and central in the
centre of myself. I am drowning in this merge of harmlessness, this
sympathetic humanity. Oh, for heaven's sake let me crawl out of the
sympathetic smear, and get myself clean again.&quot;Back to his own centre - back - back. The inevitable recoil.&quot;Everything,&quot; said R. to himself, in one of those endless conversations
with himself which were his chief delight, &quot;everything is relative.&quot;And flop he went into the pot of spikenard.&quot;Not quite,&quot; he gasped, as he crawled out. &quot;Let me drag my isolate and
absolute individual self out of this mess.&quot;Which is the history of relativity in man. All is relative as we go flop
into the ointment: or the treacle or the flame. But as we crawl out, or
flutter out with a smell of burning, the ABSOLUTE holds us spellbound.
Oh to be isolate and absolute, and breathe clear.So that even relativity is only relative. Relative to the absolute.I am sorry to have to stand, a sorry sight, preening my wings on the
brink of the ointment-pot, thought Richard. But from this vantage ground
let me preach to myself. He preached, and the record was taken down for
this gramophone of a novel.No, the self is absolute. It may be relative to everything else in the
universe. But to itself it is an absolute.Back to the central self, the isolate, absolute self.&quot;Now,&quot; thought Richard to himself, waving his front paws with
gratification: &quot;I must sound the muezzin and summon all men back to
their central, isolate selves.&quot;So he drew himself up, when - urch!! He was sluthering over the brim of
the ointment pot into the balm of humanity once more.&quot;Oh, Lord, I nearly did it again,&quot; he thought as he clambered out with a
sick heart. &quot;I shall do it once too often. The bulk of mankind haven't
got any central selves: haven't got any. They're all bits.&quot;Nothing but his fright would have struck this truth out of him. So he
crouched still, like a fly very tired with crawling out of the ointment,
to think about it.&quot;The bulk of people haven't got any central selves. They're all bits.&quot;He knew it was true, and he felt rather sick of the sweet odour of the
balm of human beatitudes, in which he had been so nearly lost.&quot;It takes how many thousand facets to make the eye of a fly - or a
spider?&quot; he asked himself, being rather hazy scientifically. &quot;Well, all
these people are just facets: just bits, that fitted together make a
whole. But you can fit the bits together time after time, yet it won't
bring the bug to life.&quot;The people of this terrestrial sphere are all bits. Isolate one of them,
and he is still only a bit. Isolate your man in the street, and he is
just a rudimentary fragment. Supposing you have the misfortune to have
your little toe cut off. That little toe won't at once rear on its hind
legs and begin to announce: &quot;I'm an isolated individual with an immortal
soul.&quot; It won't. But your man in the street will. And he is a liar. He's
only a bit, and he's only got a minute share of the collective soul.
Soul of his own he has none: and never will have. Just a share in the
collective soul, no more. Never a thing by himself.Damn the man in the street, said Richard to himself. Damn the collective
soul, it's a dead rat in a hole. Let humanity scratch its own lice.Now I'll sound my muezzin again. THE MAN BY HIMSELF. &quot;Allah bismallah!
God is God and man is man and has a soul of his own. Each man to
himself! Each man back to his own soul! Alone, alone, with his own soul
alone. God is God and man is man and the man in the street is a louse.&quot;Whatever your relativity, that's the starting point and the finishing
point: a man alone with his own soul: and the dark God beyond him.A man by himself.Begin then.Let the men in the street - ugh, horrid millions, crawl the face of the
earth like lice or ants or some other ignominy.The man by himself.That was one of the names of Erasmus of Rotterdam.The man by himself.That is the beginning and end, the alpha and the omega, the one
absolute: the man alone by himself, alone with his own soul, alone with
his eyes on the darkness which is the dark god of life. Alone like a
pythoness on her tripod, like the oracle alone above the fissure into
the unknown. The oracle, the fissure down into the unknown, the strange
exhalations from the dark, the strange words that the oracle must utter.
Strange, cruel, pregnant words: the new term of consciousness.This is the innermost symbol of man: alone in the darkness of the cavern
of himself, listening to soundlessness of inflowing fate. Inflowing
fate, inflowing doom, what does it matter? The man by himself - that is
the absolute - listening - that is the relativity - for the influx of his
fate, or doom.The man by himself. The listener.But most men can't listen any more. The fissure is closed up. There is
no soundless voice. They are deaf and dumb, ants, scurrying ants.That is their doom. It is a new kind of absolute. Like riffraff, which
has fallen out of living relativity, on to the teeming absolute of the
dust-heap, or the ant-heap. Sometimes the dust-heap becomes huge, huge,
huge, and covers nearly all the world. Then it turns into a volcano, and
all starts again.&quot;It has nothing to do with me,&quot; said Richard to himself. I hope, dear
reader, you like plenty of CONVERSATION in a novel: it makes it so much
lighter and brisker.&quot;It has nothing to do with me,&quot; said Richard to himself. &quot;They do as
they like. But since, after all, I AM a kind-hearted dear creature, I
will just climb the minaret of myself and sound my muezzin.&quot;So behold the poor dear on his pinnacle lifting his hands.&quot;God is God and man is man; and every man by himself. Every man by
himself, alone with his own soul. Alone as if he were dead. Dead to
himself. He is dead and alone. He is dead; alone. His soul is alone.
Alone with God, with the dark God. God is God.&quot;But if he likes to shout muezzins, instead of hawking fried fish or
newspapers or lottery tickets, let him.Poor dear, it was rather an anomalous call: &quot;Listen to me, and be
alone.&quot; Yet he felt called upon to call it.To be alone, to be alone, and to rest on the unknown God alone.The God must be unknown. Once you have defined him or described him, he
is the most chummy of pals, as you'll know if you listen to preachers.
And once you've chummed up with your God, you'll never be alone again,
poor you. For that's the end of you. You and your God chumming it
through time and eternity.Poor Richard saw himself in funny situations.&quot;My dear young lady, let me entreat you, be alone, only be alone.&quot;&quot;Oh, Mr. Somers, I should love to, if you'd hold my hand.&quot;&quot;There is a gulf,&quot; growing sterner, &quot;surrounds each solitary soul. A
gulf surrounds you - a gulf surrounds me - .&quot;&quot;I'M FALLING!&quot; shrieks and flings her arms around his neck. Or Kangaroo.&quot;Why am I so beastly to Kangaroo?&quot; said Richard to himself. &quot;For beastly
I am. I am a detestable little brat to them all round.&quot;A detestable little brat he felt.But Kangaroo wanted to be a queen-bee of another hive, with all the
other bees clustering on him like some huge mulberry. Sickening! Why
couldn't he be alone? At least for ONCE. For once withdraw entirely.And a queen bee buzzing with beatitudes. Beatitudes, beatitudes. Bee
attitudes or any other attitudes, it made Richard feel tired. More
benevolence, more nauseating benevolence. &quot;Charity suffereth long.&quot;Yet one cannot live a life of entire loneliness, like a monkey on a
stick, up and down one's own obstacle. There's got to be meeting: even
communion. Well, then, let us have the other communion. &quot;This is thy
body which I take from thee and eat&quot; as the priest, also the God, says
in the ritual of blood sacrifice. The ritual of supreme responsibility,
and offering. Sacrifice to the dark God, and to the men in whom the dark
God is manifest. Sacrifice to the strong, not to the weak. In awe, not
in dribbling love. The communion in power, the assumption into glory. La
gloire.>



As a rule the jetty on its poles straddling a little way into the sea
was as deserted as if it were some relic left by an old invader. Then it
had spurts of activity, when steamer after steamer came blorting and
hanging miserably round, like cows to the cowshed on a winter afternoon.
Then a little engine would chuff along the pier, shoving a string of
tip-up trucks, and little men would saunter across the sky-line, and
there would be a fine dimness of black dust round the low, red ship and
the end of the jetty. Luckily it was far enough away, so that Harriet
need not fear for her beautiful white washing. She washed her linen
herself for the sheer joy of it, and loved nothing so much as thinking
of it getting whiter and whiter, like the Spenserian maid, in the sun
and sea, and visiting it on the grass every five minutes, and finding it
every time really whiter, till Somers said it would reach a point of
whiteness where the colours would break up, and she'd go out and find
pieces of rainbow on the grass and bushes, instead of towels and shirts.&quot;Shouldn't I be startled!&quot; she said, accepting it as quite a possible
contingency, and adding thoughtfully: &quot;No, not really.&quot;One of these afternoons when Somers was walking down on the sands,
looking at the different shells, their sea-colours of pink and brown and
rainbow and brilliant violet and shrimp-red, and when the boats were
loading coal on the moderately quiet sea, he noticed the little engine
standing steaming on the jetty, just overhead where he was going to pass
under. Then his attention was drawn away to the men picking up the
rounded, sea-smooth pebbles of coal in one little place where the beach
was just a black slope of perfectly clean coal-pebbles: just like any
other pebbles. There were usually some men, or women or children,
picking here, putting the bigger pebbles of sea-coal into sacks. From
the edge of the small waves Somers heard one man talking to another, and
the English tones - unconsciously he expected a foreign language - and
particularly the peculiar educated-artisan quality, almost a kind of
uppishness that there is in the speech of Australian working men, struck
him as incongruous with their picking up the coal-cobs from the shore.
He watched them, in the chill of the shadow. Yes, they thought as much
of themselves as anybody. But one was palpably a Welshman, and loved
picking up something for nothing; and the other mixed his democratic
uppishness with a queer lousy quality, like a bushranger. &quot;They are ten
times more foreign to me,&quot; said Somers, &quot;than Italian scoundrels, or
even Indians. They are so FOREIGN to me. And yet their manner of life,
their ordinary way of living is almost exactly what I was used to as a
boy. Why are they so foreign to me?&quot;They silently objected to his looking, so he went on. He had come to the
huge, high timbers of the tall jetty. There stood the little engine
still overhead: and in the gloom among the timbers underneath water was
dripping down from her, which gave Somers a distaste for passing just
then. He looked up. There was the engine-driver in his dirty shirt and
dirty bare arms, talking to another man. The other man saluted - and to
Somers' surprise it was William James. He stood quite still, and a
surprised smile of recognition greeted the other man, who saluted.&quot;Why, what are you doing here?&quot; called Somers.William James came to the edge of the jetty, but could not hear, because
of the noise of the sea. His face had that small, subtle smile that was
characteristic of him, and which Somers was never quite sure of, whether
it was really jeering or in a cunning way friendly.&quot;Won't you come up a minute?&quot; roared William James.So Somers scrambled round up the banks, on to the railway track.&quot;I couldn't come down for the moment,&quot; said William James. &quot;I'll have to
see the manager, then I'm off on this boat. We're ready to go. You heard
her blowing.&quot;&quot;Where are you going? Back to Sydney.&quot;&quot;Yes. I come down occasionally on this coal-business, and if I like I go
back on the collier. The sea is quiet, and I needn't wait for a train.
Well, an' how're you gettin' on, like? Pleased with it down here all by
yourselves?&quot;&quot;Very.&quot;&quot;A bit lonely for you. I suppose you wouldn't like to know the manager
here - Mr. Thomas? He's a decent chap - from South Wales originally.&quot;&quot;No. I like it best when I don't know anybody.&quot;&quot;That's a compliment for some of us. However - I know what you mean. I
know what you mean. Jack tells me you saw Kangaroo. Made quite a fuss of
you, I hear. I knew he would. Oh, Kangaroo knew all about you: all he
wanted to know, anyhow. I say, if ye think of stoppin' down here, you
might get in a ton of coal. It looks as if this strike might come off.
That Arbitration Board's a fine failure, what?&quot;&quot;As far as I can gather.&quot;&quot;Oh, bound to be. Bound to be. They talk about scraps of paper, why,
every agreement that's ever come to in this country, you could wrap your
next red herring in it, for all it's worth.&quot;&quot;I suppose it's like Ireland, they don't want to agree.&quot;&quot;That's about it. The Labour people want this revolution of theirs.
What?&quot; - and he looked at Somers with a long, smiling, sardonic leer,
like a wink. &quot;There's a certain fact,&quot; he continued, &quot;as far as any
electioneering success goes, they're out of the running for a spell.
What do you think of Trades Unions, one way and another?&quot;&quot;I dislike them on the whole rather intensely. They're just the nastiest
profiteering side of the working man - they make a fool of him too, in my
opinion.&quot;&quot;Just my opinion. They make a fool of him. Wouldn't it be nice to have
them for bosses of the whole country? They very nearly are. But I doubt
very much if they'll ever cover the last lap - what?&quot;&quot;Not if Kangaroo can help it,&quot; said Somers.&quot;No!&quot; William James flashed a quick look at him from his queer grey
eyes. &quot;What did you make of him then? Could you make him out?&quot;&quot;Not quite. I never met anyone like him. The wonder to me is, he seems
to have as much spare time for entertaining and amusing his guests, as
if he had no work at all on hand.&quot;&quot;Oh, that was just a special occasion. But he's a funny sort of Saviour,
isn't he? Not much crown of thorns about him. Why, he'd look funny on a
cross, what?&quot;&quot;He's no intention of being on one, I think,&quot; said Somers stiffly.&quot;Oh, I don't know. If the wrong party got hold of him. There's many
mites in a pound of cheese, they say.&quot;&quot;Then I'll toast my cheese.&quot;&quot;Ha-ha! Oh yes, I like a bit of toasted cheese myself - or a Welsh
rabbit, as well as any man.&quot;&quot;But you don't think they'd ever let him down, do you? - these
Australians?&quot;&quot;No-o,&quot; said William James. &quot;I doubt if they'd ever let him down. But if
he happened to FALL down, you know, they'd soon forget him.&quot;&quot;You don't sound a very warm follower yourself.&quot;&quot;Oh, warm isn't my way, in anything. I like to see what I'm about. I can
see that Kangaroo's a wonder. Oh yes, he's a world wonder. And I'd
rather be in with him than anybody, if it was only for the sake of the
spree, you know. Bound to be a spree some time - and before long, I
should say, things going as they are. I wouldn't like to be left out of
the fun.&quot;&quot;But you don't feel any strong devotion to your leader?&quot;&quot;Why, no; I won't say it's exactly strong devotion. But I think he's a
world wonder. He's not quite the SHAPE of a man that I should throw away
my eyes for, that's all I mean.&quot; Again William James looked at Somers
with that long, perhaps mocking little smile in his grey eyes.&quot;I thought even his shape beautiful, when he talked to me.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, it's wonderful what a spell he can cast over you. But I'm a
stuggy fellow myself, maybe that's how it is I can't ever quite see him
in the same light as the thin chaps do. But that's just the looks of the
thing. I can see there isn't another man in the world like him, and I'd
cross the seas to join in with him, if only for the fun of the thing!&quot;&quot;But what about the end of the fun?&quot; asked Somers.&quot;Oh, that I don't know. And nobody does, for that matter.&quot;&quot;But surely if one believes - .&quot;&quot;One believes a lot, and one believes very little, seems to me. Taking
all in all, seems to me we live from hand to mouth, as far as beliefs
go.&quot;&quot;You never WOULD believe,&quot; said Somers, laughing.&quot;Not till I was made to,&quot; replied Jaz, twisting his face in his
enigmatic smile.Somers looked at the thick, stocky, silent figure in the well-made dark
clothes that didn't in the least belong to him. There was something
about him like a prisoner in prison uniform, in his town clothes - and
something of that in his bearing. A stocky, silent, unconquerable
prisoner. And in his imprisoned soul another kind of mystery, another
sort of appeal.The two men stood still in the cold wind that came up the sands to the
south-west. To the left, as they faced the wind, went the black railway
track on the pier, and the small engine stood dribbling. On the right
the track ran curiously black past a little farm-place with a corrugated
iron roof, and past a big field where the stubble of maize or beans
stood ragged and sere, on into the little hollow of bush, where the mine
was, beyond the stagnant creek. It was curious how intensely black,
velvety and unnatural, the railway-track looked on this numb
coast-front. The steamer hooted again.&quot;Cold it is up here,&quot; said Somers.&quot;It is cold. He's coming now, though,&quot; replied William James.They stood together still another minute, looking down the pale sands at
the foam and the dark-blue sea, the sere grass scattered with bungalows.It was a strange, different bond of sympathy united them, from that that
subsisted between Somers and Jack, or Somers and Kangaroo. Hardly
sympathy at all, but an ancient sort of root-knowledge.&quot;Well, good-bye,&quot; said Somers, wanting to be gone before the manager
came up with the papers. He shook hands with William James - but as
usual, Jaz gave him a slack hand. Their eyes met - and the look,
something like a taunt, in Trewhella's secretive grey eye, made Somers
stiffen his back, and a kind of haughtiness flew into his soul.&quot;Different men, different ways, Mr. Trewhella,&quot; he said.William James did not answer, but smiled rather stubbornly. It seemed to
Somers the man would be smiling that stubborn, taunting smile till the
crack of doom.&quot;I told Mrs. Somers what I think about it,&quot; said Jaz, with a very
Cornish accent. &quot;I doubt if she'll ever do much more believin' than I
shall.&quot; And the taunt was forked this time.&quot;She says she believes entirely in Kangaroo.&quot;&quot;Does she now? Who did she tell it to?&quot;&quot;Me.&quot;Trewhella still stood with that faint grin on his face, short and stocky
and erect like a little post left standing. Somers looked at him again,
frowning, and turned abruptly down the bank. The smile left the face of
the Cornishman, and he just looked obstinate, indifferent, and curiously
alone, as if he stood there all alone in the world. He watched Somers
emerge on the sands below, and go walking slowly among the sea-ragged
flat shelves of the coast-bed rocks, his head dropping, looking in the
pools, his hands in his pockets. And the obstinate light never changed
in the eyes of the watcher, not even when he turned to the approaching
manager.Perhaps it was this meeting which made Somers want to see Kangaroo once
more. Everything had suddenly become unreal to him. He went to Sydney
and to Cooley's rooms. But during the first half hour, the revulsion
from the First persisted. Somers disliked his appearance, and the
kangaroo look made him feel devilish. And then the queer, slow manner of
approach. Kangaroo was not really ready for his visitor, and he seemed
dense, heavy, absent, clownish. It was that kangarooish clownishness
that made a vicious kind of hate spring into Somers' face. He talked in
a hard, cutting voice.&quot;Whom can you depend on, in this world?&quot; he was saying. &quot;Look at these
Australians - they're awfully nice, but they've got no inside to them.
They're hollow. How are you going to build on such hollow stalks? They
may well call them corn-stalks. They're marvellous and manly and
independent and all that, outside. But inside, they are not. When
they're QUITE alone, they don't exist.&quot;&quot;Yet many of them have been alone a long time, in the bush,&quot; said
Kangaroo, watching his visitor with slow, dumb, unchanging eyes.&quot;Alone, what sort of alone? Physically alone. And they've just gone
hollow. They're never alone in spirit: quite, quite alone in spirit. And
the people who are are the only people you can depend on.&quot;&quot;Where shall I find them?&quot;&quot;Not here. It seems to me, least of all here. The Colonies make for
OUTWARDNESS. Everything is outward - like hollow stalks of corn. The life
makes this inevitable: all that struggle with bush and water and
what-not, all the mad struggle with the material necessities and
conveniences - the inside soul just withers and goes into the outside,
and they're all just lusty robust stalks of people.&quot;&quot;The corn-stalks bear the corn. I find them generous to
recklessness - the greatest quality. The old world is cautious and
forever bargaining about its soul. Here they don't bother to bargain.&quot;They've no soul to bargain about. But they're even more full of conceit.
What do you expect to do with such people. Build a straw castle?&quot;&quot;You see I believe in them - perhaps I know them a little better than you
do.&quot;&quot;Perhaps you do. It'll be cornstalk castle, for all that. What DO you
expect to build on?&quot;&quot;They're generous - generous to recklessness,&quot; shouted Kangaroo. &quot;And I
love them. I love them. Don't you come here carping to me about them.
They are my children, I love them. If I'm not to believe in their
generosity, am I to believe in your cautious, old-world carping, do you
think, I WON'T!&quot; he shouted fiercely. &quot;I WON'T. Do you hear that!&quot; And
he sat hulked in his chair glowering like some queer dark god at bay.
Somers paused, and his heart failed.&quot;Then make me believe in them and their generosity,&quot; he said dryly.
&quot;They're nice. But they haven't got the last everlasting central bit of
soul, solitary soul, that makes a man himself. The central bit of
himself. They all merge to the outside, away from the centre. And what
can you do, PERMANENTLY, with such people? You can have a fine
corn-stalk blaze. But as for anything permanent - .&quot;I tell you I HATE permanency,&quot; barked Kangaroo. &quot;The phoenix rises out
of the ashes.&quot; He rolled over angrily in his chair.&quot;Let her! Like Rider Haggard's 'She', I don't feel like risking it a
second time,&quot; said Somers, like the venomous serpent he was.&quot;Generous, generous men!&quot; Kangaroo muttered to himself. &quot;At least you
can get a blaze out of them. Not like European wet matches, that will
never again strike alight - as you've said yourself.&quot;&quot;But a blaze for what? What's your blaze for?&quot;&quot;I don't care,&quot; yelled Kangaroo, springing with sudden magnificent
swiftness to his feet, and facing Somers, and seizing him by the
shoulders and shaking him till his head nearly fell off, yelling all the
time: &quot;I don't care, I tell you, I don't care. Where there's fire
there's change. And where the fire is love, there's creation. Seeds of
fire. That's enough for me! Fire, and seeds of fire, and love. That's
all I care about. Don't carp at me, I tell you. Don't carp at me with
your old, European, damp spirit. If you can't take fire, WE CAN. That's
all. Generous, passionate men - and you dare to carp at them. You. What
have you to show?&quot; And he went back to his chair like a great, sulky
bear-god.Somers sat rather stupefied than convinced. But he found himself again
WANTING to be convinced, wanting to be carried away. The desire hankered
in his heart. Kangaroo had become again beautiful: huge and beautiful
like some god that sways and seems clumsy, then suddenly flashes with
all the agility of thunder and lightning. Huge and beautiful as he sat
hulked in his chair. Somers DID wish he would get up again, and carry
him quite away.But where to? Where to? Where is one carried to when one is carried
away? He had a bitter mistrust of seventh heavens and all heavens in
general. But then the experience. If Kangaroo had got up at that moment
Somers would have given him heart and soul and body, for the asking, and
damn all consequences. He longed to do it. He knew that by just going
over and laying a hand on the great figure of the sullen god he could
achieve it. Kangaroo would leap like a thunder-cloud and catch him
up - catch him up and away into a transport. A transport that should last
for life. He knew it.But alas, it was just too late. In some strange way Somers felt he had
come to the end of transports: they had no more mystery for him; at
least this kind: or perhaps no more charm. Some bubble or other had
burst in his heart. All his body and fibres wanted to go over and touch
the other great being into a storm of response. But his soul wouldn't.
The coloured bubble had burst.Kangaroo sat up and adjusted his eyeglasses.&quot;Don't you run away with the idea, though,&quot; he said, &quot;that I am just an
emotional fool.&quot; His voice was almost menacing, and with a strange cold,
intellectual quality that Somers had never heard before.&quot;I believe in the one fire of love. I believe it is the one inspiration
of all creative activity. I trust myself entirely to the fire of love.
This I do with my reason also. I don't discard my reason. I use it at
the service of love, like a sharp weapon. I try to keep it very
sharp - and very dangerous. Where I don't love, I use only my will and my
wits. Where I love, I trust to love alone.&quot; The voice came cold and
static.Somers sat rather blank. The change frightened him almost as something
obscene. This was the reverse to the passionate thunder-god.&quot;But is love the only inspiration of creative activity?&quot; he asked,
rather feebly.&quot;This is the first time I have heard it questioned. Do you know of any
other?&quot;Somers thought he did, but he was not going to give himself away to that
sharp weapon of a voice, so he did not answer.&quot;IS there any other inspirational force than the force of love?&quot;
continued Kangaroo. &quot;There is no other. Love makes the trees flower and
shed their seed, love makes the animals mate and birds put on their best
feather, and sing their best songs. And all that man has ever created on
the face of the earth, or ever will create - if you will allow me the use
of the word create, with regard to man's highest productive activities.&quot;&quot;It's the word I always use myself,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Naturally, since you know how to think inspiredly. Well then, all that
man ever has created or ever will create, while he remains man, has been
created in the inspiration and by the force of love. And not only
man - all the living creatures are swayed to creation, to new creation,
to the creation of song and beauty and lovely gesture, by love. I will
go further. I believe the sun's attraction for the earth is a form of
love.&quot;&quot;Then why doesn't the earth fly into the sun?&quot; said Somers.&quot;For the same reason. Love is mutual. Each attracts the other. But in
natural love each tries at the same time to withhold the other, to keep
the other true to its own beloved nature. To any true lover, it would be
the greatest disaster if the beloved broke down from her own nature and
self and began to identify herself with him, with his nature and self. I
say, to any genuine lover this is the greatest disaster, and he tries by
every means in his power to prevent this. The earth and sun, on their
plane, have discovered a perfect equilibrium. But man has not yet begun.
His lesson is so much harder. His consciousness is at once so
complicated and so cruelly limited. This is the lesson before us. Man
has loved the beloved for the sake of love, so far, but rarely, rarely
has he CONSCIOUSLY known that he could only love her for her own
separate, strange self: forever strange and a joyful mystery to him.
Lovers henceforth have got to KNOW one another. A terrible mistake, and
a self-delusion. True lovers only learn that as they know less, and
less, and less of each other, the mystery of each grows more startling
to the other. The tangible unknown: that is the magic, the mystery, and
the grandeur of love, that it puts the tangible unknown in our arms, and
against our breast: the beloved. We have made a fatal mistake. We have
got to know so much ABOUT things, that we think we know the actuality,
and contain it. The sun is as much outside us, and as eternally unknown,
as ever it was. And the same with each man's beloved: like the sun. What
do the facts we know ABOUT a man amount to? Only two things we can know
of him, and this by pure soul-intuition: we can know if he is true to
the flame of life and love which is inside his heart, or if he is false
to it. If he is true, he is friend. If he is wilfully false, and
inimical to the fire of life and love in his own heart, then he is my
enemy as well as his own.&quot;Somers listened. He seemed to see it all and hear it all with marvellous
clarity. And he believed that it was all true.&quot;Yes,&quot; he said, &quot;I believe that is all true.&quot;&quot;What is it then that you disbelieve?&quot;&quot;I don't quite believe that love is the one and only exclusive force or
mystery of living inspiration. I don't quite believe that. There is
something else.&quot;Kangaroo looked at him for once overbearingly and with a sort of
contempt.&quot;Tell me what it is,&quot; he replied briefly.&quot;I am not very clear myself. And, you see, what I want to say, you don't
want to hear.&quot;&quot;Yes, I do,&quot; snapped Kangaroo.&quot;With your ears and your critical mind only.&quot;&quot;Say it anyhow, say it.&quot;Richard sat feeling very stupid. The communicative soul is like the ass,
you can lead him to the water, but you can't make him drink.&quot;Why,&quot; he said, &quot;it means an end of us and what we are, in the first
place. And then a re-entry into us of the great God, who enters us from
below, not from above.&quot;Kangaroo sat bunched up like some creature watching round-eyed out of a
darker corner.&quot;How do you mean, enters us from below?&quot; he barked.&quot;Not through the spirit. Enters us from the lower self, the dark self,
the phallic self, if you like.&quot;&quot;Enters us from the phallic self?&quot; snapped Kangaroo sharply.&quot;Sacredly. The god you can never see or visualise, who stands dark on
the threshold of the phallic me.&quot;&quot;The phallic you, my dear young friend, what is that but love?&quot;Richard shook his head in silence.&quot;No,&quot; he said, in a slow, remote voice. &quot;I know your love, Kangaroo.
Working everything from the spirit, from the head. You work the lower
self as an instrument of the spirit. Now it is time for the spirit to
leave us again; it is time for the Son of Man to depart, and leave us
dark, in front of the unspoken God: who is just beyond the dark
threshold of the lower self, my lower self. There is a great God on the
threshold of my lower self, whom I fear while he is my glory. And the
spirit goes out like a spent candle.&quot;Kangaroo watched with a heavy face like a mask.&quot;It is time for the spirit to leave us,&quot; he murmured in a somnambulist
voice. &quot;Time for the spirit to leave us.&quot;Somers, who had dropped his face, hiding it as he spoke, watched the
other man from under his brows. Kangaroo, who still sat impassive, like
a frozen, antagonised Buddha, gave himself a jerk of recovery.&quot;Ah well!&quot; he sighed, with a weary, impatient, condescending sigh. &quot;I
was never able to follow mysticism and metaphysics. One of my many
limitations. I don't know what you mean.&quot;&quot;But what is your 'love' but a mystical thing?&quot; asked Richard
indignantly.&quot;My love? Why, that is something I FEEL, as plain as toothache.&quot;&quot;Well, so do I feel the other: and love has become like cardboard to
me,&quot; said Richard, still indignant.&quot;Like cardboard? Well, I don't quite see love like cardboard, dear boy.
For you ARE a dear boy, in spite of yourself. Oh yes, you are. There's
some demon inside you makes you perverse, and won't let you be the dear,
beautiful thing you are. But I'm going to exorcise that demon.&quot;Somers gave a short laugh, the very voice of the demon speaking.&quot;Oh yes I am,&quot; said Kangaroo, in a steely voice. &quot;I'm going to exorcise
that demon, and release your beautiful Andromeda soul.&quot;&quot;Try,&quot; ejaculated Richard dryly, turning aside his face in distaste.Kangaroo leapt to his feet and stood towering over the little enemy as
if he would stoop over him and smother him in violent warmth and drive
out the demon in that way. But Richard sat cold and withheld, and
Kangaroo had not the power to touch him.&quot;I'm going to try,&quot; shouted the lawyer, in his slightly husky roar.
&quot;You've made it my prerogative by telling me to try. I'm going to love
you, and you won't get away from that. I'm the hound of heaven after
you, my boy, and I'm fatal to the hell hound that's leading you. Do you
know I love you? - that I loved you long before I met you?&quot;Richard, curled narrow in his chair like a snake, glanced up at the big
man projecting over him. A sort of magnetic effusion seemed to come out
of Kangaroo's body, and Richard's hand was almost drawn in spite of
himself to touch the other man's body. He had deliberately to refrain
from laying his hand on the near, generous stomach of the Kangaroo,
because automatically his hand would have lifted and sought that rest.
But he prevented himself, and the eyes of the two men met. Kangaroo
searched Lovat's eyes: but they seemed to be of cloudy blue like
hell-smoke, impenetrable and devilish. Kangaroo watched a long time: but
the other man was the unchangeable. Kangaroo turned aside suddenly.&quot;Ah well,&quot; he said. &quot;I can see there is a beast in the way. There is a
beast in your eyes, Lovat, and if I can't conquer him then - then, woe
betide you, my dear. But I love you, you see.&quot;&quot;Sounds like a threat,&quot; laughed Somers.Kangaroo leaned and laid his hand gently on Lovat's shoulder.&quot;Don't say that,&quot; his voice was small now, and very gentle. &quot;I loved you
before I knew you. My soul cries for you. And you hurt me with the demon
that is in you.&quot;Richard became very pale, and was silent for some moments. The hand sank
heavier, nearer, on his shoulder.&quot;You see,&quot; said Somers, trying hard to be fair, &quot;what you call my demon
is what I identify myself with. It's my best me, and I stick to it. I
think love, all this love of ours, is a devilish thing now: a slow
poison. Really, I know the dark god at the lower threshold - even if I
have to repeat it like a phrase. And in the sacred dark men meet and
touch, and it is a great communion. But it isn't this love. There's no
love in it. But something deeper. Love seems to me somehow trivial: and
the spirit seems like something that belongs to paper. I can't help
it - I know another God.&quot;The pressure of the hand became inert.&quot;But aren't you merely inventing other terms for the same thing that I
mean, and that I call love?&quot; said Kangaroo, in a strange, toneless
voice, looking aside.&quot;Does it seem to you that I am?&quot; asked Lovat, gently and
dispassionately.The strange, great passionate cloud of Kangaroo still hung there,
hovering over the pale, sharp isolation of Somers, who lay looking up.
And then it seemed as if the glow and vibration left Kangaroo's body,
the cloud became grey and heavy. He sighed, and removed his hand, and
turned away.&quot;Ah well?&quot; he said. &quot;Ah well!&quot;Somers rose, trembling now, and feeling frail.&quot;I'll go,&quot; he said.&quot;Yes, do go,&quot; said Kangaroo.And without another word Somers went, leaving the other man sunk in a
great heap in his chair, as if defeated. Somers did not even pity him.
His heart felt queer and cave-like and devoid of emotion.He was spending the night at the Callcotts. Harriet, too, was there. But
he was in no hurry to get back there. It was a clear and very starry
night. He took the tram-car away from the centre of the town, then
walked. As was always the case with him, in this country, the land and
the world disappeared as night fell, as if the day had been an illusion,
and the sky came bending down. There was the Milky Way, in clouds of
star-fume, bending down right in front of him, right down till it seemed
as if he would walk on to it, if he kept going. The pale, fumy drift of
the Milky Way drooped down and seemed so near, straight in front, that
it seemed the obvious road to take. And one would avoid the strange dark
gaps, gulfs, in the way overhead. And one would look across to the
floating isles of star-fume, to the south, across the gulfs where the
sharp stars flashed like lighthouses, and one would be in a new way
denizen of a new plane, walking by oneself. There would be a real new
way to take. And the mechanical earth quite obliterated, sunk out.Only he saw, on the sea's high black horizon, the various reddish
sore-looking lights of a ship. There they were - the signs of the ways of
men - hot-looking and weary. He turned quickly away from the marks of the
far-off ship, to look again at the downward slope of the great hill of
the Milky Way. He wanted so much to get out of this lit-up cloy of
humanity, and the exhaust of love, and the fretfulness of desire. Why
not swing away into cold separation? Why should desire always be
fretting, fretting like a tugged chain? Why not break the bond and be
single, take a fierce stoop and a swing back, as when a gannet plunges
like a white, metallic arrow into the sea, raising a burst of spray,
disappearing, completing the downward curve of the parabola in the
invisible underwater where it seizes the object of desire, then away,
away with success upwards, back flashing into the air and white space?
Why not? Why want to urge, urge, urge oneself down the causeways of
desirous love, hard pavements of love? Even like Kangaroo. Why shouldn't
meeting be a stoop as a gannet stoops into the sea, or a hawk, or a
kite, in a swift rapacious parabola downwards, to touch at the lowermost
turn of the curve, then up again?It is a world of slaves: all love-professing. Why unite with them? Why
pander to them? Why go with them at all? Why not strike at communion out
of the unseen, as the gannet strikes into the unseen underwater, or the
kite from above at a mouse? One seizure, and away again, back away into
isolation. A touch, and away. Always back, away into isolation. Why be
cloyed and clogged down like billions of fish in water, or billions of
mice on land? It is a world of slaves. Then why not gannets in the upper
air, having two worlds? Why only one element? If I am to have a meeting
it shall be down, down in the invisible, and the moment I re-emerge it
shall be alone. In the visible world I am alone, an isolate instance. My
meeting is in the underworld, the dark. Beneath every gannet that jumps
from the water ten thousand fish are swimming still. But they are
swimming in a shudder of silver fear. That is the magic of the ocean.
Let them shudder the huge ocean aglimmer.He arrived at Wyewurk at last, and found a little party. William James
was there, and Victoria had made, by coincidence, a Welsh rarebit. The
beer was on the table.&quot;Just in time,&quot; said Jack. &quot;As well you're not half an hour later, or
there might a' been no booze. How did you come - tram?&quot;&quot;Yes - and walked part of the way.&quot;&quot;What kind of an evening did you have?&quot; said Harriet.He looked at her. A chill fell upon the little gathering, from his
presence.&quot;We didn't agree,&quot; he replied.&quot;I knew you wouldn't - not for long, anyhow,&quot; she replied. &quot;I don't see
you agreeing and playing second fiddle for long.&quot;&quot;Do you see me as a fiddler at all?&quot;&quot;I've seen you fiddling away hard enough many times,&quot; retorted Harriet.
&quot;Why, what else do you do, all your life, but fiddle some tune or
other?&quot;He did not reply, and there was a pause. His face was pale and very
definite, as if it were some curious seashell.&quot;What did you get the wind up about, between you?&quot; said Jack soothingly,
pouring Somers a glass of beer.&quot;No wind. We're only not the same pair of shoes.&quot;&quot;I could have told you that before you went,&quot; said Jaz with quiet
elation in his tones.Victoria looked at Somers with dark, bright eyes. She was quite
fascinated by him, as an Australian bird by some adder.&quot;Isn't Mr. Somers queer?&quot; she said. &quot;He doesn't seem to mind a bit.&quot;Somers looked at her quickly, a smile round his eyes, and a curious,
smiling devil inside them, cold as ice.&quot;Oh yes, he minds. Don't take any notice of his pretence. He's only in a
bad temper,&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;I know him by now. He's been in a temper
for days.&quot;&quot;Oh why?&quot; cried Victoria. &quot;I thought he was lovely this afternoon when
he was here.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Harriet grimly. &quot;Lovely! You should live with him.&quot;But again Victoria looked at his clear, fixed face, with the false smile
round the eyes, and her fascination did not diminish.&quot;What an excellent Welsh rarebit,&quot; he said. &quot;If there were a little red
pepper.&quot;&quot;Red pepper?&quot; cried Victoria. &quot;There is!&quot; And she sprang up to get it
for him. As she handed it to him he looked into her dilated, dark bright
eyes, and thanked her courteously. When he was in this state his voice
and tone in speaking were very melodious. Of course it set Harriet on
edge. But Victoria stood fluttering with her hands over the table,
bewildered.&quot;What are you feeling for?&quot; asked Jack.She only gave a little blind laugh, and remembered that she was going to
sit down. So she sat down, and then wondered what it was she was going
to do after that.&quot;So you don't cotton on to Kangaroo either?&quot; said Jack easily.&quot;I have the greatest admiration for him.&quot;&quot;You're not alone there. But you don't fall over yourself, loving him.&quot;&quot;I only trip, and recover my balance for the moment.&quot;Jaz gave a loud laugh, across his cheese.&quot;That's good!&quot; he said.&quot;You trip, and recover your balance,&quot; said Jack. &quot;You're a wary one. The
rest of us falls right in, flop, and are never heard of again. And how
did you part then?&quot;&quot;We parted in mutual esteem. I said I would go, and he asked me please
to do so as quickly as possible.&quot;Jack made round eyes, and even Jaz left off eating.Did you QUARREL?&quot; cried Harriet.&quot;Oh yes, violently. But, of course, not vulgarly. We parted, as I said,
in mutual esteem, bowing each other out.&quot;&quot;You ARE awful. You only went on purpose to upset him. I knew that all
along. Why must you be so spiteful?&quot; said Harriet. &quot;You're never happy
unless you're upsetting somebody's apple-cart.&quot;&quot;Am I doomed to agree with everybody, then?&quot;&quot;No. But you needn't SET OUT to be disagreeable. And to Mr. Cooley
especially, who likes you and is such a warm, big man. You ought to be
flattered that he CARES what you think. No, you have to go and try and
undermine him. Ah - why was I ever pestered with such a viperish husband
as you!&quot; said Harriet.Victoria made alert, frightened eyes. But Somers sat on with the same
little smile and courteous bearing.&quot;I am, of course, immensely flattered at his noticing me,&quot; he replied.
&quot;Otherwise, naturally, I should have resented being told to leave. As it
was I didn't resent it a bit.&quot;&quot;Didn't you!&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;I know you and your pretences. That is
what has put you in such a temper.&quot;&quot;But you remember I've been in a temper for days,&quot; he replied calmly and
gravely. &quot;Therefore there could be no putting.&quot;&quot;Oh, it only made you worse. I'm tired of your temper, really.&quot;&quot;But Mr. Somers isn't in a temper at all!&quot; cried Victoria. &quot;He's nicer
than any of us, really. Jack would be as angry as anything if I said all
those things to him. Shouldn't you, Jack?&quot; And she cuddled his arm.&quot;You'd be shut up in the coal-shed for the night before you got half way
through with it, if ever you started trying it on,&quot; he replied, with
marital humour.&quot;No, I shouldn't either: or it would be the last door you'd shut on ME,
so there. But anyhow you'd be in a waxy old temper.&quot;And she smiled at Somers as she cuddled her husband's arm.&quot;If my hostess says I'm nice,&quot; said Somers, &quot;I am not going to feel
guilty whatever my WIFE may say.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, you do feel guilty,&quot; said Harriet.&quot;Your hostess doesn't find any fault with you at all,&quot; cried Victoria.
She was looking very pretty, in a brown chiffon dress. &quot;She thinks
you're the nicest of anybody here, there.&quot;&quot;What?&quot; cried Jack. &quot;When I'm here as well?&quot;&quot;Whether you're here or not. You're not very nice to me to-night, and
William James never is. But Mr. Somers is AWFULLY nice.&quot; She blushed
suddenly quite vividly, looking under her long lashes at him. He smiled
a little more intensely to himself.&quot;I tell you what, Mrs. Somers,&quot; said Jack. &quot;We'd better make a swap of
it, till they alter their opinion. You and me had better strike up a
match, and let them two elope with one another for a bit.&quot;&quot;And what about William James?&quot; cried Victoria, with hurried, vivid
excitement.&quot;Oh nobody need trouble themselves about William James,&quot; replied that
individual. &quot;It's about time he was rolling home.&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Harriet, in answer to Jack. &quot;I'm striking off no more
matches, thank you. The game's not worth the candle.&quot;&quot;Why, maybe you've only struck on the rough side, you know,&quot; said Jack.
&quot;You might strike on the smooth next time.&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;I'm going to bed, and leave you all to your
striking and your bad tempers. Good-night!&quot;She rose roughly. Victoria jumped up to accompany her to her room. The
Somers had had a room each in Torestin, so Victoria had put them each
separately into a nice little room in her house.&quot;Is it right,&quot; said Jack, &quot;that you got the wind up to-night?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Somers. &quot;At least we only quite lovingly agreed to differ.
Nothing else.&quot;&quot;I thought it would be like that,&quot; said Jack. &quot;He thinks the world of
you, I can see that.&quot;William James stood ready to leave. He looked at Somers cunningly, as if
reading into him with his light-grey, sceptical eyes.&quot;Mr. Somers doesn't care to commit himself so easily,&quot; he said.&quot;No,&quot; said Jack. &quot;You blighters from the old country are so mighty
careful of risking yourselves. That's what I'm not. When I feel a thing
I jump up and go for it, and damn the consequences. There's always
plenty of time to think about a thing after you've done it. And then if
you're fool enough to wish you hadn't done it, why, that shows you
SHOULDN'T have. I don't go in for regrets, myself. I do what I want. And
if I wanted to do a thing, then it's ALL RIGHT when it's done. All a
man's got to do is to keep his mouth shut and his fist ready, and go
down on his knees to NOTHING. Then he can damn well do as he pleases.
And all he asks is that other folks shall do as they please, men or
women. Damn all this careful stunt. I'll step along as far as the tram
with you, Jaz, I feel like walking the Welsh rabbit down into his
burrow. Vicky prefers Mr. Somers to me pro tem. - and I don't begrudge it
her. Why should I?&quot;Victoria was putting away the dishes, and seemed not to hear. The two
men went. Somers still sat in his chair. He was truly in a devil of a
temper, with everybody and everything: a wicked, fiendish mood that made
him LOOK quite handsome, as fate would have it. He had heard Jack's
hint. He knew Victoria was attracted to him: that she imagined no
nonsense about love, she was too remote from the old world, and too
momentary for that. The moment - that was all her feelings were to her.
And at this moment she was fascinated, and when she said, in her
slightly contralto voice:&quot;You're not in a temper with ME, though, are you Mr. Somers?&quot; she was so
comely, like a maiden just ready for love, and like a comely, desirous
virgin offering herself to the wayfarer, in the name of the god of
bright desire, that Somers stretched out his hand and stroked her hot
cheek very delicately with the tips of his fingers, replying:&quot;I could never be angry with you. You're much too winsome.&quot;She looked at him with her dark eyes dilated into a glow, a glow of
offering. He smiled faintly, rising to his feet, and desire in all his
limbs like a power. The moment - and the power of the moment. Again he
felt his limbs full of desire, like a power. And his days of anger
seemed to culminate now in this moment, like bitter smouldering that at
last leaps into flame. Not love - just weapon-like desire. He knew it.
The god Bacchus. Iacchos! Iacchos! Bacchanals with weapon hands. She had
the sacred glow in her eyes. Bacchus, the true Bacchus. Jack would not
begrudge the god. And the fire was very clean and steely, after the
smoke. And he felt the velvety fire from her face in his finger-tips.And still his old stubborn self intervened. He decided almost
involuntarily. Perhaps it was fear.&quot;Good-night,&quot; he said to her. &quot;Jack will be back in a moment. You look
bonnie to-night.&quot;And he went to his room. When he had shut the door, he wondered if it
was merely a sort of cowardice. Honour? No need as far as Jack was
concerned, apparently. And Harriet? She was too honest a female. She
would know that the dishonour, as far as she felt it, lay in the desire,
not in the act. For her, too, honour did not consist in a pledged word
kept according to pledge, but in a genuine feeling faithfully followed.
He had not to reckon with honour there.What then? Why not follow the flame, the moment sacred to Bacchus? Why
not, if it was the way of life? He did not know why not. Perhaps only
old moral habit, or fear, as Jack said, of committing himself. Perhaps
only that. It was Victoria's high moment; all her high moments would
have this Bacchic, weapon-like momentaneity: since Victoria was
Victoria. Why then deny it?The pagan way, the many gods, the different service, the sacred moments
of Bacchus. Other sacred moments: Zeus and Hera, for example, Ares and
Aphrodite, all the great moments of the gods. Why not know them all, all
the great moments of the gods, from the major moment with Hera to the
swift short moments of Io or Leda or Ganymede? Should not a man know the
whole range? And especially the bright, swift, weapon-like Bacchic
occasion, should not any man seize it when it offered?But his heart of hearts was stubbornly puritanical. And his innermost
soul was dark and sullen, black with a sort of scorn. These moments bred
in the head and born in the eye: he had enough of them. These flashes of
desire for a visual object would no longer carry him into action. He had
no use for them. There was a downslope into Orcus, and a vast, phallic,
sacred darkness, where one was enveloped into the greater god as in an
Egyptian darkness. He would meet there or nowhere. To the visual
travesty he would lend himself no more.Pondering and turning recklessly he heard Jack come back. Then he began
to doze. He did not sleep well in Australia, it seemed as if the
aboriginal daimon entered his body as he slept, to destroy its old
constitution. Sleep was almost pain, and too full of dreams. This night
he woke almost at once from a vivid little dream. The fact of the
soonness troubled him too, for at home he never dreamed till morning.But the dream had been just this. He was standing in the living room at
Coo-ee, bending forward doing some little thing by the couch, perhaps
folding the newspaper, making the room tidy at the last moment before
going to bed, when suddenly a violent darkness came over him, he felt
his arms pinned, and he heard a man's voice speaking mockingly behind
him, with a laugh. It was as if he saw the man's face too - a stranger, a
rough, strong sort of Australian. And he realised with horror: &quot;Now they
have put a sack over my head, and fastened my arms, and I am in the
dark, and they are going to steal my little brown handbag from the
bedroom, which contains all the money we have.&quot; The shock of intense
reality made him fight his way out of the depths of the first sleep, but
it was some time before he could really lay hold of facts, like: &quot;I am
not at Coo-ee. I am not at Mullumbimby. I am in Sydney at Wyewurk, and
the Callcotts are in the next room.&quot; So he came really awake. But if the
thing had really happened, it could hardly have happened to him more
than in this dream.In the morning they were returning to the South Coast. But Jack said to
Somers, a little sarcastically:&quot;You aren't altogether pleased with us, then?&quot;Somers hesitated before replying:&quot;I'm not altogether pleased with myself, am I?&quot;&quot;You don't have to be so particular, in this life,&quot; said Jack.&quot;I may have to be.&quot;&quot;You can't have it all perfect beforehand, you know. You've got to sink
a few times before you can swim.&quot;&quot;Sink in what?&quot;&quot;Why, it seems to me you want to have a thing all ready in your hand,
know all about it, before you'll try it. And there's some things you
can't do that with. You've just got to flop into them, like when you
chuck a dog into water.&quot;Somers received this rebuke rather sourly. This was the first wintry day
they had really had. There was a cold fog in Sydney in the morning, and
rain in the fog. In the hills it would be snow - away in the Blue
Mountains. But the fog lifted, and the rain held off, and there was a
wash of yellowish sunshine.Harriet of course had to talk to a fellow-passenger in the train,
because Lovat was his glummest. It was a red-moustached Welshman with a
slightly injured look in his pale blue eyes, as if everything hadn't
been as good to him as he thought it ought, considering his merit. He
said his name was Evans, and he kept a store. He had been sixteen years
in the country.And is it VERY hot in the summer?&quot; said Harriet. &quot;I suppose it is.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; he said, &quot;it's very hot. I've known the days when I've had to lie
down at two o'clock in the afternoon, and not been able to move.
Overpowered, that's what it is, overpowered.&quot;Harriet was suitably impressed, having tried heat in India.&quot;And do you think it takes one long to get used to this country?&quot; she
asked after a while.&quot;Well, I should say it takes about four or five years for your blood
properly to thin down. You can't say you've begun, under two years.&quot;&quot;Four or five years!&quot; re-echoed Harriet. But what she was really turning
over in her mind was this phrase: &quot;For your blood to thin down.&quot; To thin
down! how queer! Lovat also heard the sentence, and realized that his
blood took this thinning very badly, and still about four years of
simmering ahead, apparently, if he stayed in this country. And when the
blood had finished its thinning, what then? He looked at Mr. Evans, with
the sharp pale nose and the reddish hair and the injured look in his
pale-blue eyes. Mr. Evans seemed to find it sweet still to talk to
people from the &quot;old country&quot;. &quot;You're from the old country?&quot; - the
inevitable question. The thinning down had left him looking as if he
felt he lacked something. Yet he wouldn't go back to South Wales. Oh no,
he wouldn't go back.&quot;The blood is thinner out here than in the old country.&quot; The Australians
seemed to accept this as a scientific fact. Richard felt he didn't want
his blood thinned down to the Australian constituency. Yet no doubt in
the night, in his sleep, the metabolic change was taking place fast and
furious.It was raining a little in the late afternoon when Somers and Harriet
got back to Coo-ee. With infinite relief she stepped across her own
threshold.&quot;Ah!&quot; she said, taking a long breath. &quot;Thank God to be back.&quot; She looked
round, and went to rearrange on the sofa the cushions that they had
whacked so hard to get the dust out.Somers went to the edge of the grass to be near the sea. It was raving
in long, rasping lines of hissing breakers - not very high ones, but very
long. The sky hung grey, with veils of dark rain out to sea, and in the
south a blackness of much rain blowing nearer in the wind. At the end of
the jetty, in the mist of the sea-wind's spray, a long, heavy
coal-steamer was slowly toiling to cast loose and get away. The waves
were so long and the current so strong, they would hardly let her turn
and get clear of the misty-black jetty.Under the dark-grey sky the sea looked bright, but coldly bright, with
its yellow-green waves and its ramparts of white foam. There were
usually three white ramparts, one behind the other, of rasping surf: and
sometimes four. Then the long swish and surge of the shoreward wash. The
coast was quite deserted: the steep sand wet as the backwash slid away:
the rocks wet with rain: the low, long black steamer still laboured in
the fume of the wind, indistinctly.Somers turned indoors, and suddenly began taking off his clothes. In a
minute he was running naked in the rain which fell with lovely freshness
on his skin. Ah, he felt so stuffy after that sort of emotional heat in
town. Harriet in amazement saw him whitely disappearing over the edge of
the low cliff-bank, and came to the edge to look.He ran quickly over the sands, where the wind blew cold but velvety, and
the raindrops fell loosely. He walked straight into the fore-wash, and
fell into an advancing ripple. At least it looked a ripple, but was
enough to roll him over so that he went under and got a little taste of
the Pacific. Ah, the fresh cold wetness! - the fresh cold wetness! The
water rushed in the back-wash and the sand melted under him, leaving him
stranded like a fish. He turned again to the water. The walls of surf
were some distance off, but near enough to look rather awful as they
raced in high white walls shattering towards him. And above the ridge of
the raving whiteness the dimness of the labouring steamer, as if it were
perched on a bough.Of course he did not go near the surf. No, the last green ripples of the
broken swell were enough to catch him by the scruff of the neck and
tumble him rudely up the beach, in a pell-mell. But even the blow did
one good, as the sea struck one heavily on the back, if one were
fleeing; full on the chest, if one were advancing.It was raining quite heavily as he walked out, and the skies hung low
over the sea, dark over the green and white vigour of the ocean. The
shore was so foam-white it almost suggested sun. The rain felt almost
warm.Harriet came walking across the grass with a towel.&quot;What a good idea!&quot; she said. &quot;If I'd known I'd have come. I wish I
had.&quot;But he ignored the towel, and went into the little wash-place and under
the shower, to wash off the sticky, strong Pacific. Harriet came along
with the towel, and he put his hand to her face and nodded to her. She
knew what he meant, and went wondering, and when he had rubbed the wet
off himself he came to her.To the end she was more wondering than anything. But when it was the
end, and the night was falling outside, she laughed and said to him:&quot;That was done in style. That was chic. Straight from the sea, like
another creature.&quot;Style and chic seemed to him somewhat ill suited to the occasion, but he
brought her a bowl of warm water and went and made the tea. The wind was
getting noisier, and the sea was shut out but still calling outside the
house. They had tea and toast and quince jam, and one of the seven brown
teapots with a bit off the spout shone quite nicely and brightly at a
corner of the little red-and-white check tea-cloth, which itself
occupied a corner of the big, polished jarrah table. But, thank God, he
felt cool and fresh and detached, not cosy and domestic. He was so
thankful not to be feeling cosy and &quot;homely&quot;. The room felt as
penetrable to the outside influence as if it were a sea-shell lying on
the beach, cool with the freshness and insistence of the sea, not a
snug, cosy box to be secured inside.And Jack Callcott's rebuke stuck in his throat. Perhaps after all he was
just a Pommy, prescribing things with overmuch emphasis, and wanting to
feel God-Almighty in the face of unborn events. A Pommy is a newcomer in
Australia, from the Old Country.Teacher: Why did you hit him, Georgie?Georgie: Please miss, he called me a Pommy.Aussie (with a discoloured eye): Well, you're one, ain'cher? Can I help
it that ch'are one?Pommy is supposed to be short for pomegranate. Pomegranate, pronounced
invariably pommygranate, is a near enough rhyme to immigrant, in a
naturally rhyming country. Furthermore, immigrants are known in their
first months, before their blood &quot;thins down,&quot; by their round and ruddy
cheeks. So we are told. Hence again, pomegranate, and hence Pommy. Let
etymologists be appeased: it is the authorised derivation.Perhaps, said Somers to himself, I am just a Pommy and a fool. If my
blood had thinned down, I shouldn't make all this fuss over sharing in
with Kangaroo or being mates with Jack Callcott. If I am not a ruddy
Pommy, I am a green one. Of course they take the thing as it comes to
them, and they expect me to do the same. Yet there I am hopping and
hissing like a fish in a frying-pan. Putting too much &quot;soul&quot; into it.
Far too much. When your blood has thinned down, out here, there's
nothing but the merest sediment of a soul left, and your wits and your
feelings are clear of it. You take things as they come, as Jack says.
Isn't that the sanest way to take them, instead of trying to drive them
through the exact hole in the hedge that you've managed to poke your
head through? Oh, you unlearn a lot as your blood thins down. But
there's an awful lot to be unlearnt. And when you've unlearnt it, you
never say so. In the first place, because it's dead against the sane old
British tradition. And in the second place, because you don't really
care about telling what you feel, once your blood has thinned down and
is clear of soul.&quot;Thin, you Australian burgundy,&quot; said Somers to his own body, when he
caught a glimpse of it unawares, reflected in the glass as he was going
to bed. &quot;You're thin enough as a bottle, but the wine needs a lot of
maturing. I've made a fool of myself latterly.&quot;Yet he said to himself: &quot;Do I want my blood to thin down like
theirs? - that peculiar emptiness that is in them, because of the
thinning that's gone out of them? Do I want this curious transparent
blood of the antipodes, with its momentaneous feelings, and its sort of
ABSENTNESS? But of course till my blood has thinned down I shan't see
with their eyes. And how in the name of heaven is this world-brotherhood
mankind going to see with one eye, eye to eye, when the very blood is of
different thickness on different continents, and with the difference in
blood, the inevitable psychic difference? Different vision!&quot;>



They went back to Sydney on the Thursday, for two days, to pack up and
return to Coo-ee. All the time, they could hear the sea. It seemed
strange that they felt the sea so far away, in Sydney. In Sydney itself,
there is no sea. It might be Birmingham. Even in Mullumbimby, a queer
raw little place, when Somers lifted his head and looked down Main
Street and saw, a mile away, the high level of the solid sea, it was
almost a shock to him. Half a mile inland, the influence of the sea has
disappeared, and the land-sense is so heavy, buried, that it is hard to
believe that the dull rumble in the air is the ocean. It sounds like a
coal-mine or something.&quot;You'll let Mr. Somers and me have a little chat to ourselves, Mrs.
Somers, won't you?&quot; said Jack, appearing after tea.&quot;Willingly. I assure youIdon't want to be bothered with your
important affairs,&quot; said Harriet. None the less she went over rather
resentfully to Victoria, turned out of her own house. It wasn't that she
wanted to listen. She would really have hated to attend to all their
high-and-mighty revolution stuff. She didn't believe in
revolutions - they were vieux jeu, out of date.&quot;Well,&quot; said Jack, settling down in a wooden arm-chair and starting his
pipe. &quot;You've thought it over, have you?&quot;&quot;Over and over,&quot; laughed Somers.&quot;I knew you would.&quot;He sucked his pipe and thought for a time.&quot;I've had a long talk with Kangaroo about you to-day,&quot; he said.&quot;Who's Kangaroo?&quot;&quot;He's the First,&quot; replied Jack slowly. And again there was silence.
Somers kept himself well in hand, and said nothing.&quot;A lawyer - well up - I knew him in the army, though. He was one of my
lieutenants.&quot;Still Somers waited, without speaking.&quot;He'd like to see you. Should you care to have lunch with him and me in
town to-morrow?&quot;&quot;Have you told him you've talked to me?&quot;&quot;Oh yes - told him before I did it. He knows your writings - read all
you've written, apparently. He'd heard about you too from a chap on the
Naldera. That's the boat you came by, isn't it?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Yes,&quot; echoed Jack. &quot;He was all over me when I mentioned your name.
You'd like Kangaroo. He's a great chap.&quot;&quot;What's his name?&quot;&quot;Cooley - Ben - Benjamin Cooley.&quot;&quot;They like him on the Bulletin, don't they? Didn't I see something about
Ben Cooley and his straight talk?&quot;&quot;Yes. Oh, he can talk straight enough - and crooked enough as well, if it
comes to that. You'll come to lunch then? We lunch in his chambers.&quot;Somers agreed. Jack was silent, as if he had not much more to say. After
a while he added reflectively:&quot;Yes, I'm glad to have brought you and Kangaroo together.&quot;&quot;Why do they call him Kangaroo?&quot;&quot;Looks like one.&quot;Again there was a silence, each man thinking his own thoughts.&quot;You and Kangaroo will catch on like wax, as far as ideas go,&quot; Jack
prognosticated. &quot;But he's an unfeeling beggar, really. And that's where
you WON'T cotton on to him. That's whereIcome in.&quot;He looked at Somers with a faint smile.&quot;Come in to what?&quot; laughed Somers.Jack took his pipe from his mouth with a little flourish.&quot;In a job like this,&quot; he said, &quot;a man wants a mate - yes, a mate - that he
can say ANYTHING to, and be absolutely himself with. Must have it. And
as far as I go - for me - you don't mind if I say it, do you? - Kangaroo
could never have a mate. He's as odd as any phoenix bird I've ever heard
tell of. You couldn't mate him to anything in the heavens above or in
the earth beneath or in the waters under the earth. No, there's no
female kangaroo of his species. Fine chap, for all that. But as lonely
as a nail in a post.&quot;&quot;Sounds something fatal and fixed,&quot; laughed Somers.&quot;It does. And he IS fatal and fixed. Those eyeglasses of his, you
know - they alone make a man into a sort of eye of God, rather glassy.
But my idea is, in a job like this, every man should have a mate - like
most of us had in the war. Mine was Victoria's brother - and still is, in
a way. But he got some sort of a sickness that seems to have taken all
the fight out of him. Fooling about with the wrong sort of women. Can't
get his pecker up again now, the fool. Poor devil an' all.&quot;Jack sighed and resumed his pipe.&quot;Men fight better when they've got a mate. They'll stand anything when
they've got a mate,&quot; he went on again after a while. &quot;But a mate's not
all that easy to strike. We're a lot of decent chaps, stick at nothing
once they wanted to put a thing through, in our lodge - and in my club.
But there's not one of them I feel's quite up to me - if you know what I
mean. Rattling good fellows - but nary one of 'em quite my cut.&quot;&quot;That's usually so,&quot; laughed Somers.&quot;It is,&quot; said Jack. Then he narrowed and diminished his voice. &quot;Now I
feel,&quot; he said cautiously and intensely, &quot;that if you and me was mates,
we could put any damn mortal thing through, if we had to knock the
bottom out of the blanky show to do it.&quot;Somers dropped his head. He liked the man. But what about the cause?
What about the mistrust and reluctancy he felt? And at the same time,
the thrill of desire. What was offered? He wanted so much. To be mates
with Jack in this cause. Life and death mates. And yet he felt he
couldn't. Not quite. Something stopped him.He looked up at Callcott. The other man's face was alert and waiting:
curiously naked a face too. Somers wished it had had even a moustache,
anything rather than this clean, all-clean bare flesh. If Jack had only
had a beard too - like a man - and not one of these clean-shaven
too-much-exposed faces. Alert, waiting face - almost lurking, waiting for
an answer.&quot;Could we ever be QUITE mates?&quot; Somers asked gently.Jack's dark eyes watched the other man fixedly. Jack himself wasn't
unlike a kangaroo, thought Somers: a long-faced, smooth-faced, strangely
watchful kangaroo with powerful hindquarters.&quot;Perhaps not as me and Fred Wilmot was. In a way you're higher up than I
am. But that's what I like, you know - a mate that's better than I am, a
mate who I FEEL is better than I am. That's what I feel about you: and
that's what makes me feel, if we was mates, I'd stick to you through
hell fire and back, and we'd clear some land between us. I KNOW if you
and me was mates, we could put any blooming thing through. There'd be
nothing to stop us.&quot;&quot;Not even Kangaroo?&quot;&quot;Oh, he'd be our way, and we'd be his. He's a sensible chap.&quot; Somers was
tempted to give Jack his hand there and then, and pledge himself to a
friendship, or a comradeship, that nothing should ever alter. He wanted
to do it. Yet something withheld him as if an invisible hand were upon
him, preventing him.&quot;I'm not sure that I'm a mating man, either,&quot; he said slowly.&quot;You?&quot; Jack eyed him. &quot;You are and you aren't. If you'd once come
over - why man, do you think I wouldn't lay my life down for you?&quot;Somers went pale. He didn't want anybody laying down their lives for
him. &quot;Greater love than this - .&quot; But he didn't want this great love. He
didn't BELIEVE in it: in that way of love.&quot;Let's leave it, Jack,&quot; he replied, laughing slowly and rising, giving
his hand to the other man. &quot;Don't let us make any pledges yet. We're
friends, whatever else we are. As for being mates - wait till I feel
sure. Wait till I've seen Kangaroo. Wait till I see my way clear. I feel
I'm only six strides down the way yet, and you ask me to be at the end.&quot;&quot;At the start you mean,&quot; said Jack, gripping the other man's hand, and
rising too. &quot;But take your time, old man.&quot; He laid his hand on Somers'
shoulder. &quot;If you're slow and backward like a woman, it's because it's
your nature. Not like me, I go at it in jumps like a kangaroo. I feel I
could jump clean through the blooming tent-canvas sometimes.&quot; As he
spoke he was pale and tense with emotion, and his eyes were like black
holes, almost wounds in the pallor of his face.Somers was in a dilemma. Did he want to mix and make with this man? One
part of him perhaps did. But not a very big part, since for his life he
could not help resenting it when Jack put his hand on his shoulder, or
called him &quot;old man&quot;. It wasn't the commonness either. Jack's &quot;common&quot;
speech and manner was largely assumed - part of the colonial bluff. He
could be accurate enough if he chose - as Somers knew already, and would
soon know more emphatically. No, it was not the commonness, the vulgar
touch in the approach. Jack was sensitive enough, really. And the quiet,
well-bred appeal of upper-class young Englishmen, who have the same
yearning for intimate comradeship, combined with a sensitive delicacy
really finer than a woman's, this made Somers shrink just the same. He
half wanted to commit himself to this whole affection with a friend, a
comrade, a mate. And then, in the last issue, he didn't want it at all.
The affection would be deep and genuine enough: that he knew. But - when
it came to the point, he didn't want any more affection. All his life he
had cherished a beloved ideal of friendship - David and Jonathan. And
now, when true and good friends offered, he found he simply could not
commit himself, even to simple friendship. The whole trend of this
affection, this mingling, this intimacy, this truly beautiful love, he
found his soul just set against it. He couldn't go along with it. He
didn't want a friend, he didn't want loving affection, he didn't want
comradeship. No, his soul trembled when he tried to drive it along the
way, trembled and stood still, like Balaam's Ass. It did not want
friendship or comradeship, great or small, deep or shallow.It took Lovat Somers some time before he would really admit and accept
this new fact. Not till he had striven hard with his soul did he come to
see the angel in the way; not till his soul, like Balaam's Ass, had
spoken more than once. And then, when forced to admit, it was a
revolution in his mind. He had all his life had this craving for an
absolute friend, a David to his Jonathan, Pylades to his Orestes: a
blood-brother. All his life he had secretly grieved over his
friendlessness. And now at last, when it really offered - and it had
offered twice before, since he had left Europe - he didn't want it, and
he realised that in his innermost soul he had never wanted it.Yet he wanted SOME living fellowship with other men; as it was he was
just isolated. Maybe a living fellowship! - but not affection, not love,
not comradeship. Not mates and equality and mingling. Not
blood-brotherhood. None of that.What else? He didn't know. He only knew he was never destined to be mate
or comrade or even friend with any man. Some other living relationship.
But what? He did not know. Perhaps the thing that the dark races know:
that one can still feel in India: the mystery of lordship. That which
white men have struggled so long against, and which is the clue to the
life of the Hindu. The mystery of lordship. The mystery of innate,
natural, sacred priority. The other mystic relationship between men,
which democracy and equality try to deny and obliterate. Not any
arbitrary caste or birth aristocracy. But the mystic recognition of
difference and innate priority, the joy of obedience and the sacred
responsibility of authority.Before Somers went down to George Street to find Jack and to be taken by
him to luncheon with the Kangaroo, he had come to the decision, or to
the knowledge that mating or comradeship were contrary to his destiny.
He would never pledge himself to Jack, nor to this venture in which Jack
was concerned.They arrived at Mr. Cooley's chambers punctually. It was a handsome
apartment with handsome jarrah furniture, dark and suave, and some very
beautiful rugs. Mr. Cooley came at once: and he WAS a kangaroo. His face
was long and lean and pendulous, with eyes set close together behind his
pince-nez: and his body was stout but firm. He was a man of forty or so,
hard to tell, swarthy, with short-cropped dark hair and a smallish head
carried rather forward on his large but sensitive, almost shy body. He
leaned forward in his walk, and seemed as if his hands didn't quite
belong to him. But he shook hands with a firm grip. He was really tall,
but his way of dropping his head, and his sloping shoulders, took away
from his height. He seemed not much taller than Somers, towards whom he
seemed to lean the sensitive tip of his long nose, hanging over him as
he scrutinised him sharply through his eye-glasses, and approaching him
with the front of his stomach.&quot;Very glad to see you,&quot; he said, in a voice half Australian, half
official.The luncheon was almost impressive: a round table with a huge bunch of
violets in a queer old copper bowl, Queen Anne silver, a tablecloth with
heavy point edging, Venetian wine-glasses, red and white wine in
Venetian wine-jugs, a Chinaman waiting at table, offering first a silver
dish of hors d'oeuvres and a handsome crayfish with mayonnaise.&quot;Why,&quot; said Somers, equivocally, &quot;I might be anywhere.&quot;Kangaroo looked at him sharply. Somers noticed that when he sat down,
his thighs in his dark grey, striped trousers were very thick, making
his shoulders seem almost slender; but though his stomach was stout, it
was firm.&quot;Then I hope you feel at home,&quot; said Kangaroo. &quot;Because I am sure you
are at home anywhere.&quot; And he helped himself to olives, putting one in
his queer, pursed, thick-lipped mouth.&quot;For which reason I'm never at home, presumably.&quot;&quot;That may easily be the case. Will you take red or white wine?&quot;&quot;White,&quot; said Somers, oblivious of the poised Chinaman.&quot;You have come to a homely country,&quot; said the Kangaroo, without the
ghost of a smile.&quot;Certainly to a very hospitable one.&quot;&quot;We rarely lock our doors,&quot; said Kangaroo.&quot;Or anything else,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Though of course we may slay you in the
scullery if you say a word against us.&quot;&quot;I'm not going to be so indiscreet,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Leave the indiscretion to us. We believe in it. Indiscretion is the
better part of valour. You agree, Kangaroo?&quot; said Jack, smiling over his
plate directly at his host.&quot;I don't think I'd care to see you turn discreet, boy,&quot; returned the
other. &quot;Though your quotation isn't new.&quot;&quot;Even a crystal-gazer can't gaze to the bottom of a deep well, eh? Never
mind, I'm as shallow as a pie-dish, and proud of it. Red, please.&quot; This
to the Chink.&quot;That's why it's so nice knowing you,&quot; said Kangaroo.&quot;And you, of course, are a glass finger-bowl with a violet floating on
it, you're so transparent,&quot; said Jack.&quot;I think that describes me beautifully. Mr. Somers, help yourself to
wine, that's the most comfortable. I hope you are going to write
something for us. Australia is waiting for her Homer - or her
Theocritus.&quot;&quot;Or even her Ally Sloper,&quot; said Jack, &quot;if I may be permitted to be so
old-fashioned.&quot;&quot;If I were but blind,&quot; said Somers, &quot;I might have a shot at Australian
Homerics.&quot;&quot;His eyes hurt him still, with looking at Sydney,&quot; said Jack.There certainly is enough of it to look at,&quot; said Kangaroo.&quot;In acreage,&quot; said Jack.&quot;Pity it spreads over so much ground,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Oh, every man his little lot, and an extended tram-service.&quot;In Rome,&quot; said Somers, &quot;they piled up huge houses, vast, and stowed
them away like grubs in a honeycomb.&quot;&quot;Who did the stowing?&quot; asked Jack sarcastically.&quot;We don't like to have anybody overhead here,&quot; said Kangaroo. &quot;We don't
even care to go upstairs, because we are then one storey higher than our
true, ground-floor selves.&quot;&quot;Prop us up on a dozen stumps, and we're cosy,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Just a
little above the earth level, and no higher, you know. Australians in
their heart of hearts hate anything but a bungalow. They feel it's rock
bottom, don't you see. None of your stair-climbing shams and upstairs
importance.&quot;&quot;Good honest fellows,&quot; said Kangaroo, and it was impossible to know if
he were joking or not.&quot;Till it comes to business,&quot; said Jack.Kangaroo then started a discussion of the much-mooted and at the moment
fashionable Theory of Relativity.&quot;Of course it's popular,&quot; said Jack. &quot;It absolutely takes the wind out
of anybody's sails who wants to say &quot;I'm IT.&quot; Even the Lord Almighty is
only relatively so and as it were.&quot;&quot;How nice for us all,&quot; laughed Somers. &quot;It needed a Jew to lead us this
last step in liberty.&quot;&quot;Now we're all little ITS, chirping like so many molecules one with
another,&quot; said Jack, eyeing the roast duck with a shrewd gaze.The luncheon passed frivolously. Somers was bored, but he had a shrewd
suspicion that the other two men really enjoyed it. They sauntered into
the study for coffee. It was a smallish room, with big, deep leather
chairs of a delicate brown colour, and a thick, bluey oriental carpet.
The walls even had an upper panelling of old embossed cordovan leather,
a bluish colouring with gilt, old and tarnished away. It was evident
that law pays, even in a new country.Everybody waited for everybody to speak. Somers, of course, knew it was
not his business to begin.&quot;The indiscreet Callcott told you about our Kangaroo clubs,&quot; said the
host, smiling faintly. Somers thought that surely he had Jewish blood in
him. He stirred his little gold coffee-cup slowly.&quot;He gave me a very sketchy outline.&quot;&quot;It interested you?&quot;&quot;Exceedingly.&quot;&quot;I read your series of articles on Democracy,&quot; said Kangaroo. &quot;In fact
they helped me to this attempt now.&quot;&quot;I thought not a soul read them,&quot; said Somers, &quot;in that absurd
international paper published at the Hague, that they said was run
absolutely by spies and shady people.&quot;&quot;It may have been. But I was a subscriber, and I read your essays here
in Sydney. There was another man, too, writing on a new aristocracy. But
it seemed to me there was too much fraternising in his scheme, too much
reverence for the upper classes and passionate pity for the working
classes. He wanted them all to be kind to one another, aristocrats of
the spirit.&quot; Kangaroo smiled slowly. And when he smiled like that, there
came an exceedingly sweet charm into his face, for a moment his face was
like a flower. Yet he was quite ugly. And surely, thought Somers, it is
Jewish blood. The very best that is in the Jewish blood: a faculty for
pure disinterestedness, and warm, physically warm love, that seems to
make the corpuscles of the blood glow. And after the smile his face went
stupid and kangaroo-like, pendulous, with the eyes close together above
the long, drooping nose. But the shape of the head was very beautiful,
small, light, and fine. The man had surely Jewish blood. And he was
almost purely KIND, essential kindliness, embodied in an ancient,
unscrupulous shrewdness. He was so shrewd, so clever. And with a rogue
or a mean man, absolutely unscrupulous. But for any human being who
showed himself sincere and vulnerable, his heart was pure in kindness.
An extraordinary man. This pure kindliness had something Jehovah-like in
it. And in every difficulty and every stress, he would remember it, his
kindly love for real, vulnerable human beings. It had given his soul an
absolute direction, whatever he said about relativity. Yet once he felt
any man or woman was cold, mean, barren of this warmth which was in him,
then he became at once utterly unscrupulous in defeating the creature.
He was not angry or indignant. He was more like a real Jehovah. He had
only to turn on all the levers and forces of his clever, almost
fiendishly subtle will, and he could triumph. And he knew it. Somers had
once had a Jewish friend with this wonderful, Jehovah-like kindliness,
but also, without the shrewd fiendish subtlety of will. But it helped
him to understand Cooley.&quot;Yes - I think the man sent me his book,&quot; said Somers. &quot;I forget his
name. I only remember there was a feverish adulation of Lord
Something-or-other, and a terrible cri du coeur about the mother of the
people, the poor elderly woman in a battered black bonnet and a shawl,
going out with sixpence ha'penny to buy a shillings-worth of necessaries
for the home.&quot;&quot;Just so,&quot; said Kangaroo, smiling again. &quot;No doubt her husband drank. If
he did, who can wonder.&quot;&quot;The very sight of her makes one want to shove her out of the house - or
out of the world, for that matter,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Nay,&quot; said Jack. &quot;She's enjoying her misery, dear old soul. Don't envy
her bits of pleasures.&quot;Not envy,&quot; laughed Somers. &quot;But I begrudge them her.&quot;&quot;What would you do with her?&quot; asked Kangaroo.&quot;I wouldn't do anything. She mostly creeps in the East End. where one
needn't bother about her. And she's as much at home there as an opossum
is in the bush. So don't bother me about her.&quot;&quot;Just so,&quot; smiled Kangaroo. &quot;I'd like to provide public kitchens where
the children can get properly fed - and make the husband do a certain
amount of state labour to pay for it. And for the rest, leave them to go
their own way.&quot;&quot;But their minds, their souls, their spirits?&quot; said Somers.&quot;They must more or less look after them themselves. I want to keep
ORDER. I want to remove physical misery as far as possible. That I am
sure of. And that you can only do by exerting strong, just POWER from
above. There I agree with you.&quot;&quot;You don't believe in education?&quot;&quot;Not much. That is to say, in ninety per cent of the people it is
useless. But I do want those ninety per cent none the less to have full,
substantial lives: as even slaves had under certain masters and as our
people hardly have at all. That again, I think, is one of your ideas.&quot;&quot;It is,&quot; said Somers. But his heart sank. &quot;You want a kind of benevolent
tyranny, then?&quot;&quot;Not exactly. You see my tyrant would be so much circumscribed by the
constitution I should establish. But in a sense, he would be a tyrant.
Perhaps it would be nearer to say he would be a patriarch, or a pope:
representing as near as possible the wise, subtle spirit of life. I
should try to establish my state of Australia as a kind of Church, with
the profound reverence for life, for life's deepest urges, as the motive
power. Dostoevsky suggests this: and I believe it can be done.&quot;&quot;Perhaps it might be done here,&quot; blurted Somers. &quot;Every continent has
its own way, and its own needs.&quot;&quot;I agree,&quot; said Kangaroo. &quot;I have the greatest admiration for the Roman
Catholic Church, as an institution. But the creed and the theology are
not natural to me, quite. Not quite. I think we need something more
flexible, and a power less formal and dogmatic; more generous, shall I
say. A GENEROUS power, that sees all the issue here, not in the
after-life, and that does not concern itself with sin and repentance and
redemption. I should try to teach my people what it is truly to be a
MAN, and a woman. The salvation of souls seems too speculative a job. I
think if a man is truly a man, true to his own being, his soul saves
itself in that way. But no two people can save their souls alive, in the
same way. As far as possible, we must leave it to them. Fata volentem
ducunt, nolentem trahunt.&quot;&quot;I believe that too.&quot;&quot;Yet there must be law, and there must be authority. But law more human,
and authority much wiser. If a man loves life, and feels the sacredness
and the mystery of life, then he knows that life is full of strange and
subtle and even conflicting imperatives. And a wise man learns to
recognize the imperatives as they arise - or nearly so - and to obey. But
most men bruise themselves to death trying to fight and overcome their
own new, life-born needs, life's ever-strange new imperatives. The
secret of all life is in obedience: obedience to the urge that arises in
the soul, the urge that is life itself, urging us on to new gestures,
new embraces, new emotions, new combinations, new creations. It is a
subtle and conflicting urge away from the thing we are. And there lies
the pain. Because man builds himself in to his old house of life, builds
his own blood into the roads he lays down, and to break from the old
way, and to change his house of life, is almost like tearing him to
pieces: a sacrilege. Life is cruel - and above all things man needs to be
reassured and suggested into his new issues. And he needs to be relieved
from this terrible responsibility of governing himself when he doesn't
know what he wants, and has no aim towards which to govern himself. Man
again needs a father - not a friend or a brother sufferer, a suffering
Saviour. Man needs a quiet, gentle father who uses his authority in the
name of living life, and who is absolutely stern against anti-life. I
offer no creed. I offer myself, my heart of wisdom, strange warm cavern
where the voice of the oracle steams in from the unknown; I offer my
consciousness, which hears the voice; and I offer my mind and my will,
for the battle against every obstacle to respond to the voice of life,
and to shelter mankind from the madness and the evil of anti-life.&quot;&quot;You believe in evil?&quot;&quot;Ah, yes. Evil is the great principle that opposes life in its new
urges. The principle of permanency, everlastingness is, in my opinion,
the root of evil. The Ten Commandments which Moses heard were the very
voice of life. But the tablets of stone he engraved them on are
millstones round our necks. Commandments should fade as flowers do. They
are no more divine than flowers are. But our divine flowers - look at
those hibiscus - they don't want to immortalise themselves into stone. If
they turned into stone on my table, my heart would almost stop beating,
and lose its hope and its joy. But they won't. They will quietly, gently
wither. And I love them for it. And so should all creeds, all gods,
quietly and gently curl up and wither as their evening approaches. That
is the only way of true holiness, in my opinion.&quot;The man had a beautiful voice, when he was really talking. It was like a
flute, a wood-instrument. And his face, with that odd look of a sheep or
a kangaroo, took on an extraordinary beauty of its own, a glow as if it
were suffused with light. And the eyes shone with a queer, holy light,
behind the eyeglasses. And yet it was still the kangaroo face.Somers watched the face, and dropped his head. He sat feeling rebuked.
He was so impatient and outrageous himself. And the steady loveliness of
this man's warm, wise heart was too much for him. He was abashed before
it.&quot;Ah, yes,&quot; Kangaroo re-echoed. &quot;There is a principle of evil. The
principle of resistance. Malignant resistance to the life principle. And
it uses the very life-force itself against life, and sometimes seems as
if it were absolutely winning. Not only Jesus rose from the dead. Judas
rose as well, and propagated himself on the face of the earth. He has
many children now. The life opposers. The life-resisters. The
life-enemies. But we will see who wins. We will see. In the name of
life, and the love of life, as man is almost invincible. I have found it
so.&quot;&quot;I believe it also,&quot; said Somers.They were silent, and Kangaroo sat there with the rapt look on his face:
a pondering, eternal look, like the eternity of the lamb of God grown
into a sheep. This rather wicked idea came into Somers' mind: the lamb
of God grown into a sheep. So the man sat there, with his wide-eyed,
rapt face sunk forward to his breast, very beautiful, and as eternal as
if it were a dream: so absolute.A wonderful thing for a sculptor. For Kangaroo was really ugly: his
pendulous Jewish face, his forward shoulders, his round stomach in its
expensively tailored waistcoat and dark grey, striped trousers, his very
big thighs. And yet even his body had become beautiful, to Somers - one
might love it intensely, every one of its contours, its roundnesses and
downward-drooping heaviness. Almost a grotesque, like a Chinese Buddha.
And yet not a grotesque. Beautiful, beautiful as some half-tropical,
bulging flower from a tree.Then Kangaroo looked with a teasing little smile at Somers.&quot;But you have your OWN idea of power, haven't you?&quot; he said, getting up
suddenly, with quick power in his bulk, and gripping the other man's
shoulder.&quot;I thought I had,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Oh, you have, you have.&quot; There was a calm, easy tone in the voice,
slightly fat, very agreeable. Somers thrilled to it as he had never
thrilled.&quot;Why, the man is like a god, I love him,&quot; he said to his astonished
self. And Kangaroo was hanging forward his face and smiling heavily and
ambiguously to himself, knowing that Somers was with him.&quot;Tiger, tiger, burning bright
In the forests of the night&quot;he quoted in a queer, sonorous voice, like a priest. &quot;The lion of your
might would be a tiger, wouldn't it. The tiger and the unicorn were
fighting for the crown. How about me for a unicorn? - if I tied a bayonet
on my nose?&quot; He rubbed his nose with a heavy playfulness.&quot;Is the tiger your principle of evil?&quot;&quot;The tiger? Oh dear, no. The jackal, the hyaena, and dear, deadly
humanity. No, no. The tiger stands on one side of the shield, and the
unicorn on the other, and they don't fight for the crown at all. They
keep it up between them. The pillars of the world! The tiger and the
kangaroo!&quot; he boomed this out in a mock heroic voice, strutting with
heavy playfulness. Then he laughed, looking winsomely at Somers. Heaven,
what a beauty he had!&quot;Tiger, tiger, burning bright,&quot; he resumed, sing-song, abstracted. &quot;I
knew you'd come. Ever since I read your first book of poems - how many
years is it ago? - ten? - eleven? I knew you'd come.'Your hands are five-branded flames - 
Noli me tangere.'Of course you had to come.&quot;&quot;Well, here I am, anyhow,&quot; said Somers.&quot;You are. You ARE!&quot; shouted the other, and Somers was quite scared. Then
Kangaroo laughed again. &quot;Get up,&quot; he said. &quot;Stand up and let me look at
you.&quot;The two men stood facing one another: Kangaroo large, with his full
stomach and his face hulking down, and his queer, glaring eyes: Somers
slight and aloof-looking. Cooley eyed him up and down.&quot;A little bit of a fellow - too delicate for rough me,&quot; he said, then
started quoting again:'Your hands are five-branded flames - 
Noli me tangere.'I've got fat and bulky on all the poetry I never wrote. How do you do,
Mr. Somers? How do you like Australia, and its national animal, the
kangaroo?&quot; Again he smiled with the sudden glow of warmth in his dark
eyes, startling and wonderful.&quot;Australia is a weird country, and it's national animal is beyond me,&quot;
Somers said, smiling rather palely.&quot;Oh no, it isn't. You'll be patting it on the back as soon as you've
taken your hands out of your pockets.&quot;He stood silent a long while, with feet apart, looking abstractedly at
Somers through his pince-nez.&quot;Ah, well,&quot; he sighed at last. &quot;We shall see. We shall see. But I'm very
glad you came. You understand what I mean, I know, when I say we are
birds of the same feather. Aren't we?&quot;&quot;In some ways I think we are.&quot;&quot;Yes. In the feathery line. When shall I see you again?&quot;&quot;We are going back to the South Coast on Saturday.&quot;&quot;Then let me see you to-morrow. Let me call for you at your house - and
bring you back into town for dinner in the evening. May I do that?&quot;&quot;Thank you,&quot; said Somers.&quot;What does 'thank you' mean? Danke! No, thank you.&quot;&quot;Yes, thank you,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Don't thank ME, man,&quot; suddenly shouted the other. &quot;I'm the one to do
the thanking.&quot;Somers felt simple startled amazement at these sudden shouts - loud
shouts, that you might almost hear in the street.At last Jack and Somers left. Jack had felt it his business to keep
quiet: he knew his chief. But now he opened his mouth.&quot;What do you think of Kangaroo?&quot; he asked.&quot;I'm beyond thinking,&quot; said Somers.&quot;I know, that's how he leaves you when he makes a set at you. But he's a
rattling fine sort, he is. He puts a heart into you when your chest's as
hollow as an old mustard tin. He's a wonder, is Kangaroo: and he keeps
on being a wonder.&quot;&quot;Yes, he's certainly a wonder.&quot;&quot;My, the brain the man has! I say, though, talking about tigers and
kangaroos reminded me of a thing I once saw. It was up in the North. I
was going along when I heard snarls out of some long buffalo grass that
made my hair stand on end. I had to see what it was, though, so into the
grass goes I. And there I saw a full-grown male kangaroo backed up
against a tree, with the flesh of one leg torn clean from the bone. He
was gasping, but he was still fighting. And the other was a great big
cat, we call 'em tiger-cats, as big as a smallish leopard, a
beauty - grey and black stripes, and straighter than a leopard. And
before you could breathe, a streak of black and grey shot at the 'roo's
throat, seemed to twist in mid air - and the 'roo slipped down to the
ground with his entrails ripped right out. I was so dumbfounded I took a
step in the grass, and that great hulking cat stopped and lifted his
face from his warm food that he'd started on without ever looking up. He
stood over the 'roo for ten seconds staring me in the eyes. Then the
skin wrinkled back from his snout, and the fangs were so white and clean
as death itself, and a low growl came out of his ugly throat. &quot;Come on,
you swine,&quot; it said as plain as words. I didn't, you bet. I backed out
of that beastly grass.&quot;The next one I saw was a dead one. And beside him lay the boss' best
staghound, that had been trained to tackling wild boars since he was a
pup: dead as well. The cat had come fossicking round our camp on the
Madden River.&quot;My gad, though, but the size of the brute, and muscle like you couldn't
find in any other beast. I looked at the claws on the pads. They're as
sharp as a lancet, and they'd tear the guts out of a man before he could
squeak. It was good-bye 'roo, that time.&quot;&quot;They put that yarn in the Bulletin. And some chap wrote and said it was
a stiff 'un, and the wild cat must be descended from escaped tame cats,
because this country has no pussy aboriginal of any sort. Couldn't say
myself, except I saw that tiger-cat, and it didn't look much like the
son of a homely tissey, either. Wonder what put the thing in my head.
Perhaps Kangaroo's fat belly.&quot;&quot;He's not so very fat,&quot; said Somers.&quot;No, he's not got what you'd call a corporation and a whole urban
council in front of him. Neither is he flat just there, like you and
me.&quot;Kangaroo arrived the next day at Torestin with a large bunch of violets
in his hand: pale, expensive, late winter violets. He took off his hat
to Harriet and bowed quite deep, without shaking hands. He had been a
student at Munich.&quot;Oh, how do you do!&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;Please don't look at the horrid
room, we leave in the morning.&quot;Kangaroo looked vacantly around. He was not interested, so he saw
nothing: he might as well have been blind.&quot;It's a very nice room,&quot; he said. &quot;May I give you the violets? The poet
said you liked having them about.&quot;She took them in her two hands, smelling their very faint fragrance.&quot;They're not like English violets - or those big dark fellows in Italy,&quot;
he said. &quot;But still we persuade ourselves that they ARE violets.&quot;&quot;They're lovely. I feel I could warm my hands over them,&quot; she said.&quot;And now they're quite happy violets,&quot; he replied, smiling his rare,
sweet smile at her. &quot;Why are you taking the poet away from Sydney?&quot;&quot;Lovat? He wants to go.&quot;&quot;Lovat! What a good name to call him by!&quot; He turned to Somers, looking
at him closely. &quot;May I call you Lovat?&quot;&quot;Better that than 'the poet',&quot; said Somers, lifting his nose slightly
with aversion.The other man laughed, but softly and happily.&quot;His muse he's not in love with,&quot; he murmured to himself.&quot;No, he prefers his own name,&quot; said Somers.&quot;But supposing now,&quot; said Kangaroo, as if alert and interested, &quot;your
name was Cooley: Benjamin Cooley - Ben, for short. You'd prefer even
Kangaroo to that.&quot;&quot;In Australia the kangaroo is the king of beasts,&quot; said Somers.&quot;The kangaroo is the king of beasts,
Inviting the other ones out to feasts,&quot;sang the big man continuing: &quot;Won't you both come to dinner with the
king of beasts? Won't you come too, Mrs. Somers?&quot;&quot;You know you only want Lovat, to talk your MAN'S stuff.&quot;&quot;I'm not a man, I'm a kangaroo. Besides, yesterday I hadn't seen you. If
I had known, my dear Somers, that your wife, who is at this moment in
her room hastily changing her dress, was such a beautiful person - I
don't say woman merely - I'd have invited you for her sake, and not for
your own.&quot;&quot;ThenIwouldn't have come,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Hear them, what a haughty pair of individuals! I suppose you expect the
king of beasts to go down on his knees to you, like the rest of
democratic kings to their constituents. Won't you get ready,&quot; Mrs.
Somers?&quot;&quot;You are quite sure you want me to come?&quot; said Harriet suspiciously.&quot;Why, if you won't come, I shall ask Lovat - dear Lovat, by the happiest
fluke in the world not Lovelace - to let me stay here to tea, dinner, or
supper - that is, to the next meal, whatever name it may bear.&quot;At this Harriet disappeared to put on a proper dress.&quot;We will go as soon as you are ready,&quot; called Kangaroo. &quot;We can all
squeeze into that automobile at your gate.&quot;When Harriet reappeared the men rose. Kangaroo looked at her with
admiration.&quot;What a remarkably beautiful person you are,&quot; he said. &quot;But mind, I
don't say WOMAN. Dio liberi!&quot; He scuttled hurriedly to the door.They had a gay dinner. Kangaroo wasn't really witty. But he had such an
innocent charm, an extraordinary winsomeness, that it was much more
delicious than wit. His presence was so warm. You felt you were cuddled
cosily, like a child, on his breast, in the soft glow of his heart, and
that your feet were nestling on his ample, beautiful &quot;tummy&quot;.&quot;I wonder you were never married,&quot; said Harriet to him.&quot;I've been married several times,&quot; he replied.&quot;Really!&quot; she cried.&quot;First to Benny Cooley - then to immortal verse - after that to the
law - once to a haughty lady - and now I'm wedded to my ideals. This time
it is final. I don't take another wife.&quot;&quot;I don't care about the rest. But were you ever married, really?&quot;&quot;To a woman? A mere woman? Why yes indeed. A young Baroness too. And
after seven months she told me she couldn't stand me for another minute,
and went off with Von Rumpeldorf.&quot;&quot;Is it true?&quot;&quot;Quite true.&quot;&quot;And is there still a Mrs. Kangaroo?&quot;&quot;Alas, no! Like the unicorn, the family knows no female.&quot;&quot;But why couldn't she stand you?&quot; cried Harriet.&quot;Think of it now. Could ANY woman stand me?&quot; he asked, with a slight
shrug.&quot;I should have thought they'd have ADORED you,&quot; she cried.&quot;Of course they do. They can't stand me, though. And I thoroughly
sympathize with them.&quot;Harriet looked at him thoughtfully.&quot;Yes,&quot; she said slowly. &quot;You're too much like Abraham's bosom. One would
feel nowhere.&quot;Kangaroo threw down his napkin and pushed back his chair and roared with
laughter - roared and roared with laughter. The Chinese man-servant stood
back perturbed. Harriet went very red - the dinner waited. Then suddenly
he became quiet, looking comically at Harriet, and still sitting back
from table. Then he opened his arms and held them outstretched, his head
on one side.&quot;The way to nowhere,&quot; he said, ironically.She did not say any more, and he turned to the manservant.&quot;My glass is empty, John,&quot; he said.&quot;Ah well,&quot; he sighed, &quot;if you please one woman you can't please all
women.&quot;&quot;And you must please all women,&quot; said Harriet, thoughtfully. &quot;Yes,
perhaps you must. Perhaps it is your mission.&quot;&quot;Mission! Good God! Now I'm a fat missionary. Dear Mrs. Somers, eat my
dinner, but don't swallow ME in a mouthful. Eating your host for hors
d'oeuvres. You're a dangerous ogre, a Medusa with her hair under her
hat. Let's talk of Peach Melba. Where have you had the very best Peach
Melba you ever tasted?&quot;After this he became quiet, and a little constrained, and when they had
withdrawn for coffee, the talk went subduedly, with a little difficulty.&quot;I suppose your husband will have told you, Mrs. Somers, of our
heaven-inspired scheme of saving Australia from the thieves, dingoes,
rabbits, rats and starlings, humanly speaking.&quot;&quot;No, he hasn't told me. He's only told me there was some political
business going on.&quot;&quot;He may as well put it that way as any other. And you advised him not to
have anything to do with it?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Harriet, &quot;I let him do as he likes.&quot;&quot;Wonderful woman! Even the wind bloweth where it listeth.&quot;&quot;So does he.&quot;&quot;With your permission.&quot;&quot;The wind has permission too,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;Everything goes by
permission of something else, in this world.&quot; But she went rather red.&quot;Bravo, a Daniel come to judgement!&quot; Then his voice changed, became
gentle and winning again. It was as if he had remembered to love her, in
his way of love. &quot;It's not quite a political thing,&quot; he said. &quot;We want
to take away the strain, the nervous tension out of life, and let folks
be happy again unconsciously, instead of unhappy consciously. You
wouldn't say that was wrong, would you?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; she replied, rather unwilling.&quot;And if I have to be a fat old Kangaroo with - not an Abraham's bosom,
but a pouch to carry young Australia in - why - do you really resent it?&quot;Harriet laughed, glancing involuntarily at his lowest waistcoat button.
It seemed such a true figure.&quot;Why should I resent it? It's not my business.&quot;&quot;Let it be your business just a little bit. I want your sympathy.&quot;&quot;You mean you want Lovat?&quot;&quot;Poor Lovat. Richard Lovat Somers! I do indeed want him. But just as
much I want your sympathy.&quot;Harriet smiled enigmatically. She was being her most annoying. A look of
almost vicious anger came over the man's face as he leaned back in his
chair, seeming to make his brows narrower, and a convulsion seemed to go
through his belly. Then he recovered his calm, and seemed to forget. For
a long time he lay silent, with a strange hypnotic stillness, as if he
were thinking far away, quite far away. Both Harriet and Somers felt
spellbound. Then from the distance came his small voice:&quot;Man that is born of woman is sick of himself. Man that is born of woman
is tired of his day after day. And woman is like a mother with a
tiresome child: what is she to do with him? What is she to do with
him? - man, born of woman.&quot;But the men that are born like ants, out of the cold interval, and are
womanless, they are not sick of themselves. They are full of cold
energy, and they seethe with cold fire in the anthill, making new
corridors, new chambers - they alone know what for. And they have cold,
formic-acid females, as restless as themselves, and as active about the
ant-hill, and as identical with the dried clay of the building. And the
active, important, so-called females, and the active, cold-blooded,
energetic males, they shift twig after twig, and lay crumb of earth upon
crumb of earth, and the females deposit cold white eggs of young. This
is the world, and the people of the world. And with their cold, active
bodies the ant-men and the ant-women swarm over the face of the earth.&quot;And where then are the sons of men? Where are the sons of men, and man
that is born of woman? Man that is born of woman is a slave in the cold,
barren corridors of the ant-hill. Or if he goes out, the open spaces are
but spaces between ant-hill and ant-hill. And as he goes he hears voices
claiming him, saying: &quot;Hello, here comes a brother ant.&quot; And they hail
him as a brother ant. And from this there is no escape. None. Not even
the lap of woman.&quot;But I am a son of man. I was once a man born of woman. And by the warm
heart of the mother that bore me, even if fifty wives denied me, I would
still go on fighting with a warm heart to break down the ant-hill. I can
fight them with their own weapons: the hard mandibles and the acid sting
of the cold ant. But that is not how I fight them. I fight them with the
warm heart. Deep calls to deep, and fire calls out fire. And for warmth,
for the fire of sympathy, to burn out the ant heap with the heat of
fiery, living hearts: that is what I stand for.&quot;And if I can make no one single woman happy, I will make none unhappy
either. But if I can let out the real fire of happiness from the heart
and bowels of man that is born of woman and woman that is born of man.&quot;
Then suddenly he broke off: &quot;And whether I can or not, I LOVE them,&quot; he
shouted, in a voice suddenly become loud and passionate. &quot;I love them. I
LOVE you, you woman born of man, I do, and I defy you to prevent me.
Fiery you are, and fiery am I, and fire should be friends with fire. And
when you make me angry, with your jealousy and mistrust like the ants, I
remember, I remind myself: &quot;But see the beauty of the fire in her! And
think how the ants have tortured her and filled her with fear and with
horror!&quot; And then the rage goes down again, and I know I love you, and I
know that fire loves fire, and that therefore you love me. And I chalk
up another mark against the ants, who have tortured you with their cold
energy and their conscious formic-acid that stings like fire. And I love
you because you've suffered from them as I have. And I love you because
you and your husband cherish the fire between you, sacred, apart from
the ants. A bas les fourmis.&quot;I have been like a man buried up to his neck in an ant-heap: so buried
in the daily world, and stung and stung and stung again, because I
wouldn't change and grow cold, till now their poison is innocuous, and
the formic-acid of social man has no effect on me. And I've kept my
warmth. And I will keep it, till I give it up to the unknown, out of my
poor fat body. And it is my banner, and my wife and my children and my
God - just a flicker that is in my heart like a fire, and that I live by.
I CAN'T speculate about God. I can't do it. It seems to me a cold,
antish trick. But the fire that is in my heart is God, and I will not
forswear it, no, not if you offer me all the world. And fire is full of
seeds - full of seeds - and let them scatter. I won't cherish it on a
domestic hearth. I say I won't. So don't bring that up against me. I
won't cherish it on the domestic hearth. I will use it against the ants,
while they swarm over everything. And I'll call fire to my fire, and set
the ant-heap at last in a blaze. Like kerosene poured in. It shall be
so. It shall be so. Don't oppose me. Believe the flame in your heart,
once and for all, and don't oppose me. Believe the flame of your own
heart, and be with me. Remember I am with you against the ants. Remember
that. And if I am Abraham's bosom - isn't it better than no bosom, in a
world that simmers with busy ants? And would you leave every young,
warm, naked thing on the ground for the ants to find. Would you?&quot;He looked at her searchingly. She was pale, and moved, but hostile. He
swung round in his chair, swinging his heavy hips over and lying
sideways.&quot;Shall I tell you a thing a man told me. He had it from the lady's own
lips. It was when the Prince of Wales was in India just now. There had
been a show - and then a dinner given by the governor of the town - some
capital or other. The Prince sat next to the governor's lady, and he was
glum, silent, tortured by them all a bit beyond bearance. And the
governor's lady felt she ought to make conversation, ought to say
something to the poor devil, just for the show's sake and the occasion.
So she COULDN'T think what to tell him that would interest him. Then she
had a brilliant idea. 'Do you know what happened to me last week?' she
said. 'You've seen my adorable little Pekinese, Chu? She had
puppies - four darling queer little things - tiny little creepy-crawlies.
Of course we loved them. But in the night I thought I heard them
crying - I wasn't sure. But at last I went down. And what do you think!
There was a swarm of white ants, and they were just eating up the last
bits of them. Wasn't it awful.' The Prince went white as death. And just
then an ant happened to come on the tablecloth. He took his glass and
banged it over it, and never spoke another word all evening. Now that
story was told by the woman herself. And this was what she did to a poor
nerve-racked lad she was supposed to honour. Now I ask you, where was
the living heart in her? She was an ant, a white ant, too.&quot;He rolled over in his chair, bitterly, with massive bitterness, turning
his back on Harriet. She sat with a pale, blenched face, and tears in
her eyes.&quot;How cruel!&quot; she said. &quot;But she must have been a fool.&quot;&quot;Vile! Vile! No fool! Quite brilliant ant-tactics. There was warmth in
the lad's heart, and she was out to do HER bit of the quenching. Oh, she
gave him her nip and sting. Ants, social ants. Social creatures!
Cold - I'm as cold as they are when it comes to them. And as cunning, and
QUITE as vicious. But that's not what I care for. I want to collect
together all the fire in all the burning hearts in Australia: that's
what I want. Collect the heart-fire, and the fire will be our fire.
That's what I do want; apart from all antics and ant-tricks. 'We have
lighted such a fire this day, Master Latimer.' Yes, and we'll light
another. You NEEDN'T be with me if you don't want to - if you're
frightened of losing your monopoly over your precious husband. Take him
home then - take him home.&quot;And he rolled his back on her more than ever, finishing in a sudden gust
of anger and weariness. He lay there rolled in his chair, a big, queer,
heavy figure, with his face almost buried in the soft leather, and his
big hips sticking out. Her face was quivering, wanting to cry. Then
suddenly she broke into a laugh, saying rather shakily, venomously:&quot;Well, anyhow, you needn't turn the wrong end of you at me quite so
undisguisedly.&quot;&quot;How do you know it IS the wrong end of me?&quot; he said, sitting up
suddenly and letting his head hang, scowling.&quot;Facon de parler,&quot; she said, laughing rather stiffly.Somers was silent, and kept silent till the end. He was thankful that
Kangaroo was fighting the battle this time.Their host sent them home in his motor-car. Neither of them had anything
to say. Then, as Harriet shut the door of Torestin, and they were quite
alone, she said:&quot;Yes, he's right. I absolutely believe in him. I don't care WHAT he does
with you.&quot;&quot;I do, though,&quot; said Somers.The next day they went to Mullumbimby. And the day after that, each of
them wrote a letter to Kangaroo.&quot;Dear Kaiser Kangaroo,&quot; began Harriet, &quot;I must thank you very much for
the dinner and the violets, which are still quite fresh and blue in
Coo-ee. I think you were very horrid to me, but also very nice, so I
hope you don't think the worst of me. I want to tell you that I DO
sympathize, and that I am awfully glad if I can be of any use to you in
any way. I have a holy terror of ants since I heard you, but I know what
you mean by the fire. Lovat will hand over my portion when he comes to
see you. But I shall make myself into a Fire Brigade, because I am sure
you will be kindling fires all over everywhere, under the table and in
the clothes-cupboard, and I, poor domestic wretch, shall have to be
rushing to put them out. Being only a poor domestic female, I really
don't feel safe with fires anywhere except in fire-places and in grates
with hearths. But I do want you to know you have my sympathy - and my
Lovat.&quot; She then signed herself Harriet Somers, and felt even more
fluttered than when she had signed the marriage register.She received for answer:&quot;Dear Mrs. Somers: I am much honoured and very grateful for the
assurance of your sympathy. I have put a one-and-sixpenny government
stamp under your signature, to make your letter a legal document, and
have further forged the signatures of two witnesses to your deed of gift
of Lovat, so I am afraid there is no court of law in New South Wales in
which you could now substantiate a further claim over him. I am sorry to
take this mean advantage over you, but we lawyers know no scruples.&quot;I should be more than delighted if I could have the honour of
entertaining once more in Sydney - say next Thursday - a beautiful person
and remarkable woman (one and the same individual) who tells me to my
nose that I am a Jew and that my name, instead of Benjamin, should be
Abraham. Do please come again and call me Abraham's Bosom, but don't
fail to bring your husband, for the simple look of the thing.&quot;&quot;The Kangaroo is a fighting beast, I believe,&quot; said Somers, looking at
Harriet and laughing. He was not sorry when for once some other person
gave her a dig.&quot;I think he's rather foolish,&quot; she said briefly.These days Somers, too, was filled with fury. As for loving mankind, or
having a fire of love in his heart, it was all rot. He felt almost
fierily cold. He liked the sea, the pale sea of green glass that fell in
such cold foam. Ice-fiery, fish-burning. He went out on to the low flat
rocks at low tide, skirting the deep pock-holes that were full of
brilliantly clear water and delicately-coloured shells and tiny, crimson
anemones. Strangely sea-scooped sharp sea-bitter rock-floor, all wet and
sea-savage. And standing at the edge looking at the waves, rather
terrifying, rolling at him, where he stood low and exposed, far out from
the sand-banks, and as he watched the gannets gleaming white, then
falling with a splash like white sky-sparrows into the waves, he wished
as he had never wished before that he could be cold, as sea-things are
cold, and murderously fierce. To have oneself exultantly ice-cold, not
one spark of this wretched warm flesh left, and to have all the
terrific, ice energy of a fish. To surge with that cold exultance and
passion of a sea thing! Now he understood the yearning in the
seal-woman's croon, as she went back to the sea, leaving her husband and
her children of warm flesh. No more cloying warmth. No more of this
horrible stuffy heat of human beings. To be an isolated swift fish in
the big seas, that are bigger than the earth; fierce with cold, cold
life, in the watery twilight before sympathy was created to clog us.These were his feelings now. Mankind? Ha, he turned his face to the
centre of the seas, away from any land. The noise of waters, and
dumbness like a fish. The cold, lovely silence, before crying and
calling were invented. His tongue felt heavy in his mouth, as if it had
relapsed away from speech altogether.He did not care a straw what Kangaroo said or felt, or what anybody said
or felt, even himself. He had no feelings, and speech had gone out of
him. He wanted to be cold, cold, and alone like a single fish, with no
feeling in his heart at all except a certain icy exultance and wild,
fish-like rapacity. &quot;Homo sum!&quot; All right. Who sets a limit to what a
man is? Man is also a fierce and fish-cold devil, in his hour, filled
with cold fury of desire to get away from the cloy of human life
altogether, not into death, but into that icily self-sufficient vigour
of a fish.>



The following evening Somers could feel waves of friendliness coming
across the hedge, from Victoria. And she kept going out to the gate to
look for Jack, who was late returning home. And as she went, she always
looked long towards the verandah of Torestin, to catch sight of the
Somers.Somers felt the yearning and amicable advance in the atmosphere. For
some time he disregarded it. Then at last he went out to look at the
nightfall. It was early June. The sun had set beyond the land, casting a
premature shadow of night. But the eastern sky was very beautiful, full
of pure, pure light, the light of the southern seas, next the Antarctic.
There was a great massive cloud settling low, and it was all gleaming, a
golden, physical glow. Then across the upper sky trailed a thin line of
little dark clouds, like a line of porpoises swimming in the extremely
beautiful clarity.&quot;Isn't it a lovely evening again?&quot; Victoria called to him as he stood on
the summer-house top.&quot;Very lovely. Australia never ceases to be a wonderland for me, at
nightfall,&quot; he answered.&quot;Aha!&quot; she said. &quot;You are fond of the evening?&quot;He had come down from his point of vantage, and they stood near together
by the fence.&quot;In Europe I always like morning best - much best. I can't say what it is
I find so magical in the evening here.&quot;&quot;No!&quot; she replied, looking upwards round the sky. &quot;It's going to rain.&quot;&quot;What makes you think so?&quot; he asked.&quot;It looks like it - and it feels like it. I expect Jack will be here
before it comes on.&quot;&quot;He's late to-night, is he?&quot;&quot;Yes. He said he might be. Is it six o'clock?&quot;&quot;No, it's only a little after five.&quot;&quot;Is it? I needn't be expecting him yet, then. He won't be home till
quarter past six.&quot; She was silent for a while. &quot;We shall soon have the
shortest day,&quot; she said. &quot;I am glad when it has gone. I always miss Jack
so much when the evening comes, and he isn't home. You see I was used to
a big family, and it seems a bit lonely to me yet, all alone in the
cottage. That's why we're so glad to have you and Mrs. Somers next door.
We get on so well, don't we? Yes, it's surprising. I always felt nervous
of English people before. But I love Mrs. Somers. I think she's lovely.&quot;&quot;You haven't been married long?&quot; asked Somers.&quot;Not quite a year. It seems a long time in some ways. I wouldn't be
without Jack, not for anything. But I do miss my family. We were six of
us all at home together, and it makes such a difference, being all
alone.&quot;&quot;Was your home in Sydney?&quot;&quot;No, on the South Coast - dairy-farming. No, my father was a surveyor, so
was his father before him. Both in New South Wales. Then he gave it up
and started this farm down south. Oh yes, I liked it - I love home. I
love going down home. I've got a cottage down there that father gave me
when I got married. You must come down with us some time when the people
that are in it go. It's right on the sea. Do you think you and Mrs.
Somers would like it?&quot;&quot;I'm sure we should.&quot;&quot;And will you come with us for a week-end? The people in it are leaving
next week. We let it furnished.&quot;&quot;We should like to very much indeed,&quot; said Somers, being polite over it
because he felt a little unsure still, whether he wanted to be so
intimate. But Victoria seemed so wistful.&quot;We feel so ourselves with you and Mrs. Somers,&quot; said Victoria. &quot;And yet
you're so different from us, and yet we feel so much ourselves with
you.&quot;&quot;But we're not different,&quot; he protested.&quot;Yes, you are - coming from home. It's mother who always called England
home. She was English. She always spoke so prettily. She came from
Somerset. Yes, she died about five years ago. Then I was mother of the
family. Yes, I am the eldest, except Alfred. Yes, they're all at home.
Alfred is a mining engineer - there are coal mines down the South Coast.
He was with Jack in the war, on the same job. Jack was a Captain and
Alfred was a Lieutenant. But they drop all the army names now. That's
how I came to know Jack: through Alfred. Jack always calls him Fred.&quot;&quot;You didn't know him before the war?&quot;&quot;No, not till he came home. Alfred used to talk about him in his
letters, but I never thought then I should marry him. They are great
friends yet, the two of them.&quot;The rain that she had prophesied now began to fall - big straight drops,
that resounded on the tin roofs of the houses.&quot;Won't you come in and sit with us till Jack comes?&quot; asked Somers.
&quot;You'll feel dreary, I know.&quot;&quot;Oh, don't think I said it for that,&quot; said Victoria.&quot;Come round, though,&quot; said Somers. And they both ran indoors out of the
rain. Lightning had started to stab in the south-western sky, and clouds
were shoving slowly up.Victoria came round and sat talking, telling of her home on the south
coast. It was only about fifty miles from Sydney, but it seemed another
world to her. She was so quiet and simple, now, that both the Somers
felt drawn to her, and glad that she was sitting with them.They were talking still of Europe. Italy, Switzerland, England,
Paris - the wonderworld to Victoria, who had never been out of New South
Wales in her life, in spite of her name - which name her father had given
her to annoy all his neighbours, because he said the State of Victoria
was run like a paradise compared to New South Wales - although he too
never went a yard out of his home state, if he could help it; they were
talking still of Europe when they heard Jack's voice calling from the
opposite yard.&quot;Hello,&quot; cried Victoria, running out. &quot;Are you there, Jack? I was
listening for the motor-bike. I remember now, you went by tram.&quot;Sometimes she seemed a little afraid of him - physically afraid - though
he was always perfectly good-humoured with her. And this evening she
sounded like that - as if she feared his coming home, and wanted the
Somers to shelter her.&quot;You've found a second home over there, apparently,&quot; said Jack,
advancing towards the fence. &quot;Well, how's things?&quot;It was dark, so they could not see his face. But he sounded different.
There was something queer, unknown about him.&quot;I'll come over for a game of chess to-night, old man, if you'll say the
word,&quot; he said to Somers. &quot;And the ladies can punish the piano again
meanwhile, if they feel like it. I bought something to sweeten the
melodies with, and give us a sort of breathing-space now and then: sort
of little ear-rest, you know.&quot;&quot;That means a pound of chocolates,&quot; said Victoria, like a greedy child.
&quot;And Mrs. Somers will come and help me to eat them. Good!&quot; And she ran
in home. Somers thought of a picture advertisement in the Bulletin.&quot;Madge: I can't think what you see in Jack. He is so unintellectual.&quot;&quot;Gladys: Oh, but he always brings a pound of Billyer's chocolates.&quot;Or else: &quot;Sweets to the Sweet. Give her Billyer's chocolates&quot;; or else:
&quot;Billyer's chocolates sweeten the home.&quot;The game of chess was a very quiet one. Jack was pale and subdued,
silent, tired, thought Somers, after his long day and short night.
Somers too played without any zest. And yet they were satisfied, just
sitting there together, a curious peaceful ease in being together.
Somers wondered at it, the rich, full peace that there seemed to be
between him and the other man. It was something he was not used to. As
if one blood ran warm and rich between them. &quot;Then shall thy peace be as
a river.&quot;&quot;There was nothing wrong at the Trewhellas', was there, that made
William James come so late?&quot; asked Somers.Jack looked up with a tinge of inquiry in his dark eyes at this
question: as if he suspected something behind it. Somers flushed
slightly.&quot;No, nothing wrong,&quot; said Jack.&quot;I beg your pardon for asking,&quot; said Somers hastily. &quot;I heard a whistle
when I'd just done setting the rat-traps, and I looked out, and heard
you speak to him. That's how I knew who it was. I only wondered if
anything was wrong.&quot;&quot;No, nothing wrong,&quot; repeated Jack laconically.&quot;That's all right,&quot; said Somers. &quot;It's your move. Mind your queen.&quot;&quot;Mind my queen, eh? She takes some minding, that lady does. I feel I
need a special eye at the end of my nose, to keep track of her. Come out
of it, old lady. I'm not very bright at handling royalty, that's a
fact.&quot;Somers was now silent. He felt he had made a faux pas, and was rebuffed.
They played for some time, Jack talking to himself mostly in that
facetious strain which one just had to get used to in him, though Somers
occasionally found it tiring.Then after a time Jack put his hands into his lap, and looked up at
Somers.&quot;You mustn't think I get the wind up, you know,&quot; he said, &quot;if you ask me
a question. You can ask me what you like, you know. And when I can tell
you, I'll tell you. I know you'd never come shoving your nose in like a
rat from under the skirting board when nobody's looking.&quot;&quot;Even if I SEEM to,&quot; said Somers, ironically.&quot;No, no, you don't seem to. And when I CAN tell you, I'll do so.Iknow I can trust you.&quot;Somers looked up wondering, and met the meditative dark eyes of the
other man resting on his face.&quot;There's some of us chaps,&quot; said Jack, &quot;who've been through the war and
had a lick at Paris and London, you know, who can tell a man by the
smell of him, so to speak. If we can't see the COLOUR of his aura, we
can jolly well size up the QUALITY of it. And that's what we go by. Call
it instinct or what you like. If I like a man, slap out, at the first
sight, I'd trust him into hell, I would.&quot;&quot;Fortunately you haven't anything VERY risky to trust him with,&quot; laughed
Somers.&quot;I don't know so much about that,&quot; said Jack. &quot;When a man feels he likes
a chap, and trusts him, he's risking all he need, even by so doing.
Because none of us likes to be taken in, and to have our feelings thrown
back in our faces, as you may say, do we?&quot;&quot;We don't,&quot; said Somers grimly.&quot;No, we don't. And you know what it means to HAVE them thrown back in
your face. And so do I. There's a lot of the people here that I wouldn't
trust with a thank-you, I wouldn't. But then there's some that I would.
And mind you, taking all for all, I'd rather trust an Aussie, I'd rather
trust an Australian than an Englishman, I would, and a lot rather. Yet
there's some of the rottenest people in Sydney that you'd find even if
you sifted hell over. Rotten - absolute yellow rotten. And many of them
in public positions, too. Simply white-anting society, that's what
they're doing. Talk about public affairs in Sydney, talk about
undercurrents of business in Sydney: the wickedest crew on God's earth,
bar none. All the underhanded tricks of a Chink, a blooming yellow
Chinaman, and all the barefaced fair talk of an Englishman. There you
are. And yet, I'm telling you, I'd rather trust even a Sydney man, and
he's a special sort of wombat, than an Englishman.&quot;&quot;So you've told me before: for my good, I suppose,&quot; laughed Somers, not
without irony.&quot;No, now don't you go running away with any wrong ideas,&quot; said Jack,
suddenly reaching out his hand and laying it on Somers' arm. &quot;I'm not
hinting at anything. If I was I'd ask you to kick me out of your house.
I should deserve it. No, you're an Englishman. You're a European,
perhaps I ought to say, for you've lived about all over that old
continent, and you've studied it, and you've got tired of it. And you've
come to Australia. Your instinct brought you here, however much you may
rebel against rats and tin cans and a few other things like that. Your
instinct brought you here - and brought you straight up against me. Now
that I call fate.&quot;He looked at Somers with dark, burning, questioning eyes.&quot;I suppose following one's deepest instinct IS one's fate,&quot; said Somers,
rather flatly.&quot;There - you know what I mean, you see. Well then, instinct brings us
together. I knew it the minute I set eyes on you when I saw you coming
across from the Botanical Gardens, and you wanted a taxi. And then when
I heard the address, 51 Murdoch Street, I said to myself, 'That chap is
coming into my life.' And it is so. I'm a believer in fate, absolute.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Somers, non-committal.&quot;It's fate that you left Europe and came to Australia, bit by bit, and
unwilling to come, as you say yourself. It's fate that brings you to
Sydney, and makes me see you that dinner-hour coming from the Botanical
Gardens. It's fate that brings you to this house. And it's fate that
sets you and me here at this minute playing chess.&quot;&quot;If you call it playing chess,&quot; laughed Somers.Jack looked down at the board.&quot;I'm blest if I know whose move it is,&quot; he said. &quot;But never mind. I say
that fate meant you and Mrs. Somers to come here: her as much as you. I
say fate meant me and you and Victoria and her to mean a lot to one
another. And when I feel my fate, I absolutely give myself up to it.
That's what I say. Do you think I'm right?&quot;His hand, which held Somers' arm lightly, now gripped the biceps of that
arm hard, while he looked into the other man's face.&quot;I should say so,&quot; said Somers, rather uncomfortably.Jack hardly heeded the words. He was watching the face.&quot;You're a stranger here. You're from the old country. You're different
from us. But you're a man we want, and you're a man we've got to keep. I
know it. What? What do you say? I can trust you, can't I?&quot;&quot;What with?&quot; asked Somers.&quot;What with?&quot; Jack hesitated. &quot;Why everything!&quot; he blurted. &quot;Everything!
Body and soul and money and every blessed thing. I can trust you with
EVERYTHING! Isn't that right?&quot;Somers looked with troubled eyes into the dark, dilated glowing eyes of
the other man.&quot;But I don't know what it means,&quot; he stammered. &quot;EVERYTHING! It means so
much, that it means nothing.&quot;Jack nodded his head slowly.&quot;Oh yes it does,&quot; he reiterated. &quot;Oh yes it does.&quot;&quot;Besides,&quot; said Somers, &quot;why should you trust me with ANYTHING, let
alone everything. You've no occasion to trust me at all - except - as one
neighbour trusts another, in common honour.&quot;&quot;Common honour!&quot; Jack just caught up the words, not heeding the sense.
&quot;It's more than common honour. It's most uncommon honour. But look
here,&quot; he seemed to rouse himself. &quot;Supposing I came to you, to ask you
things, and tell you things, you'd answer me man to man, wouldn't
you? - with common honour? You'd treat everything I say with common
honour, as between man and man?&quot;&quot;Why, yes, I hope so.&quot;&quot;I know you would. But for the sake of saying it, say it. I can trust
you, can't I? Tell me now, can I trust you?&quot;Somers watched him. Was it any good making reservations and
qualifications? The man was in earnest. And according to standards of
commonplace honour, the so-called honour of man to man, Somers felt that
he would trust Callcott, and that Callcott might trust him. So he said
simply:&quot;Yes.&quot;A light leaped into Jack's eyes.&quot;That means you trust me, of course?&quot; he said.&quot;Yes,&quot; replied Somers.&quot;Done!&quot; said Jack, rising to his feet and upsetting the chessmen. Somers
also pushed his chair, and rose to his feet, thinking they were going
across to the next house. But Jack came to him and flung an arm round
his shoulders and pressed him close, trembling slightly, and saying
nothing. Then he let go, and caught Somers by the hand.&quot;This is fate,&quot; he said, &quot;and we'll follow it up.&quot; He seemed to cling to
the other man's hand. And on his face was a strange light of purpose and
of passion, a look at once exalted and dangerous.&quot;I'll soon bring the others to see it,&quot; he said.&quot;But you know I don't understand,&quot; said Somers, withdrawing his hand and
taking off his spectacles.&quot;I know,&quot; said Jack. &quot;But I'll let you know everything in a day or two.
Perhaps you wouldn't mind if William James - if Jaz came here one
evening - or you wouldn't mind having a talk with him over in my shack.&quot;&quot;I don't mind talking to anybody,&quot; said the bewildered Somers.&quot;Right you are.&quot;They still sat for some time by the fire, silent; Jack was pondering.
Then he looked up at Somers.&quot;You and me,&quot; he said in a quiet voice, &quot;in a way we're mates and in a
way we're not. In a way - it's different.&quot;With which cryptic remark he left it. And in a few minutes the women
came running in with the sweets, to see if the men didn't want a
macaroon.On Sunday morning Jack asked Somers to walk with him across to the
Trewhellas. That is, they walked to one of the ferry stations, and took
the ferry steamer to Mosman's Bay. Jack was a late riser on Sunday
morning. The Somers, who were ordinary half-past seven people, rarely
saw any signs of life in Wyewurk before half-past ten on the
Sabbath - then it was Jack in trousers and shirt, with his shirt-sleeves
rolled up, having a look at his dahlias while Vicky prepared breakfast.So the two men did not get a start till eleven o'clock. Jack rolled
along easily beside the smaller, quieter Somers. They were an odd
couple, ill-assorted. In a colonial way, Jack was handsome, well-built,
with strong, heavy limbs. He filled out his expensively tailored suit
and looked a man who might be worth anything from five hundred to five
thousand a year. The only lean, delicate part about him was his face.
See him from behind, his broad shoulders and loose erect carriage and
brown nape of the neck, and you expected a good square face to match. He
turned, and his long lean rather pallid face really didn't seem to
belong to his strongly animal body. For the face wasn't animal at all,
except perhaps in a certain slow, dark, lingering look of the eyes,
which reminded one of some animal or other, some patient, enduring
animal with an indomitable but naturally passive courage.Somers, in a light suit of thin cloth, made by an Italian tailor, and an
Italian hat, just looked a foreign sort of little bloke - but a
gentleman. The chief difference was that he looked sensitive all over,
his body, even its clothing, and his feet, even his brown shoes, all
equally sensitive with his face. Whereas Jack seemed strong and
insensitive in the body, only his face vulnerable. His feet might have
been made of leather all the way through, tramping with an insentient
tread. Whereas Somers put down his feet delicately, as if they had a
life of their own, mindful of each step of contact with the earth. Jack
strode along: Somers seemed to hover along. There was decision in both
of them, but oh, of such different quality. And each had a certain
admiration of the other, and a very definite tolerance. Jack just barely
tolerated the quiet finesse of Somers, and Somers tolerated with
difficulty Jack's facetious familiarity and heartiness.Callcott met quite a number of people he knew, and greeted them all
heartily. &quot;Hello Bill, old man, how's things?&quot; &quot;New boots pinchin' yet,
Ant'ny? Hoppy sort of look about you this morning. Right 'o! So long,
Ant'ny!&quot; &quot;Different girl again, boy! go on, Sydney's full of yer
sisters. All right, goodbye, old chap.&quot; The same breezy intimacy with
all of them, and the moment they had passed by, they didn't exist for
him any more than the gull that had curved across in the air. They
seemed to appear like phantoms, and disappear in the same instant, like
phantoms. Like so many Flying Dutchmen the Australian's acquaintances
seemed to steer slap through his consciousness, and were gone on the
wind. What was the consecutive thread in the man's feelings? Not his
feeling for any particular human beings, that was evident. His friends,
even his loves, were just a series of disconnected, isolated moments in
his life. Somers always came again upon this gap in the other man's
continuity. He felt that if he knew Jack for twenty years, and then went
away, Jack would say: &quot;Friend o' mine, Englishman, rum sort of bloke,
but not a bad sort. Dunno where he's hanging out just now. Somewhere on
the surface of the old humming-top, I suppose.&quot;The only consecutive thing was that facetious attitude, which was the
attitude of taking things as they come, perfected. A sort of ironical
stoicism. Yet the man had a sort of passion, and a passionate identity.
But not what Somers called human. And threaded on this ironical
stoicism.They found Trewhella dressed and expecting them. Trewhella was a coal
and wood merchant, on the north side. He lived quite near the wharf, had
his sheds at the side of the house, and in the front a bit of garden
running down to the practically tideless bay of the harbour. Across the
bit of blue water were many red houses, and new, wide streets of single
cottages, seaside-like, disappearing rather forlorn over the brow of the
low hill.William James, or Jas, Jaz, as Jack called him, was as quiet as ever.
The three men sat on a bench just above the brown rocks of the water's
edge, in the lovely sunshine, and watched the big ferry steamer slip in
and discharge its stream of summer-dressed passengers, and embark
another stream: watched the shipping of the middle harbour away to the
right, and the boats loitering on the little bay in front. A motor-boat
was sweeping at a terrific speed, like some broom sweeping the water,
past the little round fort away in the open harbour, and two tall white
sailing boats, all wing and no body, were tacking across the pale blue
mouth of the bay. The inland sea of the harbour was all bustling with
Sunday morning animation: and yet there seemed space, and loneliness.
The low, coffee-brown cliffs opposite, too low for cliffs, looked as
silent and as aboriginal as if white men had never come.The little girl Gladys came out shyly. Somers now noticed that she wore
spectacles.&quot;Hello kiddie!&quot; said Jack, &quot;Come here and make a footstool of your
uncle, and see what your Aunt Vicky's been thinking of. Come on then,
amble up this road.&quot;He took her on his knee, and fished out of his pocket a fine sort of
hat-band that Victoria had contrived with ribbon and artificial flowers
and wooden beads. Gladys sat for a moment shyly on her uncle's knee, and
he held her there as if she were a big pillow he was scarcely conscious
of holding. Her stepfather sat exactly as if the child did not exist, or
were not present. It was neutrality brought to a remarkable pitch. Only
Somers seemed actually aware that the child was a little human
being - and to him she seemed so absent that he didn't know what to make
of her.Rose came out bringing beer and sausage rolls, and the girl vanished
away again, seemed to evaporate. Somers felt uncomfortable, and wondered
what he had been brought for.&quot;You know Cornwall, do you?&quot; said William James, the Cornish singsong
still evident in his Australian speech. He looked with his light-grey,
inscrutable eyes at Somers.&quot;I lived for a time near Padstow,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Padstow! Ay, I've been to Padstow,&quot; said William James. And they talked
for a while of the bleak, lonely northern coast of Cornwall, the black
huge cliffs, with the gulls flying away below, and the sea boiling, and
the wind blowing in huge volleys: and the black Cornish nights, with
nothing but the violent weather outside.&quot;Oh, I remember it, I remember it,&quot; said William James. &quot;Though I was a
half-starved youngster on a bit of a farm out there, you know, for
everlasting chasing half a dozen heifers from the cliffs, where the
beggars wanted to fall over and kill themselves, and hunting for a dozen
sheep among the gorsebushes, and wading up to my knees in mud most part
of the year, and then in summer, in the dry times, having to haul water
for a mile over the rocks in a wagon, because the well had run dry. And
at the end of it my father gave me one new suit in two years, and
sixpence a week. Ay, that was a life for you. I suppose if I was there
still he'd be giving me my keep and five shillin' a week - if he could
open his heart as wide as two half-crowns, which I'm doubting very
much.&quot;&quot;You have money out here, at least,&quot; said Somers. &quot;But there was a great
fascination for me, in Cornwall.&quot;&quot;Fascination! And where do you find the fascination? In a little
Wesleyan chapel of a Sunday night, and a girl with her father waiting
for her with a strap if she's not in by nine o'clock? Fascination, did
you say?&quot;&quot;It had a great fascination for me - a magic - a magic in the atmosphere.&quot;&quot;All the fairy tales they'll tell you,&quot; said William James, looking at
the other man with a smile of slow ridicule. &quot;Why ye didn't go and
believe them, did ye?&quot;&quot;More or less. I could more easily have believed them there than
anywhere else I've been.&quot;&quot;Ay, no doubt. And that shows what sort of a place it be. Lot of damn
silly nonsense.&quot; He stirred on his seat impatiently.&quot;At any rate, you're well out of it. You're set up all right here,&quot; said
Somers, who was secretly amused. The other man did not answer for some
time.&quot;Maybe I am,&quot; he said at last, &quot;I'm not pining to go back and work for
my father, I tell you, on a couple of pasties and a lot of abuse. No,
after that, I'd like you to tell me what's wrong with Australia.&quot;&quot;I'm sure I don't know,&quot; said Somers, &quot;Probably nothing at all.&quot;Again William James was silent. He was a short, thick man, with a little
felt hat that sat over his brow with a half humorous flap. He had his
knees wide apart, and his hands clasped between them. And he looked for
the most part down at the ground. When he did cock his eye at Somers, it
was with a look of suspicion marked with humour and troubled with a
certain desire. The man was restless, desirous, craving
something - heaven knows what.&quot;You thinking of settling out here then, are you?&quot; he asked.&quot;No,&quot; said Somers. &quot;But I don't say I won't. It depends.&quot;William James fidgeted, tapping his feet rapidly on the ground, though
his body was silent. He was not like Jack. He too, was sensitive all
over, though his body looked so thick it was silently alive, and his
feet were still uneasy. He was young too, with a youth that troubled
him. And his nature was secretive, maybe treacherous. It was evident
Jack only half liked him.&quot;You've got the money, you can live where you like and go where you
like,&quot; said William James, looking up at Somers. &quot;Well, I might do the
same. If I cared to do it, I could live quietly on what I've got,
whether here or in England.&quot; Somers recognized the Cornishman in this.&quot;You could very easily have as much as I've got,&quot; he said laughing.&quot;The thing is, what's the good of a life of idleness?&quot; said William
James.&quot;What's the good of a life of work?&quot; laughed Somers.Shrewdly, with quick grey eye, Trewhella looked at the other man to see
if he were laughing at him.&quot;Yet I expect you've got some purpose in coming to Australia,&quot; said
William James, a trifle challenging.&quot;Maybe I had - or have - maybe it was just whim.&quot;Again the other man looked shrewdly, to see if it were the truth.&quot;You aren't investing money out here, are you?&quot;&quot;No, I've none to invest.&quot;&quot;Because if you was, I'd advise you not to.&quot; And he spat into the
distance, and kept his hands clasped tight.All this time Jack sat silent and as if unconcerned, but listening
attentively.&quot;Australians have always been croakers,&quot; he said now.&quot;What do you think of this Irish business?&quot; asked William James.&quot;I? I really don't think much at all. I don't feel Ireland is my job,
personally. If I had to say, offhand, what I'd do myself, why, if I
could I'd just leave the Irish to themselves, as they want, and let them
wipe each other out or kiss and make friends as they please. They bore
me rather.&quot;&quot;And what about the Empire?&quot;&quot;That again isn't my job. I'm only one man, and I know it. But
personally, I'd say to India and Australia and all of them the same - if
you want to stay in the Empire, stay; if you want to go out, go.&quot;&quot;And suppose they went out?&quot;&quot;That's their affair.&quot;&quot;Supposing Australia said she was coming out of the Empire and governing
herself, and only keeping a sort of entente with Britain. What do you
think she'd make of it?&quot;&quot;By the looks of things, I think she'd make a howling mess of it. Yet it
might do her good if she were thrown entirely on her own resources.
You've got to have something to keep you steady. England has really kept
the world steady so far - as steady as it's been. That's my opinion. Now
she's not keeping it very steady, and the world's sick of being bossed,
anyhow. Seems to me you may as well sink or swim on your own resources.&quot;&quot;Perhaps we're too likely to find ourselves sinking.&quot;&quot;Then you'll come to your senses, after you've sunk for the third time.&quot;&quot;What, about England? Cling to England again, you mean?&quot;&quot;No, I don't. I mean you can't put the brotherhood of man on a wage
basis.&quot;&quot;That's what a good many people say here,&quot; put in Jack.&quot;You don't trust socialism then?&quot; said Jaz, in a quiet voice.&quot;What sort of socialism? Trades unionism? Soviet?&quot;&quot;Yes, any.&quot;&quot;I really don't care about politics. Politics is no more than your
country's housekeeping. If I had to swallow my whole life up in
housekeeping, I wouldn't keep house at all; I'd sleep under a hedge.
Same with a country and politics. I'd rather have no country than be
gulfed in politics and social stuff. I'd rather have the moon for a
motherland.&quot;Jaz was silent for a time, contemplating his knuckles.&quot;And that,&quot; he said, &quot;is how the big majority of Australians feel, and
that's why they care nothing about Australia. It's cruel to the
country.&quot;&quot;Anyhow, no sort of POLITICS will help the country,&quot; said Somers.&quot;If it won't, then nothing will,&quot; retorted Jaz.&quot;So you'd advise us all to be like seven-tenths of us here, not care a
blooming hang about anything except your dinner and which horse gets
in?&quot; asked Jack, not without sarcasm.Now Richard was silent, driven into a corner.&quot;Why,&quot; he said, &quot;there's just this difference. The bulk of Australians
don't care about Australia - that is, you say they don't. And why don't
they? Because they care about nothing at all, neither in earth below or
heaven above. They just blankly don't care about anything, and they live
in defiance, a sort of slovenly defiance of care of any sort, human or
inhuman, good or bad. If they've got one belief left, now the war's
safely over, it's a dull, rock-bottom belief in obstinately not caring,
not caring about anything. It seems to me they think it manly, the only
manliness, not to care, not to think, not to attend to life at all, but
just to tramp blankly on from moment to moment, and over the edge of
death without caring a straw. The final manliness.&quot;The other two men listened in silence, the distant colonial silence that
hears the voice of the old country passionately speaking against them.&quot;But if they're not to care about politics, what are they to care
about?&quot; asked Jaz, in his small, insinuating voice.There was a moment's pause. Then Jack added his question:&quot;Do you yourself really care about anything, Mr. Somers?&quot;Richard turned and looked him for a moment in the eyes. And then,
knowing the two men were trying to corner him, he said coolly:&quot;Why, yes. I care supremely.&quot;&quot;About what?&quot; Jack's question was soft as a drop of water falling into
water, and Richard sat struggling with himself.&quot;That,&quot; he answered, &quot;you either know or don't know. And if you don't
know, it would only be words my trying to tell.&quot;There was a silence of check-mate.&quot;I'm afraid, for myself, I don't know,&quot; said Jack.But Somers did not answer, and the talk, rather lamely, was turned off
to other things.The two men went back to Murdoch Street rather silent, thinking their
own thoughts. Jack only blurted once:&quot;What do you make of Jaz, then?&quot;&quot;I like him. He lives by himself and keeps himself pretty dark - which is
his nature.&quot;&quot;He's a cleverer man than you'd take him for - figures things out in a
way that surprises me. And he's better than a detective for getting to
know things. He's got one or two Cornish pals down town, you see - and
they tip one another the wink. They're like the Irish in many ways. And
they're not uncommonly unlike a Chink. I always feel as if Jaz had got a
bit of Chinese blood in him. That's what makes the women like him, I
suppose.&quot;&quot;But do the women like him?&quot;&quot;Rose does. I believe he'd make any woman like him, if he laid himself
out to do it. Got that quiet way with him, you know, and a sly sort of
touch-the-harp-gently, that's what they like on the quiet. But he's the
sort of chap I don't exactly fancy mixing my broth with, and drinking
out of the same can with.&quot;Somers laughed at the avowal of antipathy between the two men.They were not home till two o'clock. Somers found Harriet looking rather
plaintive.&quot;You've been a long time,&quot; she said. &quot;What did you do?&quot;&quot;Just talked.&quot;&quot;What about?&quot;&quot;Politics.&quot;&quot;And did you like them?&quot;&quot;Yes, quite well.&quot;&quot;And have you promised to see them again to-day?&quot;&quot;Who?&quot;&quot;Why, any of them - the Callcotts.&quot;&quot;No.&quot;&quot;Oh. They're becoming rather an institution.&quot;&quot;You like them too?&quot;&quot;Yes, they're all right. But I don't want to spend my life with them.
After all, that sort of people isn't exactly my sort - and I thought you
used to pretend it wasn't yours.&quot;&quot;It isn't. But then no sort of people is my sort.&quot;&quot;Yes, it is. Any sort of people, so long as they make a fuss of you.&quot;&quot;Surely they make an even greater fuss of you.&quot;&quot;Do they! It's you they want, not me. And you go as usual, like a lamb
to the slaughter.&quot;&quot;Baa!&quot; he said.&quot;Yes, baa! You should hear yourself bleat.&quot;&quot;I'll listen,&quot; he said.But Harriet was becoming discontented. They had been in their house only
six weeks: and she had had enough of it. Yet it was paid for for three
months: at four guineas a week. And they were pretty short of money, and
would be for the rest of the year. He had already overdrawn.Yet she began to suggest going away: away from Sydney. She felt
humiliated in that beastly little Murdoch Street.&quot;What did I tell you?&quot; he retorted. &quot;The very look of it humiliated me.
Yet you wanted it, and you said you liked it.&quot;&quot;I did like it - for the fun of it. But now there's all this intimacy and
neighbouring. I just can't stand it. I just can't.&quot;&quot;But you began it.&quot;&quot;No, I didn't; you began it. And your beastly sweetness and gentleness
with such people. I wish you kept a bit of it for me.&quot;He went away in silence, knowing the uselessness of argument. And to
tell the truth he was feeling also a revulsion from all this
neighbouring, as Harriet called it, and all this talk. It was usually
the same. He started by holding himself aloof then gradually he let
himself get mixed in, and then he had revulsions. And to-day was one of
his revulsions. Coming home from Mosman's Bay, he had felt himself
dwindle to a cipher in Jack's consciousness. Then, last evening, there
had been all this fervour and protestation. And this morning all the
cross-examination by Trewhella. And he, Somers, had plainly said all he
thought. And now, as he walked home with Jack, Jack had no more use for
him than for the stump of cigar which he chewed between his lips merely
because he forgot to spit it away. Which state of affairs did not go at
all well with OUR friend's sense of self-importance.Therefore, when he got home, his eyes opened once more to the delicacy
of Harriet's real beauty, which he knew as none else knew it, after
twelve years of marriage. And once more he realized her gay, undying
courage, her wonderful fresh zest in front of life. And all these other
little people seemed so common in comparison, so common. He stood still
with astonishment, wondering how he could have come to betray the
essential reality of his life and Harriet's to the common use of these
other people with their watchful, vulgar wills. That scene of last
evening: what right had a fellow like Callcott to be saying these things
to him? What right had he to put his arm round his, Richard's shoulder,
and give him a tight hug? Somers winced to think of it. And now Callcott
had gone off with his Victoria in Sunday clothes to some other outing.
Anything was as good as anything else: why not!A gulf there was between them, really, between the Somers and the
Callcotts. And yet the easy way Callcott flung a flimsy rope of intimacy
across the gulf, and was embracing the pair of his neighbours in
mid-air, as it were, without a grain of common foothold. And Somers let
himself be embraced. So he sat pale and silent and mortified in the
kitchen that evening thinking of it all, and wishing himself far away,
in Europe.&quot;Oh, how I detest this treacly democratic Australia,&quot; he said. &quot;It
swamps one with a sort of common emotion like treacle, and before one
knows where one is, one is caught like a fly on a flypaper, in one mess
with all the other buzzers. How I hate it! I want to go away.&quot;&quot;It isn't Australia,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;Australia's lonely. It's just the
people. And it isn't even the people - if you would only keep your proper
distance, and not make yourself cheap to them and get into messes.&quot;&quot;No, it's the country. It's in the air. I want to leave it.&quot;But he was not very emphatic. Harriet wanted to go down to the South
Coast, of which she had heard from Victoria.&quot;Think,&quot; she said, &quot;it must be lovely there - with the mountain behind,
and steep hills, and blackberries, and lovely little bays of sand.&quot;&quot;There'll be no blackberries. It's end of June - which is their
mid-winter.&quot;&quot;But there'll be the other things. Let's do that, and never mind the
beastly money for this pokey Torestin.&quot;&quot;They've asked us to go with them to Mullumbimby in a fortnight. Shall
we wait till then and look?&quot;Harriet sat in silence for some moments.&quot;We might,&quot; she said reluctantly. She didn't want to wait. But what
Victoria had told her of Mullumbimby, the township on the South Coast,
so appealed to her that she decided to abide by her opportunity.And then curiously enough, for the next week the neighbours hardly saw
one another. It was as if the same wave of revulsion had passed over
both sides of the fence. They had fleeting glimpses of Victoria as she
went about the house. And when he could, Jack put in an hour at his
garden in the evening, tidying it up finally for the winter. But the
weather was bad, it rained a good deal; there were fogs in the morning,
and foghorns on the harbour; and the Somers kept their doors continually
blank and shut.Somers went round to the shipping agents and found out about boats to
San Francisco, and talked of sailing in July, and of stopping at Tahiti
or at Fiji on the way, and of cabling for money for the fares. He
figured it all out. And Harriet mildly agreed. Her revulsion from
Australia had passed quicker than his, now that she saw herself escaping
from town and from neighbours to the quiet of a house by the sea, alone
with him. Still she let him talk. Verbal agreement and silent opposition
is perhaps the best weapon on such occasions.Harriet would look at him sometimes wistfully, as he sat with his brow
clouded. She had a real instinctive mistrust of other people - all other
people. In her heart of hearts she said she wanted to live alone with
Somers, and know nobody, all the rest of her life. In Australia, where
one can be lonely, and where the land almost calls to one to be
lonely - and then drives one back again on one's fellow-men in a kind of
frenzy. Harriet would be quite happy, by the sea, with a house and a
little garden and as much space to herself as possible, knowing nobody,
but having Lovat always there. And he could write, and it would be
perfect.But he wouldn't be happy - and he said so - and she knew it. She saw it
like a doom on his brow.&quot;And why couldn't we be happy in this wonderful new country, living to
ourselves. We could have a cow, and chickens - and then the Pacific, and
this marvellous new country. Surely that is enough for any man. Why must
you have more?&quot;&quot;Because I feel I MUST fight out something with mankind yet. I haven't
finished with my fellow-men. I've got a struggle with them yet.&quot;&quot;But what struggle? What's the good? What's the point of your struggle?
And what's your struggle for?&quot;&quot;I don't know. But it's inside me, and I haven't finished yet. To make
some kind of an opening - some kind of a way for the afterwards.&quot;&quot;Ha, the afterwards will make its own way, it won't wait for you. It's a
kind of nervous obstinacy and self-importance in you. You DON'T like
people. You always turn away from them and hate them. Yet like a dog to
his vomit you always turn back. And it will be the same old game here
again as everywhere else. What are these people after all? Quite nice,
but just common and - and not in your line at all. But there you are. You
stick your head into a bush like an ostrich, and think you're doing
wonders.&quot;&quot;I intend to move with men and get men to move with me before I die,&quot; he
said. Then he added hastily: &quot;Or at any rate I'll try a bit longer yet.
When I make up my mind that it's really no good, I'll go with you and
we'll live alone somewhere together, and forget the world. And in
Australia too. Just like a business man retiring. I'll retire away from
the world, and forget it. But not yet. Not till I feel I've finished.
I've got to struggle with men and the world of men for a time yet. When
it's over I'll do as you say.&quot;&quot;Ah, you and your men, men! What do these Callcotts and these little
Trewhella people mean to you after all? Are they men? They are only
something you delude yourself about. And then you'll come a cropper, and
fall back on me. Just as it always is. You fall back on me, and I'm
expected to like it. I'm good enough to fall back on, when you've made a
fool of yourself with a lot of tuppenny little people, imagining you're
doing something in the world of MEN. Much men there is about it. Common
little street-people, that's all.&quot;He was silent. He heard all she had to say: and he knew that as far as
the past went, it was all quite true. He had started off on his fiery
courses: always, as she said, to fall back rather the worse for the
attempt on her. She had no use at all for fiery courses and efforts with
the world of men. Let all that rubbish go.&quot;Well,&quot; he said. &quot;It's my need to make these tries, yet. Wait till I've
exhausted the need, and we'll have a little place of our own and forget
the world, really. I know I can do it. I could almost do it now: and
here in Australia. The country appeals to me that way: to lose oneself
and have done with this side of life. But wait a bit longer.&quot;&quot;Ah, I suppose I shall have to,&quot; she said recklessly. &quot;You'll have to go
on making a fool of yourself till you're tired. Wives are SUPPOSED to
have to take their husbands back a little damaged and repentant from
their LOVE AFFAIRS with other women. And I'm hanged if it wouldn't be
more fun than this business of seeing you come back once more fooled
from your attempts with MEN - the world of men, as you call it. If they
WERE real men I wouldn't mind. But look at your Jack Callcott. Really,
and you're supposed to have had some experience of life. 'Clip in, old
man!'&quot; She imitated Jack's voice and manner. &quot;And you stand it all and
think it's wonderful! Nay, men are too foolish for me to understand
them; I give them up.&quot;He laughed, realizing that most of what she said was true.&quot;You see,&quot; he said, &quot;I have the roots of my life with you. But I want if
possible to send out a new shoot in the life of mankind - the effort man
makes forever, to grow into new forms.&quot;She looked at him. And somehow she wanted to cry, because he was so
silly in refusing to be finally disappointed in his efforts with
mankind, and yet his silliness was pathetic, in a way beautiful. But
then it WAS so silly - she wanted to shake him.&quot;Send out a new shoot then. Send it out. You do it in your writing
already!&quot; she cried. &quot;But getting yourself mixed up with these impudent
people won't send any shoots, don't you think it. They'll nip you in the
bud again, as they always do.&quot;He pondered this also, stubbornly, and knew it was true. But he had set
his will on something, and wasn't going to give way.&quot;I want to do something with living people, somewhere, somehow, while I
live on the earth. I write, but I write alone. And I live alone. Without
any connection whatever with the rest of men.&quot;&quot;Don't swank, you don't live alone. You've got ME there safe enough, to
support you. Don't swank to me about being alone, because it insults me,
you see. I know how much alone you are, with me always there keeping you
together.&quot;And again he sulked and swallowed it, and obstinately held out.&quot;None the less,&quot; he retorted, &quot;I do want to do something along with men.
I AM alone and cut off. As a man among men, I just have no place. I have
my life with you, I know: et praeterea nihil.&quot;&quot;Et praeterea nihil! And what more do you want? Besides, you liar,
haven't you your writing? Isn't that all you want, isn't that DOING all
there is to be done? Men! Much MEN there is about them! Bah, when it
comes to that, I have to be even the only man as well as the only
woman.&quot;&quot;That's the whole trouble,&quot; said he bitingly.&quot;Bah, you creature, you ought to be grateful,&quot; cried Harriet.William James arrived one morning when the Callcotts were both out, and
brought a little basket of persimmons and passion fruits for Harriet. As
it happened, Somers also was out.&quot;I remember you said you like these date-plums, Mrs. Somers. Over at our
place we don't care for them, so if you like to have them you're
welcome. And these are about the last of the passion fruit, seemingly.&quot;The persimmons were good big ones, of that lovely suave orange-red
colour which is perhaps their chief attraction, and they were just
beginning to go soft. Harriet of course was enchanted. William James
came in and sat down for a few minutes, wondering what had become of
Victoria. He looked round the room curiously. Harriet had, of course,
arranged it to her own liking, taken away all the pictures and
ornaments, hung a Tunis curtain behind the couch, stood two tall red
lacquer candlesticks on the mantelpiece, and altogether given the room
that air of pleasant distinction which a woman who knows how to do it
finds so easy, especially if she has a few shawls and cushion-covers and
bits of interesting brass or china. Harriet insisted on travelling with
a few such things. She was prepared to camp in a furnished bungalow or
cottage on any continent, but a few of her own things she must have
about her. Also she wore a dress of Bavarian peasant stuff, very thin
black woollen material, sprinkled all over with tiny pink roses with
green leaves. And on her feet she had heelless sandals of plaited strips
of leather, from Colombo. William James noticed every one of these
things. They had a glamour like magic for him.&quot;This is quite a pleasant room you have here,&quot; he said in his Cornish
voice, with the alert, subtle, faintly smiling look of wonder on his
face.&quot;It isn't bad,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;But a bit poky.&quot;&quot;Poky you call it? Do you remember the little stone holes they have for
rooms in those old stone Cornish cottages?&quot;&quot;Yes - but we had a lovely one. And the great thick granite walls and the
low ceilings.&quot;&quot;Walls always letting the damp in, can't keep it out, because all the
chinks and spaces are just stuffed with plain earth, and a bit of mortar
smeared over the outside like butter scraped on bread. Don't I remember
it! I should think I do.&quot;&quot;Cornwall had a great charm for me.&quot;&quot;Well, I don't know where you found it, I'm sure. But I suppose you've
got a way of your own with a place, let it be Cornwall or where it may,
to make it look well. It all depends where you're born and where you
come from.&quot;&quot;Perhaps,&quot; said Harriet.&quot;I've never seen an Australian cottage looking like this, now. And yet
it isn't the number of things you've put into it.&quot;&quot;The number I've taken out,&quot; laughed Harriet.William James sat there with his quiet slumberous-seeming body, watching
her: watching the quick radiance of her fair face, and the charm of her
bearing. There was something quick and sure and, as it were, beyond the
ordinary clay, about her, that exercised a spell over him. She was his
real Cornish idea of a lady: simple, living among people as if one of
themselves, and yet not one of themselves: a sort of magic about her. He
could almost see a glow in the air around her. And he could see that for
her he was just a nice fellow who lived in another world and on another
plane than herself, and that he could never come up or she come down.
She was the queen that slumbers somewhere in every Cornish imagination,
the queen ungrudged. And perhaps, in the true Celtic imagination
slumbers the glamorous king as well. The Celt needs the mystic glow of
real kingliness. Hence his loneliness in the democratic world of
industry, and his social perversity.&quot;I don't suppose Rose could ever learn to do this with a room, could she
now?&quot; he asked, making a slight gesture with his hand. He sat with his
clear, queer, light grey eyes fixed on Harriet's face.&quot;I think so,&quot; cried Harriet; then she met the watchful eyes. &quot;In her own
way she could. Every woman has her own way, you know.&quot;&quot;Yes, I do know,&quot; he answered.&quot;And you see,&quot; said Harriet, &quot;we're more or less lazy people who have no
regular work in the world. If we had, perhaps we should live in a
different way.&quot;William James shook his head.&quot;It's what's bred into you,&quot; he said, &quot;that comes out. Now if I was a
really rich man, I think I could learn to carry it off with the best of
them, out here. But when it comes to being the real thing, why, I know
it would be beyond me, so there you are.&quot;&quot;But can one be sure?&quot; she cried.&quot;I think I can. I can see the difference between common and uncommon. I
can do more than that. I can see the difference between gentlemen who
haven't got the gift, and those that have. Take Lord Washburn, for
example. He's a gentleman all right - he comes of an old family, they
tell me. But I doubt very much if he's any better than I am.&quot;&quot;Why should he be?&quot; cried Harriet.&quot;What I mean is,&quot; said William James, &quot;he hasn't got the gift, you
know.&quot;&quot;The gift of what?&quot; said Harriet, puzzled.&quot;How shall I put it? The gift that you've got, now: and that Mr. Somers
has as well: and that people out here don't have.&quot;&quot;But that may only be manner,&quot; said Harriet.&quot;No, it's more than manner. It's the gift of being superior, there now:
better than most folks. You understand me, I don't mean swank and money.
That'll never give it you. Neither is it THINKING yourself superior. The
people that are superior don't think it, and don't even seem to feel it,
in a way. And yet in a way they know it. But there aren't many of them
out here. And what there are go away. This place is meant for all one
dead level sort of people.&quot;He spoke with curious sarcasm.&quot;But,&quot; said Harriet, &quot;you are Australian yourself now, aren't you? Or
don't you feel it?&quot;&quot;Oh yes, I suppose I feel it,&quot; he said shifting uneasily on his seat. &quot;I
AM Australian. And I'm Australian partly because I know that in
Australia there WON'T be anybody any better than me. There now.&quot;&quot;But,&quot; laughed Harriet, &quot;aren't you glad then?&quot;&quot;Glad?&quot; he said. &quot;It's not a matter for gladness. It's a fact. But I'm
not one of the fools who think there's nobody any better than me in the
world. I know there are.&quot;&quot;How queer to hear you say so!&quot;&quot;But this isn't the place for them. Here in Australia we don't want
them. We want the new-fashioned sort of people who are all dead-level as
good as one another. You're going to Mullumbimby this week-end with Jack
and Victoria, aren't you?&quot;&quot;Yes. And I thought if we liked it we might stay down there for a
while - by the sea - away from the town.&quot;&quot;You please yourselves, of course. Perhaps better there than here.
But - it's no business of mine, you know that&quot; - he shrugged his
shoulders. &quot;But there's something comes over me when I see Mr. Somers
thinking he can live out here, and work with the Australians. I think
he's wrong - I really do. They'll drag him down to their level, and make
what use they can of him - and - well, in my opinion you'd both be sorry
for it.&quot;&quot;How strange that you should say so, you who are one of them.&quot;&quot;I am one of them, and I'm not. I'm not one of anybody. But I haven't
got only just the two eyes in my head that can tell the kettle from the
teapot. I've got another set of eyes inside me somewhere that can tell
real differences, when there are any. And that's what these people don't
seem to have at all. They've only got the outside eyes.&quot;Harriet looked at him in wonder. And he looked at her - at her queer,
rather large, but thin-skinned, soft hands.&quot;You need a thick skin to live out here,&quot; he said.But still she sat with her hands folded, lost in meditation.&quot;But Lovat wants so much to do something in the world, with other men,&quot;
she said at last. &quot;It's not MY urging, I assure you.&quot;&quot;He's making a mistake. He's making a mistake to come out here, tell him
from me. They'll take him at their own level, not at his.&quot;&quot;But perhaps he wants to be taken at their level,&quot; said Harriet, rather
bitterly, almost loving the short, thick man opposite for his quiet,
Cornish voice and his uncanny grey eyes, and his warning.&quot;If he does he makes the mistake of his life, tell him from me.&quot; And
William James rose to his feet. &quot;You'll excuse me for stopping talking
like this, over things that's no business of mine,&quot; he added.&quot;It's awfully good of you,&quot; said Harriet.&quot;Well, it's not often I interfere with people's doings. But there was
just something about you and Mr. Somers - .&quot;&quot;Awfully good of you.&quot;He had taken his little black felt hat. He had an almost Italian or
Spanish look about him - from one of the big towns, Barcelona or even
Palermo.&quot;I suppose I'll have to be getting along,&quot; he said.She held out her hand to him to bid him good-bye. But he shook hands in
a loose, slack way, and was gone, leaving Harriet uneasy as if she had
received warning of a hidden danger.She hastened to show Somers the persimmons when he came home, and to
tell of her visitor.&quot;And he's queer, Lovat, he's awfully queer - nice too. He told me we were
superior people, and that we made a mistake coming here, because they'd
bring us down to their level.&quot;&quot;Not if we don't let them.&quot;&quot;He says we can't help it.&quot;&quot;Why did he come to tell you that, I wonder.&quot;They were going down to Mullumbimby in two days' time - and they had
hardly seen anything of Jack and Victoria since the Sunday at Mosman's
Bay. But Victoria called across the fence, rather hesitatingly:&quot;You're going with us on Saturday, aren't you, Mrs. Somers?&quot;&quot;Oh yes, we're looking forward to it immensely - if it really suits you.&quot;&quot;I'm so glad. I thought perhaps you didn't want to go.&quot;That same evening Jack and Victoria came across for a few minutes.&quot;Look at the lovely cacchi,&quot; said Harriet, giving the persimmons their
Italian name. &quot;William James brought them me this morning.&quot;&quot;William James brought them!&quot; cried Victoria and Jack in a breath. &quot;Why,
whatever have you done to him?&quot;&quot;Nothing,&quot; laughed Harriet. &quot;I hope not, I'm sure.&quot;&quot;You must have given him a glad eye,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Did he come in?&quot;&quot;Yes, he came in and talked to me quite a long time. He said he would
see you to-morrow in town.&quot;&quot;Wonders never cease! I tell you, you've done it on him. What did he
talk to you about, then?&quot;&quot;Oh. Australia. He said he didn't think we should really like it.&quot;&quot;He did, did he? Wanted to warn you off, so to speak.&quot;&quot;Perhaps,&quot; laughed Harriet.&quot;The little mingo. He's as deep as a five hundred feet boring, and I've
never got down to sweet water in him yet.&quot;&quot;Don't you trust him?&quot; said Harriet.&quot;Trust him? Oh yes, he'd never pick my pocket.&quot;&quot;I didn't mean that.&quot;&quot;That's the only way I have of trusting folks,&quot; said Jack.&quot;Then you don't trust them far,&quot; mocked Harriet.&quot;Perhaps I don't. And perhaps I'm wise of it.&quot;>



They had another ferocious battle, Somers and Harriet; they stood
opposite to one another in such fury one against the other that they
nearly annihilated one another. He couldn't stay near her, so started
walking off into the country. It was winter, but sunny, and hot walking.
He climbed steadily up and up the highroad between the dense, damp
jungle that grew at the base and up the steep rise of the tor-face,
which he wanted to get to the top of. Strange birds made weird, metallic
noises. Tree-ferns rose on their notchy little trunks, and great mosses
tangled in with more ordinary bushes. Overhead rose the gum-trees,
sometimes with great stark, dead limbs thrown up, sometimes hands over
like pine-trees.He sweated up the steep road till at last he came to the top. There, on
the farther side, the dip slope, the hills sank and ran in spurs, all
fairly densely wooded, but not like the scarp slope up which he had
toiled. The scarp slope was jungle, impenetrable, with tree-ferns and
bunchy cabbage-palms and mosses like bushes, a thick matted undergrowth
beneath the boles of the trees. But the dip slope was bush: gum trees
rather scattered, and a low undergrowth like heath. The same lonely,
unbreakable silence and loneliness that seemed to him the real bush.
Curiously unapproachable to him. The mystery of the bush seems to recede
from you as you advance, and then it is behind you if you look round.
Lonely, and weird, and hoary.He went on till he could look over the tor's edge at the land below.
There was the scalloped sea-shore, for miles, and the strip of flat
coast-land, sometimes a mile wide, sprinkled as far as the eye could
reach with the pale-grey zinc roofs of the bungalows: all scattered like
crystals in the loose cells of the dark tree-tissue of the shore. It was
suggestive of Japanese landscape, dark trees and little, single,
scattered toy houses. Then the bays of the shore, the coal-jetty, far
off rocks down the coast, and long white lines of breakers.But he was looking mostly straight below him, at the massed foliage of
the cliff-slope. Down into the centre of the great, dull-green whorls of
the tree-ferns, and on to the shaggy mops of the cabbage palms. In one
place a long fall of creeper was yellowish with damp flowers. Gum-trees
came up in tufts. The previous world! - the world of the coal age. The
lonely, lonely world that had waited, it seemed, since the coal age.
These ancient flat-topped tree-ferns, these towsled palms like mops.
What was the good of trying to be an alert conscious man here? You
couldn't. Drift, drift into a sort of obscurity, backwards into a
nameless past, hoary as the country is hoary. Strange old feelings wake
in the soul: old, non-human feelings. And an old, old indifference, like
a torpor, invades the spirit. An old, saurian torpor. Who wins? There
was the land sprinkled with dwellings as with granulated sugar. There
was a black smoke of steamers on the high pale sea, and a whiteness of
steam from a colliery among the dull trees. Was the land awake? Would
the people waken this ancient land, or would the land put them to sleep,
drift them back into the semi-consciousness of the world of the
twilight?Somers felt the torpor coming over him. He hung there on the parapet
looking down, and he didn't care. How profoundly, darkly he didn't care.
There are no problems for the soul in its darkened, wide-eyed torpor.
Neither Harriet nor Kangaroo nor Jaz, nor even the world. Worlds come,
and worlds go: even worlds. And when the old, old influence of the
fern-world comes over a man, how can he care? He breathes the fern seed
and drifts back, becomes darkly half vegetable, devoid of
preoccupations. Even the never-slumbering urge of sex sinks down into
something darker, more monotonous, incapable of caring: like sex in
trees. The dark world before conscious responsibility was born.A queer bird sat hunched on a bough a few yards away, just below; a bird
like a bunch of old rag, with a small rag of a dark tail, and a fluffy
pale top like an owl, and a sort of frill round his neck. He had a long,
sharp, dangerous beak. But he too was sunk in unutterable apathy. A
kukooburra! Some instinct made him know that Somers was watching, so he
just shuffled round on the bough and sat with his back to the man, and
became utterly oblivious. Somers watched and wondered. Then he whistled.
No change. Then he clapped his hands. The bird looked over its shoulder
in surprise. What! it seemed to say. Is there somebody alive? Is that a
live somebody? It had quite a handsome face, with the exquisite long,
dagger beak.It slowly took Somers in. Then he clapped again. Making an effort the
bird spread quite big wings and whirred in a queer, flickering flight to
a bough a dozen yards farther off. And there it clotted again.Ah well, thought Somers, life is so big, and has such huge ante-worlds
of grey twilight. How can one care about anything in particular!He went home again, and had forgotten the quarrel and forgotten marriage
or revolutions or anything: drifted away into the grey pre-world where
men didn't have emotions. Where men didn't have emotions and personal
consciousness, but were shadowy like trees, and on the whole silent,
with numb brains and slow limbs and a great indifference.But Harriet was waiting for him rather wistful, and loving him rather
quiveringly. And yet even in the quiver of her passion was some of this
indifference, this twilight indifference of the fern-world.Jack and Victoria came for the week-end, and Somers and Callcott met in
a much nearer sympathy than they had ever known before. Victoria was
always thrilled and fascinated by both the Somers: they had an
inexhaustible fascination for her, the tones of their voices, their
manner, their way with each other. She could not understand the strange
sureness they had in themselves, the sureness of what they were saying
or going to say, the sureness of what they were feeling. For herself,
her words fluttered out of her without her direct control, and her
feelings fluttered in her the same. She was one perpetually agitated
dovecot of words and emotions, always trying consciously to find HERSELF
amid the whirl, and never quite succeeding. She thought someone might
TELL her. Whereas the Somers had an unconscious sureness, something that
seemed really royal to her. But she had in the last issue the twilight
indifference of the fern-world. Only she still quivered for the light.Poor Victoria! She clung to Jack's arm vibrating, always needing to
vibrate outwards. And he seemed to become more Australian and apathetic
every week. The great indifference, the darkness of the fern-world, upon
his mind. Then spurts of energy, spurts of sudden violent desire, spurts
of gambling excitement. But the mind in a kind of twilight sleep.He made no more appeals. He was just static, and quite gentle. Even at
table he was half oblivious of the presence of the other people. Then
Victoria would poke him with her elbow, poke him hard, into
consciousness, and bring back the lively Jack that the Somers had first
known. Strange that the torpor had come on him so completely of late.
Yet there was a queer light in his eyes, as if he might do something
dangerous. And when he was once talking, he was perfectly logical and
showed surprising calm common-sense. When he was discussing or
criticising, he seemed so unusually sane as to be peculiar. Like a man
in his sleep.Just outside the station was the football field, and Mullumbimby was
playing Wollondindy, Mullumbimby in royal blue, and Wollondindy in
rather faded red. Along the roadside buggies and motor-cars were pulled
up, the ponies were taken out of harness and left to feed on the
roadside grass. Two riders sat on horseback to survey the scene. And
under the flowering coral-trees, with their sharp red cockatoo flowers,
stood men in their best clothes smoking pipes, or men in their best
clothes squatting on the fence, and lasses mingling in or strolling past
in white silk stockinette frocks, or pink crepe de chine, or muslin.
Just like prostitutes, arm in arm, strolled the lasses, airing
themselves and their pronounced hips. And the men apathetically took no
notice, but watched the field.This scene was too much for Jack Callcott. Somers or no Somers, he must
be there. So there he stood, in his best clothes and a cream velour hat
and a short pipe, staring with his long, naked, Australian face,
impassive. On the field the blues and the reds darted madly about, like
strange bird-creatures rather than men. They were mostly blond, with
hefty legs, and with prominent round buttocks that worked madly inside
the little white cotton shorts. And Jack, with his dark eyes, watched as
if it was Doomsday. Occasionally the tail-end of a smile would cross his
face, occasionally he would take his pipe-stem from his mouth and give a
bright look into vacancy and say, &quot;See that!&quot; Heaven knows what it was
that he saw. The game, the skill? Yes. But more, the motion, the wild
combative motion. And most of all, fate. Fate had a fascination for him.
It was the only real point of curiosity left in him: how would chance
work things out. Chance! Now then, how would chance settle it? Even the
football field, with its wildly scurrying blues and bits of red, was
only a frenzied shuffling of fate, with men for the instruments. The
living instruments of fate! And how would it work out, how would it work
out? He could have stood there, static, with his little pipe, till
Doomsday, waiting for fate to settle it. The wild scurrying motion, and
the jumps in the air, of course made his heart beat faster. Towards the
close one of the chaps got a kick on the jaw, and was knocked out. They
couldn't finish the game. Hard lines.Jack was a queer sight to Somers, when he was in this brightly vacant
mood, not a man at all, but a chance thing, gazing spellbound on the
evolutions of chance. And in this state, this very Australian state, you
could hardly get a word out of him. Or, when he broke into a little
volley of speech, you listened with wonder to the noise of it, as if a
weird animal had suddenly given voice.The indifference, the marvellous, bed-rock indifference. Not the static
fatalism of the east. But an indifference based on real recklessness, an
indifference with a deep flow of loose energy beneath it, ready to break
out like a geyser. Ready to break into a kind of frenzy, a berserk
frenzy, running amok in wild generosity, or still more wild smashing up.
The wild joy in letting loose, in a smash-up. But will he ever let
loose? Or will the static patience settle deeper, and the fern-twilight
altogether envelop him. The slow transmutation! What does to-day matter,
or this country? Time is so huge, and in Australia the next step back is
to the fern age.The township looked its queerest as dusk fell. Then the odd electric
lights shone at rather wide intervals, the wide, unmade roads of rutted
earth seemed to belong again to the wild, in the semi-dark, and the low
bungalows with the doors open and the light showing seemed like shacks
in the wilderness, a settlement in the fierce gloom of the wilderness.
Then youths dashed fiercely on horseback down the soft roads, standing
in the stirrups and crouching over the neck of the thin, queer brown
racehorses that sprinted along like ghosts. And the young baker, in
emulation, dashed through the village on his creamy pony. A collier who
had been staying somewhere cantered stiffly away into the dark on a pony
like a rocking horse. Young maidens in cotton dresses stood at the
little rail gates of their bungalow homes talking to young men in a
buggy, or to a young man on foot, or to the last tradesman's cart, or to
youths who were strolling past. It was evening, and the intense dusk of
the far-off land, and white folks peering out of the dusk almost like
aborigines. The far-off land, just as far-off when you are in it: nay,
then furthest off.The evening came very dark, with lightning playing pallid in the
south-east, over the sea. There was nothing to be done with Jack but to
play draughts with him. He wasn't in a real sporting mood, so he let
himself be beaten even at draughts. When he was in a sporting mood he
could cast a spell of confusion over Somers, and win every time, with a
sort of gloating. But when he wasn't in a sporting mood he would shove
up his men recklessly and lose them. He didn't care. He just leaned back
and stretched himself in that intense physical way which Somers thought
just a trifle less than human. The man was all body: a strong body full
of energy like a machine that has got steam up, but is inactive. He had
no mind, no spirit, no soul: just a tense, inactive body, and an eye
rather glazed and a trifle bloodshot. The old psyche slowly
disintegrating.Meanwhile Victoria in a trill of nervous excitement and exaltation was
talking Europe with Harriet. Victoria was just the opposite of Jack: she
was all a quiver of excited consciousness, to know, to see, to realise.
She would almost have done anything, to be able to LOOK at life, look at
the inside of it, see it in its intimacy. She had had wild ideas of
being a stewardess on a boat, a chambermaid in an hotel, a waitress in a
good restaurant, a hospital nurse - anything, so that she could SEE
intimacies, touch the private mysteries. To travel seemed to her the
great desirable: to go to Europe and India, and SEE it all. She loved
Australia, loved it far more quiveringly and excitedly than he. But it
wasn't Australia that fascinated her: it was the secret intimacies of
life, and what OTHER FOLKS FELT. That strange and aboriginal
indifference that was bottommost in him seemed like a dynamo in her. She
fluttered in the air like a loose live nerve, a nerve of the sympathetic
system. She was all sympathetic drive: and he was nearly all check. He
sat there apathetic, nothing but body and solid, steady, physical
indifference. He did not oppose her at all, or go counter to her. He was
just the heavy opposite pole of her energy. And of course she belonged
to him as one pole belongs to the other pole in a circuit.And he, he would stretch his body continuously, but he would not go to
bed, though Somers suggested it. No, there he sat. So Somers joined in
the more exciting conversation of the women, and Jack sat solidly there.
Whether he listened or whether he didn't, who knows? The aboriginal
SYMPATHETIC apathy was upon him, he was like some creature that has lost
its soul, and simply stares.The morning was one of the loveliest Australian mornings, perfectly
golden, all the air pure gold, the great gold effulgence to seaward, and
the pure, cold pale-blue inland, over the dark range. The wind was
blowing from inland, the sea was quiet as a purring cat with white paws,
becoming darkish green-blue flecked with innumerable white flecks like
rain-spots splashing the surface of a pool. The horizon was a clear and
hard and dark sea against an almost white sky, but from far behind the
horizon showed the mirage-magic tops of hazed, gold-white clouds, that
seemed as if they indicated the far Pacific isles.Though it was cold, Jack was sauntering about in his shirtsleeves with
his waistcoat open and his hands in his pockets: rather to the vexation
of Victoria. &quot;Pull yourself together, Jack dear, do. Put your collar and
tie on,&quot; she coaxed, fondling him.&quot;In a minute,&quot; he said.The indifference - the fern-dark indifference of this remote golden
Australia. Not to care - from the bottom of one's soul, not to care.
Overpowered in the twilight of fern-odour. Just to keep enough grip to
run the machinery of the day: and beyond that, to let yourself drift,
not to think or strain or make any effort to consciousness whatsoever.
That was Jack, sauntering down there in his shirt-sleeves, with his
waistcoat open showing his white shirt, his strong neck bare: sauntering
with his hands in his pockets beside Somers, at the water's edge. Somers
wore a dark flannel jacket, and his necktie hung dark and broke the
intimacy of the white shirt-breast.The two women stood on the cliff, the low, bushy cliff, looking down.
Harriet was in a plain dress of dark-coloured purplish-and-brown
hand-woven stuff of cotton and silk mixture, with old silver lace round
the collar; Victoria in a pale-green knitted dress. So they stood in the
morning light, watching the men on the fawn-coloured sand by the
sea-fringe, waiting to wave when they looked up.Jack looked up first. The two women coo-eed and waved. He took his pipe
from his mouth and held it high in his hand, in answer. A strange
signal. The pale-green wisp of Victoria in the sky was part of his
landscape. But the darker figure of Harriet had for some reason a menace
to him, up there. He suddenly felt as if he were down below: he suddenly
realised a need to bethink himself. He turned to Somers, looking down
and saying in his peculiar Australian tone:&quot;Well, I suppose we'd better be going up.&quot;The curious note of obedience in the manly twang!Victoria made him put on coat and collar and tie for breakfast.&quot;Yes, dear, come on. I'll tie your tie for you.&quot;&quot;I suppose a man was born to give in,&quot; said he, with laconic good humour
and obstinacy. But he was a little uneasy. He realised the need to
gather himself together.&quot;You get like the rest of them,&quot; Victoria scolded him in a coaxing tone.
&quot;You used to be so smart. And you promised me you'd never go slack like
they all are. Didn't you, you bad boy?&quot;&quot;I forget,&quot; said he. But nevertheless the constraint of breakfast pulled
him up. Because Harriet REALLY disapproved, and he didn't know what was
inside that rose-and-brown-purple cloud of her. The ancient judgment of
the Old World. So he gathered himself somewhat together. But he was so
far, fern-lost, from the old world.&quot;My God!&quot; thought Somers. &quot;These are the men Kangaroo wants to build up
a new state with.&quot;After breakfast Somers got Jack to talk about Kangaroo and his plans. He
heard again all about the Diggers' Clubs: nearly all soldiers and
sailors who had been in the war, but not restricted to these. They had
started like any other social club: games, athletics, lectures,
readings, discussions, debates. No gambling, no drink, no class or party
distinction. The clubs were still chiefly athletics, but not SPORTING.
They went in for boxing, wrestling, fencing, and knife-throwing, and
revolver practice. But they had swimming and rowing squads, and
rifle-ranges for rifle practice, and they had regular military training.
The colonel who planned out the military training was a clever chap. The
men were grouped in little squads of twenty, each with sergeant and
corporal. Each of these twenty was trained to act like a scout,
independently, though the squad worked in absolute unison among
themselves, and were pledged to absolute obedience of higher commands.
These commands, however, left most of the devising and method of
execution of the job in hand to the squad itself. In New South Wales the
Maggies, as these private squads were called, numbered already about
fourteen hundred, all perfectly trained and equipped. They had a
distinctive badge of their own: a white, broad-brimmed felt hat, like
the ordinary khaki military hat, but white, and with a tuft of white
feathers. &quot;Because,&quot; said Ennis, the colonel, &quot;we're the only ones that
can afford to show the white feather.&quot;These Maggies, probably from Magpies, because Colonel Ennis used to wear
white riding-breeches and black gaiters, and a black jacket and a white
stock, with his white hat - were the core and heart of the Digger
Movement. But Kangaroo had slaved at the other half of the business, the
mental side. He DID want his men to grip on to the problem of the future
of Australia. He had insisted on attendance at debates and discussions:
Australia and the World, Australia and the Future, White Australia,
Australia and the Reds, Class Feeling in Australia, Politics and
Australia, Australians and Work, What is Democracy? What is an
Australian? What do our Politicians do for Australia? What our State
Parliament does for us, What our Federal Parliament does for us, What
side of the Australian does Parliament represent? Is Parliament
necessary to Democracy? What is wrong with Soviet rule? Do we want a
Statesman, or do we want a Leader? What kind of Leader do we want? What
aim have we in view? Are we Australians? Are we Democratic? Do we
believe in Ourselves?So the debates had been going on, for a year and a half now. These
debates were for club members only. And each club numbered only fifty
members. Every member was asked to take part in the debates, and a
memorandum was kept of each meeting. Then there were monthly united
gatherings, of five or six or more clubs together. And occasionally a
mass-meeting, at which Kangaroo spoke.All this went on in the open, and roused some comment in the press: at
first a great deal of praise, later some suspicion and considerable
antagonism, both from Conservatives and Labour. Ben Cooley was supposed
to be working himself in as a future Prime Minister, with a party behind
him that would make him absolute, a Dictator. As soon as one paper came
out with this alarm, an opponent sneered and pooh-poohed, and spoke of
the Reds lounging about, a fearful menace, in Sydney, and recalled the
Reigns of Terror in Paris and in Petrograd. Was another Reign of Terror
preparing for Sydney? Was a bloodthirsty Robespierre or a ruthless Lenin
awaiting his moment? Would responsible citizens be lynched in Martin
Place, and dauntless citizenesses thrown into the harbour, when the
fatal hour struck? Whereupon a loud burst from the press: were we to be
alarmed by the knock-kneed, loutish socialist gang that hung round
Canberra House? These gentry could hardly kill the vermin in their own
clothing, not to speak of lynching in Martin Place. Whereas the Maggies
were a set of efficient, well-armed, and no doubt unscrupulous tools of
still more designing and unscrupulous masters. If we had to choose
between Napoleon, in the shape of Ben Cooley, or Lenin, in the
lack-of-shape of Willie Struthers, we should be hard put to it to know
which was worse. Whereupon a fierce blast about our returned heroes and
the white-livered skulkers who had got themselves soft jobs as
coast-watchers, watching that the sharks didn't nibble the rocks, and
now dared lift their dishonourable croaks against the revered name of
Digger. And a ferocious rush-in from Labour, which didn't see much
Napoleon in Ben Cooley, except his belly and the knack of filling his
pockets. Napoleon, though but a Dago and not a Jew, had filled one of
the longest pockets Europe had ever emptied herself into, so where would
poor little Australia be when the sham Kangaroo, with the help of the
Magpies, which were indeed strictly Butcher Birds, started to coin her
into shekels?Then the boom died down, but the Digger Clubs had grown immensely on the
strength of it. There were now more than a hundred clubs in New South
Wales, and nearly as many in Victoria. The chief in Victoria was a smart
chap, a mining expert. They called him the Emu, to match Kangaroo on the
Australian coat of arms. He would be the Trotsky to the new Lenin, for
he was a born handler of men. He had been a lieutenant-colonel in the
war, a very smart soldier, and there had been a great cry to keep him
on, for the Defence Force. But he had got the shove from Government, so
he cleared out and went back to his mining.But every club had its own committee, and this committee was composed of
five or six of the best, surest members, sworn in to secrecy and to
absolute obedience to any decision. Each club committee handled every
question of development, and the master and the teller went to
section-meetings. A section consisted of ten clubs. A decision at a
section meeting was carried to the state meeting, where the chief of the
state always had the ruling vote. Once a decision was passed, it became
a law for all members, embodied in the person of the chief, and
interpreted by him unquestioned save by his lieutenant, the chief of all
the secretaries, or tellers.The public members of the clubs were initiated into no secrets. The most
important questions were discussed only among the chiefs. More general
secrets were debated at the section meetings. That is, the great bulk of
the members gave only their allegiance and their spirit of sympathy. The
masters and chiefs carefully watched the response to all propositions at
all open discussions. They carefully fostered the feeling they wished
for, or which they were instructed to encourage. When the right feeling
was arrived at, presumably, then the secret members started the
discussion of propositions proposed from above. A secret member was
allowed to make a proposition also, and the list was read over at the
section meetings. But the Jack, the chief of the tellers, had right of
absolute veto.Somers could not get it very clear, from Jack Callcott's description.
But it seemed to him as if all the principal ideas originated with the
chief, went round the circuit of the clubs, disguised as general topics
for debate, and returned as confirmed principles, via the section
meetings and the state meetings. All the debates had been a slow,
deliberate crystallising of a few dominant ideas in all the members. In
the actual putting into practice of any principle, the chief was an
autocrat, though he might, if he chose, send his propositions through
the section meetings and the state meetings for criticism and amendment.&quot;What I feel,&quot; said Somers to Jack, &quot;is that the bulk of you just don't
care what the chief does, so long as he does something.&quot;&quot;Oh, we don't lose our sleep at nights. If he likes to be the boss, let
him do the thinking. We know he's our man, and so we'll follow him. We
can't all be Peter and Paul and know all about it.&quot;&quot;You just feel he's your man?&quot;&quot;Oh, we do.&quot;&quot;But supposing you go in and win - and he is the boss of Australia. Shall
you still leave things to him?&quot;Jack thought lazily for a time.&quot;I should think so,&quot; he replied, with a queer, mistrustful tone.And Somers felt again so distinctly they were doing it all just in order
to have something to do, to put a spoke in the wheel of the present
bosses, to make a change. Just temporary. There would be a change, and
that was what they wanted. There was all the time the excitement. Damn
the consequences.&quot;You don't think it would be as well to HAVE a Soviet and Willie
Struthers?&quot;&quot;No, I don't,&quot; said Jack, in a thin, sharp voice. &quot;I don't want to be
bullied by any damned Red International Labour. I don't want to be
kissing and hugging a lot of foreign labour tripe: niggers and what the
hell. I'd rather have the British Empire ten thousand times over, and
that bed's a bit too wide, and too many in it for me. I don't like
sleeping with a lot of neighbours. But when it comes to going to bed
with a crowd of niggers and dagoes, in an International Labour Combine,
with a pair of red sheets so that the dirt won't show, I'm absolutely
sure I won't have it. That's why I like Kangaroo. We shall be just cosy
and Australian with a boss like a father who gets up first in the
morning, and locks up at night before you go to bed.&quot;&quot;And who will stop in the Empire?&quot;&quot;Oh, I suppose so. But he won't be asking even the British to go to bed
with him. He knows the difference between Australia and the rest of the
Empire, The Empire's like a lot of lock-up shops that you do your trade
in. But I know Kangaroo well enough to know he's not mixing his family
in. He'll keep Australia close and cosy. That's what I want. And that's
what we all want, when we're in our senses and aren't bitten into spots
by the Red International bug.&quot;Somers then mentioned Jaz's proposition, of a red revolution first.&quot;I know,&quot; said Jack. &quot;It may be so. He's one of your sly, crawling
devils, Jaz is, and that seems to be the road nowadays. I wouldn't mind
egging the Reds in, and then slapping them clean out into nowhere. I
wouldn't mind at all. But I'm bound to follow Kangaroo's orders, so I'm
not bothering my chump over Jaz's boodle.&quot;&quot;You don't care which way it happens?&quot;Jack looked at him sideways, like the funny bird.&quot;No,&quot; he said, with an Australian drawl. &quot;So long as it does happen. I
don't like things as they are, and I don't feel safe about them. I don't
mean I want to feel safe as if nothing would ever happen. There's some
sorts of sport and risk that you enjoy, and there's others you hate the
thought of. Now I hate the thought of being bossed and messed about by
the Old Country, or by Jew capitalists and bankers, or by a lot of
labour bullies, or a Soviet. There's no fun in that sort of sport, to
me, unless you can jolly well wipe the bleeders out afterwards. And I
don't altogether want the mills of the British Empire to go grinding
slowly on, and yourself compelled to do nothing but grind slowly with
'em. It's too much of a sameness altogether, and not as much sport as a
tin Lizzie. We're too much mixed up with other folk's business, what's
absolutely no fun for us. No, what I want is a cosy, lively little
Australia away from all this blooming world-boost. I've no use for a lot
of people across a lot of miles of sea nudging me while I handle my
knife and fork. Leave us Australians to ourselves, we shall manage.&quot;They were interrupted by Harriet calling for Somers to come and rescue
the tea-towel from the horns of a cow who had calmly scrambled through
the fence on to their grass. Somers was used to the cow: she had
scrambled through the Coo-ee fence long before the Somers had ever
walked through the gate, so she looked on them as mild intruders. He was
quite friendly with her, she ate the pumpkin rind and apple parings from
his hand. Now she looked at him half guiltily out of one eye, the
kitchen towel hanging over the other eye. She took it quite calmly, but
had a disreputable appearance.&quot;Come here,&quot; said he. &quot;Come here and have it taken off. Of course you
had to poke your head into the bush if you thought there was a towel on
it.&quot;She came mildly up and held her head while he disentangled the towel
from her horns. Then she went calmly on, snuffing at the short, bitten
grass for another mouthful, and twitching leaves off the stunted bushes.So they were, the cows, so unafraid. In Cornwall, Harriet said, the cows
had always sniffed in when she came near, and then breathed out heavily,
nnh! nnh! as if they did not like the smell of human beings, breathing
out against her, and backing. And that had scared her. But these cows
didn't do that. They seemed so calm. They fed over all the bush, the
unoccupied grassy lots above the sea, among the unbuilt streets. And
they pushed in among the trees and bushes where the creek came in. And
then at dusk a boy would come on a cream-coloured pony riding round and
driving them in, scaring a sort of crane or heron bird from the still
waters of the marshy creek-edge. Then the cows walked or trotted
placidly home: so unconcerned. And the bird with the great, arched grey
wings flapped in a low circle round, then settled again a yard or two
from where she was before.So unconcerned. Somers had noticed a pair of fishing birds by the creek,
queer objects nearly as big as ducks, perched at the extremity of a dead
gum-tree, above the water. They flew away at his coming, but while he
stood looking, they circled with their longish necks stretched out and
their wings sharply flicking in the high air, then one returned and sat
again on the tree, and the other perched on another dead tree. The near
one looked sideways at him.&quot;Yes, I'm here,&quot; said he aloud.Whereupon she did the inevitable, turned her back on him and he no
longer existed for her. These ostriches needed no sand. She so far
forgot him as to turn sideways to him again, so he had her in profile,
clutched grey like an old knot at the tip of the stark, dead grey tree.
And there she performed queer corkscrew exercises with her neck in the
air. Whether it was she was getting down a last fishbone in her gizzard,
or whether she was merely asserting herself in the upper air, he could
not tell.&quot;What a fool you look,&quot; he said aloud to her.Then away the birds rose. And he saw a seedy, elderly man in black, in a
long-skirted black coat like a cast-off Methodist parson, spying at him
furtively from behind the bushes on the other side of the creek. This
parson-looking weed carried a gun, and was shooting heaven knows what.
He thought Richard Lovat a very suspicious bird, and Richard Lovat
thought him the last word in human weeds. So our young man turned away
to the sands, where the afternoon sea had gone a very dark blue. Another
human weed with a very thin neck and a very red face sat on the sand
ridge up which the foam-edge swished, his feet wide apart, facing the
ocean, and tending a line which he had in some way managed to cast out
into the low surf. An urchin, barefoot, was pottering round in silence,
like a sandpiper. The elderly one made unintelligible noises as Somers
approached. The latter realised it meant he was not to catch with his
foot the line, which reached out behind the thin fisherman, covered with
sand. So he stepped over it. The brown, barefoot urchin pottered round
unheeding. He did not even look up when the elder made more
unintelligible sounds to him.My father is a fisherman,
Oh a fisherman! Yes a fisherman!
He catches all the fish-e-can.Mondays, Wednesdays, and Saturdays were the library nights. When you had
crossed the iron foot-bridge over the railway, you came to a big wooden
building with a corrugated iron roof, standing forlorn at an unmade
corner, like the fag-end of the village. But the village was an
agglomeration of fag ends. This building might have been a temporary
chapel, as you came at it from the back. But in front it was labelled
&quot;Pictoria&quot;, so it was the cinema. But there was also a black board with
gilt letters, like a chapel notice-board, which said &quot;School of Arts
Library&quot;. And the Pictoria had a sort of little wing, all wood, like a
little school-room. And in one section of this wing was the School of
Arts Library, which the Somers had joined. Four rows of novels: the top
row a hundred or more thin books, all Nat Gould or Zane Grey. The young
women came for Zane Grey. &quot;Oh, 'The Maid of Mudgee' is a lovely thing,
lovely&quot; - a young woman was pronouncing from the top of the broken chair
which served as stool to give access to this top row. &quot;Y'aven' got a new
Zaine Greye, have yer?&quot; She spoke in these tones of unmitigated intimacy
to the white-moustached librarian. One would have thought he was her
dear old dad. Then came a young railway man who had heard there was a
new Nat Gould.&quot;But,&quot; said Somers, as he and Harriet went off with a Mary E. Mann and a
George A. Birmingham, &quot;I don't wonder they can't read English books, or
only want Nat Gould. All the scruples and the emotions and the regrets
in English novels do seem waste of time out here.&quot;&quot;I suppose,&quot; said Harriet, &quot;if you don't have any inside life of your
own it must seem a waste of time. But look at it - look!&quot;The object she bade him look at was a bone of contention between them.
She wanted to give five pounds to have four posts and an iron chain put
round it, and perhaps a bit of grass sowed inside the enclosure. He
declared that they'd probably charge ten pounds for the chain alone,
since it was Australia. And let it alone. It was of a piece with the
rest. But Harriet said she couldn't leave the place till she'd had
something done to it. He said she was an interfering female.The object was the memorial to the fallen soldiers. It was really a
quite attractive little monument: a statue in pale, fawnish stone, of a
Tommy standing at ease, with his gun down at his side, wearing his
puttees and his turned-up felt hat. The statue itself was about life
size, but standing just overhead on a tall pedestal it looked small and
stiff and rather touching. The pedestal was in very nice proportion, and
had at eye level white inlet slabs between little columns of grey
granite, bearing the names of the fallen on one slab, in small black
letters, and on the other slabs the names of all the men who served:
&quot;God Bless Them&quot;. The fallen had &quot;Lest we forget&quot;, for a motto. Carved
on the bottom step it said, &quot;Unveiled by Grannie Rhys&quot;. A real township
monument, bearing the names of everybody possible: the fallen, all those
who donned khaki, the people who presented it, and Grannie Rhys.
Wonderfully in keeping with the place and its people, naive but quite
attractive, with the stiff, pallid, delicate fawn-coloured soldier
standing forever stiff and pathetic.But there it stood, a few yards from the corner of the corrugated
Pictoria, at the corner of the fag-end road to the station, like an old
milk-can someone had set down and forgotten: or a bran new milk-can. Old
rags of paper littered the ground at the base, with an old tin or two. A
little further back was a German machine gun, also looking as if it had
been scrapped and forgotten. Standing there, with its big metal
screen-flap, it looked exotic, a thing of some higher culture, demoniac
and fallen.Harriet was dying to rescue the forlorn monument that seemed as if it
had been left there in the bustle of removal. She wanted to enclose it.
But he said: &quot;Leave it. Leave it. They don't like things enclosed.&quot;She still had in her mind's eye an Australia with beautiful manorial
farm-houses and dainty, perfect villages. She never acquiesced in the
UNCREATEDNESS of the new country, the rawness, the slovenliness. It
seemed to her comical, for instance, that no woman in Australia would
carry a basket. Harriet went shopping as usual with her pretty straw
basket in the village. But she felt that the women remarked on it. Only
then did she notice that everybody carried a suit-case in this discreet
country. The fat old woman who came to the door with a suit-case must,
she thought, be a visitor coming to the wrong house. But no. &quot;Did you
want a cabbage?&quot; In the suitcase two cabbages and half a pumpkin. A
little girl goes to the dairy for six eggs and half a pound of butter
with a small, elegant suit-case. Nay, a child of three toddled with a
little six-inch suit-case, containing, as Harriet had occasion to see,
two buns, because the suit-case flew open and the two buns rolled out.
Australian suit-cases were always flying open, and discharging groceries
or a skinned rabbit or three bottles of beer. One had the impression
that everybody was perpetually going away for the week-end: with a
suit-case. Not so at all. Just a new-country bit of convention.Ah, a new country! The cabbage, for example, cost tenpence in the normal
course of things, and a cauliflower a shilling. And the tradesmen's
carts flew round in the wilderness, delivering goods. There isn't much
newness in MAN, whatever the country.That old aeroplane that had lain broken-down in a field. It was nowadays
always staggering in the low air just above the surf, past the front of
Coo-ee, and lurching down on to the sands of the town &quot;beach&quot;. There, in
the cold wind, a forlorn group of men and boys round the aeroplane, the
sea washing near, the marsh of the creek desolate behind. Then a
&quot;passenger mounted&quot;, and men shoving the great insect of a thing along
the sand to get it started. It buzzed venomously into the air, looking
very unsafe and wanting to fall in the sea.&quot;Yes, he's carrying passengers. Oh, quite a fair trade. Thirty-five
shillings a time. Yes, it seems a lot, but he has to make his money
while he can. No, I've not been up myself, but my boy has. No, you see,
there was four boys, and they had a sweepstake: eight-and-six apiece,
and my boy won. He's just eleven. Yes, he liked it. But they was only up
about four minutes: I timed them myself. Well, you know, it's hardly
worth it. But he gets plenty to go. I heard he made over forty pounds on
Whit Monday, here on this beach. It seems to me, though, he favours some
more than others. There's some he flies round with for ten minutes, and
that last chap now, I'm sure he wasn't up a second more than three
minutes. No, not quite fair. Yes, he's a man from Bulli: was a
flying-man all through the war. Now he's got this machine of his own,
he's quite right to make something for himself if he can. No, I don't
know that he has any licence or anything. But a chap like that, who went
through the war - why, who's going to interfere with his doing the best
for himself?&quot;>



The thing that Kangaroo had to reckon with, and would not reckon with,
was the mass-spirit. A collection of men does not necessarily mean a
mob. A collection of men - an accidental gathering - may be just a
gathering, drawn by a moment's curiosity, or it may be an audience drawn
to hear something, or it may be a congregation, gathered together in
some spirit of earnest desire: or it may be just a crowd, inspired by no
one motive. The mass-spirit is complex. At its lowest it is a mob, and
what is a mob?To put it as briefly as possible, it is a collection of all the weak
souls, sickeningly conscious of their weakness, into a heavy mob, that
lusts to glut itself with blind destructive power. Not even vengeance.
The spirit of vengeance belongs to a mass which is higher than a mob.The study of collective psychology to-day is absurd in its inadequacy.
Man is supposed to be an automaton working in certain automatic ways
when you touch certain springs. These springs are all labelled, they
form a keyboard to the human psyche, according to modern psychology. And
the chief labels are herd instinct, collective interest, hunger, fear,
collective prestige, and so on.But the only way to make any study of collective psychology is to study
the isolated individual. Upon your conception of the single individual,
all your descriptions will be based, all your science established. For
this reason, the human sciences, philosophy, ethics, psychology,
politics, economics, can never be sciences at all. There can never be an
exact science dealing with individual life. L'anatomia presuppone il
cadavere: anatomy presupposes a corpse, says D'Annunzio. You can
establish an exact science on a corpse, supposing you start with the
corpse, and don't try to derive it from a living creature. But upon life
itself, or any instance of life, you cannot establish a science.Because even science must start from definition, or from precise
description. And you can never define or precisely describe any living
creature. Iron must remain iron, or cease to exist. But a rabbit might
evolve into something which is still rabbit, and yet different from that
which a rabbit now is. So how can you define or precisely describe a
rabbit? There is always the unstable CREATIVE element present in life,
and this science can never tackle. Science is cause-and-effect.Before we can begin any of the so-called humane sciences we must take on
trust a purely unscientific fact: namely, that every living creature has
an individual soul, however trivial or rudimentary, which connects it
individually with the source of all life, as man, in the religious
terminology, is connected with God, and inseparable from God. So is
every creature, even an ant or a louse, individually in contact with the
great life-urge which we call God. To call this connection the
will-to-live is not quite sufficient. It is more than a will-to-persist.
It is a will-to-live in the further sense, a will-to-change, a
will-to-evolve, a will towards further creation of the self. The urge
towards evolution if you like. But it is more than evolution. There is
no simple cause-and-effect sequence. The change from caterpillar to
butterfly is not cause and effect. It is a new gesture in creation.
Science can wriggle as hard as it likes, but the change from caterpillar
to butterfly is utterly unscientific, illogical, and UNNATURAL, if we
take science's definition of nature. It is an answer to the strange
creative urge, the God-whisper, which is the one and only everlasting
motive for everything.So then man. He is said to be a creature of cause-and-effect, or a
creature of free-will. The two are the same. Free-will means acting
according to reasoned choice, which is a purest instance of
cause-and-effect. Logic is the quintessence of cause-and-effect. And
idealism, the ruling of life by the instrumentality of the idea, is
precisely the mechanical, even automatic cause-and-effect process. The
idea, or ideal, becomes a fixed principle, and life, like any other
force, is driven into mechanical repetition of given motions - millions
of times over and over again - according to the fixed ideals. So, the
Christian-democratic world prescribes certain motions, and men proceed
to repeat these motions, till they conceive that there ARE no other
motions but these. And that is pure automatism. When scientists describe
savages, or ancient Egyptians, or Aztecs, they assume that these far-off
peoples acted, but in a crude, clumsy way, from the same motives which
move us. &quot;Too much ego in his cosmos.&quot; Men have had strange,
inconceivable motives and impulses, which were just as &quot;right&quot; as ours
are. And our &quot;right&quot; motives will cease to activate, even as the lost
motives of the Assyrians have ceased. Our &quot;right&quot; and our righteousness
will go pop, and there will be another sort of right and righteousness.The mob, then. Now, the vast bulk of mankind has always been, and always
will be, helpless. By which we mean, helpless to interpret the new
prompting of the God-urge. The highest function of MIND is its function
of messenger. The curious throbs and pulses of the God-urge in man would
go on forever ignored, if it were not for some few exquisitely sensitive
and fearless souls who struggle with all their might to make that
strange translation of the low, dark throbbing into open act or speech.
Like a wireless message the new suggestion enters the soul, throb-throb,
throb-throb-throb. And it beats and beats for years, before the mind,
frightened of this new knocking in the dark, can be brought to listen
and attend.For the mind is busy in a house of its own, which house it calls the
universe. And how can there be anything outside the universe?There is though. There is always something outside our universe. And it
is always at the doors of the innermost, sentient soul. And there
throb-throb, throb-throb-throb, throb-throb. It is like the almost
inaudible beating of a wireless machine. Nine hundred and ninety-nine
men out of a thousand hear nothing at all. Absolutely nothing. They
racket away in their nice, complete, homely universe, running their
trains and making their wars and saving the world for democracy. They
hear not a thing. A tiny minority of sensitive souls feel the throb, and
are frightened, and cry for more virtue, more goodness, more
righteousness a la mode. But all the righteousness and goodness in all
the world won't answer the throb, or interpret the faint but painful
thresh of the message.There is no Morse-code. There never will be. Every new code supersedes
the current code. Nowadays, when we feel the throb, vaguely, we cry:
&quot;More love, more peace, more charity, more freedom, more
self-sacrifice.&quot; Which makes matters all the worse, because the new
throb interpreted mechanically according to the old code breeds madness
and insanity. It may be that there is an insufficient activity of the
thyroid glands, or the adrenalin cortex isn't making its secretions, or
the pituitary or the pineal body is not working adequately. But this is
result, not cause, of our neurasthenia and complexes. The neurasthenia
comes from the inattention to the suggestion, or from a false
interpretation. The best souls in the world make some of the worst
interpretations - like President Wilson - and this is the bitterest
tragedy of righteousness. The heroic effort to carry out the old
righteousness becomes at last sheer wrongeousness. Men in the past have
chosen to be martyred for an unborn truth. But life itself inflicts
something worse than martyrdom on them if they will persist too long in
the old truth.Alas, there is no Morse-code for interpreting the new life-prompting,
the new God-urge. And there never will be. It needs a new term of speech
invented each time. A whole new concept of the universe gradually born,
shedding the old concept.Well now. There is the dark god knocking afresh at the door. The vast
mass hear nothing, but say: &quot;We know all about the universe. Our job is
to make a real smart place of it.&quot; So they make more aeroplanes and
old-age-pensions and are furious when Kaiser William interrupts them.
The more sensitive hear something, feel a new urge and are uneasy. Then
cry: &quot;We are not pure in heart. We are too selfish. Let us educate the
poor. Let us remove the slums. Let us save the children. Let us spend
all we have on the noble work of education.&quot; So they spend a bit more
than before, but by no means all they have, with the result that now
everybody reads the newspapers and discusses world-politics and feels
himself most one-sidedly a bit of the great Godhead of the sacred
People.And still the knocking goes on, on, on, till some soul that dares as
well as can, listens, and struggles to interpret. Every new word is
anathema - bound to be. Jargon, rant, mystical tosh and so on. Evil, and
anti-civilisation. Naturally. For the machine of the human psyche, once
wound up to a certain ideal, doesn't want to stop.And still, all the time, even in the vulgar uneducated - perhaps more in
them than in the hearty money-makers of the lower
middle-classes - throb-throb-throb goes the god-urge deep in their souls,
driving them almost mad. They are quite stone-deaf to any new meaning.
They would jeer an attempt at a new interpretation, jeer it to death. So
there they are, between the rocky Scylla of the fixed, established
ideal, and the whirling Charybdis of the conservative opposition to this
ideal. Between these two perils they must pass. For behind them drives
the unknown current of the God-urge, on, on through the straits.They will never get through the straits. They do not know that there IS
any getting through. Scylla must beat Charybdis, and Charybdis must beat
Scylla. So the monster of humanity with a Scylla of an ideal of equality
for the head, and a Charybdis of industrialism and possessive
conservatism for the tail, howls with frenzy, and lashes the straits
till every boat goes down, that tries to make a passage.Well, Scylla must have it out with Charybdis, that's all, and we must
wait outside the straits till the storm is over.It won't be over yet, though.Now this is the state of the mass. It is driven, goaded mad at length by
the pricking of the God-urge which it will not, cannot attend to or
interpret. It is so goaded that it is mad with its own wrongs. It is
wronged, so wronged that it is mad.And what is the wrong, pray? The mass doesn't know. There is no
connection at all between the burning, throbbing unconscious soul and
the clear-as-daylight conscious mind. The whole of Labour, to-day, sees
the situation clear as daylight. So does the whole of Capital. And yet
the whole of the daylight situation has really nothing to do with it. It
is the God-urge which drives them mad, the unacknowledged, unadmitted,
non-existent God-urge.They may become a mob. A mob is like a mass of bullocks driven to frenzy
by some bott fly, and charging frantically against the tents of some
herdsman, imagining that all the evil comes out of these tents. There is
a gulf between the quivering hurt in the unconscious soul, and the
round, flat world of the visible existence. A sense of weakness and
injury, at last an intolerable sense of wrong, turning to a fiendish
madness. A mad necessity to wreck something, cost what it may. For only
the flat, round, visible world exists.And yet it is the bott fly of the Holy Ghost, unlistened to, that is the
real cause of everything.But the mob has no direction even in its destructive lust. The vengeful
masses HAVE direction. And it is no good trying to reason with them. The
mass does not act by reason. A mass is not even formed by reason. The
more intense or extended the COLLECTIVE consciousness, the more does the
truly reasonable, individual consciousness sink into abeyance.The herd instinct, for example, is of many sorts. It has two main
divisions, the fear-instinct, and the aggressive instinct. But the
vengeance instinct is not part of the herd instinct.But consider the mode of communication of herd instinct. The
communication between the individuals in a herd is not through the MIND.
It is not through anything said or known. It is sub-mental. It is
telepathic.Why does a flock of birds rise suddenly from the tree-tops, all at once,
in one spring, and swirl round in one cloud towards the water? There was
no visible sign or communication given. It was a telepathic
communication. They sat and waited, and waited, and let the individual
mind merge into a kind of collective trance. Then click! - the unison was
complete, the knowledge or suggestion was one suggestion all through,
the action was one action.This so-called telepathy is the clue to all herd instinct. It is not
instinct. It is a vertebral-telegraphy, like radio-telegraphy. It is a
complex interplay of vibrations from the big nerve centres of the
vertebral system in all the individuals of the flock, till,
click! - there is a unanimity. They have one mind. And this
one-mindedness of the many-in-one will last while ever the peculiar
pitch of vertebral nerve-vibrations continues unbroken through them all.
As the vibration slacks off, the flock falls apart.This vertebral telepathy is the true means of communication between
animals. It is perhaps most highly developed where the brain, the mental
consciousness, is smallest. Indeed the two forms of consciousness,
mental and vertebral, are mutually exclusive. The highest form of
vertebral telepathy seems to exist in the great sperm whales.
Communication between these herds of roving monsters is of marvellous
rapidity and perfection. They are lounging, feeding lazily,
individually, in mid-ocean, with no cohesion. Suddenly, a quick
thought-wave from the leader-bull, and as quick as answering thoughts
the cows and young bulls are ranged, the herd is taking its direction
with a precision little short of miraculous. Perhaps water acts as a
most perfect transmitter of vertebral telepathy.This is the famous wisdom of the serpent, this vertebral consciousness
and telepathy. This is what makes the magic of a leader like
Napoleon - his powers of sending out intense vibrations, messages to his
men, without the exact intermediation of mental correspondence. It is
not brain-power. In fact, it is, in some ways, the very REVERSE of
brain-power: it might be called the acme of stupidity. It is the
stupendous wits of brainless intelligence. A marvellous reversion to the
pre-mental form of consciousness.This pre-mental form of consciousness seems most perfect in the great
whales: more even in them than in the flocks of migrating birds. After
the whales, the herds of wolves and deer and buffaloes. But it is most
ABSOLUTE in the cold fishes and serpents, reptiles. The fishes have no
other correspondence save this cold, vertebral vibration. And this is,
as it were blind. The fish is absolutely stone-wall limited in its
consciousness, to itself. It knows none other. Stony, abstract, cold,
alone, the fish has still the power of radio-communication. It is a form
of telepathy, like a radium-effluence, vibrating fear principally. Fear
is the first of the actuating gods.Then come the reptiles. They have sex, and dimly, darkly discern the
bulk of the answerer. They are drawn to contact. It is the new motive.
The fishes are never drawn to contact. Only food and fear. So in the
reptiles the second telepathic vibration, the sympathetic, is set up.
The primary consciousness is cold, the wisdom is isolated, cold,
moon-like, knowing none other: the self alone in knowledge, utterly
subtle. But then sex comes upon them, and the isolation is broken.
Another flow sets up. They must seek the answerer. It is love.So, telepathy, communication in the vertebrates. Ants and bees too have
a one-conscious vibration. Even they have perfect ganglia-communication.
But it is enough to consider the vertebrates.In the sperm whale, intense is the passion of amorous love, intense is
the cold exultance in power, isolate kingship. With the most intense
enveloping vibration of possessive and protective love, the great bull
encloses his herd into a oneness. And with the intensest vibration of
power he keeps it subdued in awe in fear. These are the two great
telepathic vibrations which rule all the vertebrates, man as well as
beast. Man, whether in a savage tribe or in a complex modern society, is
held in unison by these two great vibrations emitted unconsciously from
the leader, the leaders, the governing classes, the authorities. First,
the great influence of shadow of power, causing trust, fear and
obedience: second, the great influence of protective love, causing
productivity and the sense of safety. Those two powerful influences are
emitted by men like Gladstone or Abraham Lincoln, against their
knowledge, but none the less emitted. Only Gladstone and Lincoln justify
themselves in speech. And both insist on the single influence of love,
and denounce the influence of fear.A mob occurs when men turn upon ALL leadership. For true, living
activity the mental and the vertebral consciousness should be in
harmony. In Caesar and Napoleon the vertebral influence of power
prevailed - and there was a break of balance, and a fall. In Lincoln and
President Wilson the vertebral influence of love got out of balance, and
there was a fall. There was no balance between the two modes of
influence: the mind ran on, as it were, without a brake, towards
absurdity. So it ran to absurdity in Napoleon.Break the balance of the two great controlling influences, and you get,
not a simple preponderance of the one influence, but a third state, the
mob-state. This is the state when the society, tribe or herd degenerates
into a mob. In man, the mind runs on with a sort of terrible automatism,
which has no true connection with the VERTEBRAL consciousness. The
vertebral inter-communication gradually gathers force, apart from all
mental expression. Its vibration steadily increases till there comes a
sudden click! And then you have the strange phenomenon of revolution,
like the Russian and the French revolutions. It is a great disruptive
outburst. It is a great eruption against the classes in authority. And
it is, finally, a passionate, mindless vengeance taken by the
collective, vertebral psyche upon the authority of orthodox MIND. In the
Russian revolution it was the EDUCATED classes that were the enemy
really: the deepest inspiration the hatred of the conscious classes. But
revolution is not a mob-movement. Revolution has direction, and
leadership, however temporary. There is point to its destructive frenzy.In the end, it is a question with us to-day whether the masses will
degenerate into mobs, or whether they will still keep a spark of
direction. All great mass uprisings are really acts of vengeance against
the dominant consciousness of the day. It is the dynamic, vertebral
consciousness in man bursting up and smashing through the fixed,
superimposed mental consciousness of mankind, which mental consciousness
has degenerated and become automatic.The masses are always, strictly, non-mental. Their consciousness is
preponderantly vertebral. And from time to time, as some great life-idea
cools down and sets upon them like a cold crust of lava, the vertebral
powers will work below the crust, apart from the mental consciousness,
till they have come to such a heat of unison and unanimity, such a pitch
of vibration that men are reduced to a great, non-mental oneness as in
the hot-blooded whales, and then, like whales which suddenly charge upon
the ship which tortures them, so they burst upon the vessel of
civilization. Or like whales that burst up through the ice that
suffocates them, so they will burst up through the fixed consciousness,
the congealed idea which they can now only blindly react against. At the
right moment, a certain cry, like a war-cry, a catchword, suddenly
sounds, and the movement begins.The purest lesson our era has taught is that man, at his highest, is an
individual, single, isolate, alone, in direct soul-communication with
the unknown God, which prompts within him.This lesson, however, puts us in danger of conceit, especially spiritual
conceit.In his supreme being, man is alone, isolate, nakedly himself, in contact
only with the unknown God.This is our way of expressing Nirvana.But just as a tree is only perfect in blossom because it has groping
roots, so is man only perfected in his individual being by his groping,
pulsing unison with mankind. The unknown God is within, at the quick.
But this quick must send down roots into the great flesh of mankind.In short, the 'spirit' has got a lesson to learn: the lesson of its own
limitation. This is for the individual. And the infinite, which is Man
writ large, or Humanity, has a still bitterer lesson to learn. It is the
individual alone who can save humanity alive. But the greatest of great
individuals must have deep, throbbing roots down in the dark red soil of
the living flesh of humanity. Which is the bitter pill which Buddhists
and all advocates of pure &quot;Spirit&quot; must swallow.In short, man, even the greatest man, does not live only by his spirit
and his pure contact with the Godhead - for example, Nirvana. Blessed are
the pure in heart, Blessed are the poor in spirit. He is FORCED to live
in vivid RAPPORT with the mass of men. If he denies this, he cuts his
roots. He intermingles as the roots of a tree interpenetrate the fat,
rock-ribbed earth.How? In this same vertebral correspondence. The mystic may stare at his
own navel and try to abstract himself for ever towards Nirvana: it is
half at least illusion. There is all the time a powerful, unconscious
interplay going on between the vertebral centres of consciousness in all
men, a deep, mindless current flashing and quivering through the family,
the community, the nation, the continent, and even the world. No man can
REALLY isolate himself. And this vertebral interplay is the root of our
living: must always be so.And this vertebral interplay is subject to the laws of polarity, since
it is an intercommunion of active, polarised conscience-force. There is
a dual polarity, and a dual direction. There is the outward, or downward
pulse, in the great motion of sympathy or love, the love that goes out
to the weaker, to the poor, to the humble. The vast, prostrate mass now
becomes the positive pole of attraction: woman, the working classes.The whole of the great current of vertebral consciousness in mankind is
supposed, now, to run in this direction. But the whole movement is but a
polarised circuit. Insist on one direction overmuch, derange the
circuit, and you have a terrible debacle. Which brings us to another
aspect of relativity: relativity in dynamic living.When the flow is sympathetic, or love, then the weak, the woman, the
masses, assume the positivity. But the balance even is only kept by
stern AUTHORITY, the unflinching obstinacy of the return-force, of
power.When the flow is power, might, majesty, glory, then it is a culminating
flow towards one individual, through circles of aristocracy towards one
grand centre. Emperor, Pope, Tyrant, King: whatever may be. It is the
grand obeisance before a master.In the balance of these two flows lies the secret of human stability. In
the absolute triumph of either flow lies the immediate surety of
collapse.We have gone very far in the first direction. Democracy has ALMOST
triumphed. The only real master left is the boss in industry. And he is
to be dethroned. Labour is to wear the absolute crown of the everyday
hat. Even the top hat is doomed. Labour shall be its own boss, and
possess its own means and ends. The serpent shall swallow itself in a
last gulp.Mastership is based on possessions. To kill mastership you must have
communal ownership. Then have it, for this superiority based on
possession of money is worse than any of the pretensions of Labour or
Bolshevism, strictly. Let the serpent swallow itself. Then we can have a
new snake.The moment Labour takes upon itself to be its own boss, the whole show
is up, the end has begun. While ever the existing boss succeeds in
hanging on to his money-capital, we get the present conditions of
nullity and nagging. We're between the devil and a deep sea.What Richard wanted was some sort of a new show: a new recognition of
the life-mystery, a departure from the dreariness of money-making,
money-having, and money-spending. It meant a new recognition of
difference, of highness and of lowness, of one man meet for service and
another man clean with glory, having majesty in himself, the innate
majesty of the purest INDIVIDUAL, not the strongest instrument, like
Napoleon. Not the tuppeny trick-majesty of Kaisers. But the true majesty
of the single soul which has all its own weaknesses, but its strength in
spite of them, its own lovableness, as well as its might and dread. The
single soul that stands naked between the dark God and the dark-blooded
masses of men. &quot;Now, Kangaroo,&quot; said Richard, &quot;is in a false position.
He wants to save property for the property owners, and he wants to save
Labour from itself and from the capitalist and the politician and all.
In fact, he wants to save everything as we have it, and it can't be
done. You can't eat your cake and have it, and I prefer Willie
Struthers. Bolshevism is at least not sentimental. It's a last step
towards an end, a hopeless end. But better disaster than an equivocal
nothingness, like the present. Kangaroo wants to be God Himself, and
save everybody, which is just irritating, at last. Kangaroo as God
Himself, with a kind of marsupial belly, is worse than Struthers'
absolute of the People. Though it's a choice of evils, and I choose
neither. I choose the Lord Almighty.&quot;Having made up his mind so far, Richard came up to the big mass meeting
of Labour in the great Canberra Hall, in Sydney. The Labour leaders had
lost much ground. Labour was slipping into disorganization: the
property-owning Conservatives and Liberals were just beginning to
rejoice again. The reduction of the basic wage had been brought about, a
further reduction was announced. At the same time the Government was
aiming a strong blow at the Unions. It had pronounced the right of every
man to work as he himself chose, and the right of employers to agree
with non-union workers as to rate of wages. It had further announced its
determination to protect the non-union worker, by holding the union
responsible for any attacks on non-union men. The leaders of a union
were to be arrested and held responsible for attacks on non-workers. In
case of bloodshed and death, they were to be tried for manslaughter or
for murder. The first to be arrested should be the chief of the union
concerned. After him, his immediate subordinates.Now the sword was drawn, and Labour was up in arms. Meetings were held
every day. A special meeting was announced at Canberra Hall, admission
by ticket. Somers had asked Jaz if he could get him a ticket, and Jaz
had succeeded. There were two meetings: one, a small gathering for
discussion, at half-past eight in the morning; the other, the mass
meeting, at seven at night.Richard got up in the dark, to catch the six o'clock train to Sydney. It
was a dark, cloudy morning - night still - and a few frogs still were
rattling away in a hollow towards the sea, like a weird little factory
of machines whirring and trilling and screeching in the dark. At the
station some miners were filling their tin bottles at the water-tap:
pale and extinguished-looking men.Dawn began to break over the sea, in a bluey-green rift between clouds.
There seemed to be rain. The journey was endless.In Sydney it was raining, but Richard did not notice. He hurried to the
hall to the meeting. It lasted only half an hour, but it was
straightforward and sensible. When Richard heard the men among
themselves, he realised how LOGICAL their position was, in pure
philosophy.He came out with Jaz, whom he had not seen for a long time. Jaz looked
rather pale, and he was very silent, brooding.&quot;Your sympathy is with Labour, Jaz?&quot;&quot;My sympathy is with various people, Mr. Somers,&quot; replied Jaz,
non-communicative.It was no use talking to him: he was too much immersed.The morning was very rainy, and Sydney, big city as it is, a real
metropolis in Pitt Street and George Street, seemed again like a
settlement in the wilderness, without any core. One of the great cities
of the world. But without a core: unless, perhaps, Canberra Hall were
its real centre. Everybody very friendly and nice. The friendliest
country in the world: in some ways, the gentlest. But without a core.
There was no heart in it all, it seemed hollow.With mid-day came the sun and the clear sky: a wonderful clear sky and a
hot, hot sun. Richard bought sandwiches and a piece of apple turnover,
and went into the Palace Gardens to eat them, so that he need not sit in
a restaurant. He loathed the promiscuity and publicity of even the good
restaurants. The promiscuous feeding gave him a feeling of disgust. So
he walked down the beautiful slope to the water again, and sat on a seat
by himself, near a clump of strange palm-trees that made a weird noise
in the breeze. The water was blue and dancing: and again he felt as if
the harbour were wild, lost and undiscovered, as it was in Captain
Cook's time. The city wasn't real.In front in the small blue bay lay two little war-ships, pale grey, with
the white flag having the Union Jack in one corner floating behind. And
one boat had the Australian flag, with the five stars on a red field.
They lay quite still, and seemed as lost as everything else, rusting
into the water. Nothing seemed to keep its positive reality, this
morning in the strong sun after the rain. The two ships were like bits
of palpable memory, that persisted, but were only memory images.Two tiny birds, one brown, one with a sky-blue patch on his head, like a
dab of sky, fluttered and strutted, hoisting their long tails at an
absurd angle. They were real: the absurd, sharp, unafraid creatures.
They seemed to have no deep natural fear, as creatures in Europe have.
Again and again Somers had felt this in Australia: the creatures had no
sense of fear as in Europe. There was no animal fear in the air, as
there is so deeply in India. Only sometimes a grey metaphysical dread.&quot;Perhaps,&quot; thought he to himself, &quot;this is really the country where men
might live in a sort of harmless Eden, once they have settled the old
Adam in themselves.&quot;He wandered the hot streets, walked round the circular quay and saw the
women going to the ferries. So many women, ALMOST elegant. Yet their
elegance provincial, without pride, awful. So many ALMOST beautiful
women. When they were in repose, quite beautiful, with pure, wistful
faces, and some nobility of expression. Then, see them change
countenance, and it seemed almost always a grimace of ugliness. Hear
them speak, and it was startling, so ugly. Once in motion they were not
beautiful. Still, when their features were immobile, they were lovely.Richard had noticed this in many cases. And they were like the birds,
quite without fear, impudent, perky, with a strange spasmodic
self-satisfaction. Almost every one of the younger women walked as if
she thought she was sexually trailing every man in the street after her.
And that was absurd, too, because the men seemed more often than not to
hurry away and leave a blank space between them and these women. But it
made no matter: like mad-women the females, in their quasi-elegance,
pranced with that prance of crazy triumph in their own sexual powers
which left little Richard flabbergasted.Hot, big, free-and-easy streets of Sydney: without any sense of an
imposition of CONTROL. No control, everybody going his own ways with
alert harmlessness. On the pavement the foot-passengers walked in two
divided streams, keeping to the left, and by their unanimity made it
impossible for you to wander and look at the shops, if the shops
happened to be on your right. The stream of foot passengers flowed over
you.And so it was: far more regulated than London, yet all with a curious
exhilaration of voluntariness that oppressed Richard like a madness. No
control, and no opposition to control. Policemen were cyphers, not
noticeable. Every man his own policeman. The terrible lift of the
HARMLESS crowd. The strange relief from all superimposed control. One
feels the police, for example, in London, and their civic majesty of
authority. But in Sydney no majesty of authority at all. Absolute
freedom from all that. Great freedom in the air. Yet, if you got into
the wrong stream on the pavement you felt they'd tread you down, almost
unseeing. You just MUSTN'T get in the wrong stream - Liberty!Yes - the strange unanimity of HARMLESSNESS in the crowd had a half
paralysing effect on Richard. &quot;Can it be?&quot; he said to himself, as he
drifted in the strong sun-warmth of the world after rain, in the
afternoon of this strange, antipodal city. &quot;Can it be that there is any
harm in these people at all?&quot;They were quick, and their manners were, in a free way, natural and
kindly. They might say Right-O, Right you are! - they did say it, even in
the most handsome and palatial banks and shipping offices. But they were
patient and unaffected in their response. That Was the beauty of the
men: their absolute lack of affectation, their naive simplicity, which
was at the same time sensitive and gentle. The gentlest country in the
world. Really, a high pitch of breeding. Good-breeding at a very high
pitch - innate, and in its shirt sleeves.A strange country. A wonderful country. Who knows what future it may
have? Can a great continent breed a people of this magic harmlessness
without becoming a sacrifice of some other, external power? The land
that invites parasites now - where parasites breed like nightmares - what
would happen if the power-lust came that way?Richard bought himself a big, knobbly, green, soft-crusted apple, at a
Chinese shop, and a pretty mother-of-pearl spoon to eat it with. The
queer Chinese, with their gabbling-gobbling way of speaking - were they
parasites too? A strange, strange world. He took himself off to the
gardens to eat his custard apple - a pudding inside a knobbly green
skin - and to relax into the magic ease of the afternoon. The warm sun,
the big, blue harbour with its hidden bays, the palm trees, the ferry
steamers sliding flatly, the perky birds, the inevitable shabby-looking,
loafing sort of men strolling across the green slopes, past the red
poinsettia bush, under the big flame-tree, under the blue, blue
sky - Australian Sydney, with a magic like sleep; like sweet, soft
sleep - a vast, endless, sun-hot, afternoon sleep with the world a
mirage. He could taste it all in the soft, sweet, creamy custard apple.
A wonderful sweet place to drift in. But surely a place that will some
day wake terribly from this sleep.Yet why should it? Why should it not drift marvellously for ever, with
its sun and its marsupials?The meeting in the evening, none the less, was a wild one. And Richard
could not believe there was any REAL vindictiveness. He couldn't believe
that anybody REALLY hated anybody. There was a touch of sardonic
tolerance in it all. Oh, that sardonic tolerance! And at the same time
that overwhelming obstinacy and power of endurance. The strange,
Australian power of enduring - enduring suffering or opposition or
difficulty - just blank enduring. In the long run, just endure.Richard sat next to Jaz. Jaz was very still, very still indeed, seated
with his hands in his lap.&quot;Will there be many diggers here?&quot; Lovat asked.&quot;Oh, yes. There's quite a crowd over there, with Jack.&quot;And Richard looked quickly, and saw Jack. He knew Jack had seen him. But
now he was looking the other way. And again, Richard felt afraid of
something.It was a packed hall, tense. There was plenty of noise and interruption,
plenty of homethrusts at the speakers from the audience. But still, that
sense of sardonic tolerance, endurance. &quot;What's the odds, boys?&quot;Willie Struthers gave the main speech: on the solidarity of Labour. He
sketched the industrial situation, and elaborated the charge that Labour
was cutting its own throat by wrecking industry and commerce.&quot;But will anything get us away from this fact, mates,&quot; he said: &quot;that
there's never a shop shuts down because it can't pay the weekly
wage-bill. If a shop shuts down, it is because it can't pay a high
enough DIVIDEND, and there you've got it.&quot;Australian Labour has set out from the first on the principle that huge
fortunes should not be made out of its efforts. We have had the obvious
example of America before us, and we have been determined from the start
that Australia should not fall into the hands of a small number of
millionaires and a larger number of semi-millionaires. It has been our
idea that a just proportion of all profits should circulate among the
workers in the form of wages. Supposing the worker DOES get his pound a
day. It is enormous, isn't it! It is preposterous. Of course it is. But
it isn't preposterous for a small bunch of owners or shareholders to get
their ten pounds a day, FOR DOING NOTHING. Sundays included. That isn't
preposterous, is it?&quot;They raise the plea that their fathers and their forefathers
accumulated the capital by their labours. Well, haven't OUR fathers and
forefathers laboured? Haven't they? And what have they accumulated? The
right to labour on, and be paid for it what the others like to give 'em.&quot;We don't want to wreck industry. But, we say, wages shall go up so that
profits shall go down. Why should there be any profits, after all?
Forefathers! Why, we've all had forefathers, and I'm sure mine worked.
Why should there be any profits AT ALL, I should like to know. And if
profits there MUST be, well then, the profit grabber isn't going to get
ten times as mush as the wage-earner, just because he had a few screwing
forefathers. We, who work for what we get, are going to see that the man
who doesn't work shall not receive a large income for not working. If
he's GOT to have an income for doing nothing, let him have no more than
what we call wages. The labourer is worthy of his hire, and the hire is
worthy of his labourer. But I can NOT see that any man is worthy of an
unearned income. Let there be no unearned incomes. So much for the basic
wage. We know it is not the basic wage that wrecks industry. It's big
profits. When the profits are not forthcoming the directors would rather
close down. A criminal proceeding. Because, after all, any big works is
run, first, to supply the community with goods, and second, to give a
certain proportion of the community a satisfactory occupation. Whatever
net profits are made are made by cheating the worker and the consumer,
filching a bit from every one of them, no matter how small a bit. And we
will not see wages reduced one ha'penny, to help to fill the pockets of
shareholders - .&quot;&quot;What about your own shares in Nestles Milk, Willie?&quot; asked a voice.&quot;I'll throw them in the fire the minute they're out of date,&quot; said
Willie, promptly, &quot;they're pretty well wastepaper already.&quot;He went on to answer the charges of corruption and Tammany, with which
the Labour Party in Australia had been accused. This led to the point of
class hatred.&quot;It is we who are supposed to foster class hatred,&quot; he said. &quot;Now I put
it to you. Does the so-called upper class hate us, or do we hate them
more? If you'll let me answer, I tell you it's they who do the hating.
We don't wear the flesh off our bones hating them. They aren't worth it.
They're far beneath hatred.&quot;We do want one class only - not your various shades of upper and lower.
We want The People - and The People means the worker. I don't mind what a
man works at. He can be a doctor or a lawyer even, if men are such fools
they must have doctors and lawyers. But look here, mates, what do we all
work FOR? For a living? Then why won't a working-man's living wage do
for a lawyer? Why not? Perhaps a lawyer makes an ideal of his job.
Perhaps he is inspired in his efforts to right the wrongs of his client.
Very well: virtue is its own reward. If he wants to be paid for it, it
isn't virtue any more. It's dirty trading in justice, or whatever law
means.&quot;Look at your upper classes, mates. Look at your lawyer charging you two
guineas for half an hour's work. Look at your doctor scrambling for his
guinea a visit. Look at your experts with their five thousand a year.
Call these UPPER classes? Upper in what? In the make-and-grab faculties,
that's all.&quot;To hell with their 'upper'. If a working man thinks he'll be in the
running, and demand say half of what these gentry get, then he's the
assassin of his trade and country. It's his business to grovel before
these 'upper' gents, is it?&quot;No, mates, it's his business to rise up and give 'em a good kick in the
seats of their pants, to remind them of their bedrock bottoms. You'd
think, to hear all the fairy tales they let off, that their pants didn't
have such a region as seats. Like the blooming little angels, all
fluttery tops and no bottoms. Don't you be sucked in any more, mates.
Look at 'em, and you'll see they've got good, heavy-weight sit-upons,
and big, deep trouser-pockets next door. That's them. Up-end 'em for
once, and look at 'em upside down. Greedy fat-arses, mates, if you'll
pardon the vulgarity for once. Greedy fat-arses.&quot;And that's what we've got to knuckle under to, is it? They're the upper
classes? Them and a few derelict lords and cuttle-fish capitalists.
Upper classes? I'm damned if I see much upper about it, mates. Drop 'em
in the sea and they'll float butt-end uppermost, you see if they don't.
For that's where they keep their fat, like the camel his hump. Upper
classes!&quot;But I wish them no special harm. A bit of a kick in the rear, to remind
them that they've got a rear, a largely kickable rear. And then, let
them pick themselves up and mingle with the rest. Give them a living
wage, like any other working man. But it's hell on earth to see them
floating their fat bottoms through the upper regions, and just stooping
low enough to lick the cream off things, as it were, and to squeal if a
working man asks for more than a gill of the skilly.&quot;Work? What is one man's job more than another? Your Andrew Carnegies
and your Rothschilds may be very smart at their jobs. All right - give
'em the maximum wage. Give 'em a pound a day. They won't starve on it.
And what do they want with more? A job is nothing but a job, when all's
said and done. And if Mr. Hebrew Rothschild is smart on the finance job,
so am I a smart sheep-shearer, hold my own with any man. And what's the
odds? Wherein is Mr. Hebrew, or Lord Benjamin Israelite any better man
than I am? Why does he want so damned much for his dirty financing, and
begrudges me my bit for shearing ten score o' sheep?&quot;No, mates, we're not sucked in. It may be Mr. Steel-trust Carnegie, it
may even be Mr. Very-clever Marconi, it may be Marquis Tribes von
Israel; and it certainly IS Willie Struthers. Now, mates, I, Willie
Struthers, a big fortune I DO NOT WANT. But I'm damned if I am going to
let a few other brainy vampires suck big fortunes out of me. Not I. I
wouldn't be a man if I did. Upper Classes? They've got more greedy
brains in the seats of their pants than in their top storeys.&quot;We're having no more of their classes and masses. We'll just put a hook
in their trouser-bottoms and hook 'em gently to earth. That's all. And
put 'em on a basic wage like all the rest: one job, one wage. Isn't that
fair? No man can do more than his best. And why should one poor devil
get ten bob for his level best, and another fat-arse get ten thousand
for some blooming trick? No, no, if a man's a sincere citizen he does
his BEST for the community he belongs to. And his simple wage is enough
for him to live on.&quot;That's why we'll have a Soviet. Water finds its own level, and so shall
money. It shall not be dammed up by a few sly fat-arses much longer. I
don't pretend it will be paradise. But there'll be fewer lies about it,
and less fat-arsed hypocrisy, and less dirty injustice than there is
now. If a man works, he shall not have less than the basic wage, be he
even a lying lawyer. There shall be no politicians, thank God. But more
than the basic wage also he shall not have. Let us bring things down to
a rock-bottom.&quot;Upper? Why all their uppishness amounts to is extra special greedy
guts, ten-thousand-a-year minimum. Upper classes! Upper classes! Upper
arses.&quot;We'll have a Soviet, mates, and then we shall feel better about it.
We'll be getting nasty tempered if we put it off much longer. Let's know
our own mind. We'll unite with the World's Workers. Which doesn't mean
we'll take the hearts out of our chests to give it Brother Brown to eat.
No, Brother Brown and Brother Yellow had, on the whole, best stop at
home and sweep their own streets, rather than come and sweep ours. But
that doesn't mean we can't come to more or less of an understanding with
them. We don't want to get too much mixed up with them or anybody. But a
proper understanding we can have. I don't say, Open the gates of
Australia to all the waiting workers of India and China, let alone
Japan. But, mates, you can be quite friendly with your neighbour over
the fence without giving him the run of your house. And that is
International Labour. You have a genuine understanding with your
neighbours down the street. You know they won't shy stones through your
windows or break into your house at night or kill your children in a
dark corner. Why not? Because they're your neighbours and you all have a
certain amount of trust in one another. And that is International
Labour. That is the World's Workers.&quot;After all, mates, the biggest part of our waking lives belongs to our
work. And certainly the biggest part of our importance is our importance
as workers. Mates, we are, and we are bound to be, workers first and
foremost. So were our fathers before us, so will our children be after
us. Workers first. And as workers, mates. On this everything else
depends. On our being workers depends our being husbands and fathers and
playmates: nay, our being men. If we are not workers we are not even
men, for we can't exist.&quot;Workers we are, mates, workers we must be, and workers we will be, and
there's the end of it. We take our stand on it. Workers first, and
whatever soul we have, it must go first into our work. Workers, mates,
we are workers. A man is a man because he works. He must work and he
does work. Call it a curse, call it a blessing, call it what you like.
But the Garden of Eden is gone for ever, and while the ages roll, we
must work.&quot;Let us take our stand on that fact, mates, and trim our lives
accordingly. While time lasts, whatever ages come or go, we must work,
day in, day out, year in, year out, so for ever. Then, mates, let us
abide by it. Let us abide by it, and shape things to fit. No use
shuffling, mates. Though you or I may make a little fortune, enough for
the moment to keep us in idleness, yet, mates, as sure as ever the sun
rises, as long as ever time lasts, the children of men must rise up to
their daily toil.&quot;Is it a curse? - is it a blessing? I prefer to think it is a blessing,
so long as, like everything else, it is in just proportion. My happiest
days have been shearing sheep, or away in the gold mines - .&quot;&quot;What, not talking on a platform?&quot; asked a voice.&quot;No, not talking on a platform. Working along with my mates, in the
bush, in the mines, wherever it was. That's where I put my manhood into
my work. There I had my mates - my fellow-workers. I've had playmates as
well. Wife, children, friends - playmates all of them. My fellow-workers
were my mates.&quot;So, since workers we are and shall be, till the end of time, let us
shape the world accordingly. The world is shaped now for the idlers and
the play-babies, and we work to keep THAT going. No, no, mates, it won't
do.&quot;Join hands with the workers of the world: just a fist-grip, as a token
and a pledge. Take nobody to your bosom - a worker hasn't got a bosom.
He's got a fist, to work with, to hit with, and lastly, to give the
tight grip of fellowship to his fellow-workers and fellow-mates, no
matter what colour or country he belongs to. The World's Workers - and
since they ARE the world, let them take their own, and not leave it all
to a set of silly playboys and Hebrews who are not only silly but worse.
The World's Workers - we, who are the world's millions, the world is our
world. Let it be so, then. And let us so arrange it.&quot;What's the scare about being mixed up with Brother Brown and Chinky and
all the rest: the Indians in India, the niggers in the Transvaal, for
instance? Aren't we tight mixed up with them as it is? Aren't we in one
box with them, in this Empire business? Aren't we all children of the
same noble Empire, brown, black, white, green, or whatever colour we may
be? We may not, of course, be reposing on the bosom of Brother Brown and
Brother Black. But we are pretty well chained at his side in a sort of
slavery, slaving to keep this marvellous Empire going, with its
out-of-date Lords and its fat-arsed, hypocritical upper classes. I don't
know whether you prefer working in the same imperial slave-gang with
Brother Brown of India, or whether you'd prefer to shake hands with him
as a free worker, one of the world's workers - but - .&quot;&quot;ONE!&quot; came a loud, distinct voice, as if from nowhere, Like a gun going
off.&quot;But one or the other - .&quot;&quot;TWO!&quot; a solid block of men's voices, like a bell.&quot;One or the other you'll - .&quot;&quot;THREE!&quot; The voice, like a tolling bell, of men counting the speaker
out. It was the diggers.A thrill went through the audience. The diggers sat mostly together, in
the middle of the hall, around Jack. Their faces were lit up with a new
light. And like a bell they tolled the numbers against the speaker,
counting him out, by their moral unison annihilating him.Willie Struthers, his dark-yellow face gone demoniac, stood and faced
them. His eyes too had suddenly leaped with a new look: big, dark,
glancing eyes, like an aboriginal's, glancing strangely. Was it fear,
was it a glancing, gulf-like menace? He stood there, a shabby figure of
a man, with undignified legs, facing the tolling enemy.&quot;FOUR!&quot; came the sonorous, perfect rhythm. It was a strange sound,
heavy, hypnotic, trance-like. Willie Struthers stood as if he were
fascinated, glaring spell-bound.&quot;FIVE!&quot; The sound was unbearable, a madness, tolling out of a certain
devilish cavern in the back of the men's unconscious mind, in terrible
malignancy. The Socialists began to leap to their feet in fury, turning
towards the block of Diggers. But the lean, naked faces of the
ex-soldiers gleamed with a smiling, demonish light, and from their
narrow mouths simultaneously:&quot;SIX!&quot;Struthers, looking as if he were crouching to spring, glared back at
them from the platform. They did not even look at him.&quot;SEVEN!&quot; In two syllables, SEV-EN!The sonorous gloating in the sound was unbearable. It was like
hammer-strokes on the back of the brain. Everybody had started up save
the Diggers. Even Somers was wildly on his feet, feeling as if he could
fly, swoop like some enraged bird. But his feeling wavered. At one
moment he gloated with the Diggers against the black and devilish figure
of the isolated man on the platform, who half-crouched as if he were
going to jump, his face black and satanic. And then, as the number came,
unbearable in its ghastly striking:&quot;EIGHT!&quot; like some hammer-stroke on the back of his brain it sent him
clean mad, and he jumped up into the air like a lunatic, at the same
moment as Struthers sprang with a clear leap, like a cat, towards the
group of static, grinning ex-soldiers.There was a crash, and the hall was like a bomb that has exploded.
Somers tried to spring forward. In the blind moment he wanted to
kill - to kill the soldiers. Jaz held him back, saying something. There
was a most fearful roar, and a mad whirl of men, broken chairs, pieces
of chairs brandished, men fighting madly with fists, claws, pieces of
wood - any weapon they could lay hold of. The red flag suddenly flashing
like blood, and bellowing rage at the sight of it. A Union Jack torn to
fragments, stamped upon. A mob with many different centres, some
fighting frenziedly round a red flag, some clutching fragments of the
Union Jack, as if it were God incarnate. But the central heap a mass
struggling with the Diggers, in real blood-murder passion, a tense mass
with long, naked faces gashed with blood, and hair all wild, and eyes
demented, and collars burst, and arms frantically waving over the dense
bunch of horrific life, hands in the air with weapons, hands clawing to
drag them down, wrists bleeding, hands bleeding, arms with the sleeves
ripped back, white naked arms with brownish hands, and thud! as the
white flesh was struck with a chair-leg.The doors had been flung open - many men had gone out, but more rushed
in. The police in blue uniforms and in blue clothes wielding their
batons, the whole place gone mad. Richard, small as he was, felt a great
frenzy on him, a great longing to let go. But since he didn't REALLY
know whom he wanted to let go at, he was not quite carried away. And
Jaz, quiet, persistent, drew him gradually out into the street. Though
not before he had lost his hat and had had his collar torn open, and had
received a bang over the forehead that helped to bring him to his
senses.Smash went the lights of the hall - somebody smashing the electric lamps.
The place was almost in darkness. It was unthinkable.Jaz drew Somers into the street, which was already a wide mass of a
crowd, and mounted police urging their way to the door, laying about
them. The crowd too was waiting to catch fire. Almost beside himself
Richard struggled out of the crowd, to get out of the crowd. Then there
were shots in the night, and a great howl from the crowd. Among the
police on horseback he saw a white hat - a white felt hat looped up at
the side - and he seemed to hear the bellowing of a big, husky voice.
Surely that was Kangaroo, that was Kangaroo shouting. Then there was a
loud explosion and a crash - a bomb of some sort.And Richard suddenly was faint - Jaz was leading him by the arm - leading
him away - in the city night that roared from the direction of the hall,
while men and women were running thither madly, and running as madly
away, and motor cars came rushing: and even the fire-brigade with bright
brass helmets - a great rush towards the centre of conflict - and a rush
away, outwards. While hats - white hats - Somers, in his dazed condition
saw three or four, and they occupied his consciousness as if they were
thousands.&quot;We must go back,&quot; he said, &quot;We must go back to them!&quot;&quot;What for?&quot; said Jaz, &quot;We're best away.&quot;And he led him sturdily down a side street, while Somers was conscious
only of the scene he had left, and the sound of shots.They went to one of the smaller, more remote Digger's Clubs. It
consisted only of one large room, meeting room and gymnastics hall in
turn, and a couple of small rooms, one belonging to the secretary and
the head, and the other a sort of little kitchen with a sink and a
stove. The one-armed caretaker was in attendance, but nobody else was
there. Jaz and Somers went into the secretary's room, and Jaz made
Richard lie down on the sofa.&quot;Stay here,&quot; he said, &quot;while I go and have a look round.&quot;Richard looked at him. He was feeling very sick: perhaps the bang over
the head. Yet he wanted to go back into the town, into the melee. He
felt he would even die if he did so. But then why not die? Why stay
outside the row? He had always been outside the world's affairs.&quot;I'll come with you again,&quot; he said.&quot;No, I don't want you,&quot; snapped Jaz. &quot;I have a few of my own things to
attend to.&quot;&quot;Then I'll go by myself,&quot; said Richard.&quot;If I were you I wouldn't,&quot; said Jaz.And Richard sat back feeling very sick, and confused. But such a pain in
his stomach, as if something were torn there. And he could not keep
still - he wanted to do something.Jaz poured out a measure of whiskey for himself and one for Richard.
Then he went out, saying:&quot;You'd best stay here till I come back, Mr. Somers. I shan't be very
long.&quot;Jaz too was very pale, and his manner was furtive, like one full of
suppressed excitement.Richard looked at him, and felt very alien, far from him and everybody.
He rose to his feet to rush out again. But the torn feeling at the pit
of his stomach was so strong he sat down and shoved his fists in his
abdomen, and there remained. It was a kind of grief, a bitter, agonised
grief for his fellow-men. He felt it was almost better to die, than to
see his fellow-men go mad in this horror. He could hear Jaz talking for
some time to the one-armed caretaker, a young soldier who was lame with
a bad limp as well as maimed.&quot;I can't do anything. I can't be on either side. I've got to keep away
from everything,&quot; murmured Richard to himself. &quot;If only one might die,
and not have to wait and watch through all the human horror. They are my
fellow-men, they are my fellow-men.&quot;So he lay down, and at length fell into a sort of semi-consciousness,
still pressing his fists into his abdomen, and feeling as if he imagined
a woman might feel after her first child, as if something had been
ripped out of him. He was vaguely aware of the rage and chaos in the
dark city round him, the terror of the clashing chaos. But what was the
good even of being afraid? - even of grief? It was like a storm, in which
he could do nothing but lie still and endure and wait. &quot;They also serve
who only stand and wait.&quot; Perhaps it is the bitterest part, to keep
still through it all, and watch and wait. In a numb half-sleep Richard
lay and waited - waited for heaven knows what.It seemed a long time. Then he heard voices. There was Jack and Jaz and
one or two others - loud voices. Presently Jack and Jaz came in to him.
Jack had a big cut on the chin, and was pale as death. There was blood
on his coat, and he had a white pocket-handkerchief round his neck,
having lost his collar. He looked with black eyes at Richard.&quot;What time is it?&quot; asked Richard.&quot;Blowed if I know,&quot; answered Jack, like a drunken man.&quot;Half past eleven,&quot; said Jaz quietly.Only an hour - or an hour and a half. Time must have stood still and
waited.&quot;What has happened?&quot; asked Richard.&quot;Nought!&quot; blurted Jack, still like a drunken man. &quot;Nought happened.
Bloody blasted nothing.&quot;&quot;Kangaroo is shot,&quot; said Jaz.&quot;Dead?&quot;&quot;No - o!&quot; snarled Jack. &quot;No, damn yer, not dead.&quot;Somers looked at Jaz.&quot;They've taken him home - shot in the belly,&quot; said Jaz.&quot;In his bloomin' Kangaroo guts,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Ain't much left of the ant
that shot 'im, though - neither guts nor marrow.&quot;Richard stared at the two men.&quot;Are you hurt?&quot; he said to Jack.&quot;Me? Oh, no, I just scratched myself shaving, darling. Making me
toilet.&quot;There was silence for some time. Jaz's plump, pale face was still
impassive, inscrutable, and his clothing was in order. Jack poured
himself a half-glass of neat whiskey, put in a little water, and drank
it off.&quot;And Willie Struthers and everybody?&quot; asked Richard.&quot;Gone 'ome to his missis to have sausage for tea,&quot; said Jack.&quot;Not hurt?&quot;&quot;Blowed if I know,&quot; replied Jack indifferently, &quot;whether he's hurt or
not.&quot;&quot;And is the town quiet?&quot; Somers turned to Jaz. &quot;Has everything blown
over? What has happened?&quot;&quot;What has happened exactly I couldn't tell you. I suppose everything is
quiet. The police have everything in hand.&quot;&quot;Police!&quot; snarled Jack. &quot;Bloody Johnny Hops! They couldn't hold a
sucking pig in their hands, unless somebody hung on to its tail for
them. It's our boys who've got things in hand. And handed them over to
the Hops.&quot;Somers knew that Johnny Hops was Australian for a policeman. Jack spoke
in a suppressed frenzy.&quot;Was anybody killed?&quot; Somers asked.&quot;I'm sure I hope so. If I haven't done one or two of 'em in I'm sorry.
Damned sorry. Bloody sorry,&quot; said Jack.&quot;I should be careful what I say,&quot; said Jaz.&quot;I know you'd be careful, you Cornish whisper. Careful Jimmy's your name
and nation. But I HOPE I did one or two of 'em in. And I DID do one or
two of 'em in. See the brains sputter out of that chap that shot 'Roo?&quot;&quot;And suppose they arrest you to-night and shove you in gaol for
manslaughter?&quot; said Jaz.&quot;I wouldn't advise anybody to lay as much as a leaf of maidenhair fern
on me to-night, much less a finger.&quot;&quot;They might to-morrow. You be still, and go home.&quot;Jack relapsed into a white silence. Jaz went into the common room again,
where members dropped in from the town. Apparently everything had gone
quiet. It was determined that everybody should go home as quietly and
quickly as possible.Richard found himself in the street with Jaz and Jack, both of whom were
silent. They walked briskly through the streets. Groups of people were
hurrying silently home. The town felt very dark, and as if something
very terrible had happened. A few taxi-cabs were swiftly and furtively
running. In George Street and Pitt Street patrols of mounted police were
stationed, and the ordinary police were drawn up on guard outside the
most important places. But the military had not been called out.On the whole, the police took as little notice as possible of the
foot-passengers who were hurrying away home, but occasionally they held
up a taxi-cab. Jaz, Jack and Somers proceeded on foot, very quickly and
in absolute silence. They were not much afraid of the city authorities:
perhaps not so much as were the authorities themselves. But they all
instinctively felt it best to keep quiet and unnoticed.It was nearly one o'clock when they reached Wyewurk. Victoria had gone
to bed. She called when she heard the men enter. Evidently she knew
nothing of the row.&quot;Only me and Jaz and Mr. Somers,&quot; called Jack. &quot;Don't you stir.&quot;&quot;Of course I must,&quot; she cried brightly.&quot;Don't you move,&quot; thundered Jack, and she relapsed into silence. She
knew, when he had one of his hell-moods on him, it was best to leave him
absolutely alone.The men drank a little whiskey, then sat silent for some time. At last
Jaz had the energy to say they must go to bed.&quot;Trot off Jazzy,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Go to bee-by, boys.&quot;&quot;That's what I'm doing,&quot; said Jaz, as he retired. He was sleeping the
night at Wyewurk, his own home being across the harbour.Somers still sat inert, with his unfinished glass of whiskey, though Jaz
said to him pertinently:&quot;Aren't you retiring, Mr. Somers?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; he answered, but didn't move.The two were left in silence: only the little clock ticking away.
Everything quite still.Suddenly Jack rose and looked at his face in the mirror.&quot;Nicked a bit out of my chin, seemingly. It was that little bomb that
did that. Dirty little swine, to throw a bomb. But it hadn't much kick
in it.&quot;He turned round to Somers, and the strangest grin in the world was on
his face, all the lines curved upwards.&quot;Tell you what, boy,&quot; he said in a hoarse whisper. &quot;I settled THREE of
'em - three!&quot; There was an indescribable gloating joy in his tones, like
a man telling of the good time he has had with a strange
mistress - &quot;Gawr, but I was lucky. I got one of them iron bars from the
windows, and I stirred the brains of a couple of them with it, and I
broke the neck of a third. Why it was as good as a sword to defend
yourself with, see - .&quot;He reached his face towards Somers with weird, gruesome exultation, and
continued in a hoarse, secret voice:&quot;Cripes, there's NOTHING bucks you up sometimes like killing a
man - NOTHING. You feel a perfect ANGEL after it.&quot;Richard felt the same torn feeling in his abdomen, and his eyes watched
the other man.&quot;When it comes over you, you know, there's nothing else like it.Inever knew, till the war. And I wouldn't believe it then, not for many a
while. But it's THERE. Cripes, it's there right enough. Having a woman's
something, isn't it? But it's a flea-bite, nothing, compared to killing
your man when your blood comes up.&quot;And his eyes glowed with exultant satisfaction.&quot;And the best of it is,&quot; he said, &quot;you feel a perfect ANGEL after it.
You don't feel you've done any harm. Feel as gentle as a lamb all round.
I can go to Victoria, now, and be as gentle - .&quot; He jerked his head in
the direction of Victoria's room. &quot;And you bet she'll like me.&quot;His eyes glowed with a sort of exaltation.&quot;Killing's natural to a man, you know,&quot; he said. &quot;It is just as natural
as lying with a woman. Don't you think?&quot;And still Richard did not answer.The next morning he left early for Mullumbimby. The newspaper gave a
large space to the disturbance, but used the wisest language. &quot;Brawl
between Communists and Nationalists at Canberra Hall. Unknown anarchist
throws a bomb. Three persons killed and several injured. Ben Cooley, the
well-known barrister, receives bullets in the abdomen, but is expected
to recover. Police, aided by Diggers, soon restored order.&quot;This was the tone of all the newspapers.Most blamed the Labour incendiaries, with pious horror - but all declared
that the bomb was thrown by some unknown criminal who had intruded
himself into the crowd unknown to all parties. There was a mention of
shots fired: and a loud shout of accusation against the Mounted Police
from the Labour papers, declaring that these had fired on the crowd.
Equally loud denials. A rigorous inquiry was to be instituted, fourteen
men were arrested. Jack was arrested as the leader of the men who had
counted-out Willie Struthers, but he was released on bail. Kangaroo was
said to be progressing, as far as could be ascertained, favourably.And then the papers had a lovely lot of topics. They could discuss the
character and persons of Struthers and Ben Cooley, all except the
Radical paper, the Sun, praising Ben for his laudable attempts to obtain
order by the help of his loyal Diggers. The Sun hinted at other things.
Then the personal histories of all the men arrested. Jack, the
well-known V.C., was cautiously praised.What was curious was that nobody brought criminal charges against
anybody. Jack's iron bar, for instance, nobody mentioned. It was called
a stick. Who fired the revolvers, nobody chose to know. The bomb thrower
was an unknown anarchist, probably a new immigrant from Europe. Each
side vituperated and poured abuse on the other side. But nobody made any
precise, criminal accusations. Most of the prisoners - including
Jack - were bound over. Two of them got a year's imprisonment, and five
got six months. And the affair began to fizzle down.A great discussion started on the subject of counting out. Tales were
told, how the sick men in a hospital, from their beds, counted out an
unsympathetic medical officer till the man dared not show his face. It
was said that the Aussies had once begun to count out the Prince of
Wales. It was in Egypt. The Prince had ridden up to review them, and he
seemed to them, as they stood there in the sun, to be supercilious,
&quot;superior&quot;. This is the greatest offence. So as he rode away like magic
they started to count him out. &quot;One! Two! Three!&quot; No command would stop
them. The Prince, though he did not know what it meant, instantly felt
the thing like a blow, and rode back at once, holding up his hand, to
ask what was wrong. And then he was so human and simple that they said
they had made a mistake, and they cheered him passionately. But they had
BEGUN to count him out. And once a man was counted out he was done: he
was dead, he was counted out. So, newspaper talk.And Somers, looking through the Bulletin, though he could hardly read it
now, as if he could not SEE it, in its one level, as if he had gone deaf
to its note - was struck by the end of a paragraph:This tendency may be noted in the Christianised Melanesian native, in
whom an almost uncontrolled desire to kill sometimes arises without any
provocation whatever. Fortunately for the would-be victim the native
often has a premonition of the impending nerve-storm. It is not uncommon
for a white man to be addressed thus by his model house-boy, walking
behind him on a bush track: &quot;More better, taubada (master), you walk
behind me. Me want make you kill.&quot; In five minutes (If the master has
been wise enough to get out of the way) a smiling boy will indicate that
his little trouble has been weathered. In these cases Brother Brown is
certainly a gentleman compared to the atavistic white.>



They went to Mullumbimby by the two o'clock train from Sydney on the
Friday afternoon, Jack having managed to get a day off for the occasion.
He was a sort of partner in the motor-works place where he was employed,
so it was not so difficult. And work was slack.Harriet and Victoria were both quite excited. The Somers had insisted on
packing one basket of food for the house, and Victoria had brought some
dainties as well. There were few people in the train, so they settled
themselves right at the front, in one of those long open second-class
coaches with many cane seats and a passage down the middle.&quot;This is really for the coal miners,&quot; said Victoria. &quot;You'll see they'll
get in when we get further down.&quot;She was rather wistful, after the vague coolness that had subsisted
between the two households. She was so happy that Somers and Harriet
were coming with her and Jack. They made her feel - she could hardly
describe it - but so safe, so happy and safe. Whereas often enough, in
spite of the stalwart Jack, she felt like some piece of fluff blown
about on the air, now that she was taken from her own home. With Somers
and Harriet she felt like a child that is with its parents, so lovely
and secure, without any need ever to look round. Jack was a man, and
everything a man should be, in her eyes. But he was also like a piece of
driftwood drifting on the strange unknown currents in an unexplored
nowhere, without any place to arrive at. Whereas to Victoria, Harriet
seemed to be rooted right in the centre of everything, at last she could
come to perfect rest in her, like a bird in a tree that remains still
firm when the floods are washing everything else about.If only Somers would let her rest in Harriet and him. But he seemed to
have a strange vindictiveness somewhere in his nature, that turned round
on her and terrified her worse than before. If he would only be fond of
her, that was what she wanted. If he would only be fond of her, and not
ever really leave her. Not love. When she thought of lovers she thought
of something quite different. Something rather vulgar, rather common,
more or less naughty. Ah no, he wasn't like that. And yet - since all men
are potential lovers to every woman - wouldn't it be terrible if he asked
for love. Terrible - but wonderful. Not a bit like Jack - not a bit. Would
Harriet mind? Victoria looked at Harriet with her quick, bright, shy
brown eyes. Harriet looked so handsome and distant: she was a little
afraid of her. Not as she was afraid of Somers. Afraid as one woman is
of another fierce woman. Harriet was fierce, Victoria decided. Somers
was demonish, but could be gentle and kind.It came on to rain, streaming down the carriage windows. Jack lit a
cigarette, and offered one to Harriet. She, though she knew Somers
disliked it intensely when she smoked, particularly in a public place
like this long, open railway carriage, accepted, and sat by the closed
window smoking.The train ran for a long time through Sydney, or the endless outsides of
Sydney. The town took almost as much leaving as London does. But it was
different. Instead of solid rows of houses, solid streets like London,
it was mostly innumerable detached bungalows and cottages, spreading for
great distances, scattering over hills, low hills and shallow inclines.
And then waste marshy places, and old iron, and abortive corrugated iron
&quot;works&quot; - all like the Last Day of creation, instead of a new country.
Away to the left they saw the shallow waters of the big opening where
Botany Bay is: the sandy shores, the factory chimneys, the lonely places
where it is still Bush. And the weary half established straggling of
more suburb.&quot;Como&quot;, said the station sign. And they ran on bridges over two arms of
water from the sea, and they saw what looked like a long lake with
wooded shores and bungalows: a bit like Lake Como, but oh, so unlike.
That curious sombreness of Australia, the sense of oldness, with the
forms all worn down low and blunt, squat. The squat-seeming earth. And
then they ran at last into real country, rather rocky, dark old rocks,
and sombre bush with its different pale-stemmed dull-leaved gumtrees
standing graceful, and various healthy-looking undergrowth, and great
spiky things like zuccas. As they turned south they saw tree-ferns
standing on one knobbly leg among the gums, and among the rocks ordinary
ferns and small bushes spreading in glades and up sharp hill-slopes. It
was virgin bush, and as if unvisited, lost, sombre, with plenty of
space, yet spreading grey for miles and miles, in a hollow towards the
west. Far in the west, the sky having suddenly cleared, they saw the
magical range of the Blue Mountains. And all this hoary space of bush
between. The strange, as it were, INVISIBLE beauty of Australia, which
is undeniably there, but which seems to lurk just beyond the range of
our white vision. You feel you can't SEE - as if your eyes hadn't the
vision in them to correspond with the outside landscape. For the
landscape is so unimpressive, like a face with little or no features, a
dark face. It is so aboriginal, out of our ken, and it hangs back so
aloof. Somers always felt he looked at it through a cleft in the
atmosphere; as one looks at one of the ugly-faced, distorted aborigines
with his wonderful dark eyes that have such an incomprehensible ancient
shine in them, across gulfs of unbridged centuries. And yet, when you
don't have the feeling of ugliness or monotony, in landscape or in
nigger, you get a sense of subtle, remote, FORMLESS beauty more poignant
than anything ever experienced before.&quot;Your wonderful Australia!&quot; said Harriet to Jack. &quot;I can't tell you how
it moves me. It feels as if no one had ever loved it. Do you know what I
mean? England and Germany and Italy and Egypt and India - they've all
been loved so passionately. But Australia feels as if it had never been
loved, and never come out into the open. As if man had never loved it,
and made it a happy country, a bride country - or a mother country.&quot;&quot;I don't suppose they ever have,&quot; said Jack.&quot;But they will?&quot; asked Harriet. &quot;Surely they will. I feel that if I were
Australian, I should love the very earth of it - the very sand and
dryness of it - more than anything.&quot;&quot;Where should we poor Australian wives be?&quot; put in Victoria, leaning
forward her delicate, frail face - that reminded one of a flickering
butterfly in its wavering.&quot;Yes,&quot; said Harriet meditatively, as if they had to be considered, but
were not as important as the other question.&quot;I'm afraid most Australians come to hate the Australian earth a good
bit before they're done with it,&quot; said Jack. &quot;If you call the land a
bride, she's the sort of bride not many of us are willing to tackle. She
drinks your sweat and your blood, and then as often as not lets you
down, does you in.&quot;&quot;Of course,&quot; said Harriet, &quot;it will take time. And of course a LOT of
love. A lot of fierce love, too.&quot;&quot;Let's hope she gets it,&quot; said Jack. &quot;They treat the country more like a
woman they pick up on the streets than a bride, to my thinking.&quot;&quot;I feel I could LOVE Australia,&quot; declared Harriet.&quot;Do you feel you could love an Australian?&quot; asked Jack, very much to the
point.&quot;Well,&quot; said Harriet, arching her eyes at him, &quot;that's another matter.
From what I see of them I rather doubt it,&quot; she laughed, teasing him.&quot;I should say you would. But it's no good loving Australia if you can't
love the Australian.&quot;&quot;Yes, it is. If as you say Australia is like the poor prostitute, and
the Australian just bullies her to get what he can out of her and then
treats her like dirt.&quot;&quot;It's a good deal like that,&quot; said Jack.&quot;And then you expect me to approve of you.&quot;&quot;Oh, we're not all alike, you know.&quot;&quot;It always seems to me,&quot; said Somers, &quot;that somebody will have to water
Australia with their blood before it's a real man's country. The soil,
the very plants seem to be waiting for it.&quot;&quot;You've got a lurid imagination, my dear man,&quot; said Jack.&quot;Yes, he has,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;He's always so extreme.&quot;The train jogged on, stopping at every little station. They were near
the coast, but for a long time the sea was not in sight. The land grew
steeper - dark, straight hills like cliffs, masked in sombre trees. And
then the first plume of colliery smoke among the trees on the hill-face.
But they were little collieries, for the most part, where the men just
walked into the face of the hill down a tunnel, and they hardly
disfigured the land at all. Then the train came out on the sea - lovely
bays with sand and grass and trees, sloping up towards the sudden hills
that were like a wall. There were bungalows dotted in most of the bays.
Then suddenly more collieries, and quite a large settlement of
bungalows. From the train they looked down on many many pale-grey zinc
roofs, sprinkled about like a great camp, close together, yet none
touching, and getting thinner towards the sea. The chimneys were faintly
smoking, there was a haze of smoke and a sense of home, home in the
wilds. A little way off, among the trees, plumes of white steam betrayed
more collieries.A bunch of schoolboys clambered into the train with their satchels, at
home as schoolboys are. And several black colliers, with tin luncheon
boxes. Then the train ran for a mile and a half, to stop at another
little settlement. Sometimes they stopped at beautiful bays in a hollow
between hills, and no collieries, only a few bungalows. Harriet hoped
Mullumbimby was like that. She rather dreaded the settlements with the
many many iron roofs, and the wide, unmade roads of sandy earth running
between, down to the sea, or skirting swamp-like little creeks.The train jogged on again - they were there. The place was half and half.
There were many tin roofs - but not SO many. There were the wide, unmade
roads running so straight as it were to nowhere, with little bungalow
homes half-lost at the side. But they were pleasant little bungalow
homes. Then quite near, inland, rose a great black wall of mountain, or
cliff, or tor, a vast dark tree-covered tor that reminded Harriet of
Matlock, only much bigger. The town trailed down from the foot of this
mountain towards the railway, a huddle of grey and red-painted iron
roofs. Then over the railway, towards the sea, it began again in a
scattered, spasmodic fashion, rather forlorn bungalows and new &quot;stores&quot;
and fields with rail fences, and more bungalows above the fields, and
more still running down the creek shallows towards the hollow sea, which
lay beyond like a grey mound, the strangest sight Harriet had ever seen.Next to the railway was a field, with men and youths playing football
for their lives. Across the road from the football field was a barber's
shop, where a man on horseback was leaning chattering to the barber, a
young intelligent gentleman in eye-glasses. And on the broad grass of
the roadside grew the trees with the bright scarlet flowers perching
among the grey twigs.Going towards the sea they were going away from the town that slid down
at the bush-covered foot of the dark tor. The sun was just sinking to
this great hill face, amid a curdle of grey-white clouds. The faintest
gold reflected in the more open eastern sky, in front. Strange and
forlorn, the wide sandy-rutted road with the broad grass margin and just
one or two bungalows. &quot;Verdun&quot; was the first, a wooden house painted
dark red. But some had quite wide grass round them, inside their fences,
like real lawns.Victoria had to dart to the house-agent for the key. The other three
turned to the left, up another wide road cut in the almost nothingness,
past two straying bungalows perched on brick supports - then across a
piece of grass-land as yet unoccupied, where small boys were kicking a
football - then round the corner of another new road, where water lay in
a great puddle so that they had to climb on to the grass beside the
fence of a big red-painted bungalow. Across the road was a big bungalow
built with imitation timbered walls and a red corrugated roof and red
huge water-tanks. The sea roared loudly, but was not in sight. Next
along the forlorn little road nestled a real bright red-tiled roof among
a high bushy hedge, and with a white gate.&quot;I do hope it's that,&quot; said Harriet to herself. She was so yearning to
find another home.Jack stood waiting at the corner on the tall bit of grassy land above
the muddy, cut-out road. There came Victoria running in her eager way
across the open space up the slight incline. Evening was beginning to
fall.&quot;Got 'em?&quot; called Jack.&quot;Yes. Mrs. Wynne was just washing herself, so I had to wait a minute.&quot;
Victoria came panting up.&quot;Is that it?&quot; said Harriet timidly at last, pointing to the bright red
roof.&quot;Yes, that's it,&quot; said Victoria, pleased and proprietary. A boy from the
big red bungalow called to ask if he should bring milk across. The big
red bungalow was a dairy. But Harriet followed eagerly on Jack's
footsteps across the road. She peeped over the white gate as he
unfastened it. A real lovely brick house, with a roof of bright red
tiles coming down very low over dark wooden verandahs, and huge round
rain-tanks, and a bit of grass and a big shed with double doors. Joy!
The gate was open, and she rushed in, under the tall, over-leaning hedge
that separated them from the neighbour, and that reached almost to touch
the side of her house. A wooden side verandah with bedsteads - old rusty
bedsteads patched with strip and rope - and then grass, a little front
all of grass, with loose hedges on either side - and the sea, the great
Pacific right there and rolling in huge white thunderous rollers not
forty yards away, under her grassy platform of a garden. She walked to
the edge of the grass. Yes, just down the low cliff, really only a bank,
went her own little path, as down a steep bank, and then was smooth
yellow sand, and the long sea swishing up its incline, and rocks to the
left, and incredible long rollers furling over and crushing down on the
shore. At her feet! At her very feet, the huge rhythmic Pacific.She turned to the house. There it crouched, with its long windows and
its wide verandah and its various slopes of low, red-tiled roofs.
Perfect! Perfect! The sun had gone down behind the great front of black
mountain wall which she could still see over the hedge. The house inside
was dark, with its deep verandahs like dark eyelids half closed.
Somebody switched on a light. Long cottage windows, and a white ceiling
with narrow dark beams. She rushed indoors. Once more in search of a
home, to be alone with Lovat, where he would be happy. How the sea
thundered!Harriet liked the house immensely. It was beautifully built, solid, in
the good English fashion. It had a great big room with dark jarrah
timbering on the roof and the walls: it had a dark jarrah floor, and
doors, and some solid, satisfactory jarrah furniture, a big, real table
and a sideboard and strong square chairs with cane seats. The Lord had
sent her here, that was certain.And how delighted Victoria was with her raptures. Jack whipped his coat
off and went to the shed for wood and coal, and soon had a lavish fire
in the open hearth. A boy came with milk, and another with bread and
fresh butter and eggs, ordered by Mrs. Wynne. The big black kettle was
on the fire. And Harriet took Lovat's arm, she was so moved.Through the open seaward door, as they sat at the table, the near sea
was glimmering pale and greenish in the sunset, and breaking with a
crash of foam right, as it seemed, under the house. If the house had not
stood with its little grassy garden some thirty or forty feet above the
ocean, sometimes the foam would have flown to the doorstep, or to the
steps of the loggia. The great sea roaring at one's feet!After the evening meal the women were busy making up beds and tidying
round, while the men sat by the fire. Jack was quiet, he seemed to
brood, and only smoke abstractedly, vaguely. He just sucked his pipe and
stared in the fire, while the sea boomed outside, and the voices of the
women were heard eager in the bedrooms. When one of the doors leading on
to the verandahs was opened, the noise of the sea came in frightening,
like guns.The house had been let for seven months to a man and wife with eleven
children. When Somers got up at sunrise, in the morning, he could well
believe it. But the sun rose golden from a low fume of haze in the
north-eastern sea. The waves rolled in pale and bluey, glass-green,
wonderfully heavy and liquid. They curved with a long arch, then fell in
a great hollow thud, and a spurt of white foam and a long, soft,
snow-pure rush of forward flat foam. Somers watched the crest of fine,
bristling spume fly back from the head of the waves as they turned and
broke. The sea was all yellow-green light.And through the light came a low, black tramp steamer, lurching up and
down on the waves, disappearing altogether in the lustrous water, save
for her bit of yellow-banded funnel and her mast-tips: then emerging
like some long, out-of-shape dolphin on a wave-top. She was like some
lost mongrel running over a furrowed land. She bellowed and barked
forlornly, and hung round on the up-and-down waves.Somers saw what he wanted. At the south end of the shallow bay was a
long, high jetty straddling on great treetrunk poles out on to the sea,
and carrying a long line of little red coal-trucks, the sort that can be
tipped up. Beyond the straddling jetty was a spit of low, yellow-brown
land, grassy, with a stiff little group of trees like ragged Noah's ark
trees, and further in, a little farm-place with two fascinating big
gum-trees that stuck out their clots of foliage in dark tufts at the end
of slim, up-starting branches.But the lines from the jetty ran inland for two hundred yards, to where
a tiny colliery was pluming steam and smoke from beyond a marsh-like
little creek. The steamer wanted to land. She saw the line of little
trucks full and ready. She bellowed like a miserable cow, sloping up and
down and turning round on the waters of the bay. Near the jetty the foam
broke high on some sheltering rocks. The steamer seemed to watch
yearningly, like a dog outside a shut door. A little figure walked along
the jetty, slowly, unconcernedly. The steamer bellowed again. The figure
reached the end of the jetty, and hung out a red flag. Then the steamer
shouted no more, but slowly, fearfully turned and slunk up and down the
waves back towards Sydney.The jetty - the forlorn pale-brown grassy bank running out to sea, with
the clump of sharp, hard-pointed dark conifers, trees of the southern
hemisphere, stiff and mechanical; then the foreshore with yellow sand
and rollers; then two bungalows, and a bit of waste ground full of tins;
that was the southern aspect. Northwards, next door, was the big
imitation black and white bungalow, with a tuft of wind-blown trees and
half-dead hedge between it and the Somers' house. That was north. And
the sun was already sloping upwards and northwards. It gave Somers an
uneasy feeling, the northward travelling of the climbing sun: as if
everything had gone wrong. Inland, lit up dark grey with its plumy trees
in the morning light, was the great mountain or tor, with bare, greying
rock showing near the top, and above the ridge-top the pure blue sky, so
bright and absolutely unsullied, it was always a wonder. There was an
unspeakable beauty about the mornings, the great sun from the sea, such
a big, untamed, proud sun, rising into a sky of such tender delicacy,
blue, so blue, and yet so frail that even blue seems too coarse a colour
to describe it, more virgin than humanity can conceive; the land inward
lit up, the prettiness of many painted bungalows with tin roofs
clustering up the low up-slopes of the grey-treed bush; and then rising
like a wall, facing the light and still lightless, the tor face, with
its high-up rim so grey, having tiny trees feathering against the most
beautiful frail sky in the world. Morning!But Somers turned to the house. It stood on one of the regulation lots,
probably fifty feet by a hundred and fifty. The bit of level grass in
front was only fifty feet wide, and perhaps about the same from the
house to the brim of the sea-bank, which dropped bushily down some forty
feet to the sand and the flat shore-rocks and the ocean. But this grassy
garden was littered with bits of rag, and newspapers, sea-shells, tins
and old sponges. And the lot next to it was a marvellous constellation
of tin cans in every stage of rustiness, if you peeped between the
bushes.&quot;You'll take the ashes and the rubbish too?&quot; said Somers to the
sanitary-man who came to take the sanitary tin of the earth-closet every
Monday morning.&quot;No,&quot; responded that individual briefly: a true Australian Cockney
answer, impossible to spell. A sort of neow sound.&quot;Does anybody take them?&quot;&quot;Neow. We take no garbage.&quot;&quot;Then what do I do with them?&quot;&quot;Do what you like with 'em.&quot; And he marched off with the can. It was not
rudeness. It was a kind of colonial humour.After this Somers surveyed the cans and garbage of the next lot, under
the bushes and everywhere, with colonial hopelessness. But he began at
once to pick up rags and cans from his own grass.The house was very pretty, and beautifully built. But it showed all
signs of the eleven children. On the verandah at the side, on either
side of the &quot;visitors&quot; door, was a bed: one a huge family iron bedstead
with an indescribably rusty, saggy wire mattress, the other a single
iron bedstead with the wire mattress all burst and so mended with a
criss-cross of ropes. These beds were screened from the sea-wind by
sacks, old pieces of awful carpeting, and pieces of linoleum tacked to
the side of the verandah. The same happened on the third side of the
house: two more rope-mended iron bedsteads, and a nailed-up lot of
unspeakable rags to screen from the wind.The house had three little bedrooms, one opening from each of the side
verandahs, and one from the big central room. Each contained two saggy
single beds. That was five people. Remained seven, with the father and
mother. Three children must have gone into the huge bed by the side
entrance door, and the other four must have been sprinkled over the
other three outside, rope-mended beds.The bungalow contained only the big room with five doors: one on each
side the fire-place, opening into the inner bedroom and the kitchen
respectively, and on each of the other three sides a door opening on to
the verandah. From the kitchen opened a little pantry and a zinc-floored
cubby-hole fitted with the inevitable Australian douche and a little
sinkhole to carry off the water. This was the bathroom. There it was,
all compact and nice, two outer bedrooms on the wings, and for the
central block, the big room in front, the bedroom and kitchen at the
back. The kitchen door opened on to the bit of grass at the back, near
the shed.It was a well-built little place, amazing in a world of wood and tin
shacks. But Somers would not have liked to live in it with a
thirteen-people family. There were eleven white breakfast cups, of which
nine had smashed handles and broad tin substitutes quite cannily put on.
There were two saucers only. And all the rest to match: seven large
brown teapots, of which five had broken spouts: not one whole dish or
basin of any sort, except a sauce boat. And rats! Torestin was a clean
and ratless spot compared with Coo-ee. For the house was called Coo-ee,
to fetch the rats in, Jack said.The women flew at the house with hot water and soda. Jack and Somers
spent the morning removing bedsteads into the shed, tearing down the
horrid rag-and-dirt screens, pulling out the nails with which these
screens had been held in place, and pulling out the hundreds of nails
which had nailed down the dirt-grey, thin-carpet as if forever to the
floor of the big room. Then they banged and battered this thin old
patternless carpet, and washed it with soda and water. And then they
banged and battered the two sofas, that were like sandbags, so full of
sand and dust. And they took down all the ugly, dirt-filmed pictures of
the Dana Gibson sort, and the &quot;My refuge is in God&quot; text.&quot;I should think so,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Away from the muck they'd made down
here.&quot;Like demons the four of them flew at this Coo-ee house, and afternoon
saw Jack and Somers polishing floors with a stuff called glowax, and
Harriet and Victoria putting clean papers on all the shelves, and
arranging the battered remnant of well-washed white crockery.&quot;The crockery is the worst item here,&quot; said Victoria. &quot;You pay
three-and-six and four shillings for one of these cups and saucers, and
four-and-six for a common brown quart jug, and twelve guineas for a
white dinner service.&quot;Harriet looked at the horrid breakable stuff aghast.&quot;I feel like buying a tin mug at once,&quot; she said.But Victoria did not bother. She took it all as it came. The people with
the eleven children had paid three and a half guineas a week for seven
months for the house.At three o'clock Victoria's brother, a shy youth of seventeen, arrived
in a buggy and drove Jack and Victoria the four miles to the home of the
latter. Somers and Harriet had tea alone.&quot;But I love and adore the place,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;Victoria says we can
have it for thirty shillings a week, and if they'd let you off even half
of the month for Torestin, we should be saving.&quot;The Callcotts arrived home in the early dark.&quot;Oh, but doesn't the house smell different,&quot; cried Victoria.&quot;Beeswax and turps,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Not a bad smell.&quot;Again the evening passed quietly. Jack had not been his own boisterous
self at all. He was silent, and you couldn't get at him. Victoria looked
at him curiously, wondering, and tried to draw him out. He laughed and
was pleasant enough, but relapsed into silence, as if he were sad, or
gloomy.In the morning sunlight Harriet and Somers were out first, after Somers
had made the fire, having a frightened dip in the sandy foam. They kept
far back from the great rollers, which, as the two sat in the dribbling
back-wash, reared up so huge and white and fanged in a front attack,
that Harriet always rose and ran, and it was long before she got really
wet. And then when they did venture to sit in a foot of water, up came a
sudden flush and flung them helpless rolling a dozen yards in, and
banged them against the pebbles. It was distinctly surprising. Somers
had never known that he weighed so little, that he was such a scrap of
unimportance. And he still dared not quite imagine the whole of the
blind, invisible force of that water. It was so different being in it,
even on the edge of it, from looking at it from the outside.As they came trembling and panting up the bank to the grass-plot,
dripping and smelling so strong and sticky of the Pacific, they saw Jack
standing smoking and watching.&quot;Are you going to try it?&quot; said Somers.He shook his head, and lit a cigarette.&quot;No. It's past my bathing season,&quot; he said.They ran to the little tub-house and washed the sand and salt and
sea-stickiness off with fresh water.Somers wondered whether Jack was going to say anything to him or not. He
was not sure. Perhaps Jack himself was not sure. And Somers had that
shrinking feeling one has from going to see the doctor. In a quiet sort
of way, the two men kept clear of one another. They loitered about in
the sun and round the house during the morning, mending the broken
deck-chairs and doing little jobs. Victoria and Harriet were cooking
roast pork and apple sauce, and baking little cakes. It had already been
arranged that the Somers should come and live in Coo-ee, and Victoria
was quite happy and determined to leave a supply of nice eatables behind
her.In the afternoon they all went strolling down the sands, Somers and
Victoria, Jack and Harriet. They picked up big, iridescent abalone
shells, such as people had on their mantelpieces at home: and bits of
purplish coral stuff. And they walked across two fields to have a look
at an aeroplane which had come down with a broken propeller. Jack of
course had to talk about it to the people there, while Somers hung back
and tried to make himself invisible, as he always did when there were
strange onlookers.Then the four turned home. Jack and Victoria were leaving by the seven
train next morning, Somers and Harriet were staying on a few days,
before they returned to Sydney to pack up. Harriet was longing to have
the house to themselves. So was Somers. He was also hoping that Jack
wouldn't talk to him, wouldn't want anything of him. And at the same
time he was waiting for some sort of approach.The sea's edge was smoking with the fume of the waves like a mist, and
the high shore ahead, with the few painted red-roofed bungalows, was all
dim, like a Japanese print. Tier after tier of white-frost foam piled
breaking towards the shore, in a haste. The tide was nearly high. Somers
could hardly see beyond over the white wall-tops of the breaking waves,
only on the clear horizon, far away, a steamer like a small black
scratch, and a fantastic thread of smoke.He lingered behind the rest, they were nearly home. They were at the
wide sandy place where the creek left off. Its still brackish waters
just sank into the sands, without ever running to meet the waves. And
beyond the sands was a sort of marsh, bushes and tall stark dead
gum-trees, and a few thin-tufted trees. Half wild ponies walked heavily
from the bush to the sands, and across to the slope where the low cliff
rose again. In the depths of the marsh-like level was the low chimney of
the mine, and tips of roofs: and beyond, a long range of wire-like trees
holding up tufts of foliage in handfuls, in front of the pale blue,
diminishing range of the hills in the distance. It was a weird scene,
full of definite detail, fascinating detail, yet all in the funeral-grey
monotony of the bush.Somers turned to the piled-up, white-fronted sea again. On the tip of a
rock above him sat a little bird with hunched-up shoulders and a long
beak: an absurd silhouette. He went towards it, talking to it. It seemed
to listen to him: really to listen. That is another of the charms of
Australia: the birds are not really afraid, and one can really
communicate with them. In West Australia Somers could sit in the bush
and talk to the flocks of big, handsome, black-and-white birds that they
call magpies, but which are a sort of butcher bird, apparently. And they
would gurgle little answers in their throats, and cock their heads on
one side. Handsome birds they were, some with mottled grey breasts like
fish. And the boldest would even come and take pieces of bread from his
hands. Yet they were quite wild. Only they seemed to have a strange
power of understanding the human psyche.Now this little kingfisher by the sea. It sat and looked at Somers, and
cocked its head and listened. It LIKED to be talked to. When he came
quite near, it sped with the straight low flight of kingfishers to
another boulder, and waited for him. It was beautiful too: with a sheeny
sea-green back and a pale breast touched with burnt yellow. A beautiful,
dandy little fellow. And there he waited for Somers like a little
penguin perching on a brown boulder. And Somers came softly near,
talking quietly. Till he could almost touch the bird. Then away it sped
a few yards, and waited. Sheeny greyish green, like the gum-leaves
become vivid: and yellowish breast, like the suave gum-tree trunks. And
listening, and waiting, and wanting to be talked to. Wanting the
contact.The other three had disappeared from the sea-side. Somers walked slowly
on. Then suddenly he saw Jack running across the sand in a bathing suit,
and entering the shallow rim of a long, swift upwash. He went in
gingerly - then threw himself into a little swell, and rolled in the
water for a minute. Then he was rushing back, before the next big wave
broke. He had gone again by the time Somers came to climb the cliff-bank
to the house.They had a cup of tea on the wooden verandah. The air had begun to waft
icily from the inland, but in the sheltered place facing the sea it was
still warm. This was only four o'clock - or to-day, five o'clock tea.
Proper tea was at six or half-past, with meat and pies and fruit salad.The women went indoors with the cups. Jack was smoking his pipe. There
was something unnatural about his stillness.&quot;You had a dip after all,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Yes. A dip in and out.&quot;Then silence again. Somers' thoughts wandered out to the gently
darkening sea, and the bird, and the whole of vast Australia lying
behind him flat and open to the sky.&quot;You like it down here?&quot; said Jack.&quot;I do indeed.&quot;&quot;Let's go down to the rocks again, I like to be near the waves.&quot;Somers rose and followed him. The house was already lit up. The sea was
bluey. They went down the steps cut in the earth of the bank top, and
between the bushes to the sand. The tide was full, and swishing against
a flat ledge of rocks. Jack went to the edge of this ledge, looking in
at the surging water, white, hissing, heavy. Somers followed again. Jack
turned his face to him.&quot;Funny thing it should go on doing this all the time, for no purpose,&quot;
said Jack, amid all the noise.&quot;Yes.&quot;Again they watched the heavy waves unfurl and fling the white challenge
of foam on the shore.&quot;I say,&quot; Jack turned his face. &quot;I shan't be making a mistake if I tell
you a few things in confidence, shall I?&quot;&quot;I hope not. But judge for yourself.&quot;&quot;Well, it's like this,&quot; shouted Jack - they had to shout at one another
in unnaturally lifted voices, because of the huge noise of the sea.
&quot;There's a good many of us chaps as has been in France, you know - and
been through it all - in the army - we jolly well know you can't keep a
country going on the vote-catching system - as you said the other day. We
know it can't be done.&quot;&quot;It can't,&quot; said Somers, with a shout, &quot;for ever.&quot;&quot;If you've got to command, you don't have to ask your men first if it's
right, before you give the command.&quot;&quot;Of course not,&quot; yelled Somers.But Jack was musing for the moment.&quot;What?&quot; he shouted, as he woke up.&quot;No,&quot; yelled Somers.A further muse, amid the roar of the waves.&quot;Do the men know better than the officers, or do the officers know
better than the men?&quot; he barked.&quot;Of course,&quot; said Somers.&quot;These damned politicians - they invent a cry - and they wait to see if
the public will take it up. And if it won't, they drop it. And if it
will, they make a mountain of it, if it's only an old flower-pot.&quot;&quot;They do,&quot; yelled Somers.They stood close side by side, like two mariners in a storm, amid the
breathing spume of the foreshore, while darkness slowly sank. Right at
the tip of the flat, low rocks they stood, like pilots.&quot;It's no good,&quot; barked Jack, with his hands in his pockets.&quot;Not a bit.&quot;&quot;If you're an officer, you study what is best, for the cause and for the
men. You study your men. But you don't ask THEM what to do. If you do
you're a wash-out.&quot;&quot;Quite.&quot;&quot;And that's where it is in politics. You see the papers howling and
blubbering for a statesman. Why, if they'd got the finest statesman the
world ever saw, they'd chuck him on to the scrap heap the moment he
really wanted his own way, doing what he saw was the best. That's where
they've got anybody who's any good - on the scrap-heap.&quot;&quot;Same the world over.&quot;&quot;It's got to alter somewhere.&quot;&quot;It has.&quot;&quot;When you've been through the army, you know that what you depend on is
a GENERAL, and on DISCIPLINE, and on OBEDIENCE. And nothing else is the
slightest bit of good.&quot;&quot;But they say the civil world is NOT an army: it's the will of the
people,&quot; cried Somers.&quot;Will of my grandmother's old tom-cat. They've got no will, except to
stop anybody else from having any.&quot;&quot;I know.&quot;&quot;Look at Australia. Absolutely fermenting rotten with politicians and
the will of the people. Look at the country - going rottener every day,
like an old pear.&quot;&quot;All the democratic world the same.&quot;&quot;Of course it's the same. And you may well say Australian soil is
waiting to be watered with blood. It's waiting to be watered with our
blood, once England's got too soft to help herself, let alone us, and
the Japs come down this way. They'd squash us like a soft pear.&quot;&quot;I think it's quite likely.&quot;&quot;What?&quot;&quot;Likely.&quot;&quot;It's pretty well a certainty. And would you blame them? If you was
thirsty, wouldn't you pick a ripe pear if it hung on nobody's tree? Why,
of course you would. And who'd blame you.&quot;&quot;Blame myself if I didn't,&quot; said Somers.&quot;And then their coloured labour. I tell you, this country's too far from
Europe to risk it. They'll swallow us. As sure as guns is guns, if we
let in coloured labour, they'll swallow us. They hate us. All the other
colours hate the white. And they're only waiting till we haven't got the
pull over them. They're only waiting. And then what about poor little
Australia?&quot;&quot;Heaven knows.&quot;&quot;There'll be the Labour Party, the Socialists, uniting with the workers
of the world. THEY'LL be the workers, if ever it comes to it. Those
black and yellow people'll make 'em work - not half. It isn't one side
only that can keep slaves. Why, the fools, the coloured races don't have
any FEELING for liberty. They only think you're a fool when you give it
to them, and if they got a chance, they'd drive you out to work in
gangs, and fairly laugh at you. All this world's-worker business is
simply playing their game.&quot;&quot;Of course,&quot; said Somers. &quot;What is Indian Nationalism but a strong bid
for power - for tyranny. The Brahmins want their old absolute
caste-power - the most absolute tyranny - back again, and the Mohammedans
want their military tyranny. That's what they are lusting for - to wield
the rod again. Slavery for millions. Japan the same. And China, in part,
the same. The niggers the same. The real sense of liberty only goes with
white blood. And the ideal democratic liberty is an exploded ideal.
You've got to have wisdom and authority somewhere, and you can't get it
out of any further democracy.&quot;&quot;There!&quot; said Jack. &quot;That's what I mean. We'll be wiped out, wiped out.
And we know it. Look here, as man to man, you and me here: if you were
an Australian, wouldn't you do something if you could do something?&quot;&quot;I would.&quot;&quot;Whether you got shot or whether you didn't! We went to France to get
ourselves shot, for something that didn't touch us very close either.
Then why shouldn't we run a bit of risk for what does touch us very
close. Why, you know, with things as they are,Idon't want Victoria
and me to have any children. I'd a jolly sight rather not - and I'll
watch it too.&quot;&quot;Same with me,&quot; yelled Somers.Jack had come closer to him, and was now holding him by the arm.&quot;What's a man's life for, anyhow? Is it just to save up like rotten
pears on a shelf, in the hopes that one day it'll rot into a pink canary
or something of that?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Somers.&quot;What we want in Australia,&quot; said Jack, &quot;isn't a statesman, not yet.
It's a set of chaps with some guts in them, who'll obey orders when they
find a man who'll give the orders.&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;And we've got such men - we've got them. But we want to see our way
clear. We don't never feel quite SURE enough over here. That's where it
is. We sound as sure as a gas-explosion. But it's all bang and no bump.
We'll never raise no lids. We shall only raise the roof - or our
politicians will - with shouting. Because we're never quite sure. We know
it when we meet you English people. You're a lot surer than we are. But
you're mostly bigger fools as well. It takes a fool to be sure of
himself, sometimes.&quot;&quot;Fact.&quot;&quot;And there's where it is. Most Englishmen are too big cocked-up fools
for us. And there you are. Their sureness may help them along to the end
of the road, but they haven't the wit to turn a corner: not a proper
corner. And we can see it. They can only go back on themselves.&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;You're the only man I've met who seems to me sure of himself and what
he means. I may be mistaken, but that's how it seems to me. And William
James knows it too. But it's my belief William James doesn't want you to
come in, because it would spoil his little game.&quot;&quot;I don't understand.&quot;&quot;I know you don't. Now, look here. This is absolutely between ourselves,
now, isn't it?&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;Certain?&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;Jack was silent for a time. Then he looked round the almost dark shore.
The stars were shining overhead.&quot;Give me your hand then,&quot; said Jack.Somers gave him his hand, and Jack clasped it fast, drawing the smaller
man to him and putting his arm round his shoulders and holding him near
to him. It was a tense moment for Richard Lovat. He looked at the dark
sea, and thought of his own everlasting gods, and felt the other man's
body next to his.&quot;Well now,&quot; he said in Somers' ear, in a soothed tone. &quot;There's quite a
number of us in Sydney - and in the other towns as well - we're mostly
diggers back from the war - we've joined up into a kind of club - and
we're sworn in - and we're sworn to OBEY the leaders, no matter what the
command, when the time is ready - and we're sworn to keep silent till
then. We don't let out much, nothing of any consequence, to the general
run of the members.&quot;Richard listened with his soul. Jack's eager, conspirator voice seemed
very close to his ear, and it had a kind of caress, a sort of embrace.
Richard was absolutely motionless.&quot;But who are your leaders?&quot; he asked, thinking of course that it was his
own high destiny to be a leader.&quot;Why, the first club got fifty members to start with. Then we chose a
leader and talked things over. And then we chose a secretary and a
lieutenant. And every member quietly brought in more chaps. And as soon
as we felt we could afford it, we separated, making the next thirty or
so into a second club, with the lieutenant for a leader. Then we chose a
new lieutenant - and the new club chose a secretary and a lieutenant.&quot;Richard didn't follow all this lieutenant and club business very well.
He was thinking of himself entering in with these men in a dangerous,
desperate cause. It seemed unreal. Yet there he was, with Jack's arm
round him. Jack would want him to be his &quot;mate&quot;. Could he? His cobber.
Could he ever be mate to any man?&quot;You sort of have a lot of leaders. What if one of them let you down?&quot;
he asked.&quot;None of them have yet. But we've arranged for that.&quot;&quot;How?&quot;&quot;I'll tell you later. But you get a bit of the hang of the thing, do
you?&quot;&quot;I think so. But what do you call yourselves? How do you appear to the
public?&quot;&quot;We call ourselves the digger clubs, and we go in chiefly for athletics.
And we do spend most of the time in athletics. But those that aren't
diggers can join, if a pal brings them in and vouches for them.&quot;Richard was now feeling rather out of it. Returned soldiers, and clubs,
and athletics - all unnatural things to him. Was he going to join in with
this? How could he? He was so different from it all.&quot;And how do you work - I mean together?&quot; he faltered.&quot;We have a special lodge of the leaders and lieutenants and secretaries
from all the clubs, and again in every lodge they choose a master,
that's the highest; and then a Jack, he's like a lieutenant; and a
Teller, he's the sort of secretary and president. We have lodges in all
the biggish places. And then all the masters of the lodges of the five
states of Australia keep in touch, and they choose five masters who are
called the Five, and these five agree among themselves which order they
shall stand in: first, second, third, fourth, and fifth. When once
they've chosen the first, then he has two votes towards the placing of
the other four. And so they settle it. And then they grade the five
Jacks and the five Tellers. I tell it you just in rough, you know.&quot;&quot;Yes. And what are you?&quot;&quot;I'm a master.&quot;Richard was still trying to see himself in connection with it all. He
tried to piece together all that Jack had been letting off at him.
Returned soldiers' clubs, chiefly athletics, with a more or less secret
core to each club, and all the secret cores working together secretly in
all the state under one chief head, and apparently with military
penalties for any transgression. It was not a bad idea. And the aim,
apparently, a sort of revolution and a seizing of political power.&quot;How long have you been started?&quot; he asked.&quot;About eighteen months - nearly two years altogether.&quot;Somers was silent, very much impressed, though his heart felt heavy. Why
did his heart feel so heavy? Politics - conspiracy - political power: it
was all so alien to him. Somehow, in his soul he always meant something
quite different, when he thought of action along with other men. Yet
Australia, the wonderful, lonely Australia, with her seven million
people only - it might begin here. And the Australians, so queer, so
absent, as it were, leaving themselves out all the time - they might be
capable of a beautiful unselfishness and steadfastness of purpose.
Only - his heart refused to respond.&quot;What is your aim, though? What do you want, finally?&quot; he asked rather
lamely.Jack hesitated, and his grip on the other man's arm tightened.&quot;Well,&quot; he said. &quot;It's like this. We don't talk a lot about what we
intend: we fix nothing. But we start certain talks, and we listen, so we
know more or less what most of the ordinary members feel like. Why, the
plan is more or less this. The Labour people, the reds, are always
talking about a revolution, and the Conservatives are always talking
about a disaster. Well, we keep ourselves fit and ready for as soon as
the revolution comes - or the disaster. Then we step in, you see, and we
are the revolution. We've got most of the trained fighting men behind
us, and we can MAKE the will of the people, don't you see: if the
members stand steady. We shall have 'Australia' for the word. We stand
for Australia, not for any of your parties.&quot;Somers at once felt the idea was a good one. Australia is not too
big - seven millions or so, and the biggest part of the seven
concentrated in the five or six cities. Get hold of your cities and
you've got hold of Australia. The only thing he mistrusted was the
dryness in Jack's voice: a sort of that's-how-it's-got-to-be dryness,
sharp and authoritative.&quot;What d'yer think of it?&quot; said Jack.&quot;Good idea,&quot; said Somers.&quot;I know that - if we can bite on to it. Feel like joining in, d'yer
think?&quot;Somers was silent. He was thinking of Jack even more than of the
venture. Jack was trying to put something over him - in some way, to get
a hold over him. He felt like an animal that is being lassooed. Yet here
was his chance, if he wanted to be a leader of men. He had only to give
himself, give himself up to it and to the men.&quot;Let me think about it a bit, will you?&quot; he replied, &quot;and I'll tell you
when I come up to Sydney.&quot;&quot;Right O!&quot; said Jack, a twinge of disappointment in his acquiescence.
&quot;Look before you leap, you know.&quot;&quot;Yes - for both sides. You wouldn't want me to jump in, and then squirm
because I didn't like it.&quot;&quot;Right you are, old man. You take your own time - I know you won't be
wagging your jaw to anybody.&quot;&quot;No. Not even to Harriet.&quot;&quot;Oh, bless you, no. We're not having the women in, if we can help it.
Don't believe in it, do you?&quot;&quot;Not in real politics, I don't.&quot;They stood a moment longer by the sea. Then Jack let go Somers' arm.&quot;Well,&quot; he said, &quot;I'd rather die in a forlorn hope than drag my days out
in a forlorn mope. Besides, damn it, I do want to have a shot at
something, I do. These politicians absolutely get my wind up, running
the country. If I can't do better than that, then let me be shot, and
welcome.&quot;&quot;I agree,&quot; said Somers.Jack put his hand on his shoulder, and pressed it hard.&quot;I knew you would,&quot; he said, in moved tones. &quot;We want a man like you,
you know - like a sort of queen bee to a hive.&quot;Somers laughed, rather startled by the metaphor. He had thought of
himself as many things, but never as a queen bee to a hive of would-be
revolutionaries. The two men went up to the house.&quot;Wherever have you been?&quot; said Victoria.&quot;Talking politics and red-hot treason,&quot; said Jack, rubbing his hands.&quot;Till you're almost frozen, I'm sure,&quot; said Victoria.Harriet looked at the two men in curiosity and suspicion, but she said
nothing. Only next morning when the Callcotts had gone she said to
Lovat:&quot;What were you and Mr. Callcott talking about, really?&quot;&quot;As he said, politics and hot treason. An idea that some of them have
got for making a change in the constitution.&quot;&quot;What sort of change?&quot; asked Harriet.&quot;Why - don't bother me yet. I don't know myself.&quot;&quot;Is it so important you mustn't tell me?&quot; she asked sarcastically.&quot;Or else so vague,&quot; he answered.But she saw by the shut look on his face that he was not going to tell
her: that this was something he intended to keep apart from her: forever
apart. A part of himself which he was not going to share with her. It
seemed to her unnecessary, and a breach of faith on his part, wounding
her. If their marriage was a real thing, then anything very serious was
her matter as much as his, surely. Either her marriage with him was not
very important, or else this Jack Callcott stuff wasn't very important.
Which probably it wasn't. Yet she hated the hoity-toity way she was shut
out.&quot;Pah!&quot; she said. &quot;A bit of little boys' silly showing off.&quot;But he had this other cold side to his nature, that could keep a secret
cold and isolated till Doomsday. And for two or three years now, since
the war, he had talked like this about doing some work with men alone,
sharing some activity with men. Turning away from the personal life to
the hateful male impersonal activity, and shutting her out from this.She continued bright through the day. Then at evening he found her
sitting on her bed with tears in her eyes and her hands in her lap. At
once his heart became very troubled: because after all she was all he
had in the world, and he couldn't bear her to be really disappointed or
wounded. He wanted to ask her what was the matter, and to try to comfort
her. But he knew it would be false. He knew that her greatest grief was
when he turned away from their personal human life of intimacy to this
impersonal business of male activity for which he was always craving. So
he felt miserable, but went away without saying anything. Because he was
determined, if possible, to go forward in this matter with Jack. He was
also determined that it was not a woman's matter. As soon as he could he
would tell her about it: as much as it was necessary for her to know.
But, once he had slowly and carefully weighed a course of action, he
would not hold it subject to Harriet's approval or disapproval. It would
be out of her sphere, outside the personal sphere of their two lives,
and he would keep it there. She emphatically opposed this principle of
her externality. She agreed with the necessity for impersonal activity,
but oh, she insisted on being identified with the activity, impersonal
or not. And he insisted that it could not and should not be: that the
pure male activity should be womanless, beyond woman. No man was beyond
woman. But in his one quality of ultimate maker and breaker, he was
womanless. Harriet denied this, bitterly. She wanted to share, to join
in, not to be left out lonely. He looked at her in distress, and did not
answer. It is a knot that can never be untied; it can only, like a navel
string, be broken or cut.For the moment, however, he said nothing. But Somers knew from his
dreams what she was feeling: his dreams of a woman, a woman he loved,
something like Harriet, something like his mother, and yet unlike
either, a woman sullen and obstinate against him, repudiating him.
Bitter the woman was, grieved beyond words, grieved till her face was
swollen and puffy and almost mad or imbecile, because she had loved him
so much, and now she must see him betray her love. That was how the
dream woman put it: he had betrayed her great love, and she must go down
desolate into an everlasting hell, denied, and denying him absolutely in
return, a sullen, awful soul. The face reminded him of Harriet, and of
his mother, and of his sister, and of girls he had known when he was
younger - strange glimpses of all of them, each glimpse excluding the
last. And at the same time in the terrible face some of the look of that
bloated face of a madwoman which hung over Jane Eyre in the night in Mr.
Rochester's house.The Somers of the dream was terribly upset. He cried tears from his very
bowels, and laid his hand on the woman's arm saying:&quot;But I love you. Don't you BELIEVE in me? Don't you BELIEVE in me?&quot; But
the woman, she seemed almost old now - only shed a few bitter tears,
bitter as vitriol, from her distorted face, and bitterly, hideously
turned away, dragging her arm from the touch of his fingers; turned, as
it seemed to the dream-Somers, away to the sullen and dreary,
everlasting hell of repudiation.He woke at this, and listened to the thunder of the sea with horror.
With horror. Two women in his life he had loved down to the quick of
life and death: his mother and Harriet. And the woman in the dream was
so awfully his mother, risen from the dead, and at the same time
Harriet, as it were, departing from this life, that he stared at the
night-paleness between the window-curtains in horror.&quot;They neither of them believed in me,&quot; he said to himself. Still in the
spell of the dream, he put it in the past tense, though Harriet lay
sleeping in the next bed. He could not get over it.Then he tried to come right awake. In his full consciousness, he was a
great enemy of dreams. For his own private life, he found his dreams
were like devils. When he was asleep and off his guard, then his own
weaknesses, especially his old weaknesses that he had overcome in his
full, day-waking self, rose up again maliciously to take some
picturesque form and torment and overcome his sleeping self. He always
considered dreams as a kind of revenge which old weaknesses took on the
victorious healthy consciousness, like past diseases come back for a
phantom triumph. So he said to himself: &quot;The dream is one of these
larvae of my past emotions. It means that the danger is passed, the evil
is overcome, so it has to resort to dreams to terrify me. In dreams the
diseases and evil weaknesses of the soul - and of our relations with
other souls - take form to triumph falsely over the living, healthy,
onward-struggling spirit. This dream means that the actual danger is
gone.&quot; So he strengthened his spirit, and in the morning when he got up,
and remembered, he was no longer afraid. A little uneasy still, maybe,
especially as to what Harriet would do. But surely his mother was not
hostile in death! And if she were a little bit hostile at this
forsaking, it was not permanent, it was only the remains of a weakness,
an unbelief which haunted the soul in life.So he reasoned with himself. For he had an ingrained instinct or habit
of thought which made him feel that he could never take the move into
activity unless Harriet and his dead mother believed in him. They both
loved him: that he knew. They both believed in him terribly, in personal
being. In the individual man he was, and the son of man, they believed
with all the intensity of undivided love. But in the impersonal man, the
man that would go beyond them, with his back to them, away from them
into an activity that excluded them, in this man they did not find it so
easy to believe.Harriet, however, said nothing for two days. She was happy in her new
house, delighted with the sea and the being alone, she loved her Coo-ee
bungalow, and loved making it look nice. She loved having Lovat alone
with her, and all her desires, as it were, in the hollow of her hand.
She was bright and affectionate with him. But underneath lurked this
chagrin of his wanting to go away from her, for his activity.&quot;You don't take Callcott and his politics seriously, do you?&quot; she said
to him at evening.&quot;Yes,&quot; he said, rather hesitatingly.&quot;But what does he want?&quot;&quot;To have another sort of government for the Commonwealth - with a sort of
Dictator: not the democratic vote-cadging sort.&quot;&quot;But what does that matter to you?&quot;&quot;It does matter. If you can start a new life-form.&quot;&quot;You know quite well you say yourself life doesn't START with a form. It
starts with a new feeling, and ends with a form.&quot;&quot;I know. But I think there is a new feeling.&quot;&quot;In Callcott?&quot; She had a very sceptical intonation.&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;I very much doubt it. He's a returned war hero, and he wants a chance
of keeping on being a hero - or something like that.&quot;&quot;But even that is a new feeling,&quot; he persisted.&quot;Yah!&quot; she said, rather wearily sceptical. &quot;I'd rather even believe in
William James. There seems to me more real feeling even in him: deeper,
at any rate. Your Jacks are shallow really.&quot;&quot;Nay, he seemed a man to me.&quot;&quot;I don't know what you mean by your MEN. Really, I give it up, I don't
know what you do want. You change so. You've always said you despise
politics, and yet here you are.&quot; She tailed off as if it were hopeless.&quot;It's not the politics. But it IS a new life-form, a new social form.
We're pot-bound inside democracy and the democratic feeling.&quot;&quot;But you know what you've said yourself. You didn't change the Roman
Empire with a revolution. Christianity grew up for centuries without
having anything at all to do with politics - just a FEELING, and a
belief.&quot;This was indeed what he had said himself, often enough: that a new
religious inspiration, and a new religious idea must gradually spring up
and ripen before there could be any constructive change. And yet he felt
that preaching and teaching were both no good, at the world's present
juncture. There must be action, brave, faithful action: and in the
action the new spirit would arise.&quot;You see,&quot; he said, &quot;Christianity is a religion which preaches the
despising of the material world. And I don't believe in that part of it,
at least, any longer. I believe that the men with the real passion for
life, for truth, for LIVING and not for HAVING, I feel they now must
seize control of the material possessions, just to safeguard the world
from all the masses who want to seize material possessions for
themselves, blindly, and nothing else. The men with soul and with
passionate truth in them must control the world's material riches and
supplies: absolutely put possessions out of the reach of the mass of
mankind, and let life begin to live again, in place of this struggle for
existence, or struggle for wealth.&quot;&quot;Yah, I don't believe it's so all-important who controls the world's
material riches and supplies. That'll always be the same.&quot;&quot;It won't.&quot;&quot;It will. Conservatives or bolshevists or Labour Party - they're all
alike: they all want to grab and have things in their clutches, and
they're devilish with jealousy if they haven't got them. That's
politics. You've said thousands of times that politics are a game for
the base people with no human soul in them. Thousands of times you've
said it. And yet now - .&quot;He was silent for a while.&quot;Now,&quot; he said slowly. &quot;Now I see that you don't have only to give all
your possessions to the poor. You've got to HAVE no poor that can be
saved just by possessions. You've got to put the control of all supplies
into the hands of sincere, sensible men who are still men enough to know
that manhood isn't the same thing as goods. We don't want possessions.
Nobody wants possessions - more than just the immediate things: as you
say yourself, one trunk for you, one for me, and one for the household
goods. That's about all. We don't want anything else. And the world is
ours - Australia or India, Coo-ee or Ardnaree, or where you like. You
have got to teach people that, by withholding possessions and stopping
the mere frenzy for possession which runs the world to-day. You've got
to do that FIRST, not last.&quot;&quot;And you think Jack Callcott will do it?&quot;&quot;I did think so, as he talked to me.&quot;&quot;Well, then let him. Why do you want to interfere? In my opinion he's
chiefly jealous because other people run the show, and he doesn't have a
look-in. Having once been a Captain with some power, he wants the same
again, and more. I'd rather trust William James to be disinterested.&quot;&quot;Nay, Jack Callcott is generous by nature, and I believe he'd be
disinterested.&quot;&quot;In his way, he's generous. But that isn't the same as being
disinterested, for all that. He wants to have his finger in the pie,
that's what he wants.&quot;&quot;To pull out plums? That's not true.&quot;&quot;Perhaps not to pull out money plums. But to be bossy. To be a Captain
once more, feeling his feet and being a boss over something.&quot;&quot;Why shouldn't he be?&quot;&quot;Why not? I don't care if he bosses all Australia and New Zealand and
all the lot. But I don't see why you should call it disinterested.
Because it isn't.&quot;He paused, struck.&quot;Am I disinterested?&quot; he asked.&quot;Not&quot; - she hesitated - &quot;not when you want just POWER.&quot;&quot;But I don't want just power. I only see that somebody must have power,
so those should have it who don't want it selfishly, and who have some
natural gift for it, and some reverence for the sacredness of it.&quot;&quot;Ha! - power! power! What does it all mean, after all! And especially in
people like Jack Callcott. Where does he see any sacredness. He's a
sentimentalist, and as you say yourself, nothing is sacred then.&quot;This discussion ended in a draw. Harriet had struck home once or twice,
and she knew it. That appeased her for the moment. But he stuck to his
essential position, though he was not so sure of the circumstantial
standing.Harriet loved Coo-ee, and was determined to be happy there. She had at
last gradually realised that Lovat was no longer lover to her or
anybody, or even anything: and amidst the chagrin was a real relief.
Because he was her husband, that was undeniable. And if, as her husband,
he had to go on to other things, outside of marriage: well, that was his
affair. It only angered her when he thought these other
things - revolutions or governments or whatnot - higher than their
essential marriage. But then he would come to himself and acknowledge
that his marriage WAS the centre of his life, the core, the root,
however he liked to put it: and this other business was the inevitable
excursion into his future, into the unknown, onwards, which man by his
nature was condemned to make, even if he lost his life a dozen times in
it. Well, so be it. Let him make the excursion: even without her. But
she was not, if she could help it, going to have him setting off on a
trip that led nowhere. No, if he was to excurse ahead, it must be ahead,
and her instinct must be convinced as the needle of a mariner's compass
is convinced. And regarding this Australian business of Callcott's, she
had her doubts.However, she had for the moment a home, where she felt for the moment as
rooted, as central as the tree of life itself. She wasn't a bit of
flotsam, and she wasn't a dog chained to a dog-kennel. Coo-ee might be
absurd - and she knew it was only a camp. But then where she camped with
Lovat Somers was now the world's centre to her, and that was enough.She loved to wake in the morning and open the bedroom door - they had the
north bedroom, on the verandah, the room that had the sun all day long;
then she liked to lie luxuriously in bed and watch the lovely, broken
colours of the Australian dawn: always strange, mixed colours, never the
primary reds and yellows. The sun rose on the north-east - she could
hardly see it. But she watched the first yellow of morning, and then the
strange, strong smoky red-purple of floating pieces of cloud: then the
rose and mist blue of the horizon, and the sea all reddish, smoky
flesh-colour, moving under a film of gold like a glaze; then the sea
gradually going yellow, going primrose, with the foam breaking blue as
forget-me-nots or frost, in front. And on the near swing of the bluey
primrose, sticking up through the marvellous liquid pale yellow glaze,
the black fins of sharks. The triangular, black fins of sharks, like
small, hard sails of hell-boats, amid the swimming luminousness. Then
she would run out on the verandah. Sharks! Four or five sharks, skulking
in the morning glow, and so near, she could almost have thrown bread to
them. Sharks, slinking along quite near the coast, as if they were
walking on the land. She saw one caught in the heave of a breaker, and
lifted. And then she saw him start, saw the quick flurry of his tail as
he flung himself back. The land to him was horror - as to her the sea,
beyond that wall of ice-blue foam. She made Lovat come to look. He
watched them slowly, holding the brush in his hand. He had made the
fire, and was sweeping the hearth. Coffee was ready by the time Harriet
was dressed: and he was crouching making toast. They had breakfast
together on the front verandah, facing the sea, eastwards. And the
much-washed red-and-white tablecloth that had been in so many lands with
them and that they used out-doors, looked almost too strongly coloured
in the tender-seeming atmosphere. The coffee had a lot of chicory in it,
but the butter and milk were good, and the brownish honey, that also,
like the landscape, tasted queer, as if touched with unkindled smoke. It
seemed to Somers as if the people of Australia OUGHT to be dusky. Think
of Sicilian honey - like the sound of birds singing: and now this with a
dusky undertone to it. But good too - so good!>



Jaz took Somers to the famous Canberra House, in Sydney, where the
Socialists and Labour people had their premises: offices, meeting-rooms,
club-rooms, quite an establishment. There was a lively feeling about the
place, in spite of various down-at-heel malcontents who stood about in
the passage and outside on the pavement. A business-like air.The two men were conducted into an inner room where a man sat at a desk.
He was very dark, red-faced, and thin, with deep lines in his face, a
tight shut, receding mouth, and black, burning eyes. He reminded Somers
of the portraits of Abraham Lincoln, the same sunken cheeks and deep,
cadaverous lines and big black eyes. But this man, Willie Struthers,
lacked that look of humour and almost of sweetness that one can find in
Abraham Lincoln's portraits. Instead, he was suspicious, and seemed as
if he were brooding an inner wrong.He was a born Australian, had knocked about the continent, and spent
many years on the goldfields. According to report, he was just
comfortably well-off - not rich. He looked rather shabby, seedy; his
clothes had that look as if he had just thrown them on his back, after
picking them off the floor. Also one of his thin shoulders was
noticeably higher than the other. But he was a distinct Australian type,
thin, hollow-cheeked, with a brightish brittle, red skin on his face,
and big, dark, incensed-looking eyes. He nodded to the two men as they
entered, but did not speak nor rise from his desk.&quot;This is Mr. Somers,&quot; said Jaz. &quot;You've read his book on democracy.&quot;&quot;Yes, I've read it,&quot; said Struthers. &quot;Take a seat.&quot;He spoke with a pronounced Australian accent - a bad cockney. He stared
at Somers for a few seconds, then looked away.He asked the usual questions, how Richard liked Australia, how long he
had been there, how long he thought of staying. The two didn't get into
any easy harmony.Then he began to put a few shrewd questions concerning the Fascisti and
Socialisti in Italy, the appropriation of the land by the peasants, and
so on; then about Germany, the actual temper of the working people, the
quality of their patriotism since the war, and so on.&quot;You understand,&quot; said Somers, &quot;I don't pretend to give anything but
personal impressions. I have no claim to knowledge, whatever.&quot;&quot;That's all right, Mr. Somers. I want your impressions. What they call
knowledge is like any other currency, it's liable to depreciate. Sound
valuable knowledge to-day may not be worth the paper it's printed on
to-morrow - like the Austrian krone. We're no slaves to facts. Give us
your impressions.&quot;He spoke with a peculiar kind of bitterness, that showed passion too.
They talked about Europe for some time. The man could listen: listen
with his black eyes too. Watchful, always watchful, as if he expected
some bird to fly suddenly out of the speaker's face. He was
well-informed, and seemed to weigh and judge everything he heard as he
heard it.&quot;Why, when I left Europe it seemed to me socialism was losing ground
everywhere - in Italy especially. In 1920 it was quite a living, exciting
thing, in Italy. It made people insolent, usually, but it lifted them up
as well. Then it sort of fizzled down, and last year there was only the
smoke of it: and a nasty sort of disappointment and disillusion, a
grating sort of irritation. Florence, Siena - hateful! The Fascisti risen
up and taking on airs, all just out of a sort of spite. The Dante
festival at Florence, and the King there, for example. Just set your
teeth on edge, ugh! - with their &quot;Savoia!&quot; All false and out of spite.&quot;&quot;And what do you attribute that to, Mr. Somers?&quot;&quot;Why, I think the Socialists didn't QUITE believe in their own
socialism, so everybody felt let down. In Italy, particularly, it seemed
to me they were on the brink of a revolution. And the King was ready to
abdicate, and the Church was ready to make away with its possessions: I
know that. Everything ready for a flight. And then the Socialists
funked. They just funked. They daren't make a revolution, because then
they'd be responsible for the country. And they DAREN'T. And so the
Fascisti, seeing the Socialists in a funk, got up and began to try to
kick their behinds.&quot;Mr. Struthers nodded his head slowly.&quot;I suppose that is so,&quot; he said. &quot;I suppose that's what it amounts to,
they didn't believe in what they were doing. But then they're a
childish, excitable people, with no stability.&quot;&quot;But it seems to me socialism hasn't got the spark in it to make a
revolution. Not in any country. It hasn't got the spunk, either. There's
no spunk in it.&quot;&quot;What is there any spunk in?&quot; asked the other man, a sort of bitter fire
corroding in his eyes. &quot;Where do you find any spunk?&quot;&quot;Oh, nowhere,&quot; said Richard.There was a silence. Struthers looked out of the window as if he didn't
know what to say next, and he played irritably with a blotter on the
desk, with his right hand. Richard also sat uncomfortably silent.&quot;Nowhere any spunk?&quot; said Struthers, in his flat metallic voice.&quot;No,&quot; said Richard.And again the uncomfortable silence.&quot;There was plenty of spunk in the war,&quot; said Struthers.&quot;Of a sort. And because they felt they HAD to, not from choice.&quot;&quot;And mayn't they feel they HAVE to again?&quot; said Struthers, smiling
rather grimly.The two men eyed one another.&quot;What'll make them?&quot; asked Richard.&quot;Oh - circumstances.&quot;&quot;Ah well - if circumstances.&quot; Richard was almost rude. &quot;I know if it was
a question of WAR the majority of returned soldiers would join up in a
month - in a week. You hear it over and over again from the Diggers here.
The war was the only time they ever felt properly alive. But then they
moved because they hated the Germans - self-righteously hated them. And
they can't quite bring it off, to hate the capitalist with a
self-righteous hate. They don't hate him. They know that if they
themselves got a chance to make a pile of money and be capitalists,
they'd JUMP at it. You can't work up a hate except on fear. And they
DON'T fear the capitalist, and you can't make them. The most they'll do
is sneer about him.&quot;Struthers still fidgetted with the blotter, with his thin, very red,
hairy hand, and abstractedly stared at the desk in front of him.&quot;And what does all that mean, in your estimation, Mr. Somers?&quot; he asked
dryly, looking nervously up.&quot;That you'll never get them to act. You'll never get Labour, or any of
the Socialists, to make a revolution. They just won't act. Only the
Anarchists might - and they're too few.&quot;&quot;I'm afraid they are growing more.&quot;&quot;Are they? Of that I know nothing. I should have thought they were
growing fewer.&quot;Mr. Struthers did not seem to hear this. At least he did not answer. He
sat with his head dropped, fingering the blotter, rather like a boy who
is being told things he hates to hear, but which he doesn't deny.At last he looked up, and the fighting look was in the front of his
eyes.&quot;It may be as you say, Mr. Somers,&quot; he replied. &quot;Men may not be ready
yet for any great change. That does not make the change less inevitable.
It's coming, and it's got to come. If it isn't here to-day, it will be
here next century, at least. Whatever you may say, the socialistic and
communal ideal is a great ideal, which will be fulfilled when men are
ready. We aren't impatient. If revolution seems a premature jump - and
perhaps it does - then we can go on, step by step, towards where we
intend to arrive at last. And that is, State Ownership, and
International Labour Control. The General Confederation of Labour, as
perhaps you know, does not aim at immediate revolutions. It wants to
make the great revolution by degrees. Step by step, by winning political
victories in each country, by having new laws passed by our insistence,
we intend to advance more slowly, but more surely towards the goal we
have in sight.&quot;Now, Mr. Somers, you are no believer in capitalism, and in this
industrial system as we have it. If I judge you correctly from your
writings, you are no lover of the great Washed Middle Classes. They are
more than washed, they are washed out. And I think in your writings you
say as much. You want a new spirit in society, a new bond between men.
You want a new bond between men. Well, so do I, so do we. We realise
that if we are going to go ahead we need first and foremost SOLIDARITY.
Where we fail in our present position is in our lack of solidarity.&quot;And how are we to get it? You suggest us the answer in your writings.
We must have a new bond between men, the bond of real brotherhood. And
why don't we find that bond sufficiently among us? Because we have been
brought up from childhood to mistrust ourselves and to mistrust each
other. We have been brought up in a kind of fetish worship. We are like
tribes of savages with their witch-doctors. And who are our
witch-doctors, our medicine-men? Why, they are professors of science and
professors of medicine and professors of law and professors of religion,
all of whom thump on their tom-tom drums and overawe us and take us in.
And they take us in with the clever cry, &quot;Listen to us, and you will get
on, get on, get on, you will rise up into the middle classes and become
one of the great washed.&quot;&quot;The trick of this only educated men like yourself see through. The
working man can't see through it. HE can't see that, for every one that
GETS ON, you must have five hundred fresh slavers and toilers to produce
the graft. Tempt all men to get on, and it's like holding a carrot in
front of five thousand asses all harnessed to your machine. One ass gets
the carrot, and all the others have done your pulling for you.&quot;Now what we want is a new bond between fellow-men. We've got to knock
down the middle-class fetish and the middle-class medicine-men. But
you've got to build up as you knock down. You've got to build up the
real fellow-feeling between fellow-men. You've got to teach us working
men to trust one another, absolutely trust one another, and to take all
our trust away from the Great Washed and their medicine men who bleed us
like leeches. Let us mistrust them - but let us trust one another. First
and foremost, let us trust one another, we working men.&quot;Now Mr. Somers, you are a working man's son. You know what I'm talking
about. Isn't it right, what I say? And isn't it feasible?&quot;A strange glow had come into his large black eyes, something glistening
and half-sweet, fixing itself on you. You felt drawn towards a strange
sweetness - perhaps poisonous. Yet it touched Richard on one of his
quivering strings - the latent power that is in man to-day, to love his
near mate with a passionate, absolutely trusting love. Whitman says the
love of comrades. We say, the mate love. &quot;He is my mate.&quot; A depth of
unfathomed, unrealised love can go into that phrase! &quot;My mate is waiting
for me,&quot; a man says, and turns away from wife, children, mother and all.
The love of a man for his mate.Now Richard knew what Struthers wanted. He wanted this love, this
mate-trust called into consciousness and highest honour. He wanted to
set it where Whitman tried to set his Love of Comrades. It was to be the
new tie between men, in the new democracy. It was to be the new
passional bond in the new society. The trusting love of a man for his
mate.Our society is based on the family, the love of a man for his wife and
his children, or for his mother and brothers. The family is our social
bedrock and limit. Whitman said the next, broader, more unselfish rock
should be the Love of Comrades. The sacred relation of a man to his
mate, his fellow man.If our society is going to develop a new great phase, developing from
where we stand now, it must accept this new relationship as the new
sacred social bond, beyond the family. You can't make bricks without
straw. That is, you can't hold together the friable mixture of modern
mankind without a new cohesive principle, a new unifying passion. And
this will be the new passion of a man's absolute trust in his mate, his
love for his mate.Richard knew this. But he had learned something else as well. He had
learned the great danger of the new passion, which as yet lay only half
realised and half recognised, half effective.Human love, human trust, are always perilous, because they break down.
The greater the love, the greater the trust, and the greater the peril,
the greater the disaster. Because to place absolute trust on another
human being is in itself a disaster, both ways, since each human being
is a ship that must sail its own course, even if it go in company with
another ship. Two ships may sail together to the world's end. But lock
them together in mid-ocean and try to steer both with one rudder, and
they will smash one another to bits. So it is when one individual seeks
absolutely to love, or trust, another. Absolute lovers always smash one
another, absolute trusters the same. Since man has been trying
absolutely to love women, and women to love man, the human species has
almost wrecked itself. If now we start a still further campaign of men
loving and absolutely trusting each other, comrades or mates, heaven
knows the horror we are laying up.And yet, love is the greatest thing between human beings, men and women,
men and men, women and women, when it is love, when it happens. But when
human love starts out to lock individuals together, it is just courting
disaster.Man-and-woman love is a disaster nowadays. What a holy horror
man-and-man love would be: mates or comrades!What is it then that is wrong? Why, human beings CAN'T absolutely love
one another. Each man DOES kill the thing he loves, by sheer dint of
loving it. Is love then just a horror in life?Ah no. This individuality which each of us has got and which makes him a
wayward, wilful, dangerous, untrustworthy quantity to every other
individual, because every individuality is bound to react at some time
against every other individuality, without exception - or else lose its
own integrity; because of the inevitable necessity of each individual to
react away from any other individual, at certain times, human love is
truly a relative thing, not an absolute. It CANNOT be absolute.Yet the human heart must have an absolute. It is one of the conditions
of being human. The only thing is the God who is the source of all
passion. Once go down before the God-passion and human passions take
their right rhythm. But human love without the God-passion always kills
the thing it loves. Man and woman virtually are killing each other with
the love-will now. What would it be when mates, or comrades, broke down
in their absolute love and trust? Because, without the polarized
God-passion to hold them stable at the centre, break down they would.
With no deep God who is source of all passion and life to hold them
separate and yet sustained in accord, the loving comrades would smash
one another, and smash all love, all feeling as well. It would be a rare
gruesome sight.Any more love is a hopeless thing, till we have found again, each of us
for himself, the great dark God who alone will sustain us in loving one
another. Till then, best not play with more fire.Richard knew this, and it came to him again powerfully, under the dark
eyes of Mr. Struthers.&quot;Yes,&quot; he answered slowly. &quot;I know what you mean, and you know I know.
And it's probably your only chance of carrying Socialism through. I
don't really know how much it is feasible. But - .&quot;&quot;Wait a minute, Mr. Somers. You are the man I have been waiting for: all
except the but. Listen to me a moment further. You know our situation
here in Australia. You know that Labour is stronger here, perhaps, more
unopposed than in any country in the world. We might do anything. Then
why do we do nothing? You know as well as I do. Because there is no real
unifying principle among us. We're not together, we aren't one. And
probably you never WILL be able to unite Australians on the wage
question and the State Ownership question alone. They don't care enough.
It doesn't really touch them emotionally. And they need to be touched
emotionally, brought together that way. Once that was done, we'd be a
grand, solid working-class people; grand, unselfish: a real PEOPLE.
&quot;When wilt thou save the People, Oh God of Israel, when?&quot; It looks as if
the God of Israel would never save them. We've got to save ourselves.&quot;Now you know quite well, Mr. Somers, we're an unstable, unreliable body
to-day, the Labour Party here in Australia. And why? Because in the
first place we haven't got any voice. We want a voice. Think of it,
we've got no real Labour newspaper in Sydney - or in Australia. How CAN
we be united? We've no voice to call us together. And why don't we have
a paper of our own? Well, why? Nobody has the initiative. What would be
the good, over here, of a grievance-airing rag like your London Daily
Herald? It wouldn't be taken any more seriously than any other rag. It
would have no real effect. Australians are a good bit subtler and more
disillusioned than the English working classes. You can throw
Australians chaff, and they'll laugh at it. They may even pretend to
peck it up. But all the time they KNOW, and they're not taken in. The
Bulletin would soon help them out, if they were. They've got a natural
sarcastic turn, have the Australians. They'll do imbecile things:
because one thing is pretty well as good as another, to them. They don't
care.&quot;Then what's the good starting another Red rag, if the bull won't run at
it? And this Australian bull may play about with a red rag, but it won't
get his real dander up.&quot;No, you've got to give them something to appeal to the deeper man in
them. That deeper man is waiting to be appealed to. And we're waiting
for the right individual to come along to put the appeal to them.&quot;Now, Mr. Somers, here's your chance. I'm in a position to ask you,
won't you help us to bring out a sincere, CONSTRUCTIVE Socialist paper,
not a grievance airer, but a paper that calls to the constructive spirit
in men? Deep calleth to deep. And the trouble with us here is, no one
calls to our deeps, they lie there stagnant. I can't do it, I'm too
grimy. It wants a deep, fresh nature, and I'm too stale.&quot;Now Mr. Somers, you're the son of a working man. You were born of the
People. You haven't turned your back on them, have you, now that you're
a well-known gentleman?&quot;&quot;No, no,&quot; said Richard, laughing at the irony.&quot;Then here is your work before you. Come and breathe the breath of life
into us, through the printed word. Come and take charge of a true
People's paper for us. We needn't make it a daily. Make it a
twice-weekly. And let it appeal to the Australian, to his heart, for his
heart is the right place to appeal to. Let it breathe the new air of
trust and comradeship into us. We are ready for it: dying for it. Show
us how to BELIEVE in one another, with all our hearts. Show us that the
issue isn't just the wage issue, or who holds the money. It's
brother-love at last, on which Christ's Democracy is bound to rest. It's
the living People. It is man to man at last.&quot;The red face of Willie Struthers seemed to glow with fire, and his black
eyes had a strange glisten as he watched Richard's face. Richard's pale,
sombre face showed that he was moved. There was a strange excitement, a
deep, exciting vibration in the air, as if something secret were taking
place. Jaz in his corner sat silent as a mouse, his knees wide apart,
his elbows on his knees, his head dropped. Richard's eyes at length met
the black, excited, glistening eyes of the other man, and he felt that
something in the glisten was bearing him down, as a snake bears down a
bird. Himself the bird.But his heart was big within him, swollen in his breast. Because in
truth he did love the working people, he did know them capable of a
great, generous love for one another. And he did also believe, in a way,
that they were capable of building up this great Church of Christ, the
great beauty of a People, upon the generous passion of mate-love. All
this theoretical socialism started by Jews like Marx, and appealing only
to the will-to-power in the masses, making money the whole crux, this
has cruelly injured the working people of Europe. For the working people
of Europe were generous by nature, and money was not their prime
passion. All this political socialism - all politics, in fact - has
conspired to make money the only god. It has been a great treacherous
conspiracy against the generous heart of the people. And that heart is
betrayed: and knows it.Then can't the injury be remedied? Can't the working men be called back,
man to man, to a generous opening of the heart to one another, money
forgotten? Can't a new great inspiration of belief in the love of mates
be breathed into the white Peoples of the world, and a new day be built
on this belief?It can be done. It could be done. Only, the terrible stress, the strain
on the hearts of men, if as human beings the whole weight of the living
world is to rest on them. Each man with the poles of the world resting
on his heart. Men would go mad.&quot;You see,&quot; stammered Richard, &quot;it needs more than a belief of men in
each other.&quot;&quot;But what else is there to believe in? Quacks? Medicinemen? Scientists
and politicians?&quot;&quot;It DOES need some sort of religion.&quot;&quot;Well then - well then - the religious question is ticklish, especially
here in Australia. But all the churches are established on Christ. And
Christ says Love one another.&quot;Richard laughed suddenly.&quot;That makes Christ into another political agent,&quot; he said.&quot;Well then - I'm not deep enough for these matters. But surely you know
how to square it with religion. Seems to me it IS religion - love one
another.&quot;&quot;Without a God.&quot;&quot;Well - as I say - it's Christ's teaching, and that ought to be God
enough.&quot;Richard was silent, his heart heavy. It all seemed so far from the dark
God he wished to serve, the God from whom the dark, sensual passion of
love emanates, not only the spiritual love of Christ. He wanted men once
more to refer the sensual passion of love sacredly to the great dark
God, the ithyphallic, of the first dark religions. And how could that be
done, when each dry little individual ego was just mechanically set
against any such dark flow, such ancient submission? As for instance
Willie Struthers at this minute. Struthers didn't mind Christ. Christ
could easily be made to subserve his egoistic purpose. But the first,
dark, ithyphallic God whom men had once known so tremendous - Struthers
had no use for Him.&quot;I don't think I can do it. I don't think I've the right touch,&quot; said
Richard slowly.&quot;Nay, Mr. Somers, don't you be a funker, now. This is the work you were
born for. Don't leave us in the lurch.&quot;&quot;I shouldn't be doing what you want me to do.&quot;&quot;Do what seems best to yourself. We'll risk it. Make your own
conditions. I know as far as money goes you won't be hard. But take the
job on, now. It's been waiting for you, waiting for you to come out
here. Don't funk at the last minute.&quot;&quot;I won't promise at this minute,&quot; said Richard, rising to escape. &quot;I
want to go now. I will tell you within a week. You might send me details
of your scheme for the paper. Will you? And I'll think about it hard.&quot;Mr. Struthers watched him as if he would read his soul. But Richard
wasn't going to have his soul read by force.&quot;Very well. I'll see you have the whole scheme of the proposal
to-morrow. I don't think you'll be able to run away from it.&quot;Richard was thankful to get out of Canberra Hall. It was like escaping
from one of the medical-examination rooms in the war. He and Jaz went in
silence down the crowded, narrow pavement of George Street, towards the
Circular Quay. Richard called at the General Post-office in Martin
Place. As he came out again, and stood on the steps folding the stamps
he had bought, seeing the sun down Pitt Street, the people hurrying, the
flowers at the corner, the pink spread of Bulletins for sale at the
corner of George Street, the hansom-cabs and taxis standing peacefully
in the morning shadow of the post-office, suddenly the whole thing
switched right away from him. He hailed a hansom.&quot;Jaz,&quot; he said, &quot;I want to drive round the Botanical Gardens and round
the spit there - and I want to look at the peacocks and cockatoos.&quot;Jaz climbed in with him. &quot;Right-O!&quot; said the cabby, hearing the order,
and they clock-clocked away up the hill to Macquarie Street.&quot;You know, Jaz,&quot; said Richard, looking with joy at the blue harbour
inlet, where the Australian &quot;fleet&quot; lay rusting to bits, with a few gay
flags; &quot;you know, Jaz, I shan't do it. I shan't do anything. I just
don't care about it.&quot;&quot;You don't?&quot; said Jaz, with a sudden winsome smile.&quot;I try to kid myself that I care about mankind and its destiny. And I
have fits of wistful love for the working men. But at the bottom I'm as
hard as a mango nut. I don't care about them all. I don't really care
about anything, no I don't. I just don't care, so what's the good of
fussing.&quot;&quot;Why no,&quot; said Jaz, again with a quick smile.&quot;I feel neither good nor bad. I feel like a fox that has gnawed his tail
off and so escaped out of a trap. It seems like a trap to me, all this
social business and this saving mankind. Why can't mankind save itself?
It can if it wants to. I'm a fool. I neither want love nor power. I like
the world and I like to be alone in it, by myself. What do you want,
Jaz?&quot;Richard was like a child escaped from school, escaped from his necessity
to BE something and to DO something. They had jogged past the palm trees
and the grass of the gardens, and the blue wrens had cocked their
preposterous tails. They jogged to the end of the promontory, under wild
trees, and Richard looked at the two lobes of the harbour, blue water on
either side, and another part of the town beyond.&quot;Now take us back to the cockatoos,&quot; he said to the cabby.Richard loved the look of Australia, that marvellous soft flower-blue of
the air, and the sombre grey of the earth, the foliage, the brown of the
low rocks: like the dull pelts of kangaroos. It had a wonder and a
far-awayness, even here in the heart of Sydney. All the shibboleths of
mankind are so trumpery. Australia is outside everything.&quot;I couldn't exactly say,&quot; Jaz answered. &quot;You've got a bit of an
Australian look this morning about you,&quot; he added with a smile.&quot;I feel Australian. I feel a new creature. But what's the outcome?&quot;&quot;Oh, you'll come back to caring, I should think: for the sake of having
something to care about. That's what most of them do. They want to turn
bushrangers for six months, and then they get frightened of themselves,
and come back and want to be good citizens.&quot;&quot;Bushranger? But Australia's like an open door with the blue beyond. You
just walk out of the world and into Australia. And it's just somewhere
else. All those nations left behind in their schoolrooms, fussing. Let
them fuss. This is Australia, where one can't care.&quot;Jaz sat rather pale, and ten times more silent than ever.&quot;I expect you've got yourself to reckon with, no matter where you are.
That's why most Australians have to fuss about something - politics, or
horse-racing, or football. Though a man can go empty in Australia, if he
likes: as you've said yourself,&quot; replied he.&quot;Then I'll go empty,&quot; said Richard. &quot;What makes YOU fuss with Kangaroo
and Struthers, Jaz?&quot;&quot;Me?&quot; The smile was slow and pale. &quot;Go into the middle of Australia and
see how empty it is. You can't face emptiness long. You have to come
back and do something to keep from being frightened at your own
emptiness, and everything else's emptiness. It may be empty. But it's
wicked, and it'll kill you if it can. Something comes out of the
emptiness, to kill you. You have to come back and do things with
mankind, to forget.&quot;&quot;It's wonderful to be empty. It's wonderful to feel this blue globe of
emptiness of the Australian air. It shuts everything out,&quot; protested
Richard.&quot;You'll be an Aussie yet,&quot; smiled Jaz slowly.&quot;Shall I regret it?&quot; asked Richard.The eyes of the two men met. In the pale grey eyes of Jaz something
lurking, like an old, experienced consciousness looking across at the
childish consciousness of Somers, almost compassionately: and half in
mockery.&quot;You'll change back before you regret it,&quot; he said.&quot;Are you wise, Jaz? And am I childish?&quot; Richard's look suddenly changed
also to mockery. &quot;If you're wise, Jaz, why do you wander round like a
lost soul? Because you do. And what takes you to Struthers, if you
belong to Kangaroo?&quot;&quot;I'm secretary for the coal- and timber-merchants' union,&quot; said Jaz
quietly.They got out of the cab to look at the aviaries. Wonderful,
brilliant-coloured little birds, the love-birds self-consciously
smirking. &quot;Hello!&quot; - pronounced pure Australian-cockney: &quot;Helleow! Hello!
Hello! Hello Cocky! What yer want?&quot; This in a more-than-human voice from
a fine sulphur-crested cockatoo. &quot;Hello Cocky!&quot; His thick black tongue
worked in his narrow mouth. So absolutely human the sound, and yet a
bird's. It was startling, and very funny. The two men talked to the
cockatoos, fascinated and amused, for a quarter of an hour. The emu came
prancing up, with his alert, large, sticking-out eyes and his whiskers.
An alert gentleman, with the dark Australian eye. Very wide-awake, and
yet far off in the past. And a remote, alert, sharp gentleness belonging
to far past twilight ages, before enemies and iron weapons were
perfected. A very remote, dirt-brown gentleman from the lost plains of
time. The peacock rustling his blue fireworks seemed a sort of
nouveau-riche in comparison.Somers went in the evening of this memorable day to dine with Kangaroo.
The other man was quiet, and seemed preoccupied.&quot;I went to Willie Struthers this morning,&quot; Somers said.Kangaroo looked at him sharply through his pince-nez. On the subtle face
of Somers a small, wicked smile hovered like a half visible flame. But
it was his alive, beautiful face. And his whole person seemed magnetic.&quot;Who took you there?&quot; asked Kangaroo sharply.&quot;Jaz.&quot;&quot;Jaz is a meddlesome-Patty. Well, and what then?&quot;&quot;I think Willie is rather a terror. I wouldn't like to have to spend my
life with him. But he's shrewd. Only I don't like him
physically - something thin and hairy and spiderish. I didn't want to
touch him. But he's a force, he's SOMETHING.&quot;Kangaroo looked puzzled, and his face took a heavy, stupid look.&quot;He wouldn't want you to touch him,&quot; he barked. &quot;He didn't offer to
shake hands, did he?&quot;&quot;No, thank goodness,&quot; said Somers, thinking of the red, dry,
thin-skinned hand.There was a hostile silence from Kangaroo. He knew that this subtle,
attractive Somers with the faint glow about him, like an aura, was
venomous. And yet he was helplessly attracted to him.&quot;And what do you mean about his being something? Some more Trewhella?&quot;&quot;Perhaps. I couldn't help feeling that Struthers was shrewder than you
are - in a way baser - but for that reason more likely to be effectual.&quot;Kangaroo watched Richard for a long time in silence.&quot;I know why Trewhella took you there,&quot; he said sulkily.&quot;Why?&quot;&quot;Oh, I know why. And what have you decided?&quot;&quot;Nothing.&quot;There was a long and obstinate silence. The two men were at loggerheads,
and neither would make the first move.&quot;You seem very thick with Trewhella,&quot; said Kangaroo at last.&quot;Not thick,&quot; said Richard. &quot;Celts - Cornish, Irish - they always interest
me. What do you imagine is at the bottom of Jaz?&quot;&quot;Treachery.&quot;&quot;Oh, not only,&quot; laughed Somers.&quot;Then why do you ask me, if you know better?&quot;&quot;Because I don't really get to the bottom of him.&quot;&quot;There is no bottom to get to - he's the instinctive traitor, as they all
are.&quot;&quot;Oh, surely not only that.&quot;&quot;I see nothing else. They would like the white civilisation to be
trampled underfoot piecemeal. And at the same time they live on us like
parasites.&quot; Kangaroo glowered fiercely.&quot;There's something more,&quot; replied Richard. &quot;They don't believe in our
gods, in our ideals. They remember older gods, older ideals, different
gods: before the Jews invented a mental Jehovah, and a spiritual Christ.
They are nearer the magic of the animal world.&quot;&quot;Magic of the animal world!&quot; roared Kangaroo. &quot;What does that nonsense
mean? Are you traitor to your own human intelligence?&quot;&quot;All too human,&quot; smiled Richard.Kangaroo sat up very straight, and looked at Somers. Somers still smiled
faintly and luminously.&quot;Why are you so easily influenced?&quot; said Kangaroo, with a certain cold
reproof. &quot;You are like a child. I know that is part of the charm of your
nature, that you are naive like a child, but sometimes you are childish
rather than childlike. A perverse child.&quot;&quot;Let me be a perverse child then,&quot; laughed Somers, with a flash of
attractive laughter at Kangaroo. It frightened the big man, this
perverse mood. If only he could have got the wicked light out of Lovat's
face, and brought back the fire of earnestness. And yet, as an
individual, he was attracted to the little fellow now, like a moth to a
candle: a great lumbering moth to a small, but dangerous flame of a
candle.&quot;I'm sure it's Struthers' turn to set the world right, before it's
yours,&quot; Somers said.&quot;Why are you sure?&quot;&quot;I don't know. I thought so when I saw him. You're too human.&quot;Kangaroo was silent, and offended.&quot;I don't think that is a final reason,&quot; he replied.&quot;For me it is. No, I want one of the olives that the man took away. You
give one such good food, one forgets deep questions in your lovely
salad. Why don't you do as Jaz says, and back up the Reds for the time
being. Play your pawns and your bishops.&quot;&quot;You know that a bite from a hyaena means blood-poisoning,&quot; said
Kangaroo.&quot;Don't be solemn. You mean Willie Struthers? Yes, I wouldn't want to be
bitten. But if you are so sure of love as an all-ruling influence, and
so sure of the fidelity of the Diggers, through love, I should agree
with Jaz. Push Struthers where he wants to go. Let him proclaim the rule
of the People: let him nationalise all industries and resources, and
confiscate property above a certain amount: and bring the world about
his ears. Then you step in like a saviour. It's much easier to point to
a wrecked house, if you want to build something new, than to persuade
people to pull the house down and build it up in a better style.&quot;Kangaroo was deeply offended, mortified. Yet he listened.&quot;You are hopelessly facile, Lovat,&quot; he said gently. &quot;In the first place,
the greatest danger to the world to-day is anarchy, not bolshevism. It
is anarchy and unrule that are coming on us - and that is what I, as an
order-loving Jew and one of the half-chosen people, do not want. I want
one central principle in the world: the principle of love, the maximum
of individual liberty, the minimum of human distress. Lovat, you know I
am sincere, don't you?&quot;There was a certain dignity and pathos in the question.&quot;I do,&quot; replied Somers sincerely. &quot;But I am tired of one central
principle in the world.&quot;&quot;Anything else means chaos.&quot;&quot;There has to be chaos occasionally. And then, Roo, if you DO want a
benevolent fatherly autocracy, I'm sure you'd better step in after
there's been a bit of chaos.&quot;Kangaroo shook his head.&quot;Like a wayward child! Like a wayward child!&quot; he murmured. &quot;You are not
such a fool, Lovat, that you can't see that once you break the last
restraints on humanity to-day, it is the end. It is the end. Once burst
the flood-gates, and you'll never get the water back into control.
Never.&quot;&quot;Then let it distil up to heaven. I really don't care.&quot;&quot;But man, you are PERVERSE. What's the matter with you?&quot; suddenly
bellowed Kangaroo.They had gone into the study for coffee. Kangaroo stood with his head
dropped and his feet apart, his back to the fire. And suddenly he roared
like a lion at Somers. Somers started, then laughed.&quot;Even perversity has its points,&quot; he said.Kangaroo glowered like a massive cloud. Somers was standing staring at
the Durer etching of St. Jerome: he loved Durer. Suddenly, with a great
massive movement, Kangaroo caught the other man to his breast.&quot;Don't Lovat,&quot; he said, in a much moved voice, pressing the slight body
of the lesser man against his own big breast and body. &quot;Don't!&quot; he said,
with a convulsive tightening of the arm.Somers, squeezed so that he could hardly breathe, kept his face from
Kangaroo's jacket and managed to ejaculate:&quot;All right. Let me go and I won't.&quot;&quot;Don't thwart me,&quot; pleaded Kangaroo. &quot;Don't - or I shall have to break
all connection with you, and I love you so. I love you so. Don't be
perverse, and put yourself against me.&quot;He still kept Somers clasped against him, but not squeezed so hard. And
Somers heard over his own head the voice speaking with a blind yearning.
Not to himself. No. It was speaking over his head, to the void, to the
infinite or something tiresome like that. Even the words: &quot;I love you
so. I love you so.&quot; They made the marrow in Lovat's bones melt, but they
made his heart flicker even more devilishly.&quot;It is an impertinence, that he says he loves me,&quot; he thought to
himself. But he did not speak, out of regard for Kangaroo's emotion,
which was massive and genuine, even if Somers felt it missed his own
particular self completely.In those few moments when he was clasped to the warm, passionate body of
Kangaroo, Somers' mind flew with swift thought. &quot;He doesn't love ME,&quot; he
thought to himself. &quot;He just turns a great general emotion on me, like a
tap. I feel as cold as steel, in his clasp - and as separate. It is
presumption, his loving me. If he was in any way really AWARE of me,
he'd keep at the other end of the room, as if I was a dangerous little
animal. He wouldn't be hugging me if I were a scorpion. And I AM a
scorpion. So why doesn't he know it. Damn his love. He wants to FORCE
me.&quot;After a few minutes Kangaroo dropped his arm and turned his back. He
stood there, a great, hulked, black back. Somers thought to himself: &quot;If
I were a kestrel I'd stoop and strike him straight in the back of the
neck, and he'd die. He ought to die.&quot; Then he went and sat in his chair.
Kangaroo left the room.He did not come back for some time, and Lovat began to grow
uncomfortable. But the devilishness in his heart continued, broken by
moments of tenderness or pity or self-doubt. The gentleness was winning,
when Kangaroo came in again. And one look at the big, gloomy figure set
the devil alert like a flame again in the other man's heart.Kangaroo took his place before the fire again, but looked aside.&quot;Of course you understand,&quot; he began in a muffled voice, &quot;that it must
be one thing or the other. Either you are with me, and I FEEL you with
me: or you cease to exist for me.&quot;Somers listened with wonder. He admired the man for his absoluteness,
and his strange blind heroic obsession.&quot;I'm not really against you, am I?&quot; said Somers. And his own heart
answered, YES YOU ARE!&quot;You are not WITH me,&quot; said Kangaroo, bitterly.&quot;No,&quot; said Somers slowly.&quot;Then why have you deceived me, played with me,&quot; suddenly roared
Kangaroo. &quot;I could have killed you.&quot;&quot;Don't do that,&quot; laughed Somers, rather coldly.But the other did not answer. He was like a black cloud.&quot;I want to hear,&quot; said Kangaroo, &quot;your case against me.&quot;&quot;It's not a case, Kangaroo,&quot; said Richard, &quot;it's a sort of instinct.&quot;&quot;Against what?&quot;&quot;Why, against your ponderousness. And against your insistence. And
against the whole sticky stream of love, and the hateful will-to-love.
It's the will-to-love that I hate, Kangaroo.&quot;&quot;In me?&quot;&quot;In us all. I just hate it. It's a sort of syrup we HAVE to stew in, and
it's loathsome. Don't love me. Don't want to save mankind. You're so
awfully GENERAL, and your love is so awfully general: as if one were
only a cherry in the syrup. Don't love me. Don't want me to love you.
Let's be hard, separate men. Let's understand one another deeper than
love.&quot;&quot;Two human ants, in short,&quot; said Kangaroo, and his face was yellow.&quot;No, no. Two men. Let us go to the understanding that is deeper than
love.&quot;&quot;Is any understanding deeper than love?&quot; asked Kangaroo with a sneer.&quot;Why, yes, you know it is. At least between men.&quot;&quot;I'm afraid I don't know it. I know the understanding that is much LESS
than love. If you want me to have a merely commonplace acquaintance with
you, I refuse. That's all.&quot;&quot;We are neither of us capable of a quite commonplace acquaintance.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, I am,&quot; barked Kangaroo.&quot;I'm not. But you're such a Kangaroo, wanting to carry mankind in your
belly-pouch, cosy, with its head and long ears peeping out. You sort of
figure yourself a Kangaroo of Judah, instead of a Lion of Judah: Jehovah
with a great heavy tail and a belly-pouch. Let's get off it, and be men,
with the gods beyond us. I DON'T want to be godlike, Kangaroo. I like to
know the gods beyond me. Let's start as men, with the great gods beyond
us.&quot;He looked up with a beautiful candour in his face, and a diabolic bit of
mockery in his soul. For Kangaroo's face had gone like an angry wax
mask, with mortification. An angry wax mask of mortification, haughty
with a stiff, wooden haughtiness, and two little near-set holes for
eyes, behind glass pince-nez. Richard had a moment of pure hate for him.
in the silence. For Kangaroo refused to answer.&quot;What's the good, men trying to be gods?&quot; said Richard. &quot;You're a Jew,
and you must be Jehovah or nothing. We're Christians, all little Christs
walking without our crucifixes. Jaz is quite right to play us one
against the other. Struthers is the anti-christ, preaching love alone.
I'm tired, tired. I want to be a man, with the gods beyond me, greater
than me. I want the great gods, and my own mere manliness.&quot;&quot;It's that treacherous Trewhella,&quot; Kangaroo murmured to himself. Then he
seemed to be thinking hard.And then at last he lifted his head and looked at Somers. And now Somers
openly hated him. His face was arrogant, insolent, righteous.&quot;I am sorry I have made a mistake in you,&quot; he said. &quot;But we had better
settle the matter finally here. I think the best thing you can do is to
leave Australia. I don't think you can do me any serious damage with
your talk. I would ask you - before I warn you - not to try. That is all.
I should prefer now to be alone.&quot;He had become again hideous, with a long yellowish face and black eyes
close together, and a cold, mindless, dangerous hulk to his shoulders.
For a moment Somers was afraid of him, as of some great ugly idol that
might strike. He felt the intense hatred of the man coming at him in
cold waves. He stood up in a kind of horror, in front of the great,
close-eyed horrible thing that was now Kangaroo. Yes, a thing, not a
whole man. A great Thing, a horror.&quot;I am sorry if I have been foolish,&quot; he said, backing away from the
Thing. And as he went out of the door he made a quick movement, and his
heart melted in horror lest the Thing Kangaroo should suddenly lurch
forward and clutch him. If that happened, Kangaroo would have blood on
his hands. But Somers kept all his wits about him, and quickly, quietly
got his hat and walked to the hall door. It seemed like a dream, as if
it were miles to the outer door, as if his heart would burst before he
got there, as if he would never be able to undo the fastening of the
door.But he kept all his wits about him, and as by inspiration managed the
three separate locks of the strong door. Kangaroo had followed slowly,
awfully, behind, like a madman. If he came near enough to touch!Somers had the door opened, and looked round. The huge figure, the white
face with the two eyes close together, like a spider, approaching with
awful stillness. If the stillness suddenly broke, and he struck out!&quot;Good-night!&quot; said Somers, at the blind, horrible-looking face. And he
moved quickly down the stairs, though still not apparently in flight,
but going in that quick, controlled way that acts as a check on an
onlooker.He was thankful for the streets, for the people. But by bad luck, it was
Saturday night, when Sydney is all shut up, and the big streets seem
dark and dreary, though thronging with people. Dark streets, dark,
streaming people. And fear. One could feel such fear, in Australia.>



When a sincere man marries a wife, he has one or two courses open to
him, which he can pursue with that wife. He can propose to himself to be
(a) the lord and master who is honoured and obeyed, (b) the perfect
lover, (c) the true friend and companion. Of these (a) is now rather out
of date. The lord and master has been proved, by most women quite
satisfactorily, to be no more than a grown-up child, and his arrogance
is to be tolerated just as a little boy's arrogance is tolerated,
because it is rather amusing, and up to a certain point becoming. The
case of (b), the perfect lover, is the crux of all ideal marriage
to-day. But alas, not even the lord and master turns out such a fiasco
as does the perfect lover, ninety-nine times out of a hundred. The
perfect-lover marriage ends usually in a quite ghastly anti-climax,
divorce and horrors and the basest vituperation. Alas for the fact, as
compared with the ideal. A marriage of the perfect-lover type is bound
either to end in catastrophe, or to slide away towards (a) or (c). It
must either revert to a mild form of the lord-and-master marriage, and a
wise woman, who knows the sickeningness of catastrophes and the
ridiculous futility of second shots at the perfect-love paradise, often
wisely pushes the marriage back gradually into one of the little bays or
creeks of this Pacific ocean of marriage, lord-and-masterdom. Not that
either party really believes in the lordship of man. But you've got to
get into still water some time or other. The perfect-love business
inevitably turns out to be a wildly stormy strait, like the Straits of
Magellan, where two fierce and opposing currents meet and there is the
devil of a business trying to keep the bark of marriage, with the flag
of perfect-love at the mast, from dashing on a rock or foundering in the
heavy seas. Two fierce and opposing currents meet in the narrows of
perfect love. They may meet in blue and perfect weather, when the
albatross hovers in the great sky like a permanent benediction, and the
sea shimmers a second heaven. But you needn't wait long. The seas will
soon begin to rise, the ship to roll. And the waters of perfect
love - when once this love is consummated in marriage - become inevitably
a perfect hell of storms and furies.Then, as I say, the hymeneal bark either founders, or dashes on a rock,
or more wisely gets out of the clash of meeting oceans and takes one
tide or the other, where the flood has things all its own way. The woman
being to-day the captain of the marriage bark, either steers into the
vast Pacific waters of lord-and-masterdom, though never, of course,
hauling down the flag of perfect love; or else, much more frequently
these latter days, she steers into the rather grey Atlantic of true
friendship and companionship, still keeping the flag of perfect love
bravely afloat.And now the bark is fairly safe. In the great Pacific, the woman can
take the ease and warm repose of her new dependence, but she is usually
laughing up her sleeve. She lets the lord and master manage the ship,
but woe betide him if he seeks to haul down the flag of perfect love.
There is mutiny in a moment. And his chief officers and his crew, namely
his children and his household servants, are up and ready to put him in
irons at once, at a word from that wondrous goddess of the bark, the
wife of his bosom. It is Aphrodite, mistress of the seas, in her grand
capacity of motherhood and attendant wifehood. None the less, with a bit
of managing the hymeneal bark sails on across the great waters into
port. A lord and master is not much more than an upper servant while the
flag of perfect love is flying and the sea-mother is on board. But a
servant with the name of captain, and the pleasant job of sailing the
ship and giving the necessary orders. He feels it is quite all right. He
is supreme servant-in-command, while the mistress of mistresses smiles
as she suckles his children. She is suckling him too.Nevertheless, this is the course I would recommend young married women
to DRIFT INTO, after the first two years of &quot;perfect love&quot;.They won't often take my advice, I know that. Ha-ha! they will say. We
see through your lord-and-master tricks. Course East-North-East,
helmsman, into the safer and more populous waters of perfect
companionship. If we can't have one thing perfect we'll have another. If
it isn't exactly perfect love, it is perfect companionship, and the two
are pretty nearly one and the same.For woman, even more than man, when once she gets an idea into her head,
or worse, when once she gets HERSELF into her head, will have nothing
short of perfection. She simply will tolerate nothing short of
perfection. East-north-east then, into the democratic Atlantic of
PERFECT companionship.Well, they are grey waters, and the perfect companionship usually
resolves, subtly, and always under the perfect love flag, into a very
nearly perfect limited liability company, the bark steering nicely
according to profit and loss, and usually &quot;getting on&quot; fabulously. The
Golden Vanity. If this perfect love flag is a vanity, the
perfect-companionship management is certainly Golden. I would recommend
perfect-companionship to all those married couples who truly and
sincerely want TO GET ON.Now the good bark Harriet and Lovat had risen from the waves, like
Aphrodite's shell as well as Aphrodite, in the extremest waters of
perfect love. Love and love alone! Wide, wild, lonely waters, with the
great albatross like a sign of the cross, sloping in the immense
heavens. A sea to themselves, the waters of perfect love. And the good
ship Harriet and Lovat, with white sails spread, sailing with never a
master, like the boat of Dionysus, which steered of its own accord
across the waters, in the right direction mark you, to the sound of the
music of the dolphins, while the master of the ship put forth tendrils
of vine and purple bunches of grapes, and the grapes of themselves
dripped vinous down the throats of the true Dionysians. So sailed the
fair ship Harriet and Lovat in the waters of perfect love.I have not made up my mind whether she was a ship, or a bark, or a
schooner, technically speaking. Let us imagine her as any one of them.
Or perhaps she was a clipper, or a frigate, or a brig. All I insist is
that she was not a steam-boat with a funnel, as most vessels are
nowadays, sailing because they are stoked.Fair weather and foul alternated. Sometimes the brig Harriet and Lovat
skimmed along the path of the moon like a phantom: sometimes she lay
becalmed, while sharks flicked her bottom: then she drove into the most
awful hurricanes, and spun round in a typhoon: and yet behold her
sailing out through the glowing arch of a rainbow into halcyon waters
again. And so for years, till she began to look rather worn, but always
attractive. Her paint had gone, so her timbers now were sea-silvery. Her
sails were thin, but very white. The mainsail also was slit, and the
stun-sails had been carried away in a blizzard. As for the flag of
perfect love, the flag of the red-and-white rose upon the cross of
thorns, all on a field of azure, it was woefully frayed and faded. The
azure field was nearly tattered away, and the rose was fading into
invisibility.She had some awful weather, did the poor bark Harriet and Lovat. The
seas opened great jaws to swallow her, the treacherous seas of perfect
love, while cynical rocks gnashed their teeth at her, and unstable
heavens opened chasms of wind on her, and fierce, full-blooded lusty
bull-whales rushed at her and all but burst her timbers. Dazed and
battered, she wandered hither and thither on the seas of perfect love,
that she always had all to herself. Never another sail in sight, never
another ship in hail. Only sometimes the smoke of a steamer skirting the
horizon, making for one of the oceans.And now the Harriet and Lovat began to feel the pull of the two opposing
currents. It was as if she had a certain homesickness for one or other
of the populous oceans: she was weary of the lone and wasteful waters of
the sea of perfect love. Sometimes she drifted east-north-east towards
the Atlantic of true companionship. And then Lovat, seeing the long
swell of that grey sea, and the funnels of ships like a city suburb, put
the helm hard aport, and turned the ship about, and beat against a
horrible sea and wind till they got into the opposite drift. Then things
went a little easier, till Harriet saw before her the awful void opening
of the other ocean, and the great, dark-blue, dominant swell of the
waters, and the loneliness and the vastness and the feeling of being
overwhelmed. She looked at the mast and saw the flag of perfect love
falling limp, the faded rose of all roses dying at last.And in a moment when he was asleep, her almost lord-and-master, she
whipped the ship about and steered east-south-east into the heart of the
sea of perfect love, hoping to get into the current east-north-east and
so out into the open Atlantic. Then storms intolerable.Then they took to cruising the far, lone, desert fringes of the sea of
perfect love, utterly lonely and near the ice, the fringe of the seas of
death. There they cruised, in the remote waters on the edge of
extinction. And then they looked at one another.&quot;We will be perfect companions: you know how I love you,&quot; said Harriet,
of the good ship Harriet and Lovat.&quot;Never,&quot; said Lovat, of the same ship. &quot;I will be lord and master, but
ah, such a wonderful lord and master that it will be your bliss to
belong to me. Look, I have been sewing a new flag.&quot;She didn't even look at the flag.&quot;You!&quot; she exclaimed. &quot;You a lord and master! Why, don't you know that I
love you as no man ever was loved? You a lord and master! Ph! you look
it! Let me tell you I love you far, far more than ever you ought to be
loved, and you should acknowledge it.&quot;&quot;I would rather,&quot; said he, &quot;that you deferred your loving of me for a
while, and considered the new proposition. We shall never sail any
straight course at all, until you realise that I am lord and master, and
you my blissful consort. Supposing, now, you had the real Hermes for a
husband, Trismegistus. Would you not hold your tongue for fear you lost
him, and change from being a lover, and be a worshipper? Well, I am not
Hermes or Dionysus, but I am a little nearer to it than you allow. And I
want you to yield to my mastery and my divination, and let me put my
flag of a phoenix rising from a nest in flames in place of that old rose
on a field azure. The gules are almost faded out,&quot;&quot;It's a LOVELY design!&quot; she cried, looking at the new flag. &quot;I might
make a cushion-embroidery of it. But as a flag it's absurd. Of course,
you lonely phoenix, you are the bird and the ashes and the flames all by
yourself! You would be. Nobody else enters in at all. I - I am just
nowhere - I don't exist.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; he said, &quot;you are the nest.&quot;&quot;I'll watch it!&quot; she cried. &quot;Then you shall sleep on thorns, Mister.&quot;&quot;But consider,&quot; he said.&quot;That's what I am doing,&quot; she replied. &quot;Mr. Dionysus and Mr. Hermes and
Mr. Thinks-himself-grand. I've got one thing to tell you. Without ME
you'd be nowhere, you'd be nothing, you'd not be THAT,&quot; and she snapped
her fingers under his nose, a movement he particularly disliked.&quot;I agree,&quot; he replied, &quot;that without the nest the phoenix would
be - would be up a tree - would be in the air - would be nowhere, and
couldn't find a stable spot to resurrect in. The nest is as the body to
the soul: the cup that holds the fire, and in which the ashes fall to
take form again. The cup is the container and the sustainer.&quot;&quot;Yes, I've done enough containing and sustaining of you, my gentleman,
in the years I've known you. It's almost time you left off wanting so
much mothering. You can't live a moment without me.&quot;&quot;I admit that the phoenix without a nest is a bird absolutely without a
perch, he must dissipate in the air. But - .&quot;&quot;Then I'll make a cushion-cover of your flag, and you can rest on that.&quot;&quot;No, I'm going to haul down the flag of perfect love.&quot;&quot;Oh, are you! And sail without a flag? Just like you, destroy, destroy,
and nothing to put in its place.&quot;&quot;Yes, I want to put in its place this crowned phoenix rising from the
nest in flames. I want to set fire to our bark, Harriet and Lovat, and
out of the ashes construct the frigate, Hermes, which name still
contains the same reference, 'her' and 'me', but which has a higher
total significance.&quot;She looked at him speechless for some time. Then she merely said:&quot;You're mad,&quot; and left him with his flag in his hands.Nevertheless he was a determined little devil, as she knew to her cost,
and once he'd got an idea into his head not heaven nor hell nor Harriet
would ever batter it out. And now he'd got into his head this idea of
being lord and master, and Harriet's acknowledging him as such. Not just
verbally. No. Not under the flag of perfect love. No. Obstinate and
devilish as he was, he wanted to haul down the flag of perfect love, to
set fire to the bark Harriet and Lovat, to seat himself in glory on the
ashes, like a resurrected phoenix, with an imaginary crown on his head.
And she was to be a comfortable nest for his impertinence.In short, he was to be the lord and master, and she the humble slave.
Thank you. Or at the very best, she was to be a sort of domestic Mrs.
Gladstone, the Mrs. Gladstone of that old chestnut - who, when a female
friend was lamenting over the terrible state of affairs, in Ireland or
somewhere, and winding up her lament with: &quot;Terrible, terrible. But
there is One above&quot; - replied: &quot;Yes, he's just changing his socks. He'll
be down in a minute.&quot; Mr. Lovat was to be the One above, and she was to
be happy downstairs thinking that this lord, this master, this Hermes
cum Dionysus wonder, was comfortably changing his socks. Thank you
again. The man was mad.Yet he stuck to his guns. She was to submit to the mystic man and male
in him, with reverence, and even a little awe, like a woman before the
altar of the great Hermes. She might remember that he WAS only human,
that he had to change his socks if he got his feet wet, and that he
would make a fool of himself nine times out of ten. But - and the but was
emphatic as a thunderbolt - there was in him also the mystery and
lordship of - of Hermes, if you like - but the mystery and the lordship of
the forward-seeking male. That she must emphatically realise and bow
down to. Yes, bow down to. You can't have two masters of one ship:
neither can you have a ship without a master. The Harriet and Lovat had
been an experiment of ten years' endurance. Now she was to be broken up,
or burnt, so he said, and the non-existent Hermes was to take her place.You can't have two masters to one ship. And if it IS a ship: that is, if
it has a voyage to sail, a port to make, even a far direction to take,
into the unknown, then a master it must have. Harriet said it wasn't a
ship, it was a houseboat, and they could lie so perfectly here by the
Pacific for the rest of time - or be towed away to some other lovely spot
to house in. She could imagine no fairer existence. It was a houseboat.But he with his no, no, he almost drove her mad. The bark of their
marriage was a ship that must sail into uncharted seas, and he must be
the master, and she must be the crew, sworn on. She was to believe in
his adventure and deliver herself over to it; she was to believe in his
mystic vision of a land beyond this charted world, where new life rose
again.And she just couldn't. His land beyond the land men knew, where men were
more than they are now: she couldn't believe in it. &quot;Then believe in
ME,&quot; he said desperately. &quot;I know you too well,&quot; she replied. And so, it
was an impasse.Him, a lord and master! Why, he was not really lord of his own bread and
butter; next year they might both be starving. And he was not even
master of himself, with his ungovernable furies and his uncritical
intimacies with people: even people like Jack Callcott, whom Harriet
quite liked, but whom she would never have taken seriously. Yet there
was Lovat pouring himself out to him. Pah - believe! How could one
believe in such a man! If he had been naturally a master of men, general
of an army, or manager of some great steel works, with thousands of men
under him - then, yes, she could have acknowledged the MASTER part of the
bargain, if not the lord. Whereas, as it was, he was the most forlorn
and isolated creature in the world, without even a dog to his command.
He was so isolated he was hardly a man at all, among men. He had
absolutely nothing but her. Among men he was like some unbelievable
creature - an emu, for example. Like an emu in the streets or in a
railway carriage. He might well say phoenix.All he could do was to try and come it over her with this revolution
rubbish and a stunt of &quot;male&quot; activity. If it were even real!He had nothing but her, absolutely. And that was why, presumably, he
wanted to establish this ascendancy over her, assume this arrogance. And
so that he could refute her, deny her, and imagine himself a unique
male. He WANTED to be male and unique, like a freak of a phoenix. And
then go prancing off into connections with men like Jack Callcott and
Kangaroo, and saving the world. She could NOT stand these
world-saviours. And she, she must be safely there, as a nest for him,
when he came home with his feathers pecked. That was it. So that he
could imagine himself absolutely and arrogantly It, he would turn her
into a nest, and sit on her and overlook her, like the one and only
phoenix in the desert of the world, gurgling hymns of salvation.Poor Harriet! No wonder she resented it. Such a man, such a man to be
tied to and tortured by!And poor Richard! To be a man, and to have a man's uneasy soul for his
bed-fellow.But he kicked against the pricks. He did not yet submit to the fact
which he HALF knew: that before mankind would accept any man for a king,
and before Harriet would ever accept him, Richard Lovat, as a lord and
master, he, the selfsame Richard who was so strong on kingship, must
open the doors of his soul and let in a dark Lord and Master for
himself, the dark god he had sensed outside the door. Let him once truly
submit to the dark majesty, break open his doors to this fearful god who
is master, and enters us from below, the lower doors; let himself once
admit a Master, the unspeakable god: and the rest would happen.The fire began to burn the stick,
The stick began to beat the dog.
The dog began to bite the pig.
The pig began to go over the bridge,
And so the old woman got home that night...>



Kangaroo died and had a great funeral, but Richard did not go up. He had
fixed his berths on the Manganui, and would sail away in twenty days. To
America - the United States, a country that did not attract him at all,
but which seemed to lie next in his line of destiny.Meanwhile he wandered round in the Australian spring. Already he loved
it. He loved the country he had railed at so loudly a few months ago.
While he &quot;cared&quot; he had to rail at it. But the care once broken inside
him it had a deep mystery for him, and a dusky, far-off call that he
knew would go on calling for long ages before it got any adequate
response, in human beings. From far off, from down long fern-dark
avenues there seemed to be the voice of Australia, calling low.He loved to wander in the bush at evening, when night fell so delicately
yet with such soft mystery. Then the sky behind the trees was all soft,
rose pink, and the great gum-trees ran up their white limbs into the air
like quicksilver, plumed at the tips with dark tufts. Like rivulets the
white boughs ran up from the white trunk: or like great nerves, with
nerve-like articulations, branching into the dusk. Then he would stand
under a tall fern-tree, and look up through the whorl of lace above his
head, listening to the birds calling in the evening stillness, the
parrots making a chinking noise.Sitting at the edge of the bush he looked at the settlement and the sea
beyond. He had quite forgotten how he used to grumble at the haphazard
throwing of bungalows here and there and anywhere: how he used to hate
the tin roofs, and the untidiness, It recalled to him the young
Australian captain: &quot;Oh, how I liked the rain on the tin roofs of the
huts at the war. It reminded me of Australia.&quot;&quot;And now,&quot; thought Richard to himself, &quot;tin roofs and scattered shanties
will remind me of Australia. They seem to me beautiful, though it's a
fact they have nothing to do with beauty.&quot;But, oh, the deep mystery of joy it was to him to sit at the edge of the
bush as twilight fell, and look down at the township. The bungalows were
built mostly on the sides of the slopes. They had no foundations, but
stood on brickwork props, which brought them up to the level. There they
stood on the hillsides, on their short legs, with darkness under their
floors, the little bungalows, looking as if they weighed nothing.
Looking flimsy, made of wood with corrugated zinc roofs. Some of them
were painted dark red, roofs and all, some were painted grey, some were
wooden simply. Many had the white-grey zinc roofs, pale and delicate. At
the back was always one big water-butt of corrugated iron, a big round
tank painted dark-red, the corrugation ribs running round, and a jerky,
red-painted pipe coming down from the eaves. Sometimes there were two of
these tanks: and a thin, not very tidy woman in a big straw hat stooping
to the tap at the bottom of the tank. The roof came down low, making a
long shade over the wooden verandahs. Nearly always a little loggia at
the back, from which the house-door opened. And this little verandah was
the woman's kitchen; there she had a little table with her dirty dishes,
which she was going to wash up. And a cat would be trotting around, as
if it had not an enemy in the world, while from the verandah a parrot
called.The bungalows near the bush edge had odd bits of garden nipped out of
the paddocks and carefully railed in: then another little enclosure for
the calf. At the back the earth was scratched, there was a rubbish heap
of ashes and tins slipping into the brambles, and very white fowls
clustering for bedtime. In front of the house, in another bit of garden
with wooden palings, two camellia trees full of flowers, one white and
one red, like artificial things, but a bit seared by the wind. And at
the gate the branching coral trees still flowering flame from their
dark, strong-thrusting, up-curving buds.So, with evening falling. There were green roads laid out in the wild,
with but one lost bungalow to justify them. And a lost horse wildly
galloping round the corner of this blind road, to quiet down and look
around. A belated collier galloping stiffly on his pony, out of the
township, and a woman in a white blouse and black skirt, with two little
girls beside her, driving a ramshackle little buggy with a quick-legged
little pony, homewards through the trees.Lights were beginning to glint out: the township was deciding it was
night. The bungalows scattered far and wide, on the lower levels. There
was a network of wide roads, or beginnings of roads. The heart of the
township was one tiny bit of street a hundred yards long: Main Street.
You knew where it was, as you looked down on the reddish earth and grass
and bush, by the rather big roof of pale zinc and a sandy-coloured round
gable of the hotel - the biggest building in the place. For the rest, it
looked, from above, like an inch of street with tin roofs on either
side, fizzling out at once into a wide grass-road with a few bungalows
and then the bush. But there was the dark railway, and the little
station. And then again the big paddocks rising to the sea, with a ridge
of coral-trees and a farm-place. Richard could see Coo-ee with its low,
red roof, right on the sea. Behind it the rail-fences of the paddocks,
and the open grass, and the streets cut out and going nowhere, with an
odd bungalow here and there.So it was all round - a far and wide scattering of pale-roofed bungalows
at random among grassy, cut-out streets, all along the levels above the
sea, but keeping back from the sea, as if there were no sea. Ignoring
the great Pacific. There were knolls and pieces of blue creek-hollow,
blue of freshwater in lagoons on the yellow sands. Up the knolls perched
more bungalows, on very long front legs and no back legs, caves of dark
underneath. And on the sky-line, a ridge of wiry trees with dark
plume-tufts at the ends of the wires, and these little loose crystals of
different-coloured, sharp-angled bungalows cropping out beneath. All in
a pale, clear air, clear and yet far off, as it were visionary.So the land swooped in grassy swoops, past the railway, steep up to the
bush: here and there thick-headed palm trees left behind by the flood of
time and the flood of civilisation both: bungalows with flame-trees:
bare bungalows like packing-cases: an occasional wind-fan for raising
water: a round well-pool, perfectly round: then the bush, and a little
colliery steaming among the trees. And so the great tree-covered swoop
upwards of the tor, to the red fume of clouds, red like the
flame-flowers, of sunset. In the darkness of trees the strange birds
clinking and trilling: the tree-ferns with their knob-scaly trunks
spreading their marvellous circle of lace overhead against the glow, the
gum-trees like white, naked nerves running up their limbs, and the
inevitable dead gum-trees poking stark grey limbs into the air. And the
thick aboriginal dusk settling down.Richard wandered through the village, homewards. Horses stood motionless
in the middle of the road, like ghosts, listening. Or a cow stood as if
asleep on the dark footpath. Then she too wandered off. At night-time
always these creatures roaming the dark and semi-dark roads, eating the
wayside grass. The motor-cars rushing up the coast road must watch for
them. But the straying cattle were not troubled. They dragged slowly out
of the way.The night in the township was full of the sound of frogs, rattling,
screeching, whirring, raving like a whole fairy factory going at full
speed in the marshy creek-bottom. A great grey bird, a crane, came down
on wide soft wings softly in the marshy place. A cream coloured-pony,
with a snake-like head stretched out, came cropping up the road,
cropping unmoved, though Richard's feet passed within a few yards of his
nose. Richard thought of the snaky Praxiteles horses outside the
Quirinal in Rome. Very, very nearly those old, snaky horses were born
again here in Australia: or the same vision come back.People mattered so little. People hardly matter at all. They were there,
they were friendly. But they never entered inside one. It is said that
man is the chief environment of man. That, for Richard, was not true in
Australia. Man was there, but unnoticeable. You said a few words to a
neighbour or an acquaintance, but it was merely for the sake of making a
sound of some sort. Just a sound. There was nothing really to be said.
The vast continent is really void of speech. Only man makes noises to
man, from habit. Richard found he never wanted to talk to anybody, never
wanted to be with anybody. He had fallen apart out of the human
association. And the rest of the people either were the same, or they
herded together in a promiscuous fashion. But this speechless, aimless
solitariness was in the air. It was natural to the country. The people
left you alone. They didn't follow you with their curiosity and their
inquisitiveness and their human fellowship. You passed, and they forgot
you. You came again, and they hardly saw you. You spoke, and they were
friendly. But they never asked any questions, and they never encroached.
They didn't care. The profound Australian indifference, which still is
not really apathy. The disintegration of the social mankind back to its
elements. Rudimentary individuals with no desire of communication.
Speeches, just noises. A herding together like dumb cattle, a
promiscuity like slovenly animals. Yet the basic indifference under
everything.And with it all, toiling on with civilisation. But it felt like a clock
that was running down. It had been wound up in Europe, and was running
down, running right down, here in Australia. Men were mining, farming,
making roads, shouting politics. But all with that basic indifference
which dare not acknowledge HOW indifferent it is, lest it should drop
everything and lapse into a blank. But a basic indifference, with a
spurt of excitement over a horse-race, and an occasional joy in a row.It seemed strange to Somers that Labour should be so insistent in
Australia - or that Kangaroo should have been so burning. But then he
realised that these men were all the time yoked to some work, they were
all the time in the collar. And the work kept them going a good deal
more than they kept the work going. Nothing but the absolute drive of
the world's work kept them going. Without it they would have lapsed into
the old bushranging recklessness, lapsed into the profound indifference
which was basic in them.But still, they were men, they were healthy, they were full of energy,
even if they were indifferent to the aim in front. So they embraced one
aim or another, out of need to be going somewhere, doing something more
than just backing a horse. Something more than a mere day's work and a
gamble. Some smack at the old-established institution of life, that came
from Europe.There it is, laid all over the world, the heavy established European way
of life. Like their huge ponderous cathedrals and factories and cities,
enormous encumbrances of stone and steel and brick, weighing on the
surface of the earth. They say Australia is free, and it is. Even the
flimsy, foundationless bungalows. Richard railed at the scrappy
amorphousness, till two nights he dreamed he was in Paris, and a third
night it was in some other city, of Italy or France. Here he was staying
in a big palazzo of a house - and he struggled to get out, and found
himself in a high old provincial street with old gable houses and dark
shadow and himself in the gulf between: and at the end of the street a
huge, pale-grey bulk of a cathedral, an old Gothic cathedral, huge and
massive and grey and beautiful.But, suddenly, the mass of it made him sick, and the beauty was nauseous
to him. So strong a feeling that he woke up. And since that day he had
been thankful for the amorphous scrappy scattering of foundationless
shacks and bungalows. Since then he had loved the Australian landscape,
with the remote gum-trees running their white nerves into the air, the
random streets of flimsy bungalows, all loose from one another, and
temporary seeming, the bungalows perched precariously on the knolls,
like Japanese paper-houses, below the ridge of wire-and-tuft trees.He had now a horror of vast super-incumbent buildings. They were a
nightmare. Even the cathedrals. Huge, huge bulks that are called beauty.
Beauty seemed to him like some turgid tumour. Never again, he felt, did
he want to look at London, the horrible WEIGHT of it: or at Rome with
all the pressure on the hills. Horrible, inert, man-moulded weight.
Heavy as death.No, no, the flimsy hills of Australia were like a new world, and the
frail INCONSPICUOUSNESS of the landscape, that was still so clear and
clean, clean of all fogginess or confusion: but the frail, aloof,
inconspicuous clarity of the landscape was like a sort of
heaven - bungalows, shacks, corrugated iron and all. No wonder
Australians love Australia. It is the land that as yet has made no great
mistake, humanly. The horrible human mistakes of Europe. And, probably,
the even worse human mistakes of America.&quot;Then why am I going?&quot; he asked himself.&quot;Wait! Wait!&quot; he answered himself. &quot;You have got to go through the
mistakes. You've got to go all round the world, and then halfway round
again, till you get back. Go on, go on, the world is round, and it will
bring you back. Draw your ring round the world, the ring of your
consciousness. Draw it round until it is complete.&quot;So he prepared with a quiet heart to depart.The only person that called at Coo-ee was Jaz.&quot;You're leaving us, then?&quot; he said.&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;Rather suddenly at the end.&quot;&quot;Perhaps. But it's as well I should go soon if I'm going.&quot;&quot;You think so? Taken against the place, have you?&quot;&quot;No - the contrary. If I stay much longer I shall stay altogether.&quot;&quot;Come quite to like it!&quot; Jaz smiled slowly.&quot;Yes. I love it, Jaz. I don't love people. But this place - it goes into
my marrow, and makes me feel drunk. I love Australia.&quot;&quot;That's why you leave it, eh?&quot;&quot;Yes. I'm frightened. What I want to do is to go a bit further back into
the bush - near some little township - have a horse and a cow of my
own - and - damn everything.&quot;&quot;I can quite understand the 'damn everything' part of it,&quot; laughed Jaz.
&quot;You won't do it, though.&quot;&quot;I never was so tempted in my life. Talk about Eve tempting man to a
fall: Australia tempts me. Retro me - .&quot;Jaz was silent for a few moments.&quot;You'd repent it, though,&quot; he said quietly.&quot;I'll probably repent whatever I do,&quot; replied Somers, &quot;so what's the
odds. I'll probably repent bitterly going to America, going back to the
world: when I want Australia. I want Australia as a man wants a woman. I
fairly tremble with wanting it.&quot;&quot;Australia?&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;Jaz looked at Somers with his curious, light-grey eyes.&quot;Then why not stop?&quot; he said seductively.&quot;Not now. Not now. Some cussedness inside me. I don't want to give in,
you see. Not yet, I don't want to give in to the place. It's too strong.
It would lure me quite away from myself. It would be too easy. It's TOO
tempting. It's too big a stride, Jaz.&quot;Jaz laughed, looking back at Richard's intense eyes.&quot;What a man you are, Mr. Somers!&quot; he said. &quot;Come and live in Sydney and
you won't find it such a big jump from anywhere else.&quot;&quot;No, I wouldn't want to live in Sydney. I'd want to go back in the bush
near one of the little townships. It's like wanting a woman, Jaz. I want
it.&quot;&quot;Then why not do it?&quot;&quot;I won't give in, not yet. It's like giving in to a woman; I won't give
in yet. I'll come back later.&quot;Jaz suddenly looked at Richard and smiled maliciously.&quot;You won't give in, Mr. Somers, will you? You won't give in to the
women, and Australia's like a woman to you. You wouldn't give in to
Kangaroo, and he's dead now. You won't give in to Labour, or Socialism.
Well, now, what will you do? Will you give in to America, do you think?&quot;&quot;Heaven preserve me - if I'm to speak beforehand.&quot;&quot;Why, Mr. Somers!&quot; laughed Jaz, &quot;seems to me you just go round the world
looking for things you're not going to give in to. You're as bad as we
folk.&quot;&quot;Maybe,&quot; said Richard. &quot;But I'll give in to the Lord Almighty, which is
more than you'll do - .&quot;&quot;Oh, well, now - we'd give in to Him if we saw Him,&quot; said Jaz, smiling
with an odd winsomeness he sometimes had.&quot;All right. Well I prefer not to see, and yet to give in,&quot; said Richard.Jaz glanced up at him suspiciously, from under his brows.&quot;And another thing,&quot; said Richard. &quot;I won't give up the flag of our real
civilised consciousness. I'll give up the ideals. But not the aware,
self-responsible, deep consciousness that we've gained. I won't go back
on that, Jaz, though Kangaroo did say I was the enemy of civilisation.&quot;&quot;You don't consider you are, then?&quot; asked Jaz, pertinently.&quot;The enemy of civilisation? Well, I'm the enemy of this
machine-civilisation and this ideal civilisation. But I'm not the enemy
of the deep, self-responsible consciousness in man, which is whatImean by civilisation. In that sense of civilisation I'd fight forever
for the flag, and try to carry it on into deeper, darker places. It's an
adventure, Jaz, like any other. And when you realise what you're doing,
it's perhaps the best adventure.&quot;Harriet brought the tea-tray on to the verandah.&quot;It's quite nice that somebody has come to see us,&quot; she said to Jaz.
&quot;There seems such a gap, now Kangaroo is gone, and all he stood for.&quot;&quot;You feel a gap, do you?&quot; asked Jaz.&quot;Awful. As if the earth had opened. As for Lovat, he's absolutely
broken-hearted, and such a trial to live with.&quot;Jaz looked quickly and inquiringly at Somers.&quot;Sort of metaphysical heart,&quot; Richard said, smiling wryly.Jaz only looked puzzled.&quot;Metaphysical!&quot; said Harriet. &quot;You'd think to hear him he was nothing
but a tea-pot brewing metaphysical tea. As a matter of fact Kangaroo
went awfully deep with him, and now he's heart-broken, and that's why
he's rushing to America. He's always breaking his heart over
something - anything except me. To me he's a nether millstone.&quot;&quot;Is that so!&quot; said Jaz.&quot;But one feels awful, you know, Kangaroo dying like that. Lovat likes to
show off and be so beastly high and mighty about things. But I know how
miserable he is.&quot;They were silent for some time, and the talk drifted.In the newspapers Somers read of a big cyclone off the coast of China,
which had engulfed thousands of Chinese. This cyclone was now travelling
south, lashing its tail over the New Hebrides, and swooping its paws
down the thousands of miles of east coast of Australia. The monster was
expected to have spent itself by the time it reached Sydney. But it
hadn't - not quite.Down it came, in a great darkness. The sea began to have a strange
yelling sound in its breakers, the black cloud came up like a wall from
the sea, everywhere was dark. And the wind broke in volleys from the
sea, and the rain poured as if the cyclone were a great bucket of water
pouring itself endlessly down.Richard and Harriet sat in the dark room at Coo-ee, with a big fire, and
darkness raging in waters around. It was like the end of the world. The
roaring snarl of the sea was of such volume, the volleying roar of the
wind so great as to create almost a sense of silence in the room. The
house was like a small cave under the water. Rain poured in waves over
the dark room, and with a heaviness of spume. Though the roof came down
so far and deep over the verandahs, yet the water swept in, and gurgled
under the doors and in at the windows. Tiles were ripped off the
verandah roof with a crash, and water splashed more heavily. For the
first day there was nothing to do but to sit by the fire, and
occasionally mop up the water at the seaward door. Through the long, low
windows you saw only a yellow-livid fume, and over all the boom you
heard the snarl of water.They were quite cut off this day, alone, dark, in the devastation of
water. The rain had an iciness, too, which seemed to make a shell round
the house. The two beings, Harriet and Lovat, kept alone and silent in
the shell of a house as in a submarine. They were black inside as out.
Harriet particularly was full of a storm of black chagrin. She had
expected so much of Australia. It had been as if all her life she had
been waiting to come to Australia. To a new country, to a new, unspoiled
country. Oh, she hated the old world so much. London, Paris, Berlin,
Rome - they all seemed to her so old, so ponderous with ancient authority
and ancient dirt. Ponderous, ancient authority especially, oh, how she
hated it. Freed once, she wanted a new freedom, silvery and paradisical
in the atmosphere. A land with a new atmosphere, untainted by authority.
Silvery, untouched freedom.And in the first months she had found this in Australia, in the silent,
silvery-blue days, and the unbreathed air, and strange, remote forms of
tree and creature. She had felt herself free, free, free, for the first
time in her life. In the silvery pure air of this undominated continent
she could swim like a fish that is just born, alone in a crystal ocean.
Woman that she was she exulted, she delighted. She had loved Coo-ee. And
she just could not understand that Richard was so tense, so resistant.Then gradually, through the silver glisten of the new freedom came a
dull, sinister vibration. Sometimes from the interior came a wind that
seemed to her evil. Out of the silver paradisical freedom untamed, evil
winds could come, cold, like a stone hatchet murdering you. The freedom,
like everything else, had two sides to it. Sometimes a heavy,
reptile-hostility came off the sombre land, something gruesome and
infinitely repulsive. It frightened her as a reptile would frighten her
if it wound its cold folds around her. For the past month now Australia
had been giving her these horrors. It was as if the silvery freedom
suddenly turned, and showed the scaly back of a reptile, and the
horrible jaws.Out of all her bird-like elation at this new-found freedom, freedom for
her, the female, suddenly, without warning, dark revulsions struck her.
Struck her, it would seem, in her deepest female self, almost in her
womb. These revulsions sent her into a frenzy. She had sudden, mad
loathings of Australia. And these made her all the more frenzied because
of her former great, radiant hopes and her silvery realisations. What,
must it all be taken back from her, all this glisten of paradise, this
glisten of paradise, this silvery freedom like protoplasm of life? Was
it to be revoked?There was Richard, that hell-bird, preaching, preaching at her: &quot;Don't
trust it. You can't have this absolved sort of freedom. It's an
illusion. You can't have this freedom absolved from control. It can't be
done. There is no stability. There will come a reaction and a
devastation. Inevitable. You must have deep control from within. You
must have a deep, dark weight of authority in your own soul. You must be
most carefully, sternly controlled from within. You must be under the
hand of the Lord. You can't escape the dark hand of the Lord, not even
in free Australia. You'll get the devils turning on you if you try too
much freedom. It can't be done. Too much freedom means you absolve
yourself from the hand of the Lord, and once you're really absolved you
fall a prey to devils, devils. You'll see. All you white females raging
for further freedom. Wait, wait till you've got it and see how the
devils will bite you with unclean, reptile sort of mouths. Wait, you who
love Australia and its freedom. Only let me leave you to the freedom,
till it bites you with a sort of sewer-mouth, like all these rats. Only
let me abandon you to this freedom. Only let me - .&quot;So he had preached at her, like a dog barking, barking senselessly. And
oh, how it had annoyed her.Yet gradually, quite apart from him, it had begun to happen to her.
These hateful revulsions, when Australia had turned as it were UNCLEAN
to her, with an unclean sort of malevolence. And her revulsions had
possessed her. Then the death of Kangaroo. And now this blackness, this
slew of water, this noise of hellish elements.To Richard it was like being caged in with a sick tiger, to be shut up
with Harriet in this watery cave of gloom. Like a sullen, sick tiger,
she could hardly get her self to move, the weight of her revulsion was
so deep upon her. She LOATHED Australia, with wet, dark repulsion. She
was black, sick with chagrin. And she hated that barking white dog of a
Richard, with his yap-yap-yapping about control and authority and the
hand of the Lord. She had left Europe with her teeth set in hatred of
Europe's ancient encumbrance of authority and of the withered, repulsive
weight of the Hand of the Lord, that old Jew, upon it. Undying hostility
to old Europe, undying hope of the new, free lands. Especially this far
Australia.And now - and now - was the freedom all going to turn into dirty water?
All the uncontrolled gentleness and uncontaminated freedom of Australia,
was it going to turn and bite her like the ghastly bite of some
unclean-mouthed reptile, an iguana, a great newt? Had it already bitten
her?She was sick with revulsion, she wanted to get out, away to America
which is not so sloppy and lovey, but hard and greedy and domineering,
perhaps, but not mushey-lovey.These three days of dark wetness, slew, and wind finished her. On the
second morning there was an abatement, and Richard rushed to the post.
The boys, barefoot, bare-legged in the icy water, were running to school
under mackintosh capes. Down came the rain in a wind suddenly like a
great hose-pipe, and Richard got home a running, streaming pillar of
water. Home into the dark room and the sulky tiger of Harriet.The storm went on, black, all day, all night, and the next day the same,
inside the house as well as out. Harriet sulked the more, like a
frenzied sick tigress. The afternoon of the third day another abatement
into light rain, so Richard pulled on thick boots and went out to the
shore. His grass was a thin surface stream, and down the low cliffs, one
cascade stream. The sea was enormous: wave after wave in immediate
succession, raving yellow and crashing dull into the land. The
yeast-spume was piled in hills against the cliffs, among the big rocks,
and in swung the raving yellow water, in great dull blows under the
land, hoarsely surging out of the dim yellow blank of the sea. Harriet
looked at it for a few moments, shuddering and peering down like a sick
tigress in a flood. Then she turned tail and rushed indoors.Richard tried to walk under the cliffs. But the whole shore was ruined,
changed: a whole mass of new rocks, a chaos of heaped boulders, a gurgle
of rushing, clayey water, and heaps of collapsed earth.On the fourth day the wind had sunk, the rain was only thin, the dark
sky was breaking. Gradually the storm of the sky went down. But not the
sea. Its great yellow fore-fringe was a snarl of wave after wave,
unceasing. And the shore was a ruin. The beach seemed to have sunk or
been swept away, the shore was a catastrophe of rocks and boulders.
Richard scrambled along through the dank wetness to a bit of sand, where
seaweed was piled like bushes, and he could more or less walk. But soon
he came to a new obstacle. The creek, which formerly had sunk at the
edge of the beach in a long pool, and left the sloping sand all free and
beautiful, had now broken through, levelled the sand, and swept in a
kind of snarling river to the snarling waves; across the cut-out sand.
The fresh-water met the waves with a snarl, and sometimes pushed on into
the sea, sometimes was shoved back and heaped up with a rattle of angry
protest. Waters against waters.The beach never recovered, during the Somers' stay, the river never
subsided into the sand, the sandy foreshore never came back. It was a
rocky, boulder-heaped ruin with that stream for an impasse. Harriet
would not go down to the sea any more. The waves still raved very high,
they would not go back, and they lashed with a venomousness to the
cliffs, to cut a man off. Richard would wander cold and alone on this
inhospitable shore, looking for shells, out of the storm. And all the
time the waves would lash up, and he would scramble out. It seemed to
him female and vindictive. &quot;Beastly water, beastly water, rolling up so
high. Beastly water, beastly water, rolling up so high, breaking all the
shells where they lie&quot; - he crooned to himself, crooning a kind of
war-croon, malevolent against the malevolence of this ocean.Yet it was August, and spring was come, it was wattle-day in Sydney, the
city full of yellow bloom of mimosa. Richard and Harriet went up to the
United States Consul, to the shipping office: everything very easy. But
he could not bear to be in Sydney any more. He could hear Kangaroo all
the time.It was August, and spring, and hot, hot sun in a blue sky. Only the sea
would not, or could not return to its old beauties. Richard preferred to
go inland. The wattle-trees and the camellia-trees were full in bloom in
the bungalow gardens, birds flew quickly about in the sun, the morning
was quick with spring, the afternoon already hot and drowsy with summer.
Harriet, in her soul, had now left Australia for America, so she could
look at this land with new, relieved eyes again. She never more
passionately identified herself with it as at first.Richard hired a little two-wheeled trap, called in Australia a sulky,
with a little pony, to drive into the bush. Sometimes they had gone in a
motor-car, but they both much preferred the little, comfortable sulky.
There sat Harriet full and beaming, and the thin Richard beside her,
like any Australian couple in a shabby sulky behind a shabby pony,
trotting lazily under the gum-trees of the high-road and up the steep,
steep, jungle-dense climb of the mountain to the pass.Nothing is lovelier than to drive into the Australian bush in spring, on
a clear day: and most days are clear and hot. Up the steep climb the
tree-ferns and the cabbage-palms stood dark and unlighted as ever, among
the great gums. But once at the top, away from the high-road and the
sea-face, trotting on the yellow-brown sandy trail through the sunny,
thinly scattered trees of the untouched bush, it was heaven. They
splashed through a clear, clear stream, and walked up a bank into the
nowhere, the pony peacefully marching.The bush was in bloom, the wattles were out. Wattle, or mimosa, is the
national flower of Australia. There are said to be thirty-two species.
Richard found only seven as they wandered along. The little, pale,
sulphur wattle with a reddish stem sends its lovely sprays so aerial out
of the sand of the trail, only a foot or two high, but such a delicate,
spring-like thing. The thorny wattle with its fuzzy pale balls tangles
on the banks. Then beautiful heath-plants with small bells, like white
heather, stand in tall, straight tufts, and above them the gold sprays
of the intensely gold bush mimosa, with here and there, on long, thin
stalks like hairs almost, beautiful blue flowers, with gold grains,
three-petalled, like reed-flowers, and blue, blue with a touch of
Australian darkness. Then comes a hollow, desolate bare place with empty
greyness and a few dead, charred gum-trees, where there has been a
bush-fire. At the side of this bare place great flowers, twelve feet
high, like sticky dark lilies in bulb-buds at the top of the shaft,
dark, blood-red. Then over another stream, and scattered bush once more,
and the last queer, gold red bushes of the bottle-brush tree, like
soft-bristly golden bottle-brushes standing stiffly up, and the queer
black-boys on one black leg with a tuft of dark-green spears, sending up
the high stick of a seed-stalk, much taller than a man. And here and
there the gold bushes of wattle with their narrow dark leaves.Richard turned and they plunged into the wild grass and strange bushes,
following the stream. By the stream the mimosa was all gold, great gold
bushes full of spring fire rising over your head, and the scent of the
Australian spring, and the most ethereal of all golden bloom, the plumy,
many-balled wattle, and the utter loneliness, the manlessness, the
untouched blue sky overhead, the gaunt, lightless gum-trees rearing a
little way off, and sound of strange birds, vivid ones of strange,
brilliant birds that flit round. Save for that, and for some weird
frog-like sound, indescribable, the age-unbroken silence of the
Australian bush.But it is wonderful, out of the sombreness of gum-trees, that seem the
same, hoary for ever, and that are said to begin to wither from the
centre the moment they are mature - out of the hollow bush of gum-trees
and silent heaths, all at once, in spring, the most delicate feathery
yellow of plumes and plumes and plumes and trees and bushes of wattle,
as if angels had flown right down out of the softest gold regions of
heaven to settle here, in the Australian bush. And the perfume in all
the air that might be heaven, and the unutterable stillness, save for
strange bright birds and flocks of parrots, and the motionlessness, save
for a stream and butterflies and some small brown bees. Yet a stillness,
and a manlessness, and an elation, the bush flowering at the gates of
heaven.Somers and Harriet left the pony and clambered along the stream, past
trees of the grey, feathery-leaved wattle, most sumptuous of all in soft
gold in the sky, and bushes of the grey-hard, queer-leaved wattle, on to
the thick green of strange trees narrowing into the water. The water
slithered rushing over steep rocks. The two scrambled down, and along
after the water, to an abrupt edge. There the water fell in a great roar
down a solid rock, and broke and rushed into a round, dark pool, dark,
still, fathomless, low down in a gruesome dark cup in the bush, with
rocks coming up to the trees. In this tarn the stream disappeared. There
was no outlet. Rock and bush shut it in. The river just dived into the
ground.It was a dark, frightening place, famous for snakes. Richard hoped the
snakes were still sleeping. But there was a horror of them in the air,
rising from the tangled undergrowth, from under the fallen trees, the
gum-trees that crashed down into the great ferns, eaten out by white
ants.In this place already the Christmas bells were blooming, like some great
heath with hanging, bright red bells tipped with white. Other more
single bell-flowers, a little bit like foxgloves, but stiff and sharp.
All the flowers stiff, sharp, like crystals of colour come opaque out of
the sombre, stiff, bristly bush plants.Harriet had armfuls of bloom, gold plumage of many branches of different
wattles, and the white heather, the scarlet bells, with the deep-blue
reed-blobs. The sulky with all the bloom looked like a corner of
paradise. And as they trotted home through the bush evening was coming,
the gold sun slanting. But Richard kept jumping out from among the
flowers, to plunge into the brake for a new flower. And the little pony
looked round watching him impatiently and displeased. But it was a
gentle, tolerant, Australian little beast, with untold patience. Only
Harriet was frightened of the coming dusk.So at length they were slipping down the steep slopes again, between the
dense, creeper-tangled jungle and tree ferns, dark, chilly. They passed
a family moving from nowhere to nowhere, two colts trotting beside the
wagon. And they came out at last at the bottom, to the lost, flickering
little township, at nightfall.At home, with all the house full of blossom, but fluffy gold
wattle-bloom, they sat at tea in the pleasant room, the bright fire
burning, eating boiled eggs and toast. And they looked at one
another - and Richard uttered the unspoken thought:&quot;Do you wish you were staying?&quot;&quot;I - I,&quot; stammered Harriet, &quot;if I had THREE lives, I'd wish to stay. It's
the loveliest thing I've EVER known.&quot;&quot;I know,&quot; he answered, laughing. &quot;If one could live a hundred years. But
since one has only a short time - .&quot;They were both silent. The flowers there in the room were like
angel-presences, something out of heaven. The bush! The wonderful
Australia.Yet the day came to go: to give up the keys, and leave the lonely, bare
Coo-ee to the next comers. Even the sea had gone flowery again at last.
And everybody was so simple, so kindly, at the departure. Harriet felt
she would leave behind her forever something of herself, in that Coo-ee
home. And he knew that one of his souls would stand forever out on those
rocks beyond the jetty, towards Bulli, advanced into the sea, with the
dark magic of the tor standing just inland.The journey to Sydney was so spring-warm and beautiful, in the fresh
morning. The bush now and then glowed gold, and there were almond and
apricot trees near the little wooden bungalows, and by the railway
unknown flowers, magenta and yellow and white, among the rocks. The
frail, wonderful Australian spring, coming out of all the gummy hardness
and sombreness of the bush.Sydney, and the warm harbour. They crossed over once more in the blue
afternoon. Kangaroo dead. Sydney lying on its many-lobed blue harbour,
in the Australian spring. The many people, all seeming dissolved in the
blue air. Revolution - nothingnesses. Nothing could ever matter.On the last morning Victoria and Jaz's wife came to see the Somers off.
The ship sailed at ten. The sky was all sun, the boat reared her green
paint and red funnel to the sun. Down below in the dark shadow of the
wharf stood all those who were to be left behind, saying good-bye,
standing down in the shadow under the ship and the wharf, their faces
turned up to the passengers who hung over the rail. A whole crowd of
people down on the wharf, with white uplifted faces, and one little
group of quiet Chinese.Everybody had bought streamers, rolls of coloured paper ribbon, and now
the passengers leaning over the rail of the lower and middle decks
tossed the unwinding rolls to their friends below. So this was the last
tie, this ribbon of coloured paper. Somers had a yellow and a red one:
Victoria held the end of the red streamer, Jaz's wife the end of the
yellow. Harriet had blue and green streamers. And from the side of the
ship a whole glittering tangle of these colours connecting the departing
with the remaining, a criss-cross of brilliant colour that seemed to
glitter like a rainbow in the beams of the sun, as it rose higher,
shining in between the ship and the wharf shed, touching the faces of
the many people below.The gangway was hoisted - the steamer gave long hoots. Only the
criss-crossing web of brilliant streamers went from the hands of the
departing to the hands of those who would be left behind. There was a
sort of silence: the calling seemed to die out. And already before the
cables were cast loose, the gulf seemed to come. Richard held fast to
the two streamers, and looked down at the faces of the two women, who
held the other ends of his paper threads. He felt a deep pang in his
heart, leaving Australia, that strange country that a man might lose so
hopelessly. He felt another heart-string going to break like the
streamers, leaving Australia, leaving his own British connection. The
darkness that comes over the heart at the moment of departure darkens
the eyes too, and the last scene is remote, remote, detached inside a
darkness.So now, when the cables were cast loose, and the ship slowly left the
side of the wharf and drew gradually towards the easier waters of the
harbour, there was a little gulf of water between the ship and the
wharf. The streamers lengthened out, they glittered and twinkled across
the space almost like music, so many-coloured. And then the engines were
going, and the crowd on the wooden quay began to follow slowly, slowly,
holding the frail streamers carefully, like the ends of a cloud,
following slowly down the quay as the ship melted from shadow to the sun
beyond.One by one the streamers broke and fluttered loose and fell bright and
dead on the water. The slow crowd, slow as a funeral, was at the end,
the far end of the quay, holding the last streamers. But the ship
inexorably drifted out, and every coloured strip was broken: the crowd
stood alone at the end of the wharf, the side of the vessel was
fluttering with bright, broken ends.So, it was time to take out handkerchiefs and wave across space. Few
people wept. Somers waved and waved his orange silk kerchief in the blue
air. Farewell! Farewell! Farewell Victoria and Jaz's wife, farewell
Australia, farewell Britain and the great Empire. Farewell! Farewell!
The last streamers blowing away, like broken attachments, broken
heartstrings. The crowd on the wharf gone tiny in the sun, and melting
away as the ship turned.Richard watched the Observatory go by: then the Circular Quay, with all
its ferry-wharves, and a Nippon steamer lying at her berth, and a
well-known, big buff and black P. and O. boat at the P. and O. wharf,
looking so like India. Then that was gone too, and the Governor's
Palace, and the castellated Conservatorium of Music on its hill, where
Richard had first seen Jack - the Palace Gardens, and the blue inlet
where the Australian &quot;Fleet&quot; lay comfortably rusting. Then they drifted
across harbour, nearer to the wild-seeming slope, like bush, where the
Zoo is. And then they began to wait, to hang round.There ahead was the open gate of the harbour, the low Heads with the
South Lighthouse, and the Pacific beyond, breaking white. On the left
was Manly, where Harriet had lost her yellow scarf. And then the tram
going to Narrabeen, where they had first seen Jaz. Behind was the great
lobed harbour, so blue, and Sydney rather inconspicuous on the south
hills, with its one or two sky-scrapers. And already, the blue water all
round, and a thing of the past.It was midday before they got out of the Heads, out of the harbour into
the open sea. The sun was hot, the wind cold. There were not very many
passengers in the first class: and nobody who looked possible to the
Somers pair. Richard sat in the sun watching the dark coast of
Australia, so sombre, receding. Harriet watched the two seamen casting
rubbish overboard: such a funny assortment of rubbish. The iron sank in
the deep, dark water, the wood and straw and cardboard drearily floated.
The low Sydney Heads were not far off.Lovat watched till he could see the dark of the mountain, far away,
behind Coo-ee. He was almost sure of the shape. He thought of the empty
house - the sunny grass in front - the sunny foreshore with its new
rocks - the township behind, the dark tor, the bush, the Australian
spring. The sea seemed dark and cold and inhospitable.It was only four days to New Zealand, over a cold, dark, inhospitable
sea.>



He had known such different deep fears. In Sicily, a sudden fear, in the
night of some single murderer, some single thing hovering as it were out
of the violent past, with the intent of murder. Out of the old Greek
past, that had been so vivid, sometimes an unappeased spirit of
murderous-hate against the usurping moderns. A sudden presence of murder
in the air, because of something which the modern psyche had excluded,
some old and vital thing which Christianity has cut out. An old spirit,
waiting for vengeance. But in England, during the later years of the
war, a true and deadly fear of the criminal LIVING spirit which arose in
all the stay-at-home bullies who governed the country during those
years. From 1916 to 1919 a wave of criminal lust rose and possessed
England, there was a reign of terror, under a set of indecent bullies
like Bottomley of John Bull and other bottom-dog members of the House of
Commons. Then Somers had known what it was to live in a perpetual state
of semi-fear: the fear of the criminal public and the criminal
government. The torture was steadily applied, during those years after
Asquith fell, to break the independent soul in any man who would not
hunt with the criminal mob. A man must identify himself with the
criminal mob, sink his sense of truth, of justice, and of human honour,
and bay like some horrible unclean hound, bay with a loud sound, from
slavering, unclean jaws.This Richard Lovat Somers had steadily refused to do. The deepest part
of a man is his sense of essential truth, essential honour, essential
justice. This deepest self makes him abide by his own feelings, come
what may. It is not sentimentalism. It is just the male human creature,
the thought-adventurer, driven to earth. Will he give in or won't he?Many men, carried on a wave of patriotism and true belief in democracy,
entered the war. Many men were driven in out of belief that it was
necessary to save their property. Vast numbers of men were just bullied
into the army. A few remained. Of these, many became conscientious
objectors.Somers tiresomely belonged to no group. He would not enter the army,
because his profoundest instinct was against it. Yet he had no
conscientious objection to war. It was the whole spirit of the war, the
vast mob-spirit, which he could never acquiesce in. The terrible,
terrible war, made so fearful because in every country practically every
man lost his head, and lost his own centrality, his own manly isolation
in his own integrity, which alone keeps life real. Practically every man
being caught away from himself, as in some horrible flood, and swept
away with the ghastly masses of other men, utterly unable to speak, or
feel for himself, or to stand on his own feet, delivered over and
swirling in the current, suffocated for the time being. Some of them to
die for ever. Most to come back home victorious in circumstance, but
with their inner pride gone: inwardly lost. To come back home, many of
them, to wives who had egged them on to this downfall in themselves:
black bitterness. Others to return to a bewildered wife who had in vain
tried to keep her man true to himself, tried and tried, only to see him
at last swept away. And oh, when he was swept away, how she loved him.
But when he came back, when he crawled out like a dog out of a dirty
stream, a stream that had suddenly gone slack and turbid: when he came
back covered with outward glory and inward shame, then there was the
price to pay.And there IS this bitter and sordid after-war price to pay because men
lost their heads, and worse, lost their inward, individual integrity.
And when a man loses his inward, isolated, manly integrity, it is a bad
day for that man's true wife. A true man should not lose his head. The
greater the crisis, the more intense should be his isolated reckoning
with his own soul. And THEN let him act, of his own whole self. Not
fling himself away: or much worse, let himself be DRAGGED away, bit by
bit.Awful years - '16, '17, '18, '19 - the years when the damage was done. The
years when the world lost its real manhood. Not for lack of courage to
face death. Plenty of superb courage to face death. But no courage in
any man to face his own isolated soul, and abide by its decision. Easier
to sacrifice oneself. So much easier!Richard Lovat was one of those utterly unsatisfactory creatures who just
would not. He had no conscientious objections. He knew that men MUST
fight, some time in some way or other. He was no Quaker, to believe in
perpetual peace. He had been in Germany times enough to know HOW much he
detested the German military creatures: mechanical bullies they were.
They had once threatened to arrest him as a spy, and had insulted him
more than once. Oh, he would never forgive THEM, in his inward soul. But
then the industrialism and commercialism of England, with which
patriotism and democracy became identified: did not these insult a man
and hit him pleasantly across the mouth? How much humiliation had
Richard suffered, trying to earn his living! How had they tried, with
their beastly industrial self-righteousness, to humiliate him as a
separate, single man? They wanted to bring him to heel even more than
the German militarist did. And if a man is to be brought to any heel,
better a spurred heel than the heel of a Jewish financier. So Richard
decided later, when the years let him think things over, and see where
he was.Therefore when the war came, his instinct was against it. When the
Asquith government so softly foundered, he began to suffer agonies. But
when the Asquith government went right under, and in its place came that
John Bull government of '16, '17, '18, then agonies gave way to
tortures. He was summoned to join the army: and went. Spent a night in
barracks with forty other men, and not one of these other men but felt
like a criminal condemned, bitter in dejection and humiliation. Was
medically examined in the morning by two doctors, both gentlemen, who
knew the sacredness of another naked man: and was rejected.So, that was over. He went back home. And he made up his mind what he
would do. He would never voluntarily make a martyr of himself. His
feeling was private to himself, he didn't want to force it on any other
man. He would just act alone. For the moment, he was rejected as
medically unfit. If he was called up again, he would go again. But he
would never serve.&quot;Once,&quot; he said to Harriet, &quot;that they have really conscripted me, I
will never obey another order, if they kill me.&quot;Poor Harriet felt scared, and didn't know what else to say.&quot;If ever,&quot; he said, looking up from his own knees in their old grey
flannel trousers, as he sat by the fire, &quot;if ever I see my legs in
khaki, I shall die. But they shall never put my legs into khaki.&quot;That first time, at the barracks in the country town in the west, they
had treated him with that instinctive regard and gentleness which he
usually got from men who were not German militarist bullies, or worse,
British commercial bullies. For instance, in the morning in that prison
barracks room, these unexamined recruits were ordered to make their beds
and sweep the room. In obedience, so far, Richard Lovat took one of the
heavy brooms. He was pale, silent, isolated: a queer figure, a young man
with a beard. The other soldiers - or must-be soldiers - had looked at him
as a queer fish, but that he was used to.&quot;Say, Dad,&quot; said a fattish young fellow older than himself, the only
blatherer, a loose fellow who had come from Canada to join up and was
already cursing: he was a good deal older than Somers.&quot;Say, Dad,&quot; said this fellow, as they sat in the train coming up, &quot;all
that'll come off to-morrow - Qck, Qck!&quot; - and he made two noises, and gave
two long swipes with his finger round his chin, to intimate that
Richard's beard would be cut off to-morrow.&quot;We'll see,&quot; said Richard, smiling with pale lips.He said in his heart, the day his beard was shaven he was beaten, lost.
He identified it with his isolate manhood. He never forgot that journey
up to Bodmin, with the other men who were called up. They were all
bitterly, desperately miserable, but still manly: mostly very quiet, yet
neither sloppy nor frightened. Only the fat, loose fellow who had given
up a damned good job in Canada to come and serve this bloody country,
etc., etc., was a ranter and a bragger. Somers saw him afterwards naked:
strange, fat, soft, like a woman. But in another carriage the men sang
all the time, or howled like dogs in the night:I'll be your sweetheart, if you will be mine,
All my life I'll be you-o-o-ur Valentine.
Bluebells I'll gather, take them and be true,
When I'm a man, my plan will be to marry you.Wailing down the lost corridors of hell, surely, those ghastly
melancholy notes -All my li-i-i-ife - I'll be you-u-r Valentine.Somers could never recall it without writhing. It is not death that
matters, but the loss of the integral soul. And these men howled as if
they were going to their doom, helplessly, ghastly. It was not the death
in front. It was the surrender of all their old beliefs, and all their
sacred liberty.Those bluebells! They were worse than the earlier songs. In 1915,
autumn, Hampstead Heath, leaves burning in heaps, in the blue air,
London still almost pre-war London: but by the pond on the Spaniards
Road, blue soldiers, wounded soldiers in their bright hospital blue and
red, always there: and earth-coloured recruits with pale faces drilling
near Parliament Hill. The pre-war world still lingering, and some vivid
strangeness, glamour thrown in. At night all the great beams of the
searchlights, in great straight bars, feeling across the London sky,
feeling the clouds, feeling the body of the dark overhead. And then
Zeppelin raids: the awful noise and the excitement. Somers was never
afraid then. One evening he and Harriet walked from Platts Lane to the
Spaniards Road, across the Heath: and there, in the sky, like some god
vision, a Zeppelin, and the searchlights catching it, so that it gleamed
like a manifestation in the heavens, then losing it, so that only the
strange drumming came down out of the sky where the searchlights tangled
their feelers. There it was again, high, high, high, tiny, pale, as one
might imagine the Holy Ghost, far, far above. And the crashes of guns,
and the awful hoarseness of shells bursting in the city. Then gradually,
quiet. And from Parliament Hill, a great red glare below, near St.
Paul's. Something ablaze in the city. Harriet was horribly afraid. Yet
as she looked up at the far-off Zeppelin she said to Somers:&quot;Think, some of the boys I played with when I was a child are probably
in it.&quot;And he looked up at the far, luminous thing, like a moon. Were there men
in it? Just men, with two vulnerable legs and warm mouths. The
imagination could not go so far.Those days, that autumn...people carried about chrysanthemums, yellow
and brown chrysanthemums: and the smell of burning leaves: and the
wounded, bright blue soldiers with their red cotton neckties, sitting
together like macaws on the seats, pale and different from other people.
And the star Jupiter very bright at nights over the cup hollow of the
Vale, on Hampstead Heath. And the war news coming, the war horror
drifting in, drifting in, prices rising, excitement growing, people
going mad about the Zeppelin raids. And always the one song:Keep the home fires burning,
Though your hearts be yearning.It was in 1915 the old world ended. In the winter 1915-1916 the spirit
of the old London collapsed; the city, in some way, perished, perished
from being a heart of the world, and became a vortex of broken passions,
lusts, hopes, fears, and horrors. The integrity of London collapsed, and
the genuine debasement began, the unspeakable baseness of the press and
the public voice, the reign of that bloated ignominy, John Bull.No man who has really consciously lived through this can believe again
absolutely in democracy. No man who has heard reiterated in thousands of
tones from all the common people during the crucial years of the war: &quot;I
believe in John Bull. Give me John Bull,&quot; can ever believe that in any
crisis a people can govern itself, or is ever fit to govern itself.
During the crucial years of the war, the people chose, and chose
Bottomleyism. Bottom enough.The well-bred, really cultured classes were on the whole passive
resisters. They shirked their duty. It is the business of people who
really know better to fight tooth and nail to keep up a standard, to
hold control of authority. Laiser-aller is as guilty as the actual,
stinking mongrelism it gives place to.It was in mid-winter 1915 that Somers and Harriet went down to Cornwall.
The spirit of the war - the spirit of collapse and of human ignominy, had
not travelled so far yet. It came in advancing waves.We hear so much of the bravery and horrors at the front. Brave the men
were, all honour to them. It was at home the world was lost. We hear too
little of the collapse of the proud human spirit at home, the triumph of
sordid, rampant, raging meanness. &quot;The bite of a jackal is
blood-poisoning and mortification.&quot; And at home stayed all the jackals,
middle-aged, male and female jackals. And they bit us all. And
blood-poisoning and mortification set in.We should never have let the jackals loose, and patted them on the head.
They were feeding on our death all the while.Away in the west Richard and Harriet lived alone in their cottage by the
savage Atlantic. He hardly wrote at all, and never any propaganda. But
he hated the war, and said so to the few Cornish people around. He
laughed at the palpable lies of the press, bitterly. And because of his
isolation and his absolute separateness, he was marked out as a spy.&quot;I am not a spy,&quot; he said, &quot;I leave it to dirtier people. I am myself,
and I won't have popular lies.&quot;So, there began the visits from the policeman. A large, blue, helmeted
figure at the door.&quot;Excuse me, sir, I have just a few enquiries to make.&quot;The police-sergeant always a decent, kindly fellow, driven by the
military.Somers and Harriet lived now with that suspense about them in the very
air they breathed. They were suspects.&quot;Then let them suspect,&quot; said he. &quot;I do nothing to them, so what can
they do to me.&quot;He still believed in the constitutional liberty of an Englishman.&quot;You know,&quot; said Harriet, &quot;you DO say things to these Cornish people.&quot;&quot;I only say, when they tell me newspaper lies, that they ARE lies.&quot;But now the two began to be hated, hated far more than they knew.&quot;You want to be careful,&quot; warned one of the Cornish friends. &quot;I've heard
that the coast-watchers have got orders to keep very strict watch on
you.&quot;&quot;Let them, they'll see nothing.&quot;But it was not till afterwards that he learned that the watchers had
lain behind the stone fence, to hear what he and Harriet talked about.So, he was called up the first time and went. He was summoned to
Penzance, and drove over with Harriet, expecting to return for the time
at least. But he was ordered to proceed the same afternoon to Bodmin,
along with sixteen or seventeen other fellows, farm hands and working
men. He said good-bye to Harriet, who was to be driven back alone across
the moors, to their lonely cottage on the other side.&quot;I shall be back to-morrow,&quot; he said.England was still England, and he was not finally afraid.The train journey from Penzance to Bodmin with the other men: the fat,
bragging other man: the tall man who felt as Somers did: the change at
the roadside station, with the porters chaffing the men that the
handcuffs were on them. Indeed, it was like being one of a gang of
convicts. The great, prison-like barracks - the disgusting evening meal
of which he could eat nothing - the little terrier-like sergeant of the
regulars, who made them a little encouraging speech: not a bad chap. The
lounging about that barracks yard, prisoners, till bed-time: the other
men crowding to the canteen, himself mostly alone. The brief talks with
men who were for a moment curious as to who and what he was. For a
moment only. They were most of them miserable and bitter.Gaol! It was like gaol. He thought of Oscar Wilde in prison. Night came,
and the beds to be made.&quot;They're good beds, clean beds, you'll sleep quite comfortable in them,&quot;
said the elderly little sergeant with a white moustache. Nine o'clock
lights out. Somers had brought no night clothes, nothing. He slept in
his woollen pants, and was ashamed because they had patches on the
knees, for he and Harriet were very poor these years. In the next bed
was a youth, a queer fellow, in a sloppy suit of black broadcloth, and
down-at-heel boots. He had a degenerate sort of handsomeness too. He had
never spoken a word. His face was long and rather fine, but like an
Apache, his straight black hair came in a lock over his forehead. And
there was an Apache sort of sheepishness, stupidity, in everything he
did. He was a long time getting undressed. Then there he stood, and his
white cotton day-shirt was long below his knees, like a woman's
nightgown. A restless, bitter night, with one man cough, cough,
coughing, a hysterical cough, and others talking, making noises in their
sleep. Bugle at six, and a scramble to wash themselves at the zinc
trough in the wash house. Somers could not crowd in, did not get in till
towards the end. Then he had to borrow soap, and afterwards a piece of
comb. The men were all quiet and entirely inoffensive, common, but
gentle, by nature decent. A sickening breakfast, then wash-up and sweep
the floors. Somers took one of the heavy brooms, as ordered, and began.
He swept his own floors nearly every day. But this was heavier work. The
sergeant stopped him. &quot;Don't you do that. You go and help to wipe the
pots, if you like. Here, you boy, YOU - take that sweeping brush.&quot;And Somers relinquished his broom to a bigger man.They were kindly, and, in the essential sense, gentlemen, the little
terrier of a sergeant too. Englishmen, his own people.When it came to Somer's turn to be examined, and he took off his clothes
and sat in his shirt in the cold lobby: the fat fellow pointed to his
thin, delicate legs with a jeer. But Somers looked at him, and he was
quiet again. The queer, soft, pale-bodied fellow, against Somers' thin
delicate whiteness. The little sergeant kept saying:&quot;Don't you catch cold, you chaps.&quot;In the warm room behind a screen, Richard took off his shirt and was
examined. The doctor asked him where he lived - where was his home - asked
as a gentleman asks, treated him with that gentle consideration Somers
usually met with, save from business people or official people.&quot;We shall reject you, leave you free,&quot; said the doctor, after consulting
with the more elderly, officious little man, &quot;but we leave it to you to
do what you can for your country.&quot;&quot;Thank you,&quot; said Richard, looking at him.&quot;Every man must do what he can,&quot; put in the other doctor, who was
elderly and officious, but a gentleman. &quot;The country needs the help of
every man, and though we leave you free, we expect you to apply yourself
to SOME service.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Somers, looking at him, and speaking in an absolutely
neutral voice. Things said like that to him were never real to him: more
like the noise of a cart passing, just a noise.The two doctors looked from his face down his thin nakedness again.&quot;Put your shirt on,&quot; said the younger one.And Somers could hear the mental comment, &quot;Rum sort of a fellow,&quot; as he
did so.There was still a wait for the card. It was one of those cards:
A - Called up for military service. B - Called up for service at the
front, but not in the lines. C - Called up for non-military service.
R - Rejected. A, B, and C were ruled out in red ink, leaving the
Rejected. He still had to go to another office for his pay - two
shillings and fourpence, or something like that. He signed for this and
was free. Free - with two shillings and fourpence, and pass for a railway
ticket - and God's air. The moment he stepped out with his card, he
realised that it was Saturday morning, that the sun was shining, filling
the big stone yard of the barracks, from which he could look to the
station and the hill with its grass, beyond. That hill beyond - he had
seemed to look at it through darkened glass, before. Till now, the
morning had been a timeless greyness. Indeed, it had rained at seven
o'clock, as they stood lounging miserably about in the barracks yard
with its high wall, cold and bitter. And the tall man had talked to him
bitterly.But now the sun shone, the dark-green, Cornish hill, hard-looking, was
just a near hill. He walked through the great gates. Ah God, he was out,
he was free. The road with trees went downhill to the town. He hastened
down, a free human being, on Saturday morning, the grey glaze gone from
his eyes.He telegraphed the ignominious word Rejected, and the time of his
arrival, to Harriet. Then he went and had dinner. Some of the other men
came in. They were reserved now - there was a distance between him and
them - he was not of their social class.&quot;What are you?&quot; they asked him.&quot;Rejected,&quot; he said.And they looked at him grudgingly, thinking it was because he was not a
working man he had got special favour. He knew what they thought, and he
tried not to look so glad. But glad he was, and in some mysterious way,
triumphant.It was a wonderful journey on the Saturday afternoon home - sunny, busy,
lovely. He changed at Truro and went into town. On the road he met some
of the other fellows, who were called up, but not summoned for service
immediately. They had some weeks, or months, of torment and suspense
before them. They looked at Somers, and grinned rather jeeringly at him.
They envied him - no wonder. And already he was a stranger, in another
walk of life.Rejected as unfit. One of the unfit. What did he care? The Cornish are
always horrified of any ailment or physical disablement. &quot;What's amiss
then?&quot; they would ask. They would SAY that you might as well be shot
outright as labelled unfit. But most of them tried hard to find
constitutional weaknesses in themselves, that would get them rejected
also, notwithstanding. And at the same time they felt they must be
horribly ashamed of their physical ignominy if they were LABELLED unfit.Somers did not care. Let them label me unfit, he said to himself. I know
my own body is fragile, in its way, but also it is very strong, and it's
the only body that would carry my particular self. Let the fools peer at
it and put me down undeveloped chest and what they like, so long as they
leave me to my own way.Then the kindly doctor's exhortation that he should find some way for
himself for serving his country. He thought about that many times. But
always, as he came near to the fact of committing himself, he knew that
he simply could not commit himself to any service whatsoever. In no
shape or form could he serve the war, either indirectly or directly. Yet
it would have been so easy. He had quite enough influential friends in
London to put him into some job, even some quite congenial, literary
job, with a sufficient salary. They would be only too glad to do it, for
there in his remoteness, writing occasionally an essay that only
bothered them, he was a thorn in their flesh. And men and women with
sons, brothers, husbands away fighting, it was small pleasure for them
to read Mr. Somers and his denunciation. &quot;This trench and machine
warfare is a blasphemy against life itself, a blasphemy which we are all
committing.&quot; All very well, they said, but we are in for a war, and what
are we to do? We hate it as much as he does. But we can't all sit safely
in Cornwall.That was true too, and he knew it, and he felt the most a dreary misery,
knowing how many brave, generous men were being put through this
slaughter-machine of human devilishness. They were doing their best, and
there was nothing else to do. But even that was no reason why he should
go and do likewise.If men had kept their souls firm and integral through the years, the war
would never have come on. If, in the beginning, there had been enough
strong, proud souls in England to concentrate the English feeling into
stern, fierce, honourable fighting,, the war would never have gone as it
went. But England slopped and wobbled, and the tide of horror
accumulated.And now, if circumstances had roped nearly all men into the horror, and
it was a case of adding horror to horror, or dying well, on the other
hand, the irremediable circumstance of his own separate soul made
Richard Lovat's inevitable standing out. If there is outward,
circumstantial unreason and fatality, there is inward unreason and
inward fate. He would have to dare to follow his inward fate. He must
remain alone, outside of everything, everything, conscious of what was
going on, conscious of what he was doing and not doing. Conscious he
must be, and consciously he must stick to it. To be forced into nothing.For, above all things, man is a land animal and a thought-adventurer.
Once the human consciousness really sinks and is swamped under the tide
of events - as the best English consciousness was swamped, pacifist and
patriotic alike - then the adventure is doomed. The English soul went
under in the war, and, as a conscious, proud, adventurous,
self-responsible soul, it was lost. We all lost the war: perhaps Germany
least. Lost all the lot. The adventure is always lost when the human
conscious soul gives way under the stress, fails to keep control, and is
submerged. Then out swarm the rats and the Bottomleys and crew, and the
ship of human adventure is a horrible piratic affair, a dirty sort of
freebooting.Richard Lovat had nothing to hang on to but his own soul. So he hung on
to it, and tried to keep his wits. If no man was with him, he was hardly
aware of it, he had to grip on so desperately, like a man on a plank in
a shipwreck. The plank was his own individual self.Followed that period of suspense which changed his life for ever. If the
postman was coming plunging downhill through the bushes over the moor,
the first thought was: What is he bringing now? The postman was over
military age, and had a chuckle of pleasure in handing out those
accursed On His Majesty's Service envelopes which meant that a man was
summoned for torture. The postman was a great Wesleyan and a chapel
preacher, and the thought of hell for other men was sweet in him: he had
a religious zest added to his natural Cornish zest in other people's
disasters.Again, if there was the glint of a bicycle on the moor road, and if it
turned down the bypath towards the cottage, then Somers strained his
eyes to see if the rider were fat and blue, or tall and blue. Was it the
police sergeant, or the police constable, coming for more identification
proofs.&quot;We want your birth certificate,&quot; said the sergeant. &quot;They've written
from Bodmin asking you to produce your birth certificate.&quot;&quot;Then tell them to get it. No, I haven't got it. You've had my marriage
certificate. You know who I am and where I was born and all the rest.
Now let them get the birth certificate themselves.&quot;Richard Lovat was at the end of all patience. They persisted he was a
foreigner - poor Somers, just because he had a beard. One of the most
intensely English little men England ever produced, with a passion for
his country, even if it were often a passion of hatred. But no, they
persisted he was a foreigner. Pah!He and Harriet did all their own work, their own shopping. One wintry
afternoon they were coming home with a knapsack, along the field path
above the sea, when two khaki individuals, officers of some sort, strode
after them.&quot;Excuse me,&quot; said one, in a damnatory officious voice. &quot;What have you
got in that sack?&quot;&quot;A few groceries,&quot; said Lovat.&quot;I would like to look.&quot;Somers put the sack down on the path. The tall and lofty officer stooped
and groped nobly among a pound of rice and a piece of soap and a dozen
candles.&quot;Ha!&quot; he cried, exultant. &quot;What's this? A camera!&quot;Richard peeped in the bag at the groping red military hands. For a
moment he almost believed that a camera had spirited itself in among his
few goods, the implication of his guilt was so powerful. He saw a block
in brown paper.&quot;A penn'orth of salt,&quot; he said quietly, though pale to the lips with
anger and insult.But the gentlemanly officer - a Captain - tore open the paper. Yes, a
common block of salt. He pushed the bag aside.&quot;We have to be careful,&quot; said the other, lesser man.&quot;Of course,&quot; said Richard, tying up his bag.&quot;Good afternoon!&quot; said Harriet.The fellows half saluted, and turned hastening away. Richard and Harriet
had the advantage of sauntering behind them and looking at their noble
backs. Oh, they were gentlemen, true English gentlemen: perhaps Cornish.Harriet gave a pouf of laughter.&quot;The poor innocent salt!&quot; she exclaimed.And no doubt that also was chalked up against her.It was Christmas time, and two friends came down to stay at the cottage
with the Somers. Those were the days before America joined the Allies.
The man friend arrived with a whole parcel of American dainties,
buckwheat meal and sweet potatoes and maple sugar: the woman friend
brought a good basket of fruit. They were to have a Christmas in the
lonely cottage in spite of everything.It was Christmas Eve, and a pouring black wet night outside. Nowhere can
it be so black as on the edge of a Cornish moor, above the western sea,
near the rocks where the ancient worshippers used to sacrifice. The
darkness of menhirs. The American woman friend was crouching at the fire
making fudge, the man was away in his room, when a thundering knock at
the door. Ah Lord!The burly police-sergeant, and his bicycle.&quot;Sorry to trouble you sir, but is an American, a Mr. Monsell, stopping
here with you? He is. Can I have a word with him?&quot;&quot;Yes. Won't you come in?&quot;Into the cosy cottage room, with the American girl at the fire, her face
flushed with the fudge-making, entered the big, burly police-sergeant,
his black mackintosh-cape streaming wet.&quot;We give you a terrible lot of trouble, I'm sorry to say,&quot; said Harriet
ironically. &quot;What an awful night for you to have to come all these
miles. I'm sure it isn't OUR doing.&quot;&quot;No, ma'm, I know that. It's the doing of people who like to meddle.
These military orders, they take some keeping pace with.&quot;&quot;I'm sure they do.&quot;Harriet was all sympathy. So he, too, was goaded by these military
canaille.Somers fetched the American friend, and he was asked to produce papers,
and give information. He gave it, being an honourable citizen and a
well-bred American, with complete sang froid. At that moment Somers
would have given a lot to be American too, and not English. But
wait - those were early days, when America was still being jeered at for
standing out and filling her pockets. She was not yet the intensely
loved Ally. The police-sergeant was pleasant as ever. He apologised
again, and went out into the black and pouring night. So much for
Christmas Eve.&quot;But that's not the end of the horrid affair,&quot; as the song says. When
Monsell got back to London he was arrested, and conveyed to Scotland
Yard: there examined, stripped naked, his clothes taken away. Then he
was kept for a night in a cell - next evening liberated and advised to
return to America.Poor Monsell, and he was so very anti-German, so very pro-British. It
was a blow for him. He did not leave off being anti-German, but he was
much less pro-British. And after all, it was war-time, when these things
must happen, we are told. Such a war-time that let loose the foulest
feelings of a mob, particularly of 'gentlemen', to torture any single,
independent man as a mob always tortures the isolated and independent.In despair, Somers thought he would go to America. He had passports, he
was Rejected. They had no use for him, and he had no use for them. So he
posted his passports to the Foreign Office, for the military permit to
depart.It was January, and there was a thin film of half-melted snow, like
silver, on the fields and the path. A white, static, arrested morning,
away there in the west of Cornwall, with the moors looking primeval, and
the huge granite boulders bulging out of the earth like presences. So
easy to realise men worshipping stones. It is not the stone. It is the
mystery of the powerful, pre-human earth, showing its might. And all,
this morning, static, arrested in a cold, milky whiteness, like death,
the west lost in the sea.A man culminates in intense moments. This was one of Somers' white,
deathlike moments, as he walked home from the tiny post-office in the
hamlet, on the wintry morning, after he had posted his passports asking
for visas to go to New York. It was like walking in death: a strange,
arrested land of death. Never had he known that feeling before: as if he
were a ghost in the after-death, walking a strange, pale, static, cold
world. It almost frightened him. &quot;Have I done wrong?&quot; he asked himself.
&quot;Am I wrong, to leave my country and go to America?&quot;It was then as if he HAD left his country: and that was like death, a
still, static, corporate death. America was the death of his own country
in him, he realised that.But he need not have bothered. The Foreign Office kept his passports,
and did not so much as answer him. He waited in vain.Spring came - and one morning the news that Asquith was out of the
government, that Lloyd George was in. And this was another of Somers'
crises. He felt he must go away from the house, away from everywhere.
And as he walked, clear as a voice out of the moors, came a voice
saying: &quot;It is the end of England. It is the end of the old England. It
is finished. England will never be England any more.&quot;Cornwall is a country that makes a man psychic. The longer he stayed,
the more intensely it had that effect on Somers. It was as if he were
developing second sight, and second hearing. He would go out into the
blackness of night and listen to the blackness, and call, call softly,
for the spirits, the presences he felt coming downhill from the moors in
the night. &quot;Tuatha De Danaan!&quot; he would call softly. &quot;Tuatha De Danaan!
Be with me. Be with me.&quot; And it was as if he felt them come.And so this morning the voice struck into his consciousness. &quot;It is the
end of England.&quot; So he walked along blindly, up the valley and on the
moors. He loved the country intensely. It seemed to answer him. But his
consciousness was all confused. In his mind, he did not at all see why
it should be the end of England. Mr. Asquith was called Old
Wait-and-See. And truly, English Liberalism had proved a slobbery
affair, all sad sympathy with everybody, and no iron backbone, these
years. Repulsively humble, too, on its own account. It was no time for
Christian humility. And yet, it was true to its great creed.Whereas Lloyd George! Somers knew nothing about Lloyd George. A little
Welsh lawyer, not an Englishman at all. He had no real significance in
Richard Lovat's soul. Only, Somers gradually came to believe that all
Jews, and all Celts, even whilst they espoused the cause of England,
subtly lived to bring about the last humiliation of the great old
England. They could never do so if England WOULD NOT BE humiliated. But
with an England fairly offering herself to ignominy, where was the help?
Let the Celts work out their subtlety. If England WANTED to be betrayed,
in the deeper issues. Perhaps Jesus wanted to be betrayed. He did. He
chose Judas.Well, the story could have no other ending.The war-wave had broken right over England, now: right over Cornwall.
Probably throughout the ages Cornwall had not been finally swept,
submerged by any English spirit. Now it happened - the accursed later war
spirit. Now the tales began to go round full-tilt against Somers. A
chimney of his house was tarred to keep out the damp: that was a signal
to the Germans. He and his wife carried food to supply German
submarines. They had secret stores of petrol in the cliff. They were
watched and listened to, spied on, by men lying behind the low stone
fences. It is a job the Cornish loved. They didn't even mind being
caught at it: lying behind a fence with field-glasses, watching through
a hole in the drystone wall a man with a lass, on the edge of the moors.
Perhaps they were proud of it. If a man wanted to hear what was said
about him - or anything - he lay behind a wall at the field-corners, where
the youths talked before they parted and went indoors, late of a
Saturday night. A whole intense life of spying going on all the time.Harriet could not hang out a towel on a bush, or carry out the slops, in
the empty landscape of moors and sea, without her every movement being
followed by invisible eyes. And at evening, when the doors were shut,
valiant men lay under the windows to listen to the conversation in the
cosy little room. And bitter enough were the things they said: and
damnatory, the two Somers. Richard did not hold himself in. And he
talked too with the men on the farm: openly. For they had exactly the
same anti-military feeling as himself, and they simply loathed the
thought of being compelled to serve. Most men in the west, Somers
thought, would have committed murder to escape, if murder would have
helped them. It wouldn't. He loved the people at the farm, and the men
kindled their rage together. And again Somers' farmer friend warned him,
how he was being watched. But Somers WOULD not heed. &quot;What can they do
to me!&quot; he said. &quot;I am not a spy in any way whatsoever. There is nothing
they can do to me. I make no public appearance at all. I am just by
myself. What can they do to me? Let them go to hell.&quot;He refused to be watchful, guarded, furtive, like the people around,
saying double things as occasion arose, and hiding their secret thoughts
and secret malignancy. He still believed in the freedom of the
individual. - Yes, freedom of the individual!He was aware of the mass of secret feeling against him. Yet the people
he came into daily contact with liked him - almost loved him. So he kept
on defying the rest, and went along blithe and open as ever, saying what
he really felt, or holding his tongue. Enemies! How could he have any
PERSONAL enemies? He had never done harm to any of these people, had
never even felt any harm. He did not believe in personal enemies. It was
just the military.Enemies he had, however, people he didn't know and hadn't even spoken
to. Enemies who hated him like poison. They hated him because he was
free, because of his different, unafraid face. They hated him because he
wasn't cowed, as they were all cowed. They hated him for his intimacy at
the farm, in the hamlet. For each farm was bitter jealous of each other.Yet he never believed he had any PERSONAL enemies. And he had all the
west hating him like poison. He realized once, when two men came down
the moorland by-road - officers in khaki - on a motor-bicycle, and went
trying the door of the next cottage, which was shut up. Somers went to
the door, in all simplicity.&quot;Did you want me?&quot; he asked.&quot;No, we didn't want YOU,&quot; replied one of the fellows, in a genteel voice
and a tone like a slap in the face. Somers spoken to as if he were the
lowest of the low. He shut his cottage door. Was it so? Had they
wilfully spoken to him like that? He would not believe it.But inwardly, he knew it was so. That was what they intended to convey
to him: that he was the lowest of the low. He began even to feel guilty,
under this mass of poisonous condemnation. And he realised that they had
come, on their own, to get into the other cottage and see if there were
some wireless installation or something else criminal. But it was
fastened tight, and apparently they gave up their design of breaking in,
for they turned the motor-cycle and went away.Day followed day in this tension of suspense. Submarines were off the
coast; Harriet saw a ship sunk, away to sea. Horrible excitement, and
the postman asking sly questions to try to catch Somers out. Increased
rigour of coast watching, and NO light must be shown. Yet along the
high-road on the hillside above, plainer than any house-light, danced
the lights of a cart, moving, or slowly sped the light of a bicycle, on
the blackness. Then a Spanish coal-vessel, three thousand tons, ran on
the rocks in a fog, straight under the cottage. She was completely
wrecked. Somers watched the waves break over her. Her coal washed
ashore, and the farmers carried it up the cliffs in sacks.There was to be a calling-up now and a re-examination of every
man - Somers felt the crisis approaching. The ordeal was to go through,
once more. The first rejection meant nothing. There were certain
reservations. He had himself examined again by a doctor. The strain
told. on his heart as well as his breathing. He sent in this note to the
authorities. A reply: &quot;You must present yourself for examination, as
ordered.&quot;He knew that if he was really ever summoned to any service, and finally
violated, he would be broken, and die. But patience. In the meanwhile he
went to see his people: the long journey up the west, changing at
Plymouth and Bristol and Birmingham, up to Derby. Glamorous west of
England: if a man were free. He sat through the whole day, very still,
looking at the world. Very still, gone very far inside himself,
travelling through this England in spring. He loved it so much. But it
was in the grip of something monstrous, not English, and he was almost
gripped too. As it was, by making himself far away inside himself, he
contained himself, and was still.He arrived late in Derby: Saturday night, and no train for the next ten
miles. But luckily, there was a motor-bus going out to the outlying
villages. Derby was very dark, like a savage town, a feeling of
savagery. And at last the bus was ready: full of young miners, more or
less intoxicated. The bus was crammed, a solid jam of men, sitting on
each other's knees, standing blocked and wedged. There was no outside
accommodation. And inside were jammed eighteen more men than was
allowed. It was like being pressed into one block of corned beef.The bus ran six miles without stopping, through an absolutely dark
country, Zeppelin black, and having one feeble light of its own. The
roads were unmended, and very bad. But the bus charged on, madly, at
full speed, like a dim consciousness madly charging through the night.
And the mass of colliers swayed with the bus, intoxicated into a living
block, and with high, loud, wailing voices they sang:There's a long, long trail a-winding
Into the land of my dreams - 
Where the nightingales are singing and the -This ghastly trailing song, like death itself. The colliers seemed to
tear it out of their bowels, in a long, wild chant. They, too, all
loathed the war: loathed it. And this awful song! They subsided, and
somebody started &quot;Tipperary&quot;.It's a long, long way to Tipperary,
It's a long way to go - .But Tipperary was already felt as something of a Jonah: a bad-luck song,
so it did not last long. The miserable songs - with their long, long ways
that ended in sheer lugubriousness: real death-wails! These for battle
songs. The wail of a dying humanity.Somebody started:Good-bye - eeee
Don't cry - eee
Wipe the tear, baby dear, from your eye - eee - 
For it's hard to part I know.
I'll - be - tickled-to-death to go,
Good-bye - eeee
Don't cry - eee - .But the others didn't know this ragtime, and they weren't yet in the
mood. They drifted drunkenly back to the ineffable howl ofThere's a long, long trail - .A black, wild Saturday night. These were the collier youths Somers had
been to school with - approximately. As they tore their bowels with their
singing, they tore his. But as he sat squashed far back among all that
coated flesh, in the dimmest glim of a light, that only made darkness
more substantial, he felt like some strange isolated cell in some
tensely packed organism that was hurtling through chaos into oblivion.
The colliers. He was more at one with them. But they were blind,
ventral. Once they broke loose heaven knows what it would be.The Midlands - the theatre in Nottingham - the pretence of amusement, and
the feeling of murder in the dark, dreadful city. In the daytime these
songs - this horrible long trail, and &quot;Good-byeeee&quot; and &quot;Way down in
Tennessee.&quot; They tried to keep up their spirits with this rag-time
Tennessee. But there was murder in the air in the Midlands, among the
colliers. In the theatre particularly, a shut-in, awful feeling of souls
fit for murder.London - mid-war London, nothing but war, war. Lovely sunny weather, and
bombs at midday in the Strand. Summery weather.
Berkshire - aeroplanes - springtime. He was as if blind; he must hurry the
long journey back to Harriet and Cornwall.Yes - he had his papers - he must present himself again at Bodmin
barracks. He was just simply summoned as if he were already conscripted.
But he knew he must be medically examined. He went - left home at seven
in the morning to catch the train. Harriet watched him go across the
field. She was left alone, in a strange country.&quot;I shall be back to-night,&quot; he said.It was a still morning, as if one were not in the world. On the hill
down to the station he lingered. &quot;Shall I not go! Shall I not go!&quot; he
said to himself. He wanted to break away. But what good? He would only
be arrested and lost. Yet he had dawdled his time, he had to run hard to
catch the train in the end.This time things went much more quickly. He was only two hours in the
barracks. He was examined. He could tell they knew about him and
disliked him. He was put in class C3 - unfit for military service, but
conscripted for light non-military duties. There were no rejections now.
Still, it was good enough. There were thousands of C men, men who WANTED
to have jobs as C men, so they were not very likely to fetch him up. He
would only be a nuisance anyhow. That was clear all round.Through the little window at the back of their ancient granite cottage,
Harriet, peeping wistfully out to sea - poor Harriet, she was always
frightened now - saw Richard coming across the fields, home, walking
fast, and with that intent look about him that she half feared. She ran
out in a sort of fear, then waited. She would wait.He saw her face very bright with fear and joy at seeing him back: very
beautiful in his eyes. The only real thing, perhaps, left in his world.&quot;Here you are! So early!&quot; she cried. &quot;I didn't expect you. The dinner
isn't ready yet. Well?&quot;&quot;C3,&quot; he replied. &quot;It's all right.&quot;&quot;I KNEW it would be,&quot; she cried, seizing his arm and hugging it to her.
They went in to the cottage to finish cooking the evening meal. And
immediately one of the farm girls came running up to see what it was.&quot;Oh, C3 - so you're all right, Mr. Somers. Glad, I'm glad.&quot;Harriet never forgot the straight, intent bee-line for home which he was
making when she peeped out of that little window unaware.So, another respite. They were not going to touch him. They knew he
would be a firebrand in their army, a dangerous man to put with any
group of men. They would leave him alone. C3.He had almost entirely left off writing now, and spent most of his days
working on the farm. Again the neighbours were jealous.&quot;Buryan gets his labour cheap. He'd never have got his hay in but for
Mr. Somers,&quot; they said. And that was another reason for wishing to
remove Richard Lovat. Work went like steam when he was on Trendrinnan
farm, and he was too thick with the Buryans. Much too thick. And John
Thomas Buryan rather bragged of Mr. Somers at market, and how he,
Richard Lovat, wasn't afraid of any of them, etc., etc. - that he wasn't
going to serve anybody, etc. - and that nobody could make him - etc., etc.But Richard drifted away this summer, on to the land, into the weather,
into Cornwall. He worked out of doors all the time - he ceased to care
inwardly - he began to drift away from himself. He was very thick with
John Thomas, and nearly always at the farm. Harriet was a great deal
alone. And he seemed to be drifting away, drifting back to the common
people, becoming a working man, of the lower classes. It had its charm
for Harriet, this aspect of him - careless, rather reckless, in old
clothes and an old battered hat. He kept his sharp wits, but his SPIRIT
became careless, lost its concentration.&quot;I declare!&quot; said John Thomas, as Somers appeared in the cornfield, &quot;you
look more like one of us every day.&quot; And he looked with a bright Cornish
eye at Somers' careless, belted figure and old jacket. The speech struck
Richard: it sounded half triumphant, half mocking. &quot;He thinks I'm coming
down in the world - it is half a rebuke,&quot; thought Somers to himself. But
he was half pleased: and half he WAS rebuked.Corn harvest lasted long, and was a happy time for them all. It went
well, well. Also from London occasionally a young man came down and
stayed at the inn in the church town, some young friend of Somers who
hated the army and the Government and was generally discontented, and so
fitfully came as an adherent to Richard Lovat. One of these was James
Sharpe, a young Edinburgh man with a moderate income of his own,
interested in music. Sharpe was hardly more than a lad - but he was the
type of lowland Scotsman who is half an artist, not more, and so can
never get on in the ordinary respectable life, rebels against it all the
time, and yet can never get away from it or free himself from its
dictates.Sharpe had taken a house further along the coast, brought his piano down
from London and sufficient furniture and a housekeeper, and insisted,
like a morose bird, that he wanted to be alone. But he wasn't really
morose, and he didn't want really to be alone. His old house, rather
ramshackle, stood back a little way from the cliffs, where the moor came
down savagely to the sea, past a deserted tin mine. It was lonely, wild,
and in a savage way, poetic enough. Here Sharpe installed himself for
the moment: to be alone with his music and his general discontent.Of course he excited the wildest comments. He had window-curtains of
different colours, so of course, HERE was plain signalling to the German
submarines. Spies, the lot of them. When still another young man of the
same set came and took a bungalow on the moors, West Cornwall decided
that it was being delivered straight into German hands. Not that West
Cornwall would really have minded that so terribly. No; it wasn't that
it feared the Germans. It was that it hated the sight of these
recalcitrant young men. And Somers the instigator, the arch-spy, the
responsible little swine with his beard.Somers, meanwhile, began to chuckle a bit to himself. After all he was
getting the better of the military canaille. Canaille! Canaglia!
Schweinerie! He loathed them in all the languages he could lay his
tongue to.So Somers and Harriet went to stay a week-end with Sharpe at Trevenna,
as the house was called. Sharpe was a C2 man, on perpetual tenterhooks.
He had decided that if ever HE were summoned to serve, he would just
disappear. The Somers drove over, only three or four miles, on the
Saturday afternoon, and the three wandered on the moor and down the
cliff. No one was in sight. But how many pairs of eyes were watching,
who knows? Sharpe lighting a cigarette for Harriet was an indication of
untold immorality.Evening came, the lamps were lit, and the incriminating curtains
carefully drawn. The three sat before the fire in the long music room,
and tried to be cosy and jolly. But there was something wrong with the
mood. After dinner it was even worse. Harriet curled herself up on the
sofa with a cigarette. Sharpe spread himself in profound melancholy in
his big chair, Somers sat back, nearer the window. They talked in
occasional snatches, in mockery of the enemy that surrounded them. Then
Somers sang to himself, in an irritating way, one German folksong after
another, not in a songful, but in a defiant way.&quot;Annchen von Tharau&quot; - &quot;Schatz, meun Schatz, reite nicht so weit von
mir.&quot; &quot;Zu Strasburg auf der Schanz, da fiel mein Ungluck ein.&quot; This went
on till Sharpe asked him to stop.And in the silence, the tense and irritable silence that followed, came
a loud bang. All got up in alarm, and followed Sharpe through the
dining-room to the small entrance-room, where a dim light was burning. A
lieutenant and three sordid men in the dark behind him, one with a
lantern.&quot;Mr. Sharpe?&quot; - the authoritative and absolutely-in-the-right voice of
the puppy lieutenant.Sharpe took his pipe from his mouth and said laconically, &quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;You've a light burning in your window facing the sea.&quot;&quot;I think not. There is only one window, and that's on the passage where
I never go, upstairs.&quot;&quot;A light was showing from that window ten minutes ago.&quot;&quot;I don't think it can have been.&quot;&quot;It was.&quot; And the stern, puppy lieutenant turned to his followers, who
clustered there in the dark.&quot;Yes, there was a light there ten minutes since,&quot; chimed the followers.&quot;I don't see how it's possible,&quot; persisted Sharpe.&quot;Oh, well - there is sufficient evidence that it was. What other persons
have you in the house - ? and this officer and gentleman stepped into the
room, followed by his three Cornish weeds, one of whom had fallen into a
ditch in his assiduous serving of his country, and was a sorry sight. Of
course Harriet saw chiefly him, and had to laugh.&quot;There's Mrs. Waugh, the housekeeper - but she's in bed.&quot;The party now stood and eyed one another - the lieutenant with his three
sorry braves on one hand, Sharpe, Somers, and Harriet in an old dress of
soft silk on the other.&quot;Well, Mr. Sharpe, the light was seen.&quot;&quot;I don't see how it was possible. We've none of us been upstairs, and
Mrs. Waugh has been in bed for half an hour.&quot;&quot;Is there a curtain to the passage window?&quot; put in Somers quietly. He
had helped Sharpe in setting up house.&quot;I don't believe there is,&quot; said Sharpe. &quot;I forgot all about it, as it
wasn't in a room, and I never go to that side of the house. Even Mrs.
Waugh is supposed to go up the kitchen stairs, and so she doesn't have
to pass it.&quot;&quot;She must have gone across with a candle as she went to bed,&quot; said
Somers.But the lieutenant didn't like being pushed into unimportance while
these young men so quietly and naturally spoke together, excluding him
as if he were an inferior: which they meant to do.&quot;You have an uncurtained window overlooking the sea, Mr. Sharpe?&quot; he
said, in his military counter-jumper voice.&quot;You'll have to put a curtain to it to-morrow,&quot; said Somers to Sharpe.&quot;What is your name?&quot; chimed the lieutenant.&quot;Somers - I wasn't speaking to you,&quot; said Richard coldly. And then to
Sharpe, with a note of contempt: &quot;That's what it is. Mrs. Waugh must
have just passed with a candle.&quot;There was a silence. The wonderful watchers did not contradict.&quot;Yes, I suppose that's it,&quot; said Sharpe, fretfully.&quot;We'll put a curtain up to-morrow,&quot; said Somers.The lieutenant would have liked to search the house. He would have liked
to destroy its privacy. He glanced down to the music room. But Harriet,
so obviously a lady, even if a hateful one; and Somers with his pale
look of derision; and Sharpe so impassive with his pipe; and the weedy
watchers in the background, knowing just how it all was, and ALMOST
ready to take sides with the &quot;gentleman&quot; against the officer: they were
too much for the lieutenant.&quot;Well, the light was there, Mr. Sharpe. Distinctly visible from the
sea,&quot; and he turned to his followers for confirmation.&quot;Oh, yes, a light plain enough,&quot; said the one who had fallen into a
ditch, and wanted a bit of his own back.&quot;A candle!&quot; said Sharpe, with his queer, musical note of derision and
fretfulness. &quot;A candle just passing - .&quot;&quot;You have an uncurtained window to the sea, and lights were showing. I
shall have to report this to headquarters. Perhaps if you write and
apologise to Major Caerlyon it may be passed over, if nothing of the
like occurs again - .&quot;So they departed, and the three went back to their room, fuming with
rage and mockery. They mocked the appearance and voice of the
lieutenant, the appearance of the weeds, and Harriet rejoiced over the
one who had fallen into a ditch. This regardless of the fact that they
knew now that SOME of the watchers were lying listening in the gorse
bushes under the windows, and had been lying there all the evening.&quot;Shall you write and apologise?&quot; said Somers.&quot;Apologise! no!&quot; replied Sharpe, with peevish contempt.Harriet and Somers went back home on the Monday. On the Tuesday appeared
Sharpe, the police had been and left him a summons to appear at the
market town, charged under the Defence of the Realm Act.&quot;I suppose you'll have to go,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Oh, I shall go,&quot; said he.They waited for the day. In the afternoon Sharpe came with a white face
and tears of rage and mortification in his eyes. The magistrate had told
him he ought to be serving his country, and not causing mischief and
skulking in an out-of-the-way corner. And he fined him twenty pounds.&quot;Ishan't pay it,&quot; cried Sharpe.&quot;Your mother will,&quot; said Somers.And so it was. What was the good of putting oneself in their power in
ANY way, if it could be avoided?So the lower fields were cleared of corn, and they started on the two
big fields above on the moors. Sharpe cycled over to say a farmer had
asked HIM to go and help at Westyr; and for once he had gone; but he
felt spiteful to Somers for letting him in for this.But Somers was very fond of the family at Buryan farm, and he loved
working with John Thomas and the girls. John Thomas was a year or two
older than Somers, and at this time his dearest friend. And so he loved
working all day among the corn beyond the high-road, with the savage
moors all round, and the hill with its pre-christian granite rocks
rising like a great dark pyramid on the left, the sea in front.
Sometimes a great airship hung over the sea, watching for submarines.
The work stopped in the field, and the men watched. Then it went on
again, and the wagon rocked slowly down the wild, granite road, rocked
like a ship past Harriet's sunken cottage. But Somers stayed above all
day, loading or picking, or resting, talking in the intervals with John
Thomas, who loved a half-philosophical, mystical talking about the sun,
and the moon, the mysterious powers of the moon at night, and the
mysterious change in man with the change of season, and the mysterious
effects of sex on a man. So they talked, lying in the bracken or on the
heather as they waited for a wain. Or one of the girls came with dinner
in a huge basket, and they ate all together, so happy with the moors and
sky and touch of autumn. Somers loved these people. He loved the
sensitiveness of their intelligence. They were not educated. But they
had an endless curiosity about the world, and an endless interest in
what was RIGHT.&quot;Now do you think it's right, Mr. Somers?&quot; The times that Somers heard
that question, from the girls, from Arthur, from John Thomas. They spoke
in the quick Cornish way, with the West Cornish accent. Sometimes it
was:&quot;Now do'ee think it right?&quot;And with their black eyes they watched the ethical issue in his face.
Queer it was. Right and wrong was not fixed for them as for the English.
There was still a mystery for them in what was right and what was wrong.
Only one thing was wrong - any sort of PHYSICAL compulsion or hurt. That
they were sure of. But as for the rest of behaviour - it was all a flux.
They had none of the ethics of chivalry or of love.Sometimes Harriet came also to tea: but not often. They loved her to
come: and yet they were a little uneasy when she was there. Harriet was
so definitely a lady. She liked them all. But it was a bit noli me
tangere, with her. Somers was so VERY intimate with them. She couldn't
be. And the girls said: &quot;Mrs. Somers don't mix in wi the likes o' we
like Mr. Somers do.&quot; Yet they were always very pleased when Harriet
came.Poor Harriet spent many lonely days in the cottage. Richard was not
interested in her now. He was only interested in John Thomas and the
farm people, and he was growing more like a labourer every day. And the
farm people didn't mind how long SHE was left alone, at night too, in
that lonely little cottage, and with all the tension of fear upon her.
Because she felt that it was SHE whom these authorities, these English,
hated, even more than Somers. Because she made them feel she despised
them. And as they were really rather despicable, they hated her at
sight, her beauty, her reckless pride, her touch of derision. But
Richard - even he neglected her and hated her. She was driven back on
herself like a fury. And many a bitter fight they had, he and she.The days grew shorter before the corn was all down from the moors.
Sometimes Somers alone lay on the sheaves, waiting for the last wain to
come to be loaded, while the others were down milking. And then the
Cornish night would gradually come down upon the dark, shaggy moors,
that were like the fur of some beast, and upon the pale-grey granite
masses, so ancient and Druidical, suggesting blood-sacrifice. And as
Somers sat there on the sheaves in the underdark, seeing the light swim
above the sea, he felt he was over the border, in another world. Over
the border, in that twilight, awesome world of the previous Celts. The
spirit of the ancient, pre-Christian world, which lingers still in the
truly Celtic places, he could feel it invade him in the savage dusk,
making him savage too, and at the same time, strangely sensitive and
subtle, understanding the mystery of blood-sacrifice: to sacrifice one's
victim, and let the blood run to the fire, there beyond the gorse upon
the old grey granite: and at the same time to understand most
sensitively the dark flicker of animal life about him, even in a bat,
even in the writhing of a maggot in a dead rabbit. Writhe then, Life, he
seemed to say to the things - and he no longer saw its sickeningness.The old Celtic countries have never had our Latin-Teutonic
consciousness, never will have. They have never been Christian, in the
blue-eyed, or even in the truly Roman, Latin sense of the word. But they
have been overlaid by our consciousness and our civilisation,
smouldering underneath in a slow, eternal fire, that you can never put
out till it burns itself out.And this autumn Richard Lovat seemed to drift back. He had a passion, a
profound nostalgia for the place. He could feel himself metamorphosing.
He no longer wanted to struggle consciously along, a thought adventurer.
He preferred to drift into a sort of blood-darkness, to take up in his
veins again the savage vibrations that still lingered round the secret
rocks, the place of the pre-Christian human sacrifice. Human sacrifice!
he could feel his dark, blood-consciousness tingle to it again, the
desire of it, the mystery of it. Old presences, old awful presences
round the black moor-edge, in the thick dust, as the sky of light was
pushed pulsing upwards, away. Then an owl would fly and hoot, and
Richard lay with his soul departed back, back into the blood-sacrificial
pre-world, and the sun-mystery, and the moon-power, and the mistletoe on
the tree, away from his own white world, his own white, conscious day.
Away from the burden of intensive mental consciousness. Back, back into
semi-dark, the half-conscious, the clair-obscur, where consciousness
pulsed as a passional vibration, not as mind-knowledge.Then would come John Thomas with the wain, and the two men would linger
putting up the sheaves, linger, talking, till the dark, talking of the
half-mystical things with which they both were filled. John Thomas, with
his nervous ways and his quick brown eyes, was full of fear: fear of the
unseen, fear of the unknown malevolencies, above all, fear of death. So
they would talk of death, and the powers of death. And the farmer, in a
non-mental way, understood, understood even more than Somers.And then in the first dark they went down the hill with the wain, to
part at the cottage door. And to Harriet, with her pure Teutonic
consciousness, John Thomas' greeting would sound like a jeer, as he
called to her. And Somers seemed to come home like an enemy, like an
enemy, with that look on his face, and that pregnant malevolency of
Cornwall investing him. It was a bitter time, to Harriet. Yet glamorous
too.Autumn drew on, corn-harvest was over, it was October. John Thomas drove
every Thursday over the moors to market - a two hours' drive. To-day
Somers would go with him - and Ann the sister also, to do some shopping.
It was a lovely October morning. They passed the stony little huddle of
the church-town, and on up the hill, where the great granite boulders
shoved out the land, and the barrenness was ancient and inviolable. They
could see the gulls under the big cliffs beyond - and there was a buzzard
circling over the marshy place below church-town. A Cornish, magic
morning. John Thomas and Somers were walking up the hill, leaving the
reins to Ann, seated high in the trap.&quot;One day, when the war ends, before long,&quot; said Somers as they climbed
behind the trap in the sun, past the still-flickering gorse-bushes, &quot;we
will go far across the sea - to Mexico, to Australia - and try living
there. You must come too, and we will have a farm.&quot;&quot;Me!&quot; said John Thomas. &quot;Why however should I come?&quot;&quot;Why not?&quot;But the Cornishman smiled with that peculiar sceptical smile.They reached town at length, over the moors and down the long hill. John
Thomas was always late. Somers went about doing his shopping - and then
met Ann at an eating house. John Thomas was to have been there too. But
he failed them. Somers walked about the Cornish seaport - he knew it
now - and by sight he too was known, and execrated. Yet the tradespeople
were always so pleasant and courteous to him. And it was such a sunny
day.The town was buzzing with a story. Two German submarine officers had
come into the town, dressed in clothes they had taken from an English
ship they had sunk. They had stayed a night at the Mounts Bay Hotel. And
two days later they had told the story to some fisherman whose fishing
boat they stopped. They had shown the incredulous fisherman the hotel
bill. Then they had sunk the fishing boat, sending the three fishermen
ashore in the row-boat.John Thomas, the chatterbox, should have been at the stables at five. He
was an endless gossip, never by any chance punctual. Somers and Ann
waited till six - all the farmers drove home, theirs was the last trap.&quot;Buryan's trap - always the last,&quot; said the ostler.It became dark - the shops were all closing - it was night. And now the
town, so busy at noon and all the afternoon, seemed cold, stony,
deserted, with the wind blowing down its steep street. Nearly seven, and
still no John Thomas. Ann was furious, but she knew him. Somers was more
quiet: but he knew that this was a sort of deliberate insult on John
Thomas' part, and that he must never trust him again.It was well after seven when the fellow came - smiling with subtle
malevolence and excusing himself so easily.&quot;I shall never come with you again,&quot; said Somers, quietly.&quot;I should think not, Mr. Somers,&quot; cried Ann.It was a two hours' drive home - a long climb to the dark stretch of the
moors - then across the moors in the cold of the night, to the steep,
cliff-like descent on the north, where church-town lay, and the sea
beyond. As they drew near to the north descent, the home face, and the
darkness was below them, Somers suddenly said:&quot;I don't think I shall ever drive this way again.&quot;&quot;Don't you? Why, what makes you say that?&quot; cried the facile John Thomas.Past nine o'clock as they came down the rocky road and saw the yellow
curtain of the cottage glowing. Poor Harriet. Somers was stiff with cold
as he rose to jump down.&quot;I'll come down for my parcels later,&quot; he said. Easier to take them out
at the farm, and he must fetch the milk.Harriet opened the door.&quot;At last you've come,&quot; she said. &quot;Something has happened, Lovat!&quot; One of
John Thomas' sisters came out too - she had come up with Mrs. Somers out
of sympathy.&quot;What?&quot; he said. And up came all the fear.It was evident Harriet had had a bad shock. She had walked in the
afternoon across to Sharpe's place, three miles away: and had got back
just at nightfall, expecting Somers home by seven. She had left the
doors unlocked, as they usually did. The moment she came in, in the
dusk, she knew something had happened. She made a light, and looked
round. Things were disturbed. She looked in her little treasure
boxes - everything there, but moved. She looked in the
drawers - everything turned upside down. The whole house ransacked,
searched.A terrible fear came over her. She knew she was antagonistic to the
government people: in her soul she hated the fixed society with its
barrenness and its barren laws. She had always been afraid - always
shrunk from the sight of a policeman, as if she were guilty of heaven
knows what. And now the horror had happened: all the black animosity of
authority was encompassing her. The unknown of it: and the horror.She fled down to the farm. Yes, three men had come, asking for Mr. and
Mrs. Somers. They had told the one who came to the farm that Mr. Somers
had driven to town, and Mrs. Somers they had seen going across the
fields to churchtown. Then the men had gone up to the cottage again, and
gone inside.&quot;And they've searched everything - everything,&quot; said Harriet, shocked
right through with awful fear.&quot;Well, there was nothing to find. They must have been disappointed,&quot;
said Richard.But it was a shock to him also: great consternation at the farm.&quot;It must have been something connected with Sharpe - it must have been
that,&quot; said Somers, trying to reassure himself.&quot;Thank goodness the house was so clean and tidy,&quot; said Harriet. But it
was a last blow to her.What had they taken? They had not touched Somers' papers. But they had
been through has pockets - they had taken the few loose letters from the
pocket of his day-jacket - they had taken a book - and a sort of note-book
with scraps of notes for essays in it - and his address book - yes, a few
things like that.&quot;But it'll be nothing. It'll be something to do with Sharpe's bother.&quot;But he felt sick and sullen, and wouldn't get up early in the morning.
Harriet was more prepared. She was down, dressed and tidy, making the
breakfast. It was eight o'clock in the morning. Suddenly Somers heard
her call:&quot;Lovat, they're here. Get up.&quot;He heard the dread in her voice, and sprang into his clothes and came
downstairs: a young officer, the burly police-sergeant, and two other
loutish looking men. Somers came down without a collar.&quot;I have here a warrant to search your house,&quot; said the young officer.&quot;But you searched it yesterday, didn't you,&quot; cried Harriet.The young officer looked at her coldly, without replying. He read the
search-warrant, and the two lout-detectives, in civilian clothes, began
to nose round.&quot;And the police-sergeant will read this order to you.&quot;Somers, white, and very still, spoke no word, but waited. Then the
police-sergeant, in rather stumbling fashion, began to read an order
from the military authorities that Richard Lovat Somers and Harriet Emma
Marianna Johanna Somers, of Trevetham Cottage, etc., should leave the
county of Cornwall within the space of three days. And further, within
the space of twenty-four hours of their arrival in any place they must
report themselves at the police station of the said place, giving their
address. And they were forbidden to enter any part of the area of
Cornwall, etc., etc., etc.Somers listened in silence.&quot;But why?&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;Why? What have we done?&quot;&quot;I can't say what you have done,&quot; said the young officer in a cold tone,
&quot;but it must be something sufficiently serious. They don't send out
these orders for nothing.&quot;&quot;But what is it then? What is it?Idon't know what we've done. Have
we no right to know what you accuse us of?&quot;&quot;No, you have no right to know anything further than what is said in the
order.&quot; And he folded up the said official foolscap, and handed it
officially to Somers. Richard silently took it and read it again.&quot;But it's monstrous! What have they against us? We live here simply - we
do nothing at all that they can charge us with. What have we done?&quot;
cried Harriet.&quot;I don't know what you've done. But we can take no risks in these
times - and evidently there is a risk in leaving you here.&quot;&quot;But I should like to know WHAT?&quot; cried Harriet.&quot;That I cannot tell you.&quot;&quot;But you do KNOW?&quot; woman-like, she persisted.&quot;No, I don't even know,&quot; he replied coldly.Harriet broke into a few tears of fright, fear, and chagrin.&quot;Have we no rights at all?&quot; she cried, furious.&quot;Be quiet,&quot; said Richard to her.&quot;Yes. It is your duty to serve your country, if it is your country, by
every means in your power. If you choose to put yourself under
suspicion - .&quot;&quot;Suspicion of what?&quot;&quot;I tell you, I do not know, and could not tell you even if I did know.&quot;The foul, loutish detectives meanwhile were fumbling around, taking the
books off the shelves and looking inside the clock. Somers watched them
with a cold eye.&quot;Is this yours?&quot; said one of the louts, producing a book with queer
diagrams.&quot;Yes, it's a botany notebook,&quot; said Somers coldly.The man secured it.&quot;He can learn the structure of moulds and parasites,&quot; said Richard
bitterly to Harriet.&quot;The house is all open, the men can search everything?&quot; asked the
officer coldly.&quot;You know it is,&quot; said Somers. &quot;You tried yesterday while we were out.&quot;
Then he asked: &quot;Who is responsible for this? Whom can I write to?&quot;&quot;You can write to Major Witham, Headquarters Southern Division,
Salisbury, if it will do any good,&quot; was the answer.There was a pause. Somers wrote it down: not in his address book because
that was gone.&quot;And one is treated like this, for nothing,&quot; cried Harriet, again in
tears. &quot;For nothing, but just because I wasn't born English. Yet one has
married an Englishman, and they won't let one live anywhere but in
England.&quot;&quot;It is more than that. It is more than the fact that you are not English
born,&quot; said the officer.&quot;Then what? What?&quot; she cried.He refused to answer this time. The police-sergeant looked on with
troubled blue eyes.&quot;Nothing. It's nothing but that, because it CAN'T be,&quot; wept Harriet. &quot;It
can't be anything else, because we've never done anything else. Just
because one wasn't born in England - as if one could help that. And to be
persecuted like this, for nothing, for nothing else. And not even openly
accused! Not even that.&quot; She wiped her tears, half enjoying it now. The
police-sergeant looked into the road. One of the louts clumped
downstairs and began to look once more among the books.&quot;That'll do here!&quot; said the officer quietly, to the detective lout. But
the detective lout wasn't going to be ordered, and persisted.&quot;This your sketch-book, Mr. Somers?&quot; said the lout.&quot;No, those are Lady Hermione Rogers' sketches,&quot; said Somers, with
derision. And the lout stuffed the book back.&quot;And why don't they let us go away?&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;Why don't they let
us go to America? We don't WANT to be here if we are a nuisance. We want
to go right away. Why won't they even let us do that!&quot; She was all
tear-marked now.&quot;They must have their reasons,&quot; said the young officer, who was getting
more and more uncomfortable. He again tried to hurry up the detective
lout. But they were enjoying nosing round among other people's
privacies.&quot;And what'll happen to us if we don't go, if we just stay?&quot; said
Harriet, being altogether a female.&quot;You'd better not try,&quot; said the young man, grimly, so utterly confident
in the absoluteness of the powers and the rightness he represented. And
Somers would have liked to hit him across the mouth for that.&quot;Hold your tongue, Harriet,&quot; he said, turning on her fiercely. &quot;You've
said enough now. Be still, and let them do what they like, since they've
the power to do it.&quot;And Harriet was silent. And in the silence only the louts rummaging
among the linen, and one looking into the bread-tin and into the tea
caddy. Somers watched them with a cold eye, and that queer slight
lifting of his nose, rather like a dog when it shows disgust. And the
officer again tried to hurry the louts, in his low tone of command,
which had so little effect.&quot;Where do you intend to go?&quot; said the officer to Somers.&quot;Oh, just to London,&quot; said Somers, who did not feel communicative.&quot;I suppose they will send the things back that they take?&quot; he said,
indicating the louts.&quot;I should think so - anything that is not evidence.&quot;The louts were drawing to an end: it was nearly over.&quot;Of course this has nothing to do with me: I have to obey orders, no
matter what they are,&quot; said the young officer, half apologising.Somers just looked at him, but did not answer. His face was pale and
still and distant, unconscious that the other people were real human
beings. To him they were not: they were just THINGS, obeying orders. And
his eyes showed that. The young officer wanted to get out.At last it was over: the louts had collected a very few trifles. The
officer saw them on to the road, bade them good-morning, and got out of
the house as quick as he could.&quot;Good-morning, sir! Good-morning, mam!&quot; said the police sergeant in
tones of sympathy.Yes, it was over. Harriet and Lovat looked at one another in silent
consternation.&quot;Well, we must go,&quot; she said.&quot;Oh, yes,&quot; he replied.And she studied the insolent notice to quit the area of Cornwall. In her
heart of hearts she was not sorry to quit it. It had become too painful.In a minute up came one of the farm girls to hear the news: then later
Somers went down. Arthur, the boy, had heard the officer say to the
police-sergeant as he went up the hill:&quot;Well, that's a job I'd rather not have had to do.&quot;Harriet was alternately bitter and mocking: but badly shocked. Somers
had had in his pocket the words of one of the Hebridean folk songs which
Sharpe had brought down, and which they all thought so wonderful. On a
bit of paper in his jacket-pocket, the words which have no meaning in
any language apparently, but are just vocal, almost animal sounds: the
Seal Woman's Song - this they had taken.Ver mi hiu - ravo na la vo - 
Ver mi hiu - ravo hovo i - 
Ver mi hiu - ravo na la vo - an catal - 
Traum - san jechar - .What would the investigation make of this? What, oh, what? Harriet loved
to think of it. Somers really expected to be examined under torture, to
make him confess. The only obvious word - Traum - pure German.The day was Friday: they must leave on Monday by the Great Western
express. Started a bitter rush of packing. Somers, so sick of things,
had a great fire of all his old manuscripts. They decided to leave the
house as it was, the books on the shelves, to take only their personal
belongings. For Somers was determined to come back. Until he had made up
his mind to this, he felt paralysed. He loved the place so much. Ever
since the conscription suspense began he had said to himself, when he
walked up the wild, little road from his cottage to the moor: shall I
see the foxgloves come out? If only I can stay till the foxgloves come.
And he had seen the foxgloves come. Then it was the heather - would he
see the heather? And then the primroses in the hollow down to the sea:
the tufts and tufts of primroses, where the fox stood and looked at him.Lately, however, he had begun to feel secure, as if he had sunk some of
himself into the earth there, and were rooted for ever. His soul seemed
to have sunk into that Cornwall, that wild place under the moors. And
now he must tear himself out. He was quite paralysed, could scarcely
move. And at the farm they all looked at him with blank faces. He went
back to the cottage to burn more manuscripts and pack up.And then, like a revelation, he decided he would come back. He would use
all his strength, put himself against all the authorities, and in a
month or two he would come back. Before the snow-drops came in the farm
garden.&quot;I shall be back in a month or two - three months,&quot; he said to everybody,
and they looked at him.But John Thomas said to him:&quot;You remember you said you would never drive to town again. Eh?&quot; And in
the black, bright eyes Somers saw that it was so. Yet he persisted.&quot;It only meant not yet awhile.&quot;On the Monday morning he went down to say good-bye at the farm. It was a
bitter moment, he was so much attached to them. And they to him. He
could not bear to go. Only one was not there - the Uncle James. Many a
time Somers wondered why Uncle James had gone down the fields, so as not
to say good-bye.John Thomas was driving them down in the trap - Arthur had taken the big
luggage in the cart. The family at the farm did everything they could.
Somers never forgot that while he and Harriet were slaving, on the
Sunday, to get things packed, John Thomas came up with their dinners,
from the farm Sunday dinner.It was a lovely, lovely morning as they drove across the hill-slopes
above the sea: Harriet and Somers and John Thomas. In spite of
themselves they felt cheerful. It seemed like an adventure.&quot;I don't know,&quot; said John Thomas, &quot;but I feel in myself as If it was all
going to turn out for the best.&quot; And he smiled in his bright, wondering
way.&quot;So do I,&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;As if we were going to be more free.&quot;&quot;As if we were setting out on a long adventure,&quot; said Somers.They drove through the town, where, of course, they were marked people.
But it was curious how little they cared, how indifferent they felt to
everybody.At the station Somers bade good-bye to John Thomas, with whom he had
been such friends.&quot;Well, I wonder when we shall see each other again,&quot; said the young
farmer.&quot;Soon. We will MAKE it soon,&quot; said Somers. &quot;We will MAKE it soon. And
you can come to London to see us.&quot;&quot;Well - if I can manage it - there's nothing would please me better,&quot;
replied the other. But even as he said it, Somers was thinking of the
evening in town, when he and Ann had been kept waiting so long. And he
knew he would not see John Thomas again soon.During the long journey up to London Somers sat facing Harriet, quite
still. The train was full: soldiers and sailors from Plymouth. One naval
man talked to Harriet: bitter like all the rest. As soon as a man began
to talk seriously, it was in bitterness. But many were beginning to make
a mock of their own feelings even. Songs like &quot;Good-byeeee&quot; had taken
the place of &quot;Bluebells,&quot; and marked the change.But Somers sat there feeling he had been killed: perfectly still, and
pale, in a kind of after death, feeling he had been killed. He had
always BELIEVED so in everything - society, love, friends. This was one
of his serious deaths in belief. So he sat with his immobile face of a
crucified Christ who makes no complaint, only broods silently and alone,
remote. This face distressed Harriet horribly. It made her feel lost and
shipwrecked, as if her heart was destined to break also. And she was in
rather good spirits really. Her horror had been that she would be
interned in one of the horrible camps, away from Somers. She had far
less belief than he in the goodness of mankind. And she was rather
relieved to get out of Cornwall. She had felt herself under a pressure
there, long suffering. That very pressure he had loved so much. And so,
while his still, fixed, crucified face distressed her horribly, at the
same time it made her angry. What did he want to look like that for? Why
didn't he show fight?They came to London, and he tried taxi after taxi before he could get
one to take them up to Hampstead. He had written to a staunch friend,
and asked her to wire if she would receive them for a day or two. She
wired that she would. So they went to her house. She was a little
delicate lady who reminded Somers of his mother, though she was younger
than his mother would have been. She and her husband had been friends of
William Morris in those busy days of incipient Fabianism. Now her
husband was sick, and she lived with him and a nurse and her grown-up
daughter in a little old house in Hampstead.Mrs. Redburn was frightened, receiving the tainted Somers. But she had
pluck. Everybody in London was frightened at this time, everybody who
was not a rabid and disgusting so-called patriot. It was a reign of
terror. Mrs. Redburn was a staunch little soul, but she was bewildered:
and she was frightened. They did such horrible things to you, the
authorities. Poor tiny Hattie, with her cameo face, like a wise child,
and her grey, bobbed hair. Such a frail little thing to have gone
sailing these seas of ideas, and to suffer the awful breakdown of her
husband. A tiny little woman with grey, bobbed hair, and wild,
unyielding eyes. She had three great children. It all seemed a joke and
a tragedy mixed, to her. And now the war. She was just bewildered, and
would not live long. Poor, frail, tiny Hattie, receiving the Somers into
her still, tiny old house. Both Richard and Harriet loved her. He had
pledged himself, in some queer way, to keep a place in his heart for her
forever, even when she was dead. Which he did.But he suffered from London. It was cold, heavy, foggy weather, and he
pined for his cottage, the granite strewn, gorse-grown slope from the
moors to the sea. He could not bear Hampstead Heath now. In his eyes he
saw the farm below - grey, naked, stony, with the big, pale-roofed new
barn - and the network of dark green fields with the pale-grey walls - and
the gorse and the sea. Torture of nostalgia. He craved to be back, his
soul was there. He wrote passionately to John Thomas.Richard and Harriet went to a police-station for the first time in their
lives. They went and reported themselves. The police at the station knew
nothing about them and said they needn't have come. But next day a great
policeman thumping at Hattie's door, and were some people called Somers
staying there? It was explained to the policeman that they had already
reported - but he knew nothing of it.Somers wanted as quickly as possible to find rooms, to take the burden
from Hattie. The American wife of an English friend, a poet serving in
the army, offered her rooms in Mecklenburgh Square, and the third day
after their arrival in London Somers and Harriet moved there: very
grateful indeed to the American girl. They had no money. But the young
woman tossed the rooms to them, and food and fuel, with a wild free
hand. She was beautiful, reckless, one of the poetesses whose poetry
Richard feared and wondered over.Started a new life: anguish of nostalgia for Cornwall, from Somers.
Wandering in the King's Cross Road or Theobald's Road, seeing his
cottage and the road going up to the moors. He wrote twice to the
headquarters at Salisbury insisting on being allowed to return. Came a
reply, this could not be permitted. Then one day a man called and left a
book and the little bundle of papers - a handful only - which the
detectives had confiscated. A poor little show. Even the scrap of paper
with Ver mi hiu. Again Somers wrote - but to no effect. Came a letter
from John Thomas describing events in the west - the last Somers ever had
from his friend.Then Sharpe came up to London: it was too lonely down there. And they
had some gay evenings. Many people came to see Somers. But Sharpe said
to him:&quot;They're watching you still. There were two policemen near the door
watching who came in.&quot;There was an atmosphere of terror all through London, as under the Tsar
when no man dared open his mouth. Only this time it was the lowest
orders of mankind spying on the upper orders, to drag them down.One evening there was a gorgeous commotion in Somers' rooms: four poets
and three non-poets, all fighting out poetry: a splendid time. Somers
ran down the stairs in the black dark - no lights in the hall - to open
the door. He opened quickly - three policemen in the porch. They slipped
out before they could be spoken to.Harriet and Somers had reported at Bow Street - wonderful how little heed
the police took of them. Somers could tell how the civil police loathed
being under the military orders.But watched and followed he knew he was. After two months the American
friend needed her rooms. The Somers transferred to Kensington, to a flat
belonging to Sharpe's mother. Again many friends came. One evening
Sharpe was called out from the drawing-room: detectives in the hall
enquiring about Somers, where he got his money from, etc., etc., such
clowns, louts, mongrels of detectives. Even Sharpe laughed in their
faces: such canaille. At the same time detectives enquiring for them at
the old address: though they reported the change. Such a confusion in
the official mind!It was becoming impossible. Somers wrote bitterly to friends who had
been all-influential till lately, but whom the canaille were now trying
to taint also. And then he and Harriet moved to a little cottage he
rented from his dear Hattie, in Oxfordshire. Once more they reported to
the police in the market-town: once more the police sympathetic.&quot;I will report no more,&quot; said Somers.But still he knew he was being watched all the time. Strange men
questioning the cottage woman next door, as to all his doings. He began
to FEEL a criminal. A sense of guilt, of self-horror began to grow up in
him. He saw himself set apart from mankind, a Cain, or worse. Though of
course he had committed no murder. But what might he not have done? A
leper, a criminal! The foul, dense, carrion-eating mob were trying to
set their teeth in him. Which meant mortification and death.It was Christmas - winter - very cold. He and Harriet were very poor. Then
he became ill. He lay in the tiny bedroom looking at the wintry sky and
the deep, thatched roof of the cottage beyond. Sick. But then his soul
revived. &quot;No,&quot; he said to himself. &quot;No. Whatever I do or have done, I am
not wrong. Even if I commit what they call a crime, why should I accept
THEIR condemnation or verdict? Whatever I do, I do of my own responsible
self. I refuse their imputations. I despise them. They are canaille,
carrion-eating, filthy-mouthed canaille, like dead-man-devouring
jackals. I wish to God I could kill them. I wish I had power to blight
them, to slay them with a blight, slay them in thousands and thousands.
I wish to God I could kill them off, the masses of canaille. Would they
make me feel in the wrong? Would they? They shall not. Never. I will
watch that they never set their unclean teeth in me, for a bite is
blood-poisoning. But fear them! Feel in the wrong because of them?
Never. Not if I were Cain several times over, and had killed several
brothers and sisters as well. Not if I had committed all the crimes in
their calendar. I will not be put in the wrong by them, God knows I will
not. And I will report myself no more at their police-stations.&quot;So, whenever the feeling of terror came over him, the feeling of being
marked-out, branded, a criminal marked out by society, marked out for
annihilation, he pulled himself together, saying to himself:&quot;I am letting them make me feel in the wrong. I am degrading myself by
feeling guilty, marked-out, and I have convulsions of fear. But I am NOT
wrong. I have done no wrong, whatever I have done. That is, no wrong
that society has to do with. Whatever wrongs I have done are my own, and
private between myself and the other person. One may be wrong, yes, one
is often wrong. But not for THEM to judge. For my own soul only to
judge. Let me know them for human filth, all these pullers-down, and let
me watch them, as I would watch a reeking hyaena, but never fear them.
Let me watch them, to keep them at bay. But let me never admit for one
single moment that THEY may be MY judges. That, never. I have judged
them: they are canaille. I am a man, and I abide by my own soul. Never
shall they have a chance of judging me.&quot;So he discovered the great secret: to stand alone as his own judge of
himself, absolutely. He took his stand absolutely on his own judgment of
himself. Then, the mongrel-mouthed world would say and do what it liked.
This is the greatest secret of behaviour: to stand alone, and judge
oneself from the deeps of one's own soul. And then, to know, to hear
what the others say and think: to refer their judgment to the touchstone
of one's own soul-judgment. To fear one's own inward soul, and never to
fear the outside world, nay, not even one single person, nor even fifty
million persons.To learn to be afraid of nothing but one's own deepest soul: but to keep
a sharp eye on the millions of the others. Somers would say to himself:
&quot;There are fifty million people in Great Britain, and they would nearly
all be against me. Let them.&quot;So a period of quiet followed. Somers got no answers to his letters to
John Thomas: it was like the evening when he had been kept waiting. The
man was scared. It was an end.And the authorities still would allow of no return to Cornwall. So let
that be an end too. He wrote for his books and household linen to be
sent up, the rest could be sold.Bitter, in Oxfordshire, to unpack the things he had loved so dearly in
Cornwall. Life would never be quite the same again. Then let it be
otherwise. He hardened his heart and his soul.It was a lovely spring: and here, in the heart of England - Shakespeare's
England - there was a sweetness and a humanness that he had never known
before. The people were friendly and unsuspicious, though they knew all
about the trouble. The police too were delicate and kindly. It was a
human world once more, human and lovely: though the gangs of wood-men
were cutting down the trees, baring the beautiful spring woods, making
logs for trench-props.And there was always the suspense of being once more called up for
military service. &quot;But surely,&quot; thought Somers, &quot;if I am so vile they
will be glad to leave me alone.&quot;Spring passed on. Somers' sisters were alone, their husbands at the war.
His younger sister took a cottage for him in their own bleak Derbyshire.
And so he returned, after six years, to his own country. A bitter
stranger too, he felt. It was northern, and the industrial spirit was
permeated through everything: the alien spirit of coal and iron. People
living for coal and iron, nothing else. What good was it all?This time he would not go to the police-station to report. So one day a
police-inspector called. But he was a kindly man, and a little bitter
too. Strange that among the civil police, everyone that Somers met was
kindly and understanding. But the so-called, brand-new military, they
were insolent jackanapes, especially the stay-at-home military who had
all the authority in England.In September, on his birthday, came the third summons: On His Majesty's
Service. His Majesty's Service, God help us! Somers was bidden present
himself at Derby on a certain date, to join the colours. He replied: &quot;If
I am turned out of my home, and forbidden to enter the area of Cornwall:
if I am forced to report myself to the police wherever I go, and am
treated like a criminal, you surely cannot wish me to present myself to
join the colours.&quot;There was an interval: much correspondence with Bodmin, where they
seemed to have forgotten him again. Then he received a notice that he
was to present himself as ordered.What else was there to do? But he was growing devilish inside himself.
However, he went: and Harriet accompanied him to the town. The
recruiting place was a sort of big Sunday School - you went down a little
flight of steps from the road. In a smallish ante-room like a basement
he sat on a form and waited while all his papers were filed. Beside him
sat a big collier, about as old as himself. And the man's face was a
study of anger and devilishness growing under humiliation. After an
hour's waiting Somers was called. He stripped as usual, but this time
was told to put on his jacket over his complete nakedness.And so - he was shown into a high, long schoolroom, with various sections
down one side - bits of screens where various doctor-fellows were
performing - and opposite, a long writing table where clerks and old
military buffers in uniform sat in power: the clerks dutifully
scribbling, glad to be in a safe job, no doubt, the old military buffers
staring about. Near this Judgment-Day table a fire was burning, and
there was a bench where two naked men sat ignominiously waiting, trying
to cover their nakedness a little with their jackets, but too much upset
to care really.&quot;Good God!&quot; thought Somers. &quot;Naked civilised men in their Sunday jackets
and nothing else make the most heaven-forsaken sight I have ever seen.&quot;The big stark-naked collier was being measured: a big, gaunt, naked
figure, with a gruesome sort of nudity. &quot;Oh God, oh God,&quot; thought
Somers, &quot;why do the animals none of them look like this? It doesn't look
like life, like a living creature's figure. It is gruesome, with no
life-meaning.&quot;In another section a youth of about twenty-five, stark naked too, was
throwing out his chest while a chit of a doctor-fellow felt him between
the legs. This naked young fellow evidently thought himself an athlete,
and that he must make a good impression, so he threw his head up in a
would-be noble attitude, and coughed bravely when the doctor-buffoon
said cough! Like a piece of furniture waiting to be sat on, the athletic
young man looked.Across the room the military buffers looked on at the operette;
occasionally a joke, incomprehensible, at the expense of the naked, was
called across from the military papas to the fellows who may have been
doctors. The place was full of an indescribable tone of jeering, gibing
shamelessness. Somers stood in his street jacket and thin legs and
beard - a sight enough for any gods - and waited his turn. Then he took
off the jacket and was cleanly naked, and stood to be measured and
weighed - being moved about like a block of meat, in the atmosphere of
corrosive derision.Then he was sent to the next section for eye-tests, and jokes were
called across the room. Then after a time to the next section, where he
was made to hop on one foot - then on the other foot - bend over - and so
on: apparently to see if he had any physical deformity.In due course to the next section where a fool of a little fellow,
surely no doctor, eyed him up and down and said:&quot;Anything to complain of?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Somers. &quot;I've had pneumonia three times and been threatened
with consumption.&quot;&quot;Oh. Go over there then.&quot;So in his stalky, ignominious nakedness he was sent over to another
section, where an elderly fool turned his back on him for ten minutes,
before looking round and saying:&quot;Yes. What have you to say?&quot;Somers repeated.&quot;When did you have pneumonia?&quot;Somers answered - he could hardly speak, he was in such a fury of rage
and humiliation.&quot;What doctor said you were threatened with consumption? Give his name.&quot;
This in a tone of sneering scepticism.The whole room was watching and listening. Somers knew his appearance
had been anticipated, and they wanted to count him out. But he kept his
head. The elderly fellow then proceeded to listen to his heart and lungs
with a stethoscope, jabbing the end of the instrument against the flesh
as if he wished to make a pattern on it. Somers kept a set face. He knew
what he was out against, and he just hated and despised them all.The fellow at length threw the stethoscope aside as if he were throwing
Somers aside, and went to write. Somers stood still, with a set face,
and waited.Then he was sent to the next section, and the stethoscoping doctor
strolled over to the great judgment table. In the final section was a
young puppy, like a chemist's assistant, who made most of the jokes.
Jokes were all the time passing across the room - but Somers had the
faculty of becoming quite deaf to anything that might disturb his
equanimity.The chemist-assistant puppy looked him up and down with a small grin as
if to say, &quot;Law-lummy, what a sight of a human scare-crow!&quot; Somers
looked him back again, under lowered lids, and the puppy left off joking
for the moment. He told Somers to take up other attitudes. Then he came
forward close to him, right till their bodies almost touched, the one in
a navy blue serge, holding back a little as if from the contagion of the
naked one. He put his hand between Somers' legs, and pressed upwards,
under the genitals. Somers felt his eyes going black.&quot;Cough,&quot; said the puppy. He coughed.&quot;Again,&quot; said the puppy. He made a noise in his throat, then turned
aside in disgust.&quot;Turn round,&quot; said the puppy. &quot;Face the other way.&quot;Somers turned and faced the shameful monkey-faces at the long table. So,
he had his back to the tall window: and the puppy stood plumb behind
him.&quot;Put your feet apart.&quot;He put his feet apart.&quot;Bend forward - further - further - .&quot;Somers bent forward, lower, and realised that the puppy was standing
aloof behind him to look into his anus. And that this was the source of
the wonderful jesting that went on all the time.&quot;That will do. Get your jacket and go over there.&quot; Somers put on his
jacket and went and sat on the form that was placed endwise at the side
of the fire, facing the side of the judgment table. The big, gaunt
collier was still being fooled. He apparently was not very intelligent,
and didn't know what they meant when they told him to bend forward.
Instead of bending with stiff knees - not knowing at all what they
wanted - he crouched down, squatting on his heels as colliers do. And the
doctor puppy, amid the hugest amusement, had to start him over again. So
the game went on, and Somers watched them all.The collier was terrible to him. He had a sort of Irish face with a
short nose and a thin black head. This snub-nose face had gone quite
blank with a ghastly voidness, void of intelligence, bewildered and
blind. It was as if the big, ugly, powerful body could not OBEY words
any more. Oh God, such an ugly body - not as if it belonged to a living
creature.Somers kept himself hard and in command, face set, eyes watchful. He
felt his cup had been filled now. He watched these buffoons in this
great room, as he sat there naked save for his jacket, and he felt that
from his heart, from his spine went out vibrations that should
annihilate them - blot them out, the canaille, stamp them into the mud
they belonged to.He was called at length to the table.&quot;What is your name?&quot; asked one of the old parties. Somers looked at him.&quot;Somers,&quot; he said, in a very low tone.&quot;Somers - Richard Lovat?&quot; with an indescribable sneer.Richard Lovat realised that they had got their knife into him. So! He
had his knife in them, and it would strike deeper at last.&quot;You describe yourself as a writer.&quot; He did not answer.&quot;A writer of what? - with a perfect sneer.&quot;Books - essays.&quot;The old buffer went on writing. Oh, yes, they intended to make him feel
they had got their knife into him. They would have his beard off, too!
But would they! He stood there with his ridiculous thin legs, in his
ridiculous jacket, but he did not feel a fool. Oh, God, no. The white
composure of his face, the slight lifting of his nose, like a dog's
disgust, the heavy, unshakable watchfulness of his eyes brought even the
judgment-table to silence: even the puppy doctors. It was not till he
was walking out of the room, with his jacket about his thin legs, and
his beard in front of him, that they lifted their heads for a final
jeer.He dressed and waited for his card. It was Saturday morning, and he was
almost the last man to be examined. He wondered what instructions they
had had about him. Oh, foul dogs. But they were very close on him now,
very close. They were grinning very close behind him, like hyaenas just
going to bite. Yes, they were running him to earth. They had exposed all
his nakedness to gibes. And they were pining, almost whimpering to give
the last grab at him, and haul him to earth, a victim. Finished!But not yet! Oh, no, not yet. Not yet, not now, nor ever. Not while life
was life, should they lay hold of him. Never again. Never would he be
touched again. And because they had handled his private parts, and
looked into them, their eyes should burst and their hands should wither
and their hearts should rot. So he cursed them in his blood, with an
unremitting curse, as he waited.They gave him his card: C2. Fit for non-military service. He knew what
they would like to make him do. They would like to seize him and compel
him to empty latrines in some camp. They had that in mind for him. But
he had other things in mind.He went out into accursed Derby, to Harriet. She was reassured again.
But he was not. He hated the Midlands now, he hated the North. They were
viler than the South, even than Cornwall. They had a universal desire to
take life and down it: these horrible machine people, these iron and
coal people. They wanted to set their foot absolutely on life, grind it
down, and be master. Masters, as they were of their foul machines.
Masters of life, as they were masters of steam-power and electric-power
and above all, of money-power. Masters of money-power, with an obscene
hatred of life, true spontaneous life.Another flight. He was determined not to stop in the Derby Military
Area. He would move one stage out of their grip, at least. So he and
Harriet prepared to go back with their trunks to the Oxfordshire
cottage, which they loved. He would not report, nor give any sign of
himself. Fortunately in the village everybody was slack and friendly.Derby had been a crisis. He would obey no more: not one more stride. If
they summoned him he would disappear: or find some means of fighting
them. But no more obedience: no more presenting himself when called up.
By God, no! Never while he lived, again, would he be at the disposal of
society.So they moved south - to be one step removed. They had been living in
this remote cottage in the Derbyshire hills: and they must leave at
half-past seven in the morning, to complete their journey in a day. It
was a black morning, with a slow dawn. Somers had the trunks ready. He
stood looking at the dark gulf of the valley below. Meanwhile heavy
clouds sank over the bare, Derbyshire hills, and the dawn was blotted
out before it came. Then broke a terrific thunderstorm, and hail lashed
down with a noise like insanity. He stood at the big window over the
valley, and watched. Come hail, come rain, he would go: forever.This was his home district - but from the deepest soul he now hated it,
mistrusted it even more than he hated it. As far as LIFE went, he
mistrusted it utterly, with a black soul. Mistrusted it and hated it,
with its smoke and its money-power, and its squirming millions who
aren't human any more.Ah, how lovely the South-west seemed, after it all. There was hardly any
food, but neither he nor Harriet minded. They could pick up and be
wonderfully happy again, gathering the little chestnuts in the woods,
and the few last bilberries. Men were working harder than ever felling
trees for trench-timber, denuding the land. But their brush fires were
burning in the woods, and when they had gone, in the cold dusk, Somers
went with a sack to pick up the unburnt faggots and the great chips of
wood the axes had left golden against the felled logs. Flakes of sweet,
pale gold oak. He gathered them in the dusk, in a sack, along with the
other poor villagers. For he was poorer even than they. Still, it made
him very happy to do these things - to see a big, glowing pile of
wood-flakes in his shed - and to dig the garden, and set the rubbish
burning in the late, wistful autumn - or to wander through the hazel
copses, away to the real old English hamlets, that are still like
Shakespeare - and like Hardy's Woodlanders.Then, in November, the Armistice. It was almost too much to believe. The
war was over! It WAS too much to believe. He and Harriet sat and sang
German songs, in the cottage, that strange night of the Armistice, away
there in the country: and she cried - and he wondered what now, now the
walls would come no nearer. It had been like Edgar Allan Poe's story of
the Pit and the Pendulum - where the walls come in, in, in, till the
prisoner is almost squeezed. So the black walls of the war - and he had
been trapped, and very nearly squeezed into the pit where the rats were.
So nearly! So very nearly! And now the black walls had stopped, and he
was NOT pushed into the pit, and the rats. And he knew it in his soul.
What next then?He insisted on going back to Derbyshire. Harriet, who hated him for the
move, refused to go. So he went alone: back to his sisters, and to
finish the year in the house which they had paid for him. Harriet
refused to go. She stayed with Hattie in London.At St. Pancras, as Somers left the taxi and went across the pavement to
the station, he fell down: fell smack down on the pavement. He did not
hurt himself. But he got up rather dazed, saying to himself, &quot;Is that a
bad omen? Ought I not to be going back?&quot; But again he thought of Scipio
Africanus, and went on.The cold, black December days, alone in the cottage on the cold
hills - Adam Bede country, Snowfields, Dinah Morris' home. Such heavy,
cold, savage, frustrated blackness. He had known it when he was a boy.
Then Harriet came - and they spent Christmas with his sister. And when
January came he fell ill with the influenza, and was ill for a long
time. In March the snow was up to the window-sills of their house.&quot;Will the winter never end?&quot; he asked his soul.May brought the year's house-rent of the Derbyshire cottage to an end:
and back they went to Oxfordshire. But now the place seemed weary to
him, tame, after the black iron of the North. The walls had gone - and
now he felt nowhere.So they applied for passports - Harriet to go to Germany, himself to
Italy. A lovely summer went by, a lovely autumn came. But the meaning
had gone out of everything for him. He had lost his meaning. England had
lost its meaning for him. The free England had died, this England of the
peace was like a corpse. It was the corpse of a country to him.In October came the passports. He saw Harriet off to Germany - said
good-bye at the Great Eastern Station, while she sat in the Harwich-Hook
of Holland express. She had a look of almost vindictive triumph, and
almost malignant love, as the train drew out. So he went back to his
meaninglessness at the cottage.Then, finding the meaninglessness too much, he gathered his few pounds
together and in November left for Italy. Left England, England which he
had loved so bitterly, bitterly - and now was leaving, alone, and with a
feeling of expressionlessness in his soul. It was a cold day. There was
snow on the Downs like a shroud. And as he looked back from the boat,
when they had left Folkestone behind and only England was there, England
looked like a grey, dreary-grey coffin sinking in the sea behind, with
her dead grey cliffs and the white, worn-out cloth of snow above.Memory of all this came on him so violently now in the Australian night,
that he trembled helplessly under the shock of it. He ought to have gone
up to Jack's place for the night. But no, he could not speak to anybody.
Of all the black throng in the dark Sydney streets, he was the most
remote. He strayed round in a torture of fear, and then at last suddenly
went to the Carlton Hotel, got a room, and went to bed, to be alone and
think.Detail for detail he thought out his experiences with the authorities,
during the war, lying perfectly still and tense. Till now, he had always
kept the memory at bay, afraid of it. Now it all came back, in a rush.
It was like a volcanic eruption in his consciousness. For some weeks he
had felt the great uneasiness in his unconscious. For some time he had
known spasms of that same fear that he had known during the war: the
fear of the base and malignant power of the mob-like authorities. Since
he had been in Italy the fear had left him entirely. He had not even
remembered it, in India. Only in the quiet of Coo-ee, strangely enough,
it had come back in spasms: the dread, almost the horror, of democratic
society, the mob. Harriet had been feeling it too. Why? Why, in this
free Australia? Why? Why should they both have been feeling this same
terror and pressure that they had known during the war, why should it
have come on again in Mullumbimby? Perhaps in Mullumbimby they were
suspect again, two strangers, so much alone. Perhaps the secret service
was making investigations about them. Ah, canaille!Richard faced out all his memories like a nightmare in the night, and
cut clear. He felt broken off from his fellow-men. He felt broken off
from the England he had belonged to. The ties were gone. He was loose
like a single timber of some wrecked ship, drifting over the face of the
earth. Without a people, without a land. So be it. He was broken apart,
apart he would remain.>



Richard Lovat Somers registered a new vow: not to take things with too
overwhelming an amount of emotional seriousness, but to accept
everything that came along with a certain sang froid, and not to sit
frenziedly in judgment before he had heard the case. He had come to the
end of his own tether, so why should he go off into tantrums if other
folks strayed about with the broken bits of their tethers trailing from
their ankles? Is it better to be savagely tugging at the end of your
rope, or to wander at random tetherless? Matter of choice!But the day of the absolute is over, and we're in for the strange gods
once more. &quot;But when you get to the end of your tether you've nothing to
do but die&quot; - so sings an out-of-date vulgar song. But is it so? Why not
all? When you come to the end of your tether you break the rope. When
you come to the end of the lane you straggle on into the bush and beat
about till you find a new way through, and no matter if you raise vipers
or goannas or wallabies, or even only a stink. And if you see a man
beating about for a new track you don't immediately shout, &quot;Perverted
wretch!&quot; or &quot;Villain!&quot; or &quot;Vicious creature!&quot; or even merely &quot;The fool,&quot;
or mildly: &quot;Poor dear!&quot; You have to let him try. Anything is better than
stewing in your own juice, or grinding at the end of your tether, or
tread-milling away at a career. Better a &quot;wicked creature&quot; any day, than
a mechanical tread-miller of a careerist. Better anything on earth than
the millions of human ants.In this way Mr. Somers had to take himself to task, for his Pommy
stupidity and his pommigrant superiority, and kick himself rather
severely, looking at the ends of the tether he presumed he had just
broken. Why should people who are tethered to a post be so God-Almighty
puffed up about their posts? It seems queer. Yet there they are, going
round and round at the ends of their tethers, and being immensely sniffy
about the people who stray loose trailing the broken end of their old
rope, and looking for a new way through the bush. Yet so men are. They
will set up inquisitions and every manner of torture chamber to COMPEL
people to refrain from breaking their tethers. But once man has broken
any old particular hobble-line, not God Himself can safely knot it
together again.Somers now left off standing on his head in front of the word love, and
looking at it calmly, decided he didn't care vastly either way. Harriet
had on her dressing-table tray a painted wooden heart, painted red with
dots round it, a Black Forest trifle which she had bought in Baden-Baden
for a penny. On it was the motto:Dem Mutigen gehort die Welt.That was the motto to have on one's red heart: not Love or Hope or any
of those aspiring emotions: &quot;The world belongs to the courageous.&quot; To be
sure, it was a rather two-edged motto just now for Germany. And Somers
was not quite sure that it was the &quot;world&quot; that he wanted.Yes it was. Not the tuppenny social world of present mankind: but the
genuine world, full of life and eternal creative surprises, including of
course destructive surprises: since destruction is part of creation.
Somers did want the world. He did want to take it away from all the
teeming human ants, human slaves, and all the successful, empty
careerists. He wanted little that the present society can give. But the
lovely other world that is in spite of the social man of to-day: that he
wanted, to clear it, to free it. - Freedom! Not for this subnormal
slavish humanity of democratic antics. But for the world itself, and the
Mutigen.Mut! Muth! A good word. Better even than &quot;courage&quot;. Virtue, virtus,
manliness. Mut - manliness. Not braggaccio or insolence. De l'audace, at
de l'audace, at encore de l'audace! Danton's word. But it was more than
daring. It was Mut, profound manliness, that is not afraid of anything
except of being cowardly or barren.Dem Mutigen gehort die Welt.
To the manly brave belongs the world.Somers wrote to Kangaroo, and enclosed the red wooden heart, which had a
little loop of ribbon so that it could be hung on the wall.&quot;Dear Kangaroo - I send you my red heart (never mind that it is wood, the
wood once lived and was the tree of life) with its motto. I hope you
will accept it, after all my annoying behaviour. It is not the love, but
the Mut that I believe in, and join you in. Love may be an ingredient in
Mut, so you have it all your own way. Anyhow, I send you my red
motto-heart, and if you don't want it you can send it back - I will be
your follower, in reverence for your virtue - Virtus. And you may command
me.&quot;The following day came the answer, in Kangaroo's difficult scrawl:&quot;Dear Lovat - Love is in your name, notwithstanding. I accept the red
heart gladly, and when I win, I will wear it for my Order of Merit,
pinned on my swelling chest.&quot;But you are the one person in the world I can never command. I knew it
would be so. Yet I am unspeakably glad to have your approval, and
perhaps your allegiance.&quot;Come and see me as soon as it is your wish to do so: I won't invite
you, lest worse befall me. For you are either a terrible disappointment
to me, or a great blessing in store. I wait for you.&quot;Somers also wrote to Jack, to ask him to come down with Victoria for the
week-end. But Jack replied that he couldn't get away this week-end,
there was so much doing. Somers then invited him for the following one.The newspapers were at this time full of the pending strike of
coal-miners and shearers: that is, the Australian papers. The European
papers were in a terrific stew about finance, and the German debt, and
the more imposing Allied debt to America. Bolshevism, Communism, Labour,
had all sunk into a sort of insignificance. The voice of mankind was
against them for the time being, not now in hate and fear, as
previously, but in a kind of bitter contempt: the kind of feeling one
has when one has accepted a glib individual as a serious and remarkable
man, only to find that he is a stupid vulgarian. Communism was a bubble
that would never even float free and iridescent from the nasty pipe of
the theorist.What then? Nothing evident. There came dreary and fatuous letters from
friends in England, refined young men of the upper middle-class writing
with a guarded kind of friendliness, gentle and sweet, of course, but as
dozy as ripe pears in their laisser aller heaviness. That was what it
amounted to: they were over-ripe, they had been in the sun of prosperity
too long, and all their tissues were soft and sweetish. How could they
react with any sharpness to any appeal on earth? They wanted just to
hang against the warmest wall they could find, as long as ever they
could, till some last wind of death or disturbance shook them down into
earth, mushy and overripe. A sardonic letter from a Jewish friend in
London, amusing but a bit dreadful. Letters from women in London,
friendly but irritable. &quot;I have decided I am a comfort-loving
conventional person, with just a dash of the other thing to keep me
fidgety&quot; - then accounts of buying old furniture, and gossip about
everybody: &quot;Verden Grenfel in a restaurant with TWO bottles of
champagne, so he must be affluent just now.&quot; A girl taking her honeymoon
trip to Naples by one of the Orient boats, third class: &quot;There are 800
people on board, but room for another 400, so that on account of the
missing 400 we have a six-berth cabin to ourselves. It is a bit noisy
and not luxurious, but clean and comfortable, and you can imagine what
it is to me, to be on the glorious sea, and to go ashore at wonderful
Gibraltar, and to see the blue hills of Spain in the distance. Frederick
is struggling with a mass of Italian irregular verbs at the moment.&quot; And
in spite of all Somers' love of the Mediterranean, the thought of
sitting on a third class deck with eight hundred emigrants, including
babies, made him almost sick. &quot;The glorious sea - wonderful Gibraltar.&quot;
It takes quite a good eyesight even to SEE the sea from the deck of a
liner, let alone out of the piled mass of humanity on the third-class
deck. A letter from Germany, about a wedding and a pending journey into
Austria and friends, written with a touch of philosophy that comes to a
man when he's fallen down and bumped himself, and strokes the bruise. A
cheque for fifteen pounds seventeen shillings and fourpence, from a
publisher: &quot;Kindly acknowledge.&quot; A letter from a farming friend who had
changed places: &quot;A Major Ashworth has got the farm, and has spent about
600 pounds putting it in order. He has started as a poultry-farm, but
has had bad luck in losing 400 chicks straight away, with the cold
weather. I hope our spell of bad luck doesn't still hang over the place.
I wish you would come back to England for the summer. Viv talks of
getting a caravan, and then we might get two. Cold and wet weather for
weeks. All work and no play, not good enough.&quot; A letter from Paris,
artist friends: &quot;I have sold one of the three pictures that are in the
last Salon.&quot; A letter from Somers' sister: &quot;Louis has been looking round
everywhere to buy a little farm, but there doesn't seem to be a bit of
land to be got anywhere. What do you think of our coming to Australia? I
wish you would look for something for us, for we are terribly fed up
with this place, nothing doing at all.&quot; A letter from Sicily: &quot;I have
had my father and stepmother over from New York. I had got them rooms
here, but when I said so, the face of Anna, my stepmother, was a sight.
She took me aside and told me that father was spoiling the trip entirely
by his economies, and that she had set her heart on the Villa Igeia.
Then Dad took me aside and said that he didn't wish to be reckless, but
he didn't want to thwart Anna's wishes entirely, and was there nothing
in the way of compromise? It ended by their staying two days here, and
Anna said she thought it was very nice FOR ME. Then they went to the
Palmes, which is entirely up to Anna's ideas of luxury, and she is
delighted.&quot;Somers had fourteen letters by this mail. He read them with a sort of
loathing, one after the other, piling them up on his left hand for
Harriet, and throwing the envelopes in the fire. By the time he had done
he wished that every mail-boat would go down that was bringing any
letter to him, that a flood would rise and cover Europe entirely, that
he could have a little operation performed that would remove from him
for ever his memory of Europe and everything in it - and so on. Then he
went out and looked at the Pacific. He hadn't even the heart to bathe,
and he felt so trite, with all those letters; he felt quite capable of
saying &quot;Good dog&quot; to the sea: to quote one of the quips from the
Bulletin. The sea that had been so full of potency, before the postman
rode up on his pony and whistled with his policeman's whistle for Somers
to come to the gate for that mass of letters. Never had Richard Lovat
Somers felt so filled with spite against everybody he had ever known in
the old life, as now.&quot;And there was I, knave, fool, and ninny, whining to go back to Europe,
and abusing Australia for not being like it. That horrible, horrible
staleness of Europe, and all their trite consciousness, and their
dreariness. The dreariness? The sterility of their feelings? And here
was I carping at Kangaroo and at Jack Callcott, who are golden wonders
compared with anything I have known in the old world. Australia has got
some real, positive indifference to &quot;questions&quot;, but Europe is one big
wriggling question and nothing else. A tangle of quibbles. I'd rather be
shot here next week, than quibble the rest of my life away in
over-upholstered Europe.&quot;He left off kicking himself, and went down to the shore to get away from
himself. After all, he knew the endless water would soon make him
forget. It had a language which spoke utterly without concern of him,
and this utter unconcern gradually soothed him of himself and his world.
He began to forget.There had been a squall in the night. At the tip of the rock-shelves
above the waves men and youths, with bare, reddish legs, were fishing
with lines for blackfish. They looked like animal creatures perching
there, and like creatures they were passive or darting in their
movements. A big albatross swung slowly down the surf: albatross or
mollyhawk, with wide, waving wings.The sea had thrown up, all along the surf-line, queer glittery creatures
that looked like thin blown glass. They were bright transparent bladders
of the most delicate ink-blue, with a long crest of deeper blue, and
blind ends of translucent purple. And they had bunches of blue, blue
strings, and one long blue string that trailed almost a yard across the
sand, straight and blue and translucent. They must have been some sort
of little octopus, with the bright glass bladder, big as smallish narrow
pears, with a blue frill along the top to float them, and the strings to
feel with - and perhaps the long string to anchor by. Who knows? Yet
there they were, soft, brilliant, like pouches of frailest sea-glass. It
reminded Somers of the glass they blow at Butano, at Venice. But there
they never get the lovely soft texture and the colour.The sky was tufted with cloud, and in the afternoon veils of rain swept
here and there across the sea, in a changing wind. But then it cleared
again, and Somers and Harriet walked along the sands, watching the blue
sky mirror purple and the white clouds mirror warm on the wet sand. The
sea talked and talked all the time, in its disintegrative, elemental
language. And at last it talked its way into Somers' soul, and he forgot
the world again, the babel. The simplicity came back, and with it the
inward peace. The world had left him again. He had been thinking, in his
anger of the morning, that he would get Jack to teach him to shoot with
a rifle and a revolver, so that he might take his part. He had never
shot with a gun in his life, so he had thought it was high time to
begin. But now he went back on his thoughts. What did he want with guns
or revolvers? Nothing. He had nothing to do with them, as he had nothing
to do with so much that is in the world of man. When he was truly
himself he had a quiet stillness in his soul, an inward trust. Faith,
undefined and undefinable. Then he was at peace with himself. Not
content, but peace like a river, something flowing and full. A stillness
at the very core.But faith in what? In himself, in mankind, in the destiny of mankind?
No, no. In Providence, in Almighty God? No, not even that. He tried to
think of the dark God he declared he served. But he didn't want to. He
shrank away from the effort. The fair morning seaward world, full of
bubbles of life.So again came back to him the ever-recurring warning that SOME men must
of their own choice and will listen only to the living life that is a
rising tide in their own being, and listen, listen, listen for the
injunctions, and give heed and know and speak and obey all they can.
Some men must live by this unremitting inwardness, no matter what the
rest of the world does. They must not let the rush of the world's
&quot;outwardness&quot; sweep them away: or if they are swept away, they must
struggle back. Somers realised that he had had a fright against being
swept away, because he half wanted to be swept away: but that now, thank
God, he was flowing back. Not like the poor, weird &quot;ink-bubbles&quot;, left
high and dry on the sands.Now he could remember the frenzied outward rushing of the vast masses of
people, away from themselves, without being driven mad by it. But it
seemed strange to him that they should rush like this in their vast
herds, outwards, outwards, always frenziedly outwards, like souls with
hydrophobia rushing away from the pool of water. He himself, when he was
caught up in the rush, felt tortured and maddened, it was an agony of
irritation to him till he could feel himself drifting back again like a
creature into the sea. The sea of his own inward soul, his own
unconscious faith, over which his will had no exercise. Why did the mass
of people not want this stillness and this peace with their own being?
Why did they want cinemas and excitements? Excitements are as nauseous
as sea-sickness. Why does the world want them?It is their problem. They must go their way. But some men, some women
must stay by their own inmost being, in peace, and without envy. And
there in the stillness listen, listen, and try to know, and try to obey.
From the innermost, not from the outside. It is so lovely, the peace.
But poor dear Richard, he was only resting and basking in the old
sunshine just now, after his fray. The fight would come again, and only
in the fight would his soul burn its way once more to the knowledge, the
intense knowledge of his &quot;dark god&quot;. The other was so much sweeter and
easier, while it lasted.At tea-time it began to rain again. Somers sat on the verandah looking
at the dark green sea, with its films of floating yellow light between
the ruffled waves. Far back, in the east, was a cloud that was a
rainbow. It was a piece of rainbow, but not sharp, in a band; it was a
tall fume far back among the clouds of the sea-wall.&quot;Who is there that you feel you are with, besides me - or who feel
themselves with you?&quot; Harriet was asking.&quot;No one,&quot; he replied. And at the same moment he looked up and saw the
rainbow fume beyond the sea. But it was on a dark back ground, like a
coloured darkness. The rainbow was always a symbol to him - a good
symbol: of this peace. A pledge of unbroken faith, between the universe
and the innermost. And the very moment he said &quot;No one,&quot; he saw the
rainbow for an answer.Many times in his life he had seen a rainbow. The last had been on his
arrival in Sydney. For some reason he felt absolutely wretched and
dismal on that Saturday morning when the ship came into Sydney harbour.
He had an unspeakable desire not to get out of the ship, not to go down
on to the quay and into that town. The having to do it was a violation
of himself. When he came on deck after breakfast and the ship had
stopped, it was pouring with rain, the P. and O. wharf looked black and
dismal, empty. It might almost have been an abandoned city. He walked
round to the starboard side, to look towards the unimposing hillock of
the city and the Circular Quay. Black, all black and unutterably dismal
in the pouring rain, even the green grass of the Botanical Gardens, and
the bits of battlement of the Conservatorium. Unspeakably forlorn. Yet
over it all, spanning the harbour, the most magnificent great rainbow.
His mood was so miserable he didn't want to see it. But it was
unavoidable. A huge, brilliant, supernatural rainbow, spanning all
Sydney.He was thinking of this, and still watching the dark-green,
yellow-reflecting sea, that was like a northern sea, a Whitby sea, and
watching the far-off fume of a dark rainbow apparition, when Harriet
heard somebody at the door. It was William James, who had an hour to
wait for his train, and thought they wouldn't mind if he looked in. They
were pleased, and Harriet brought him a cup and plate.Thank goodness he, too, came in a certain stillness of spirit, saying
very little, but being a quiet, grateful presence. When the tea was
finished he and Somers sat back on the verandah out of the wind, and
watched the yellow, cloudy evening sink. They hardly spoke, but lay
lying back in the deckchairs.&quot;I was wondering,&quot; said Somers, &quot;whom Kangaroo depends on mostly for his
following.&quot;William James looked back at him, with quiet, steady eyes.&quot;On the diggers - the returned soldiers chiefly: and the sailors.&quot;&quot;Of what class?&quot;&quot;Of any class. But there aren't many rich ones. Mostly like me and Jack,
not quite simple working men. A few doctors and architects and that
sort.&quot;&quot;And do you think it means much to them?&quot;Jaz shifted his thick body uneasily in his chair.You never can tell,&quot; he said.&quot;That's true,&quot; said Somers. &quot;I don't really know how much Jack Callcott
cares. I really can't make out.&quot;&quot;He cares as much as about anything,&quot; said Jaz. &quot;Perhaps a bit more.
It's more exciting.&quot;&quot;Do you think it IS the excitement they care about chiefly?&quot;&quot;I should say so. You can die in Australia if you don't get a bit of
excitement.&quot; There was silence for a minute or two.&quot;In my opinion,&quot; said Somers, &quot;it has to go deeper than excitement.&quot;
Again Jaz shifted uneasily in his chair.&quot;Oh, well - they don't set much store on deepness over here. It's easy
come, easy go, as a rule. Yet they're staunch chaps while the job lasts,
you know. They are true to their mates, as a rule.&quot;&quot;I believe they are. It's the afterwards.&quot;&quot;Oh, well - afterwards is afterwards, as Jack always says.&quot; Again the two
men were silent.&quot;If they cared deeply - &quot; Somers began slowly - but he did not continue,
it seemed fatuous. Jaz did not answer for some time.&quot;You see, it hasn't come to that with them,&quot; he said. &quot;It might,
perhaps, once they'd actually done the thing. It might come home to them
then; they might HAVE to care. It might be a force-put. THEN they'd need
a man.&quot;&quot;They've got Kangaroo,&quot; said Somers.&quot;You think Kangaroo would get them over the fence?&quot; said Jaz carefully,
looking up at Somers.&quot;He seems as if he would. He's a wonderful person. And there seems no
alternative to him.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, he's a wonderful person. Perhaps a bit too much of a wonder. A
hatchet doesn't look anything like so spanking as a lawn-mower, does it
now, but it'll make a sight bigger clearing.&quot;&quot;That's true,&quot; said Somers, laughing. &quot;But Kangaroo isn't a lawn-mower.&quot;&quot;Oh, I don't say so,&quot; smiled Jaz fidgeting on his chair. &quot;I should like
to hear your rock-bottom opinion of him though.&quot;&quot;I should like to hear yours,&quot; said Somers, &quot;You know him much better
than I do. I haven't got a rock-bottom opinion of him yet.&quot;&quot;It's not a matter of the time you've known him,&quot; said Jaz. He was
manifestly hedging, and trying to get at something. &quot;You know I belong
to his gang, don't you?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Somers, wondering at the word &quot;gang&quot;.&quot;And for that reason I oughtn't to criticize him, ought I?&quot;Somers reflected for some moments.&quot;There's no oughts, if you FEEL critical,&quot; he answered.&quot;I think you feel critical of him yourself at times,&quot; said Jaz, looking
up with a slow, subtle smile of cunning: like a woman's disconcerting
intuitive knowledge. It laid Somers' soul bare for the moment. He
reflected. He had pledged no allegiance to Kangaroo.&quot;Yet,&quot; he said aloud to Jaz, &quot;if I HAD joined him I wouldn't want to
hinder him.&quot;&quot;No, we don't want to hinder him. But we need to know where we are.
Supposing you were in my position - and you DIDN'T feel sure of things! A
man has to look things in the face. You yourself, now - you're holding
back, aren't you?&quot;&quot;I suppose I am,&quot; said Richard, &quot;But then I hold back from everything.&quot;Jaz looked at him searchingly.You don't like to commit yourself?&quot; he said, with a sly smile.&quot;Not altogether that. I'd commit myself, if I could. It's just something
inside me shakes its head and holds back.&quot;Jaz studied his knuckles for some time.&quot;Yes,&quot; he said slowly. &quot;Perhaps you can afford to stand out. You've got
your life in other things. Some of us feel we haven't got any life if
we're not - if we're not mixed up in something.&quot; He paused, and Richard
waited. &quot;But the point is this - &quot; Jaz looked up again with his
light-grey, serpent's eyes. &quot;Do you yourself see Kangaroo pulling it
off?&quot; There was a subtle mockery in the question.&quot;What?&quot;&quot;Why - you know. This revolution, and this new Australia. Do you see him
figuring on the Australian postage stamps - and running the country like
a new Jerusalem?&quot;&quot;The eyes watched Richard fixedly.&quot;If he's got a proper backing, why not?&quot; Somers answered.&quot;I don't say why not. I ask you, WILL HE? Won't you say how you feel?&quot;Richard sat quite still, not even thinking, but suspending himself. And
in the suspense his heart went sad, oh so empty, inside him. He looked
at Jaz, and the two men read the meaning in each other's eyes.&quot;You think he won't?&quot; said Jaz, triumphing.&quot;No, I think he won't,&quot; said Richard. &quot;There now. I knew you felt like
that.&quot;&quot;And yet,&quot; said Richard, &quot;if men were men still - if they had any of that
belief in love they pretend to have - if they were FIT to follow
Kangaroo,&quot; he added fiercely, feeling grief in his heart.Jaz dropped his head and studied his knuckles, a queer, blank smile
setting round his mouth.&quot;You have to take things as they are,&quot; he said in a small voice.Richard sat silent, his heart for the moment broken again.&quot;And,&quot; added Jaz, looking up with a slow, subtle smile, &quot;if men aren't
what Kangaroo wants them to be, why should they be? If they don't want a
new Jerusalem, why should they have it? It's another catch. They like to
hear Kangaroo's sweet talk - and they'll probably follow him if he'll
bring off a good big row, and they think he can make it all pretty
afterwards.&quot; Again he smiled, but bitterly, mockingly. &quot;I don't know why
I say these things to you, I'm sure. But it's as well for a man to get
to the bottom of what he thinks, isn't it? And I feel, you know, that
you and me think alike, if we allow ourselves to think.&quot;Richard looked at him, but never answered. He felt somehow treacherous.&quot;Kangaroo's clever,&quot; resumed Jaz. &quot;He's a Jew, and he's damn clever.
Maybe he's the cleverest. I'll tell you why. You're not offended now at
what I say, are you?&quot;&quot;What's the good of being offended by anything, if it's a genuine
opinion?&quot;&quot;Well now, that's what I mean. And I say Kangaroo is cleverer than the
Red people, because he can make it look as if it would be all rosy
afterwards, you know, everything as good as apple pie. I tell you what.
All these Reds and I.W.W.'s and all, why don't they make their
revolution? Because they're frightened of it when they've made it.
They're not frightened of hanging all the capitalists and such. But
they're frightened to death of having to keep things going afterwards.
They're frightened to death.&quot; Jaz smiled to himself with a chuckle.
&quot;Nothing frightens them so much as the thought of having to look after
things when their revolution is made. It frightens them to death. And
that's why they won't make their grand revolution. Never. Unless
somebody shoves them into it. That's why they've got this new cry: Make
the revolution by degrees, through winning in politics. But that's no
revolution, you know. It's the same old thing with a bit of difference,
such a small bit of difference that you'd never notice it if you weren't
made to.&quot;&quot;I think that's true,&quot; said Richard. &quot;Nobody's more frightened of a Red
revolution than the Reds themselves. They just absolutely funk it.&quot;&quot;There now - that's the word - they funk it. Yet, you know, they're all
ready for it. And if you got them started, if you could, they'd make a
clearance, like they did in Russia. And we could do with that, don't you
think?&quot;&quot;I do,&quot; said Richard, sighing savagely.&quot;Well now, my idea's this. Couldn't we get Kangaroo - to join the
Reds - the I.W.W.'s and all? Couldn't we get him to use all his men to
back Red Labour in this country, and blow a cleavage through the old
system. Because, you know he's got the trump cards in his hands. These
Diggers' Clubs, they've got all the army men, dying for another scrap.
And then a sort of secret organisation has ten times the hold over men
than just a Labour Party, or a Trades Union. He's damned clever, he's
got a wonderful scheme ready. But he'll spoil it, because he'll want it
all to happen without hurting anybody. Won't he now?&quot;&quot;Except a few.&quot;&quot;Oh yes - maybe four of his enemies. But he wants to blow the house up
without breaking the windows. He thinks he can turn the country
upside-down without spilling milk, let alone blood. Now the Reds, let
them loose, would make a hole in things. Only they'll never move on
their own responsibility. They haven't got the guts, the stomach, the
backbone.&quot;&quot;You're so clever, Jaz. I wonder you're not a leader yourself.&quot;&quot;Me?&quot; A slow ironical smile wreathed his face. &quot;You're being sarcastic
with me, Mr. Somers.&quot;
&quot;Not at all. I think you're amazing.&quot;Jaz only smiled sceptically still.&quot;You take what I mean, though, do you?&quot;&quot;I do.&quot;&quot;And what do you think of it?&quot;&quot;Very clever.&quot;&quot;But isn't it feasible? You get Kangaroo, with his Diggers - the
cleverest idea in the country, really - to quietly come in with the Reds,
and explode a revolution over here. You could soon do it, in the cities:
and the country couldn't help itself. You let the Reds appear in the
front, and take all the shine. You keep a bit of a brake on them. You
let them call a Soviet, or whatever they want, and get into a real mess
over it. And then Kangaroo steps in with the balm of Gilead and the New
Jerusalem. But let them play Old Tommy Jenkins first with Capital and
State Industries and the free press and religious sects. And then
Kangaroo steps in like a redeeming angel, and reminds us that it's God's
Own Country, so we're God's Own People, and makes us feel good again.
Like Solomon, when David has done the dirty work.&quot;&quot;The only point,&quot; said Somers smiling, &quot;is that an Australian Lenin and
an Australian Trotsky might pop up in the scrimmage, and then Kangaroo
could take to the bush again.&quot;Jaz shook his head.&quot;They wouldn't,&quot; he said. &quot;There's nobody with any grip. And you'd see,
in this country, people would soon want to be good again, because it
costs them least effort.&quot;&quot;Perhaps Kangaroo is right, and they don't want to be anything BUT
good.&quot;Jaz shook his head.&quot;It's not goodness they're after just now,&quot; he said. &quot;They want to rip
things up, or they want nothing. They aren't ready to come under
Kangaroo's loving wing just yet. They'd as leave be under King George's
thumb, they can peep out easier. It seems to me, it's SPITE that's at
the bottom, with most men. And they've got to let it out before
anything's any good.&quot;Somers began to feel tired now.&quot;But after all, Jaz,&quot; he said, &quot;what have I got to do with it?&quot;&quot;You can put it to Kangaroo. You can make him see it. And you can keep
him to it, if you promise him you'll stick to him.&quot;&quot;Me a power behind the throne?&quot; protested the truly sceptical Richard.&quot;I take it you don't want to sit on the throne yourself,&quot; smiled Jaz.
&quot;And Kangaroo's got more the figure. But what do you think of it?&quot;Somers was silent. He now was smiling subtly and ironically, and Jaz was
watching him sharply, like a man who wants something. Jaz waited.&quot;I'm afraid, Jaz,&quot; said Somers, &quot;that, like Nietzsche, I no longer
believe in great events. The war was a great event - and it made
everything more pretty. I doubt if I care about the mass of mankind,
Jaz. You make them more than ever distasteful to me.&quot;Oh, you know, you needn't commit yourself. You've only to be friendly
with Kangaroo, and work him into it. You know you said yourself you'd
give anything to have a clearance made, in the world.&quot;&quot;I know. Sometimes I feel I'd give anything, soul and body, for a smash
up in this social-industrial world we're in. And I would. And then when
I realise people - just people - the same people after it as before - why,
Jaz, then I don't care any more, and feel it's time to turn to the
gods.&quot;&quot;You feel there's any gods to turn to, do you?&quot; asked Jaz, with the
sarcasm of disappointment.&quot;I feel it would probably be like Messina before and after the
earthquake. Before the earthquake it was what is called a fine town, but
commercial, low, and hateful. You felt you'd be glad if it was wiped
out. After the earthquake it was horrible heaps of mortar and rubble,
and now it's rows and rows of wood and tin shanties, streets of them,
and more commercial, lower than ever, and infinitely more ugly. That
would probably be the world after your revolution. No, Jaz, I leave
mankind to its own contrivances, and turn to the gods.&quot;&quot;But you'll say a word to Kangaroo?&quot; said Jaz, persistent.&quot;Yes, if I feel like it,&quot; said Richard.Darkness had almost fallen, and Somers shivered as he rose to go
indoors.Next morning, when Somers had made the coffee, he and Harriet sat on the
loggia at breakfast. It rained in the night, and the sea was whitish,
sluggish, with soft, furry waves that had no plunge. The last thin flush
of foam behaved queerly, running along with a straight, swift splash,
just as when a steel rope rips out of water, as a tug hauls suddenly,
jerking up a white splash that runs along its length.&quot;What had William James so much to say about?&quot; asked Harriet, on the
warpath.&quot;Why don't you have the strength of mind not to ask?&quot; he replied. &quot;You
know it's better you left it alone: that I'm not supposed to blab.&quot;She gave him one fierce look, then went pale with anger. She was silent
for some time. Then she burst out:&quot;Pah, as if I cared to know! What is all their revolution bosh to me!
There have been revolutions enough, in my opinion, and each one more
foolish than the last. And this will be the most foolish of the lot. And
what have YOU got to do with revolutions, you petty and conceited
creature? You and revolutions! You're not big enough, not grateful
enough to do anything real. I give you my energy and my life, and you
want to put me aside as if I was a charwoman. Acknowledge ME first,
before you can be any good.&quot; With which she swallowed her coffee and
rose from the table.He finished too, and got up to carry in the cups and do the few chores
that remained for his share. He always got up in the morning, made the
fire, swept the room, and tidied roughly. Then he brought in coal and
wood, made the breakfast, and did any little out-door job. After
breakfast he helped to wash up, and settled the fire. Then he considered
himself free to his own devices. Harriet could see to the rest.His devices were not very many. He tried to write, that being his job.
But usually, nowadays, when he tapped his unconscious, he found himself
in a seethe of steady fury, general rage. He didn't hate anybody in
particular, nor even any class or body of men. He loathed politicians,
and the well-bred darling young men of the well-to-do middle classes
made his bile stir. But he didn't fret himself about them specially. The
off-hand self-assertive working people of Australia made him feel
diabolic on their score sometimes. But as a rule the particulars were
not in evidence, all the rocks were submerged, and his bile swirled
diabolically for no particular reason at all. He just felt generally
diabolical, and tried merely to keep enough good sense not to turn his
temper in any particular direction.&quot;You think that nothing but goodness and virtue and wonderfulness comes
out of you,&quot; was one of Harriet's accusations against him. &quot;You don't
know how small and mean and ugly you are to other people.&quot;&quot;Which means I am small and ugly and mean in her eyes,&quot; he thought to
himself. &quot;All because of this precious gratitude which I am supposed to
feel towards her, I suppose. Damn her and her gratitude. When she
thwarts me and puts me in a temper I DON'T feel anything but spite. Damn
her impudent gratitude.&quot;But Harriet was not going to be ignored: no, she was not. She was not
going to sink herself to the level of a convenience. She didn't really
want protestations of gratitude or love. They only puzzled her and
confused her. But she wanted him INWARDLY to keep a connection with her.
Silently, he must maintain the flow between him and her, and safeguard
it carefully. It is a thing which a man cannot do with his head: it
isn't REMEMBERING. And it is a thing which a woman cannot explain or
understand, because it is quite irrational. But it is one of the deepest
realities in life. When a man and woman truly come together, when there
is a marriage, then an unconscious, vital connection is established
between them, like a throbbing blood-circuit. A man may forget a woman
entirely with his head, and fling himself with energy and fervour into
whatever job he is tackling, and all is well, all is good, if he does
not break that inner vital connection which is the mystery of marriage.
But let him once get out of unison, out of conjunction, let him inwardly
break loose and come apart, let him fall into that worst of male vices,
the vice of abstraction and mechanisation, and have a concert of working
ALONE and of himself, then he commits the breach. He hurts the woman and
he hurts himself, though neither may know why. The greatest hero that
ever existed was heroic only whilst he kept the throbbing inner union
with something, God, or Fatherland, or woman. The most immediate is
woman, the wife. But the most grovelling wife-worshippers are the
foulest of traitors and renegades to the inner unison. A man must strive
onward, but from the root of marriage, marriage with God, with wife,
with mankind. Like a tree that is rooted, always growing and flowering
away from its root, so is a vitally active man. But let him take some
false direction, and there is torture through the whole organism, roots
and all. The woman suffers blindly from the man's mistaken direction,
and reacts blindly.Now in this revolution stunt, and his insistence on &quot;male&quot; activity,
Somers had upturned the root flow, and Harriet was a devil to him - quite
rightly - for he knew that inside himself he was devilish. She tried to
keep her kindness and happiness. But no, it was false when the inner
connection was betrayed. So her silent rage accumulated, and it was no
good playing mental tricks of suppression with it. As for him, he was
forced to recognize the devil in his own belly. He just felt devilish.
While Harriet went about trying to be fair and happy, he realised that
it was awful for him to be there, as black inside as an ink-bottle;
however, he practised being nice. Theoretically he was grateful to her,
and all that. But nothing conjured away that bellyful of black
devilishness with which he was enceinte. He really felt like a woman who
is with child by a corrosive fiend. In his lower man, just girning and
demoniacal. No good pretending otherwise. No good playing tricks of
being nice. Seven-thousand devils!When he saw a motor-car parked in the waste lot next to Coo-ee, and saw
two women in twelve-guinea black coats and skirts hobbling across the
grass to the bungalow farther down, perhaps wanting to hire it: then the
devil came and sat black and naked in his eyes. They hobbled along the
uneven place so commonly, they looked so crassly common in spite of
their tailors' bills, so LOW, in spite of their motor-car, that the
devil in him fairly lashed its tail like a cat. And yet, he knew, they
were probably just two nice, kindly women, as the world goes. And truly,
even the devil in him did not want to do them any PERSONAL harm. If they
had fallen, or got into difficulty, he would have gone out at once to
help them all he could. And yet, at the sight of their backs in their
tailored &quot;costumes&quot; hobbling past the bushes, the devil in him lashed
its tail till he writhed.So there you are. Or rather, there was Richard Lovat Somers. He tried to
square accounts with himself. Surely, he said to himself, I am not just
merely a sort of human bomb, all black inside, waiting to explode I
don't know when or how or where. That's what I seem like to myself,
nowadays. Yet surely it is not the only truth about me. When I feel at
peace with myself, and, as it were, so quietly at the CENTRE of
things - like last evening, for example - surely that is also me. Harriet
seems fairly to detest me for having this nice feeling all to myself.
Well, it wasn't my fault if I had it. I did have it. What does she want?
She won't leave a fellow alone. I felt fairly beatific last evening - I
felt I could swim Australia into a future, and that Jaz was wonderful,
and I was a sort of central angel. So now I must admit I am
flabbergasted at finding my devil coiled up exultant like a black cat in
my belly this morning, purring all the more loudly because of my
&quot;goodness&quot; of last evening, and lashing his tail so venomously at the
sight of the two women in the black &quot;costumes&quot;. Is this devil after all
my god? Do I stand with the debbil-debbil worshippers, in spite of all
my efforts and protestations?This morning I do, and I admit it. I can't help it: it is so, then let
it be so. I shall change again, I know. I shall feel white again, and
like a pearl, suave and quiet within the oyster of time. I shall feel
again that, given but the ANSWER, the black poisonous bud will burst
into a lovely new, unknown flower in me. The bud is deadly poison: the
flower will be the flower of the tree of life. If Harriet let me alone,
and people like Jaz really believed in me! Because they have a right to
believe in me when I am at my best. Or perhaps he believes in me when I
am my worst, and Kangaroo likes me when I am good. Yet I don't really
like Kangaroo. The devil in me fairly hates him. Him and everybody.
Well, all right then, if I AM finally a sort of human bomb, black
inside, and primed; I hope the hour and the place will come for my going
off: for my exploding with the maximum amount of havoc. SOME men have to
be bombs, to explode and make breaches in the walls that shut life in.
Blind, havoc-working bombs too. Then so be it.That morning as luck would have it Somers read an article by A. Meston
in an old Sydney Daily Telegraph, headed:EARTHQUAKES.IS AUSTRALIA SAFE?SLEEPING VOLCANOES.The fact that Australia so far has had no trouble with volcanoes or
earthquakes, and appears to be the most immune country in the world,
accounts for our entire indifference to the whole subject. But here are
phases of this problem entitled to some serious consideration by those
in whom the thinking and observant faculties are not altogether dormant,
and who have not a calm, cool disregard of very ominous inexorable
facts. Australia is a very peaceful reposeful area, with the serious
volcanoes of New Zealand on one side, and the still more serious
volcanoes of Java on the other. We live in a soft flowery meadow between
two jungles, a lion in one and a tiger in the other, but as neither
animal has chased or bitten us, up to the present time, we go calmly to
sleep quite satisfied they are harmless.Now the line of volcanic action on the east coast of Australia is very
clearly defined, from the basalt of Illawarra, north to the basalt
within three miles of Cape York. The chief areas over all that distance
are the Big Scrub on the Richmond River, the Darling Downs, and the
Atherton Tableland, behind Cairns.These are the largest basalt areas in Australia, the Darling Downs and
Atherton containing each about 2,000,000 acres of basalt, the one
chiefly black, and the other all red. The other conspicuous areas are
the red basalt Isis and Woongarra scrubs, and north of Atherton the next
basalt area is on the McIvor and Morgan Rivers, 40 miles north of
Cooktown. From there I saw no basalt on the coast of the Peninsula,
until somewhat surprised to find great piles of black basaltic stone,
like artificial quarry heaps, in the dense Seaforthia palm scrubs ten
miles west of Somerset.VOLCANIC EVIDENCE.Here, then, is a clearly defined but very intermittent line of volcanic
action along our entire east coast for over two thousand miles. Yet
to-day there is not only not one active volcano on the whole of that
area, but not even one clearly authentic dead one. There is nothing to
show whence came the basalt of the Darling Downs, the Big Scrub, or the
Atherton Tableland, unless in the last case the two deep freshwater
lakes, Barrine and Eacham, the Barrang and Zeetcham of the aboriginals,
represent the craters of extinct volcanoes.Whence, then, came the basalt spread along a narrow line of our east
coast for two thousand miles, and all of it east of the Dividing Range?
There is a lot of room for theories...When the late Captain Audley Coote was laying the cable from New
Caledonia to Sandy Cape, at the north end of Fraser Island, on the South
Queensland coast, he passed a submerged mountain 6,000 feet in height,
and found a tremendous chasm, so deep that they could find no bottom,
and had to work the cable round the edge. When he reached the coast of
Fraser Island he got the same soundings as Cook and Flinders and the
Admiralty survey in the 'sixties, six to eight fathoms, but there came a
break in the cable in after years, located in that six and eight fathom
area, and they found the broken cable hanging over a submarine precipice
of eight hundred feet.That I read in Captain Coote's own manuscript journal, and it was
confirmed by Captain John Mackay, the Brisbane harbourmaster, who
assured me that an 800 feet chasm had suddenly formed there in the
bottom of the ocean!On the coast of Japan, the ocean bottoms sank in one place suddenly from
four or five fathoms to 4,000 feet.The old Fraser Island aboriginals told me that the deep blue lake, two
miles from the White Cliffs, was once a level plateau, on which their
fathers held fights and corroborees, and that it sank in one night. On
the North Queensland coast, there is fairly shallow water from the
seashore out to the edge of the Barrier, and then the ocean goes down to
depths up to two and three thousand feet, so if the sea were removed you
would look down from the outer Barrier into a tremendous valley with a
wall of granite cliffs.When the town of Port Royal in Jamaica was destroyed by an earthquake on
June 7, 1692, the houses all disappeared into an ocean chasm 300 feet in
depth; and in the terrible earthquake at Lisbon, 1755, destroying 2,000
houses and 5,000 people, the wharves and piers, and even the vessels
lying beside them, disappeared into some tremendous gulf, leaving no
trace whatever.It is a singular fact that the heights of the loftiest mountains
correspond with the depths of the deepest seas, and that the 29,000 feet
of Mount Everest is equal with what is known as the &quot;Tuscarora Deep&quot;,
fathomed by the U.S.A. vessel Tuscarora.ISLANDS THAT VANISHED.From the days of Seneca there are records of islands suddenly appearing
before astonished mariners, and others disappearing suddenly before
mariners equally astonished. In the dreadful volcanic explosion of
Krakatoa in August, 1883, one mountain peak was blown to pieces, while
others were thrown up from the ocean. The tidal wave created by Krakatoa
destroyed 40,000 people, and the air wave from the concussion pulsated
three times round the world. And Krakatoa and the Javanese volcanoes are
only a short distance from the coast of Australia!Doubtless many of the ships that have mysteriously disappeared, leaving
no trace, have gone down in the vortex of a submarine earthquake, or a
chasm created by a sudden shrinkage in the bottom of the ocean. From the
facts above available it is reasonable to believe that the present
continent of Australia is only a portion of the original, and that in
some remote period it extended hundreds or thousands of miles to the
eastward, probably including Lord Howe and Norfolk Islands and New
Zealand, possibly New Caledonia. How came the ancient Cretaceous Ocean,
which once covered all Central Australia, from the gulf to the Bight, to
withdraw from the land, leaving nothing but marine fossils in the desert
sandstone?Was the Cretaceous Ocean shallow all round this continent, and did it
suddenly subside to fill some tremendous chasm caused by a sudden
submarine shrinkage of the earth's crust, followed by the inland sea
which naturally rushed out into the vacancy?What seems the only real danger to Australia lies not in the eruptions
of some suddenly created new volcano, or any ordinary earthquake, but in
just such shrinkages in the sea bottom as occurred on the coast of
Japan, off Fraser Island, and many other localities, including Lisbon
and Port Royal.If such a subsidence were to come under Sydney, Melbourne, Adelaide or
Brisbane, it might be of such a magnitude that the whole city would
disappear into the gulf.We know nothing whatever of the awful forces at work beneath the crust
of the earth, and nothing of the internal fires, or that awful
subterranean abode where Shelley said &quot;the old earthquake Demon nurses
her young Ruin&quot;. The history of volcanoes and earthquakes is an
appalling record of lost countless millions of lives and awful
destruction.One Peking earthquake destroyed 300,000 people, one in Naples 70,000,
another at Naples 40,000; and we are not far from July, 1902, when the
volcano of Mount Pelee, in the island of Martinique, wiped out the town
of St. Pierre and 30,000 inhabitants.Still nearer is that 18th April, 1906, when the San Francisco earthquake
killed over a thousand people, and did damage to the extent of sixty
millions.And so far in Australian history we have not had an earthquake that
would capsize a tumbler of hot punch.Why hot punch, thought Somers, why not hot bitters or ice-cream soda,
which are much more Austral and to the point? But he had read this
almost thrilling bit of journalism with satisfaction. If the mother
earth herself is so unstable, and upsets the applecart without caring a
straw, why, what can a man say to himself if he DOES happen to have a
devil in his belly!And he looked at the ocean uneasily moving, and wondered when next it
would thrust an angry shoulder out of the watery bed-covering, to give
things a little jog. Or when his own devil would get a leg up into
affairs.>



AT last he had it all out with himself, right to the bitter end. And
then he realised that all the time, since the year 1918, whether he was
in Sicily or Switzerland or Venice or Germany or in the Austrian Tyrol,
deep in his unconsciousness had lain this accumulation of black fury and
fear, like frenzied lava quiescent in his soul. And now it had burst up:
the fear, then the acute remembrance. So he faced it out, trembling with
shock and bitterness, every detail. And then he tried to reckon it all
up.But first, why had it all come back on him? It had seemed so past, so
gone. Why should it suddenly erupt like white hot lava, to set in hot
black rock round the wound of his soul? Who knows? Perhaps there is a
periodicity even in volcanic eruption. Or perhaps it was this contact
with Kangaroo and Willie Struthers, contact with the accumulating forces
of social violence. Or perhaps it was being again in a purely
English-speaking country, and feeling again that queer revulsion from
the English form of democracy. He realised that the oh-so-pleasant
democracy of the English lower classes frightened him, always had
frightened him. Yet everybody was so very pleasant and easy-going down
in Mullumbimby. It REALLY seemed so free.Free! Free! What did it mean? It was this very ultra-freedom that
frightened him, like a still pause before a thunderstorm. &quot;Let him that
thinketh he stand take heed lest he fall.&quot;Or perhaps it was just the inversion of the season, the climate. His
blood, his whole corporeal being, expected summer, and long days and
short nights. And here he had wilfully come into the Southern
hemisphere, with long starry nights of winter, and the late sun rising
north-east behind the sea, and travelling northwards up the sky, as if
running away, and setting in a cold glare north-west, behind the
bluey-black range. It should have been bird-nesting time, and leaves and
flowers and tall corn and full summer with cherry blossom fallen and
cherries beginning to change colour. Whereas the grass was sere and
brown, the earth had one winter-numb, the few deciduous trees were bare,
and only the uncanny coral tree flared its flowers of red-hot iron.Perhaps it was just this: the inversion of the seasons, the shock to his
blood and his system. For, of course, the body has its own rhythm, with
the sun and with the moon. The great nerve ganglia and the subtle glands
have their regular times and motions, in correspondence with the outer
universe. And these times and motions had suddenly received a check from
the outer universe: a distinct check. He had had an inkling of what it
would be when from the ship in the Indian Ocean he had seen the great
and beloved constellation Orion standing on its head as if pitching head
foremost into the sea, and the bright dog Sirius coursing high above his
heels in the outer air. Then he realized the inversion in the heavens.And perhaps it was this inversion which had brought up all that
corrosive and bitter fire from the bowels of his unconscious, up again
into his full consciousness. If so, then let it be so.One thing he realized, however: that if the fire had suddenly erupted in
his own belly, it would erupt one day in the bellies of all men. Because
there it had accumulated, like a great horrible lava pool, deep in the
unconscious bowels of all men. All who were not dead. And even the dead
were many of them raging in the invisible, with gnashing of teeth. But
the living dead, these he could not reckon with: they with poisonous
teeth like hyaenas.Rage! Rage! Rage! The awful accumulations that lie quiescent and
pregnant in the bowels of men. He thought of the big gaunt collier with
the blunt, seal-like face shorn of its intelligence, squatting naked and
ghastly on his heels. It passes, it passes for the time being. But in
those moments there is an inward disruption, and the death-hot lava
pours loose into the deepest reservoirs of the soul. One day to erupt:
or else to go hard and rocky, dead.Even the athletic young man who wanted to be approved of. Even he. He
had not much true spunk. But what was he feeling now? Unless, of course,
he had got into business and was successfully coining money. That seemed
to be the only safety-valve: success in money-making. But how many men
were successful, now?Of course it was all necessary, the conscription, the medical
examinations. Of course, of course. We all know it. But when it comes to
the deepest things, men are as entirely irrational as women. You can
reason with a sex-angry woman till you are black in the face. And if for
a time you DO overcome her with reason, the sex-anger only arises more
hideously and furiously, later. Perhaps in another guise.There is no arguing with the instinctive passional self. Not the least
use in the world. Yes, you are quite right, quite right in all your
contentions. BUT! And the BUT just explodes everything like a bomb.The conscription, all the whole performance of the war was absolutely
circumstantially necessary. It was necessary to investigate even the
secret parts of a man. Agreed! Agreed! BUT - .It was NECESSARY to put Richard Lovat and the ugly collier through that
business at Derby. Many men were put through things a thousand times
worse. Agreed! Oh, entirely agreed! The war couldn't be lost, at that
hour. Quite, quite, quite! Even Richard, even now, agreed fully to all
these contentions. BUT - !And there you are. BUT - . He was full of a lava fire of rage and hate,
at the bottom of his soul. And he knew it was the same with most men. He
felt desecrated. And he knew it was the same with most men. He felt
sold. And he knew most men felt the same.He cared for nothing now, but to let loose the hell-rage that was in
him. Get rid of it by letting it out. For there was no digesting it. He
had been trying that for three years, and roaming the face of the earth
trying to soothe himself with the sops of travel and new experience and
scenery. He knew now the worth of all sops. Once that disruption had
taken place in a man's soul, and in a stress of humiliation, under the
presence of COMPULSION, something has broken in his tissue and the
liquid fire has run out loose into his blood, then no sops will be of
any avail. The lava-fire at the bottom of a man's belly breeds more lava
fire, and more, and more - till there is an eruption. As the lava fire
accumulates, the man becomes more and more reckless. Till he reaches a
pitch of dehumanised recklessness, and then the lid is blown off, as the
top is blown off a hill to make a new volcano. Or else it all sets into
rocky deadness.Richard felt himself reaching the volcanic pitch. He had as good as
reached it. And he realised that the Russians must have reached it
during the war: that the Irish had got there: that the Indians in India
were approaching the point: that the whole world was gradually working
up to the pitch. The whole world. It was as inevitable as the coming of
summer. It might be soon - it might be slow. But inevitable it was. Or
else the alternative, the dead-rock barrenness.But why? Why, oh why? Is human life just opposed to human reason? The
Allies DID have to win the war. For it would certainly not have been any
better letting Germany win. Unless a very great disaster might have
shocked men to their deeper senses. But doubtful. Things HAD to go as
they went.So, it was just Thomas Hardy's Blind Fate? No, said Lovat to himself,
no. Fata voldetem ducunt, nolentem trahunt. The Fates lead on the
willing man, the unwilling man they drag.The Fates? What Fates? It takes a willing man to answer. Man is not a
creature of circumstance, neither is he the result of cause-and-effect
throughout the ages, neither is he a product of evolution, neither is he
a living MIND, part of the Universal Mind. Neither is he a complicated
make-up of forces and chemicals and organs. Neither is he a term of
love. Neither is he the mere instrument of God's will. None of these
things.Man lives according to his own idea of himself. When circumstances begin
really to run counter to his idea of himself, he damns circumstances.
When the running-counter persists, he damns the nature of things. And
when it STILL persists, he becomes a fatalist. A fatalist or an
opportunist - anything of that sort.Whose fault is it? Fate's? Not at all. It is man's fault for persisting
in some fixed idea of himself.Yet, being an animal saddled with a mental consciousness, which means
ideas, man MUST have some idea of himself. He just must, and those that
deny it have got a more fixed idea than anybody.Man must have some idea of himself. He must live HARD, HARD, up to this
idea of himself.But the idea is perishable. Say what you like, every idea is perishable:
even the idea of God or Love or Humanity or Liberty - even the greatest
idea has its day and perishes. Each formulated religion is in the end
only a great idea. Once the idea becomes explicit, it is dead. Yet we
must HAVE ideas.When a man follows the true inspiration of a new, living idea, he then
is the willing man whom the Fates lead onwards: like St. Paul or Pope
Hildebrand or Martin Luther or Cromwell or Abraham Lincoln. But when the
idea is really dead, and STILL man persists in following it, then he is
the unwilling man whom the Fates destroy, like Kaiser Wilhelm or
President Wilson, or, to-day, the world at large.For the idea, or ideal of Love, Self-sacrifice, Humanity united in love,
in brotherhood, in peace - all this is dead. There is no arguing about
it. It is dead. The great ideal is dead.How do we know? By putting off our conscious conceit and listening to
our own soul.So then, why will men not forgive the war, and their humiliations at the
hands of these war-like authorities? Because men were COMPELLED into the
service of a dead ideal. And perhaps nothing but this compulsion made
them realise it WAS a dead ideal. But all those filthy little
stay-at-home officers and coast-watchers and dirty-minded doctors who
tortured men during the FIRST stages of the torture, did these men IN
THEIR SOULS believe in what they were doing? They didn't. They HAD no
souls. They had only their beastly little WILLS, which they used to
bully all men with. With their wills they determined to fight for a dead
ideal, and to bully every other man into compliance. The inspiring
motive was the bullying. And every other man complied. Or else, by
admitting a conscientious objection to war, he admitted the dead ideal,
but took refuge in one of its side-tracks.All men alike, and all women, admitted and still admit the face value of
the ideal of Love, Self-sacrifice, and Humanity united in love,
brotherhood, and peace. So, they persist in the dead ideal. Fata nolunt.
Fata nolunt. Then see how the fates betray them. In their service of the
defunct ideal they find themselves utterly humiliated, SOLD. In England,
Italy, Germany, India, Australia, that had been the one word men had
used to describe their feeling. They had been sold. But not before they
had sold themselves. Now then. The moment a man feels he has been sold,
sold in the deepest things, something goes wrong with his whole
mechanism. Something breaks, in his tissue, and the black poison is
emitted into his blood. And then he follows a natural course, and
becomes a creature of slow, or of quick, revenge. Revenge on all that
the old ideal is and stands for. Revenge on the whole system. Just
revenge. Even further revenge on himself.Men revenged themselves on Athens, when they felt sold. When Rome,
persisting in an old, defunct ideal, gradually made her subjects feel
sold, they were revenged on her, no matter how. Constantinople and the
Byzantine Empire the same. And now our turn. &quot;Revenge,&quot; Timotheus cries.
And Timotheus is just everybody, except those that have got hold of the
money or the power.There is nothing for it but revenge. If you sow the dragon's teeth, you
mustn't expect lilies of the valley to spring up in sweet meekness.And Kangaroo? Kangaroo insisted on the old idea as hard as ever, though
on the Power of Love rather than on the Submission and Sacrifice of
Love. He wanted to take his revenge in an odour of sanctification and
Lily of the Valley essence. But he was the mob, really. See his face in
a rage. He was the mob: the VENGEFUL mob. Oh, God, the most terrifying
of all things.And Willie Struthers? The vengeful mob also. But if the old ideal had
still a logical leaf to put forth, it was this last leaf of
communism - before the lily-tree of humanity rooted in love died its
final death. Perhaps better Struthers than Kangaroo.&quot;But what about myself?&quot; said Richard Lovat to himself as he lay in the
darkness of Sydney, his brain afire. For the horrible bitter fire seemed
really to have got into his brain, burst up from his deepest bowels.
&quot;What about me? Am I too Timotheus crying REVENGE?&quot;Oh, revenge, yes, he wanted to be avenged. He wanted to be avenged.
Especially when he felt tangled up in the horrible human affair, the
ideal become like an octopus with a ghastly eye in the centre, and white
arms enwreathing the world. Oh, then he wanted to be avenged.But now, for the moment he felt he had cut himself clear. He was
exhausted and almost wrecked - but he felt clear again. If no other
ghastly arm of the octopus should flash out and encircle him.For the moment he felt himself lying inert, but clear, the dragon dead.
The ever-renewed dragon of a great old ideal, with its foul
poison-breath. It seemed, as if, for himself, he had killed it.That was now all he wanted: to get clear. Not to save humanity or to
help humanity or to have anything to do with humanity. No - no. Kangaroo
had been his last embrace with humanity. Now, all he wanted was to cut
himself clear. To be clear of humanity altogether, to be alone. To be
clear of love, and pity, and hate. To be alone from it all. To cut
himself finally clear from the last encircling arm of the octopus
humanity. To turn to the old dark gods, who had waited so long in the
outer dark.Humanity could do as it liked: he did not care. So long as he could get
his own soul clear. For he believed in the inward soul, in the profound
unconscious of man. Not an ideal God. The ideal God is a proposition of
the mental consciousness, all-too-limitedly human. &quot;No,&quot; he said to
himself. &quot;There IS God. But forever dark, forever unrealisable: forever
and forever. The unutterable name, because it can never have a name. The
great living darkness which we represent by the glyph, God.&quot;There is this ever-present, living darkness inexhaustible and
unknowable. It IS. And it is all the God and the gods.And every LIVING human soul is a well-head to this darkness of the
living unutterable. Into every living soul wells up the darkness, the
unutterable. And then there is travail of the visible with the
invisible. Man is in travail with his own soul, while ever his soul
lives. Into his unconscious surges a new flood of the God-darkness, the
living unutterable. And this unutterable is like a germ, a foetus with
which he must travail, bringing it at last into utterance, into action,
into BEING.But in most people the soul is withered at the source, like a woman
whose ovaries withered before she became a woman, or a man whose
sex-glands died at the moment when they should have come into life. Like
unsexed people, the mass of mankind is soulless. Because to persist in
resistance of the sensitive influx of the dark gradually withers the
soul, makes it die, and leaves a human idealist and an automaton. Most
people are dead, and scurrying and talking in the sleep of death. Life
has its automatic side, sometimes in direct conflict with the
spontaneous soul. Then there is a fight. And the spontaneous soul must
extricate itself from the meshes of the ALMOST automatic white octopus
of the human ideal, the octopus of humanity. It must struggle clear,
knowing what it is doing: not waste itself in revenge. The revenge is
inevitable enough, for each denial of the spontaneous dark soul creates
the reflex of its own revenge. But the greatest revenge on the lie is to
get clear of the lie.The long travail. The long gestation of the soul within a man, and the
final parturition, the birth of a new way of knowing, a new God-influx.
A new idea, true enough. But at the centre, the old anti-idea: the dark,
the unutterable God. This time not a God scribbling on tablets of stone
or bronze. No everlasting decalogues. No sermons on mounts, either. The
dark God, the forever unrevealed. The God who is many gods to many men:
all things to all men. The source of passions and strange motives. It is
a frightening thought, but very liberating.&quot;Ah, my soul,&quot; said Richard to himself, &quot;you have to look more ways than
one. First to the unutterable dark of God: first and foremost. Then to
the utterable and sometimes very loud dark of that woman Harriet. I must
admit that only the dark god in her fighting with my white idealism has
got me so clear: and that only the dark god in her answering the dark
god in me has got my soul heavy and fecund with a new sort of infant.
But even now I can't bring it forth. I can't bring it forth. I need
something else. Some other answer.&quot;Life makes no absolute statement: the true life makes no absolute
statement. &quot;Thou shalt have no other God before me.&quot; The very
commandment suggests that it is possible to have other gods, and to put
them before Jehovah. &quot;Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself.&quot; But oh
deepest of perplexing questions, HOW do I love myself? Am I to love my
neighbour as if he WERE myself? But my very love makes me know that he
ISN'T myself, and that therein lies his lovableness, unless I am a
conceited prig. Am I to love my neighbour as much as myself? And how
much do I love myself? It is a wildly problematic commandment. Supposing
I love my neighbour more than myself. That again is a catastrophe.Since every man must love himself in a different way - unless he is a
materialist or a prig - he must love his neighbour in a different way. So
Christ's commandment is as large as life, and its meaning can never be
fixed. I sometimes hate myself: and my neighbour as myself.Life makes no absolute statement. It is all Call and Answer. As soon as
the Call ceases, the Answer is invalid. And till the Answer comes, a
Call is but a crying in the wilderness. And every Answer must wait until
it hears the Call. Till the Call comes, the Answer is but an unborn
foetus.And so it is. Life is so wonderful and complex, and ALWAYS relative. A
man's soul is a perpetual call and answer. He can never be the call and
the answer in one: between the dark God and the incarnate man: between
the dark soul of woman, and the opposite dark soul of man: and finally,
between the souls of man and man, strangers to one another, but
answerers. So it is for ever, the eternal weaving of calls and answers,
and the fabric of life woven and perishing again. But the calls never
cease, and the answers never fail for long. And when the fabric becomes
grey and machine-made, some strange clarion-call makes men start to
smash it up. So it is.BLESSED ARE THE PURE IN HEART. That is absolute truth, a statement of
living relativity, because the pure in heart are those who quiver to the
dark God, to the call of woman, and to the call of men. The pure in
heart are the listeners and the answerers. But Rameses II was no doubt
as pure in heart as John the Evangelist. Indeed perhaps purer, since
John was an INSISTER. To be pure in heart, man must listen to the dark
gods as well as to the white gods, to the call to blood-sacrifice as
well as to the eucharist.BLESSED ARE THE POOR IN SPIRIT. It depends. If it means LISTENING. Not
if it means taking up a permanent attitude.BLESSED ARE THE PEACEMAKERS. It depends. If it means ANSWERING. Not if
it means enforcing the peace, like policemen.BLESSED ARE THE MEEK. It depends on the occasion.BLESSED ARE THEY THAT MOURN. It depends altogether.BLESSED ARE THEY THAT DO HUNGER AND THIRST AFTER RIGHTEOUSNESS. Ah, yes,
but the righteousness of the profound listener, and of the answerer who
will answer come what may. Not any other righteousness of the
commandment sort.BLESSED ARE YE WHEN MEN SHALL DESPISE YOU. Nay, nay, it is rather:
UNBLESSED are the despisers - .After all his terrific upheaval, Richard Lovat at last gave it up, and
went to sleep. A man must even know how to give up his own earnestness,
when its hour is over, and not to bother about anything any more, when
he's bothered enough.>



Dear Lovat, also Mrs. Lovat: I don't think it is very nice of you that
you don't even call with a tract or a tube-rose, when you know I am so
smitten. Yours, Kangaroo.
P.S. - Bullets in my marsupial pouch.Of course Richard went up at once: and Harriet sent a little box with
all the different strange shells from the beach. They are curious and
interesting for a sick man.Somers found Kangaroo in bed, very yellow, and thin, almost
lantern-jawed, with haunted, frightened eyes. The room had many flowers,
and was perfumed with eau-de-cologne, but through the perfume came an
unpleasant, discernable stench. The nurse had asked Richard, please to
be very quiet.Kangaroo put out a thin yellow hand. His black hair came wispily,
pathetically over his forehead. But he said, with a faint, husky
briskness:&quot;Hello! Come at last,&quot; and he took Somers' hand in a damp clasp.&quot;I didn't know whether you could see visitors,&quot; said Richard.&quot;I can't. Sit down. Behave yourself.&quot;Somers sat down, only anxious to behave himself.&quot;Harriet sent you such a silly present,&quot; he said. &quot;Just shells we have
picked up from the shore. She thought you might like to play with them
on the counterpane - .&quot;&quot;Like that sloppy Coventry Patmore poem. Let me look.&quot;The sick man took the little Sorrento box with its inlaid design of
sirens and peered in at the shells.&quot;I can smell the sea in them,&quot; he said hoarsely.And very slowly he began to look at the shells, one by one. There were
black ones like buds of coal, and black ones with a white spiral thread,
and funny knobbly black and white ones, and tiny purple ones, and a
bright sea-orange, semi-transparent clamp shell, and little pink ones
with long, sharp points, and glass ones, and lovely pearly ones, and
then those that Richard had put in, worn shells like sea-ivory,
marvellous substance, with all the structure showing; spirals like fairy
stair-cases, and long, pure phallic pieces that were the centres of big
shells, from which the whorl was all washed away: also curious flat,
oval discs, with a lovely whorl traced on them, and an eye in the
centre. Richard liked these especially.Kangaroo looked at them briefly, one by one, as if they were bits of
uninteresting printed paper.&quot;Here, take them away,&quot; he said, pushing the box aside. And his face had
a faint spot of pink in the cheeks.&quot;They may amuse you some time when you are alone,&quot; said Richard,
apologetically.&quot;They make me know I have never been born,&quot; said Kangaroo, huskily.Richard was startled, and he didn't know what to answer. So he sat
still, and Kangaroo lay still, staring blankly in front of him. Somers
could not detach his mind from the slight, yet pervading sickening
smell.&quot;My sewers leak,&quot; said Kangaroo, bitterly, as if divining the other's
thought.&quot;But they will get better,&quot; said Richard.The sick man did not answer, and Somers just sat still.&quot;Have you forgiven me?&quot; asked Kangaroo, looking at Somers.&quot;There was nothing to forgive,&quot; said Richard, his face grave and still.&quot;I knew you hadn't,&quot; said Kangaroo. Richard knitted his brows. He looked
at the long, yellow face. It was so strange and so frightening to him.&quot;You bark at me as if I were Little Red Riding-hood,&quot; he said, smiling.
Kangaroo turned dark, inscrutable eyes on him.&quot;Help me!&quot; he said, almost in a whisper. &quot;Help me.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Richard.Kangaroo held out his hand: and Richard took it. But not without a
slight sense of repugnance. Then he listened to the faint, far-off
noises of the town, and looked at the beautiful flowers in the room:
violets, orchids, tube-roses, delicate yellow and red roses, iceland
poppies, orange like transmitted light, lilies. It was like a tomb, like
a mortuary, all the flowers, and that other faint, sickening odour.&quot;I am not wrong, you know,&quot; said Kangaroo.&quot;No one says you are,&quot; laughed Richard gently.&quot;I am not wrong. Love is still the greatest.&quot; His voice sank in its
huskiness to a low resonance. Richard's heart stood still. Kangaroo lay
quite motionless, but with some of the changeless pride which had lent
him beauty, at times, when he was himself. The Lamb of God grown into a
sheep. Yes, the nobility.&quot;You heard Willie Struthers' speech?&quot; said Kangaroo, his face changing
as he looked up at Somers.&quot;Yes.&quot;Well?&quot;&quot;It seemed to me logical,&quot; said Richard, not knowing how to answer.&quot;Logical!&quot; Even Kangaroo flickered with surprise. &quot;You and logic!&quot;&quot;You see,&quot; said Richard very gently, &quot;the educated world has preached
the divinity of work at the lower classes. They broke them in, like
draught-horses, put them all in the collar and set them all between the
shafts. There they are, all broken in, WORKERS. They are conscious of
nothing save that they are workers. They accept the fact that nothing is
divine but work: work being service, and service being love. The highest
is work. Very well then, accept the conclusion if you accept the
premises. The working classes are the highest, it is for them to inherit
the earth. You can't deny that, if you assert the sacredness of work.&quot;He spoke quietly, gently. But he spoke because he felt it was kinder,
even to the sick man, than to avoid discussion altogether.&quot;But I don't believe in the sacredness of work, Lovat,&quot; said Kangaroo.&quot;No, but they believe it themselves. And it follows from the sacredness
of love.&quot;&quot;I want them to be men, men, men - not implements at a job.&quot; The voice
was weak now, and took queer, high notes.&quot;Yes, I know. But men inspired by love. And love has only service as its
means of expression.&quot;&quot;How do you know? You never love,&quot; said Kangaroo in a faint, sharp
voice. &quot;The joy of love is in being with the beloved - as near as you can
get - 'And I, if I be lifted up, will draw all men unto me.' - For life,
for life's sake, Lovat, not for work. Lift them up, that they may live.&quot;Richard was silent. He knew it was no good arguing.&quot;Do you think it can't be done?&quot; asked Kangaroo, his voice growing
fuller. &quot;I hope I may live to show you. The working men have not
realised yet what love is. The perfect love that men may have for one
another, passing the love of women. Oh, Lovat, they still have that to
experience. Don't harden your heart. Don't stiffen your neck before your
old Jewish Kangaroo. You know it is true. Perfect love casteth out fear,
Lovat. Teach a man how to love his mate, with a pure and fearless love.
Oh, Lovat, think what can be done that way!&quot;Somers was very pale, his face set.&quot;Say you believe me. Say you believe me. And let us bring it to pass
together. If I have you with me I know we can do it. If you had been
with me this would never have happened to me.&quot;His face changed again as if touched with acid at the thought. Somers
sat still, remote. He was distressed, but it made him feel more remote.&quot;What class do you feel that you belong to, as far as you belong to any
class?&quot; asked Kangaroo, his eyes on Richard's face.&quot;I don't feel I belong to any class. But as far as I DO belong - it is to
the working-classes. I know that. I can't change.&quot;Kangaroo watched him eagerly.&quot;I wish I did,&quot; he said, eagerly. Then, after a pause, he added: &quot;They
have never known the full beauty of love, the working classes. They have
never admitted it. Work, bread has always stood first. But we can take
away that obstacle. Teach them the beauty of love between men, Richard,
teach them the highest - greater love than this hath no man - teach them
how to love their own mate, and you will solve the problem of work for
ever. Richard, this is true, you know it is true. How beautiful it would
be! How beautiful it would be! It would complete the perfect circle - .&quot;His voice faded down into a whisper, so that Somers seemed to hear it
from far off. And it seemed like some far off voice of annunciation. Yet
Richard's face was hard and clear and sea-bitter as one of the worn
shells he had brought.&quot;The faithful, fearless love of man for man,&quot; whispered Kangaroo, as he
lay with his dark eyes on Richard's face, and the wisp of hair on his
forehead. Beautiful, he was beautiful again, like a transfiguration.&quot;We've got to save the People, we've got to do it. And when shall we
begin, when shall we begin, you and I?&quot; he repeated in a sudden full
voice. &quot;Only when we dare to lead them, Lovat,&quot; he added in a murmur.
&quot;The love of man for wife and children, the love of man for man, so that
each would lay down his life for the other, then the love of man for
beauty, for truth, for the Right. Isn't that so! Destroy no love. Only
open the field for further love.&quot;He lay still for some moments after this speech, that ended in a whisper
almost. Then he looked with a wonderful smile at Somers, without saying
a word, only smiling from his eyes, strangely, wonderfully. But Richard
was scared.&quot;Isn't that all honest Injun, Lovat!&quot; he whispered playfully.&quot;I believe it is,&quot; said Richard, though with unchanging face. His eyes,
however, were perplexed and tormented.&quot;Of course you do. Of course you do,&quot; said Kangaroo softly. &quot;But you are
the most obstinate little devil and child that ever opposed a wise man
like me. For example, don't you love me in your heart of hearts, only
you daren't admit it! I know you do. I know you do. But admit it, man,
admit it, and the world will be a bigger place to you. You are afraid of
love.&quot;Richard was more and more tormented in himself.&quot;In a way, I love you, Kangaroo,&quot; he said. &quot;Our souls are alike
somewhere. But it is true I don't WANT to love you.&quot;And he looked in distress at the other man.Kangaroo gave a real little laugh.&quot;Was ever woman so coy and hard to please!&quot; he said, in a warm, soft
voice. &quot;Why don't you want to love me, you stiff-necked and
uncircumcised Philistine! Don't you want to love Harriet, for example?&quot;&quot;No, I don't want to love anybody. Truly. It simply makes me frantic and
murderous to have to feel loving any more.&quot;&quot;Then why did you come to me this morning?&quot;The question was pertinent. Richard was baffled.&quot;In a way,&quot; he said vaguely, &quot;because I love you. But love makes me feel
I should die.&quot;&quot;It is your wilful refusal of it,&quot; said Kangaroo, a little wearily. &quot;Put
your hand on my throat, it aches a little.&quot;He took Richard's hand and laid it over his warm, damp, sick throat,
where the pulse beat so heavy and sick, and the Adam's apple stood out
hard.&quot;You must be still now,&quot; said Lovat, gentle like a physician.&quot;Don't let me die!&quot; murmured Kangaroo, almost inaudible, looking into
Richard's muted face. The white, silent face did not change, only the
blue-grey eyes were abstract with thought. He did not answer. And even
Kangaroo dared not ask for an answer.At last he let go Richard's hand from his throat. Richard withdrew it,
and wanted to wipe it on his handkerchief. But he refrained, knowing the
sick man would notice. He pressed it very silently, quietly, under his
thigh, to wipe it on his trousers.&quot;You are tired now,&quot; he said softly.&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;I will tell the nurse to come?&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;Good-bye - be better,&quot; said Richard sadly, touching the man's cheek with
his finger-tips slightly. Kangaroo opened his eyes with a smile that was
dark as death. &quot;Come again,&quot; he whispered, closing his eyes once more.
Richard went blindly to the door. The nurse was there waiting.Poor Richard, he went away almost blinded with stress and grief and
bewilderment. Was it true what Kangaroo had said? Was it true? Did he,
Richard, love Kangaroo? Did he love Kangaroo, and deny it? And was the
denial just a piece of fear. Was it just fear that made him hold back
from admitting his love for the other man?Fear? Yes, it was fear. But then, did he not believe also in the God of
fear? There was not only one God. There was not only the God of love. To
insist that there is only one God, and that God the source of Love, is
perhaps as fatal as the complete denial of God, and of all mystery. He
believed in the God of fear, of darkness, of passion, and of silence,
the God that made a man realise his own sacred aloneness. If Kangaroo
could have realised that too then Richard felt he would have loved him,
in a dark, separate, other way of love. But never this all in all thing.As for politics, there was so little to choose, and choice meant
nothing. Kangaroo and Struthers were both right, both of them. Lords or
doctors or Jewish financiers SHOULD not have more money than a simple
working man, just because they were lords and doctors and financiers. If
service was the all in all it was absolutely wrong. And Willie Struthers
was right.The same with Kangaroo. If love was the all in all then the great range
of love was complete as he put it: a man's love for wife and children,
his sheer, confessed love for his friend, his mate, and his love for
beauty and truth. Whether love was all in all or not this was the great,
wonderful range of love, and love was not complete short of the whole.But - but something else was true at the same time. Man's isolation was
always a supreme truth and fact, not to be forsworn. And the mystery of
apartness. And the greater mystery of the dark God beyond a man, the God
that gives a man passion, and the dark, unexplained blood-tenderness
that is deeper than love, but so much more obscure, impersonal, and the
brave, silent blood-pride, knowing his own separateness, and the
sword-strength of his derivation from the dark God. This dark,
passionate religiousness and inward sense of an inwelling magnificence,
direct flow from the unknowable God, this filled Richard's heart first,
and human love seemed such a fighting for candle-light, when the dark is
so much better. To meet another dark worshipper, that would be the best
of human meetings. But strain himself into a feeling of absolute human
love, he just couldn't do it.Man's ultimate love for man? Yes, yes, but only in the separate darkness
of man's love for the present, unknowable God. Human love, as a god-act,
very well. Human love as a ritual offering to the God who is out of the
light, well and good. But human love as an all in all, ah, no, the
strain and the unreality of it were too great.He thought of Jack, and the strange, unforgettable uptilted grin on
Jack's face as he spoke of the satisfaction of killing. This was true,
too. As true as love and loving. Nay, Jack was a killer in the name of
Love. That also has come to pass again.&quot;It is the collapse of the love-ideal,&quot; said Richard to himself. &quot;I
suppose it means chaos and anarchy. Then there will have to be chaos and
anarchy: in the name of love and equality. The only thing one can stick
to is one's own isolate being, and the God in whom it is rooted. And the
only thing to look to is the God who fulfils one from the dark. And the
only thing to wait for is for men to find their aloneness and their God
in the darkness. Then one can meet as worshippers, in a sacred contact
in the dark.&quot;Which being so, he proceeded, as ever, to try to disentangle himself
from the white octopus of love. Not that even now he dared quite deny
love. Love is perhaps an eternal part of life. But it is only a part.
And when it is treated as if it were a whole, it becomes a disease, a
vast white strangling octopus. All things are relative, and have their
sacredness in their true relation to all other things. And he felt the
light of love dying out of his eyes, in his heart, in his soul, and a
great, healing darkness taking its place, with a sweetness of
everlasting aloneness, and a stirring of dark blood-tenderness, and a
strange, soft iron of ruthlessness.He fled away to be by himself as much as he could. His great relief was
the shore. Sometimes the dull exploding of the waves was too much for
him, like hammer-strokes on the head. He tried to flee inland. But the
shore was his great solace, for all that. The huge white rollers of the
Pacific breaking in a white, soft, snow-rushing wall, while the thin
spume flew back to sea like a combed mane, combed back by the strong,
cold land-wind.The thud, the pulse of the waves: that was his nearest throb of emotion.
The other emotions seemed to abandon him. So suddenly, and so
completely, to abandon him. So it was when he got back from Sydney and,
in the night of moonlight, went down the low cliff to the sand.
Immediately the great rhythm and ringing of the breakers obliterated
every other feeling in his breast, and his soul was a moonlit hollow
with the waves striding home. Nothing else.And in the morning the yellow sea faintly crinkled by the inrushing wind
from the land, and long, straight lines on the lacquered meadow, long,
straight lines that reared at last in green glass, then broke in snow,
and slushed softly up the sand. Sometimes the black skulking fin of a
shark. The water was very clear, very green, like bright green glass.
Another big fish with humpy sort of fins sticking up, and horror, in the
green water a big red mouth wide open. One day the fins of dolphins
near, it seemed almost over the sea edge. And then, suddenly, oh wonder,
they were caught up in the green wall of the rising water, and there for
a second they hung in the watery, bright green pane of the wave, five
big dark dolphins, a little crowd, with their sharp fins, and blunt
heads, a little sea-crowd in the thin, upreared sea. They flashed with a
sharp black motion as the great wave curled to break. They flashed
in-sea, flashed from the foamy horror of the land. And there they were,
black little school, away in the lacquered water, panting, Richard
imagined, with the excitement of the escape. Then one of the bold bucks
came back to try again, and he jumped clean out of the water, above the
wave, and kicked his heels as he dived in again.The sea-birds were always wheeling: big, dark-backed birds like
mollyhawks and albatrosses with a great spread of wings: and the white
gleaming gannets, silvery as fish in the air. In they went, suddenly,
like bombs into the wave, spitting back the water. Then they slipped out
again, slipped out of the ocean with a sort of sly exultance.And ships walked on the wall-crest of the sea, shedding black smoke. A
vast, hard, high sea, with tiny clouds like mirage islets away far, far
back, beyond the edge.So Richard knew it, as he sat and worked on the verandah or sat at table
in the room and watched through the open door. But it was usually in the
afternoons he went down to it.It was his afternoon occupation to go down to the sea's edge and wander
slowly on the firm sand just at the foam-edge. Sometimes the great waves
were turning like mill-wheels white all down the shore. Sometimes they
were smaller, more confused, as the current shifted. Sometimes his eyes
would be on the sand, watching the wrack, the big bladder-weed thrown
up, the little sponges like short clubs rolling in the wind, and once,
only, those fairy blue wind-bags like bags of rainbow with long blue
strings.He knew all the places where the different shells were found, the white
shells and the black and the red, the big rainbow scoops and the
innumerable little black snails that lived on the flat rocks in the
little pools. Flat rocks ran out near the coal jetty, and between them
little creeks of black, round, crunchy coal-pebbles: sea-coal. Sometimes
there would be a couple of lazy, beach-combing men picking the biggest
pebbles and putting them into sacks.On the flat rocks were pools of clear water, that many a time he stepped
into, because it was invisible. The coloured pebbles shone, the red
anemones pursed themselves up. There were hideous stumpy little fish
that darted swift as lightning - grey, with dark stripes. An urchin said
they were called toads. &quot;Yer can't eat 'em. Kill yer if y' do. Yer c'nt
eat black fish. See me catch one o' these toads!&quot; All this in a high
shrill voice above the waves. Richard admired the elfish self-possession
of the urchin, alone on the great shore all day, like a little wild
creature himself. But so the boys were: such wonderful little
self-possessed creatures. It was as if nobody was responsible for them,
so they learned to be responsible for themselves, like young elf
creatures, as soon as they were hatched. They liked Richard, and
patronised him in a friendly, half-shy way. But it was they who were the
responsible party, the grown-up they treated with a gentle, slightly
off-handed indulgence. It always amused friend Richard to see these
Australian children bearing the responsibility of their parents. &quot;He's
only a poor old Dad, you know. Young fellow like me's got to keep an eye
on him, see he's all right.&quot; That seemed to be the tone of the urchins
of ten and eleven. They were charming: much nicer than the older youths,
or the men.The jetty straddled its huge grey timbers, like a great bridge, across
the sands and the flat rocks. Under the bridge it was rather dark,
between the great trunk-timbers. But here Richard found the best of the
flat, oval disc-shells with the whorl and the blue eye. By the bank hung
curtains of yellowish creeper, and a big, crimson-pink convolvulus
flowered in odd tones. An aloe sent up its tall spike, and died at its
base. A little bare grassy headland came out, and the flat rocks ran out
dark to sea, where the white waves prowled on three sides.Richard would drift out this way, right into the sea, on a sunny
afternoon. On the flat rocks, all pocketed with limpid pools, the
sea-birds would sit with their backs to him, oblivious. Only an uneasy
black bird with a long neck, squatting among the gulls, would wriggle
his neck as the man approached. The gulls ran a few steps, and forgot
him. They were mostly real gulls, big and pure as grey pearl, suave and
still, with a mat gleam, like eggs of the foam in the sun on the rocks.
Slowly Richard strayed nearer. There were little browner birds huddled
and further, one big, dark-backed bird. There they all remained, like
opalescent whitish bubbles on the dark, flat, ragged wet-rock, in the
sun, in the sea sleep. The black bird rose like a duck, flying with its
neck outstretched, more timid than the rest. But it came back. Richard
drew nearer and nearer, within six yards of the sea-things. Beyond, the
everlasting low white wall of foam, rustling to the flat-rock. Only the
sea.The black creature rose again, showing the white at his side, and flying
with a stretched-out neck, frightened-looking, like a duck. His mate
rose too. And then all the gulls, flying low in a sort of protest over
the foam-tips. Richard had it all to himself - the ever-unfurling water,
the ragged, flat, square-holed rocks, the fawn sands inland, the soft
sand-bank, the sere flat grass where ponies wandered, the low,
red-painted bungalows squatting under coral trees, the ridge of tall
wire-thin trees holding their plumes in tufts at the tips, the stalky
cabbage-palms beyond in the hollow, clustering, low, whitish zinc roofs
of bungalows, at the edge of the dark trees - then the trees in darkness
swooping up to the wall of the tors, that ran a waving skyline sagging
southwards. Scattered, low, frail-looking bungalows with whitish roofs,
and scattered dark trees among. A plume of smoke beyond, out of the
scarp front of trees. Near the sky, dark, old, aboriginal rocks. Then
again all the yellowish fore-front of the sea, yellow bare grass, the
homestead with leafless coral trees, the ponies above the sands, the
pale fawn foreshore, the sea, the floor of wet rock.He had it all to himself. And there, with his hands in his pockets, he
drifted into indifference. The far-off, far-off, far-off indifference.
The world revolved and revolved and disappeared. Like a stone that has
fallen into the sea, his old life, the old meaning, fell, and rippled,
and there was vacancy, with the sea and the Australian shore in it.
Far-off, far-off, as if he had landed on another planet, as a man might
land after death. Leaving behind the body of care. Even the body of
desire. Shed. All that had meant so much to him, shed. All the old world
and self of care, the beautiful care as well as the weary care, shed
like a dead body. The landscape? - he cared not a thing about the
landscape. Love? - he was absolved from love, as if by a great pardon.
Humanity? - there was none. Thought? - fallen like a stone into the sea.
The great, the glamorous past? - worn thin, frail, like a frail,
translucent film of shell thrown up on the shore.To be alone, mindless and memoryless between the sea, under the sombre
wall-front of Australia. To be alone with a long, wide shore and land,
heartless, soulless. As alone and as absent and as present as an
aboriginal dark on the sand in the sun. The strange falling-away of
everything. The cabbage-palms in the sea-wind were sere like old mops.
The jetty straddled motionless from the shore. A pony walked on the sand
snuffing the sea-weed.The past all gone so frail and thin. &quot;What have I cared about, what have
I cared for? There is nothing to care about.&quot; Absolved from it all. The
soft, blue, humanless sky of Australia, the pale, white unwritten
atmosphere of Australia. Tabula rasa. The world a new leaf. And on the
new leaf, nothing. The white clarity of the Australian, fragile
atmosphere. Without a mark, without a record.&quot;Why have I cared? I don't care. How strange it is here, to be soulless
and alone.&quot;That was the perpetual refrain at the back of his mind. To be soulless
and alone, by the Southern Ocean, in Australia.&quot;Why do I wrestle with my soul? I have no soul.&quot;Clear as the air about him this truth possessed him.&quot;Why do I talk of the soul? My soul is shed like a sheath. I am soulless
and alone, soulless and alone. That which is soulless is perforce
alone.&quot;The sun was curving to the crest of the dark ridge. As soon as the sun
went behind the ridge, shadow fell on the shore, and a cold wind came,
he would go home. But he wanted the sun not to sink - he wanted the sun
to stand still, for fear it might turn back to the soulful world where
love is and the burden of bothering.He saw something clutch in a pool. Crouching, he saw a horror - a
dark-grey, brown-striped octopus thing with two smallish, white beaks or
eyes living in a cranny of a rock in a pool. It stirred the denser
viscous pool of itself and unfurled a long dark arm through the water,
an arm studded with bright, orange-red studs or suckers. Then it curled
the arm in again, cuddling close. Perhaps a sort of dark shore octopus,
star-fish coloured amid its darkness. It was watching him as he
crouched. He dropped a snail-shell near it. It huddled closer and one of
the beak-like white things disappeared; or were they eyes? Heaven knows.
It eased out again, and from its dense jelly mass another thick arm
swayed out studded with the sea-orange studs. And he crouched and
watched, while the white water hissed nearer to drive him away.
Creatures of the sea! Creatures of the sea! The sea-water was round his
boots, he rose with his hands in his pockets, to wander away.The sun went behind the coal-dark hill, though the waves still glowed
white-gold, and the sea was dark blue. But the shore had gone into
shadow, and the cold wind came at once, like a creature that was lying
in wait. The upper air seethed, seemed to hiss with light. But here was
shadow, cold like the arm of the dark octopus. And the moon already in
the sky.Home again. But what was home? The fish has the vast ocean for home. And
man has timelessness and nowhere. &quot;I won't delude myself with the
fallacy of home,&quot; he said to himself. &quot;The four walls are a blanket I
wrap around in, in timelessness and nowhere, to go to sleep.&quot;Back to Harriet, to tea. Harriet? Another bird like himself. If only she
wouldn't speak, talk, feel. The weary habit of talking and having
feelings. When a man has no soul he has no feelings to talk about. He
wants to be still. And &quot;meaning&quot; is the most meaningless of illusions.
An outworn garment.Harriet and he? It was time they both agreed that nothing has any
meaning. Meaning is a dead letter when a man has no soul. And speech is
like a volley of dead leaves and dust, stifling the air. Human beings
should learn to make weird, wordless cries, like animals, and cast off
the clutter of words.Old dust and dirt of corpses: words and feelings. The decomposed body of
the past whirling and choking us, language, love, and meaning. When a
man loses his soul he knows what a small, weary bit of clockwork it was.
Who dares to be soulless finds the new dimension of life.Home, to tea. The clicking of the clock. Tic-tac! Tic-tac! The clock.
Home to tea. Just for clockwork's sake.No home, no tea. Insouciant soullessness. Eternal indifference. Perhaps
it is only the great pause between carings. But it is only in this pause
that one finds the meaninglessness of meanings - like old husks which
speak dust. Only in this pause that one finds the meaninglessness of
meanings, and the other dimension, the reality of timelessness and
nowhere. Home to tea! Do you hear the clock tick? And yet there is
timelessness and nowhere. And the clock means nothing with its ticking.
And nothing is so meaningless as meanings.Yet Richard meandered home to tea. For the sun had set, the sea of
evening light was going pale blue, fair as evening, faintly glazed with
yellow: the eastern sky was a glow of rose and smoke blue, a band beyond
the sea, while from the dark land-ridge under the western sky an
electric fierceness still rushed up past a small but vehement evening
star. Somewhere among it all the moon was lying.He received another summons to go to Kangaroo. He didn't want to go. He
didn't want any more emotional stress, of any sort. He was sick of
having a soul that suffered or responded. He didn't want to respond any
more, or to suffer any more. Saunter blindly and obstinately through the
days.But he set off. The wattle-blooms - the whitish, mealy ones - were aflower
in the bush, and at the top of huge poles of stems, big,
blackish-crimson buds and flowers, flowers of some sort, shot up out of
a clump of spear-leaves. The bush was in flower. The sky above was a
tender, virgin blue, the air was pale with clarity, the sun moved
strong, yet with a soft and cat-like motion through the heavens. It was
spring. But still the bush kept its sombreness along all the pellucid
ether: the eternally unlighted bush.What was the good of caring? What was the point of caring? As he looked
at the silent, morning bush grey-still in the translucency of the day, a
voice spoke quite aloud in him. What was the good of caring, of
straining, of stressing? Not the slightest good. The vast lapse of time
here - and white men thrown in like snow into dusky wine, to melt away
and disappear, but to cool the fever of the dry continent.
Afterwards - afterwards - in the far-off, far-off afterwards, a different
sort of men might arise to a different sort of care. But as for
now - like snow in aboriginal wine one could float and deliciously melt
down, to nothingness, having no choice.He knew that Kangaroo was worse. But he was startled to find him looking
a dead man. A long, cadaverous-yellow face, exactly the face of a dead
man, but with an animal's dark eyes. He did not move. But he watched
Richard come forward from the door. He did not give him his hand.&quot;How are you?&quot; said Richard gently.&quot;Dying.&quot; The one word from the discoloured lips.Somers was silent, because he knew it was only too true. Kangaroo's dark
eyebrows above his motionless dark eyes were exactly like an animal that
sulks itself to death. His brow was just sulking to death, like an
animal.Kangaroo glanced up at Somers with a rapid turn of the eyes. His body
was perfectly motionless.&quot;Did you know I was dying?&quot; he said.&quot;I was afraid.&quot;&quot;Afraid! You weren't afraid. You were glad. They're all glad.&quot; The voice
was weak, hissing in its sound. He seemed to speak to himself.&quot;Nay, don't say that.&quot;Kangaroo took no notice of the expostulation. He lay silent.&quot;They don't want me,&quot; he said.&quot;But why bother?&quot;&quot;I'm dying! I'm dying! I'm dying!&quot; suddenly shouted Kangaroo, with a
breaking and bellowing voice that nearly startled Richard out of his
skin. The nurse came running in, followed by Jack.&quot;Mr. Cooley! Whatever is it?&quot; said the nurse.He looked at her with long, slow, dark looks.&quot;Statement of fact,&quot; he said, in his faint, husky voice.&quot;DON'T excite yourself,&quot; pleaded the nurse. &quot;You KNOW it hurts you.
Don't think about it, don't. Hadn't you perhaps best be left alone?&quot;&quot;Yes, I'd better go,&quot; said Richard, rising.&quot;I want to say good-bye to you,&quot; said Kangaroo faintly, looking up at
him with strange, beseeching eyes.Richard, very pale at the gills, sat down again in the chair. Jack
watched them both, scowling.&quot;Go out, nurse,&quot; whispered Kangaroo, touching her hand with his fingers,
in a loving kind of motion. &quot;I'm all right.&quot;&quot;Oh, Mr. Cooley, DON'T fret, DON'T,&quot; she pleaded.He watched her with dark, subtle, equivocal eyes, then glanced at the
door. She went, obedient, and Jack followed her.&quot;Good-bye, Lovat!&quot; said Kangaroo in a whisper, turning his face to
Somers and reaching out his hand. Richard took the clammy, feeble hand.
He did not speak. His lips were closed firmly, his face pale and proud
looking. He looked back into Kangaroo's eyes, unconscious of what he
saw. He was only isolated again in endurance. Grief, torture, shame,
seethed low down in him. But his breast and shoulders and face were hard
as if turned to rock. He had no choice.&quot;You've killed me. You've killed me, Lovat!&quot; whispered Kangaroo. &quot;Say
good-bye to me. Say you love me now you've done it, and I won't hate you
for it.&quot; The voice was weak and tense.&quot;ButIhaven't killed you, Kangaroo. I wouldn't be here holding your
hand if I had. I'm only so sorry some other villain did such a thing.&quot;
Richard spoke very gently, like a woman.&quot;Yes, you've killed me,&quot; whispered Kangaroo hoarsely.Richard's face went colder, and he tried to disengage his hand. But the
dying man clasped him with suddenly strong fingers.&quot;No, no,&quot; he said fiercely. &quot;Don't leave me now. You must stay with me.
I shan't be long - and I need you to be there.&quot;There ensued a long silence. The corpse - for such it seemed - lay
immobile and obstinate. Yet it did not relax into death. And Richard
could not go, for it held him. He sat with his wrist clasped by the
clammy thin fingers, and he could not go. Then again the dark,
mysterious, animal eyes turned up to his face.&quot;Say you love me, Lovat,&quot; came the hoarse, penetrating whisper, seeming
even more audible than a loud sound.And again Lovat's face tightened with torture.&quot;I don't understand what you mean,&quot; he said with his lips.&quot;Say you love me.&quot; The pleading, penetrating whisper seemed to sound
inside Somers' brain. He opened his mouth to say it. The sound 'I - '
came out. Then he turned his face aside and remained open-mouthed,
blank.Kangaroo's fingers were clutching his wrist, the corpse-face was eagerly
upturned to his. Somers was brought to by a sudden convulsive gripping
of the fingers around his wrist. He looked down. And when he saw the
eager, alert face, yellow, long, Jewish, and somehow ghoulish, he knew
he could not say it. He didn't love Kangaroo.&quot;No,&quot; he said, &quot;I can't say it.&quot;The sharpened face, that seemed to be leaping up to him, or leaping up
at him, like some snake striking, now seemed to sink back and go
indistinct. Only the eyes smouldered low down out of the vague yellow
mass of the face. The fingers slackened, and Richard managed to withdraw
his wrist. There was an eternity of grey silence. And for a long time
Kangaroo's yellow face seemed sunk half visible under a shadow, as a
dusky cuttle-fish under a pool, deep down. Then slowly, slowly it came
to the surface again, and Richard braced his nerves.&quot;You are a little man, a little man, to have come and killed me,&quot; came
the terrible, pathetic whisper. But Richard was afraid of the face, so
he turned aside. He thought in his mind: &quot;I haven't killed him at all.&quot;&quot;What shall you do next?&quot; came the whisper. And slowly, like a dying
snake rearing itself, the face reared itself from the bed to look at
Somers, who sat with his face averted.&quot;I am going away. I am leaving Australia.&quot;&quot;When?&quot;&quot;Next month.&quot;&quot;Where are you going?&quot;&quot;To San Francisco.&quot;&quot;America! America!&quot; came the hissing whisper. &quot;They'll kill you in
America.&quot; And the head sank back on the pillow.There was a long silence.&quot;Going to America! Going to America! After he's killed me here,&quot; came
the whispered moan.&quot;No, I haven't killed you. I'm only awfully sorry - .&quot;&quot;You have! You have!&quot; shouted Kangaroo, in the loud, bellowing voice
that frightened Richard nearly out of the window. &quot;Don't lie, you
have - .&quot;The door opened swiftly and Jack, very stern-faced, entered. He looked
at Somers in anger and contempt, then went to the bedside. The nurse
hovered in the doorway with an anxious face.&quot;What is it, 'Roo?&quot; said Jack, in a voice of infinite tenderness, that
made Somers shiver inside his skin. &quot;What's wrong, Chief, what's wrong,
dear old man?&quot;Kangaroo turned his face and looked at Somers vindictively.&quot;That man's killed me,&quot; he said in a distinct voice.&quot;No, I think you're wrong there, old man,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Mr. Somers has
never done anything like that. Let me give you a morphia injection, to
ease you, won't you?&quot;&quot;Leave me alone.&quot; Then, in a fretful vague voice: &quot;I wanted him to love
me.&quot;&quot;I'm sure he loves you, 'Roo - sure he does.&quot;&quot;Ask him.&quot;Jack looked at Richard and made him a sharp, angry sign with his brows,
as if bidding him comply.&quot;You love our one-and-only Kangaroo all right, don't you, Mr. Somers?&quot;
he said in a manly, take-it-for-granted voice.&quot;I have an immense regard for him,&quot; muttered Richard.&quot;Regard! I should think so. We've got more than regard. I love the
man - love him - love him I do. Don't I, 'Roo?&quot;But Kangaroo had sunk down, and his face had gone small, he was
oblivious again.&quot;I want nurse,&quot; he whispered.&quot;Yes, all right,&quot; said Jack, rising from bending over the sick man.
Somers had already gone to the door. The nurse entered, and the two men
found themselves in the dark passage.&quot;I shall have to be coming along, Mr. Somers, if you'll wait a minute,&quot;
said Jack.&quot;I'll wait outside,&quot; said Somers. And he went out and down to the
street, into the sun, where people were moving about. They were like
pasteboard figures shifting on a flat light.After a few minutes Jack joined him.&quot;Poor 'Roo, it's a question of days now,&quot; said Jack.&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;Hard lines, you know, when a man's in his prime and just ready to enter
into his own. Bitter hard lines.&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;That's why I think you were a bit hard on him. I DO love him myself, so
I can say so without exaggerating the fact. But if I hated the poor man
like hell, and saw him lying there in that state - why, I'd swear on
red-hot iron I loved him, I would. A man like that - a big, grand man, as
great a hero as ever lived. If a man can't speak two words of pity for a
man in his state, why, I think there's something wrong with that man.
Sorry to have to say it. But if Old Harry himself had lain there like
that and asked me to say I loved him I'd have done it. Heart-breaking,
it was. But I suppose some folks is stingy about sixpence, and others is
stingy about saying two words that would give another poor devil his
peace of mind.&quot;Richard walked on in angry silence. He hated being condemned in this
free-and-easy, rough-and-ready fashion.&quot;But I suppose chaps from the old country are more careful of what they
say - might give themselves away or something of that. We're different
over here. Kick yourself over the cliff like an old can if a mate's in
trouble and needs a helping hand, or a bit of sympathy. That's us. But I
suppose being brought up in the old country, where everybody's
frightened that somebody else is going to take advantage of him, makes
you more careful. So you're leaving Australia, are you? Mrs. Somers want
to go?&quot;&quot;I think so.&quot; Not very emphatically, perhaps.&quot;Wouldn't want to if you didn't, so to speak? Oh, Mrs. Somers is all
right. She's a fine woman, she is. I suppose I ought to say lady, but I
prefer a woman, myself, to a lady, any day. And Mrs. Somers is a woman
all over - she is that. I'm sorry for my own sake and Vicky's sake that
she's going. I'm sorry for Australia's sake. A woman like that ought to
stop in a new country like this and breed sons for us. That's what we
want.&quot;&quot;I suppose if she wanted to stop and breed sons she would,&quot; said Richard
coldly.&quot;They'd have to be your sons, that's the trouble, old man. And how's she
going to manage that if you're giving us the go-by?&quot;Richard spent the afternoon going round to the Customs House and to the
American Consulate with his passport, and visiting the shipping office
to get a plan of the boat. He went swiftly from place to place. There
were no difficulties: only both the Customs House and the Consulate
wanted photographs and Harriet's own signature. She would have to come
up personally.He wanted to go now. He wanted to go quickly. But it was no good, he
could not get off for another month, so he must preserve his soul in
patience.&quot;No,&quot; said Richard to himself, thinking of Kangaroo. &quot;I don't love
him - I detest him. He can die. I'm glad he is dying. And I don't like
Jack either. Not a bit. In fact I like nobody. I love nobody and I like
nobody, and there's the end of it, as far as I'm concerned. And if I go
round 'loving' anybody else, or even 'liking' them, I deserve a kick in
the guts like Kangaroo.&quot;And yet, when he went over to the Zoo, on the other side of the
harbour - and the warm sun shone on the rocks and the mimosa bloom, and
he saw the animals, the tenderness came back. A girl he had met, a
steamer-acquaintance, had given him a packet of little extra-strong
peppermint sweets. The animals liked them. The grizzly bear caught them
and ate them with excitement, panting after the hotness of the strong
peppermint, and opening his mouth wide, wide, for more. And one golden
brown old-man kangaroo, with his great earth-cleaving tail and his
little hanging hands, hopped up to the fence and lifted his sensitive
nose quivering, and gently nibbled the sweet between Richard's fingers.
So gently, so determinedly nibbled the sweet, but never hurting the
fingers that held it. And looking up with the big, prominent Australian
eyes, so aged in consciousness, with a fathomless, dark, fern-age
gentleness and gloom. The female wouldn't come near to eat. She only sat
up and watched, and her little one hung its tiny fawn's head and one
long ear and one fore-leg out of her pouch, in the middle of her soft,
big, grey body.Such a married couple! Two kangaroos. And the blood in Richard's veins
all gone dark with a sort of sad tenderness. The gentle kangaroos, with
their weight in heavy blood on the ground, in their great tail! It
wasn't love he felt for them, but a dark, animal tenderness, and another
sort of consciousness, deeper than human.It was a time of full moon. The moon rose about eight. She was so
strong, so exciting, that Richard went out at nine o'clock down to the
shore. The night was full of moonlight as a mother-of-pearl. He imagined
it had a warmth in it towards the moon, a moon-heat. The light on the
waves was like liquid radium swinging and slipping. Like radium, the
mystic virtue of vivid decomposition, liquid-gushing lucidity.The sea too was very full. It was nearly high tide, the waves were
rolling very tall, with light like a menace on the nape of their necks
as they bent, so brilliant. Then, when they fell, the fore-flush in a
great soft swing with incredible speed up the shore, on the darkness
soft-lighted with moon, like a rush of white serpents, then slipping
back with a hiss that fell into silence for a second, leaving the sand
of granulated silver.It was the huge rocking of this flat, hollow-foreflush moon - dim in its
hollow, that was the night to Richard. &quot;This is the night and the moon,&quot;
he said to himself. Incredibly swift and far the flat rush flew at him,
with foam like the hissing, open mouths of snakes. In the nearness a
wave broke white and high. Then, ugh! across the intervening gulf the
great lurch and swish, as the snakes rushed forward, in a hollow frost
hissing at his boots. Then failed to bite, fell back hissing softly,
leaving the belly of the sands granulated silver.A huge but a cold passion swinging back and forth. Great waves of radium
swooping with a down-curve and rushing up the shore. Then calling
themselves back again, retreating to the mass. Then rushing with
venomous radium-burning speed into the body of the land. Then recoiling
with a low swish, leaving the flushed sand naked.That was the night. Rocking with cold, radium-burning passion, swinging
and flinging itself with venomous desire. That was Richard, too, a bit
of human wispiness in thin overcoat and thick boots. The shore was
deserted all the way. Only, when he came past the creek on the sands,
rough, wild ponies looking at him, dark figures in the moon light
lifting their heads from the invisible grass of the sand, and waiting
for him to come near. When he came and talked to them they were
reassured, and put their noses down to the grass to eat a bit more in
the moon-dusk, glad a man was there.Richard rocking with the radium-urgent passion of the night: the huge,
desirous swing, the call clamour, the low hiss of retreat. The call,
call! And the answerer. Where was his answerer? There was no living
answerer. No dark-bodied, warm-bodied answerer. He knew that when he had
spoken a word to the night-half-hidden ponies with their fluffy legs. No
animate answer this time. The radium-rocking, wave-knocking night his
call and his answer both. This God without feet or knees or face. This
sluicing, knocking, urging night, heaving like a woman with unspeakable
desire, but no woman, no thighs or breast, no body. The moon, the
concave mother-of-pearl of night, the great radium-swinging, and his
little self. The call and the answer, without intermediary. Non-human
gods, non-human human being.>



&quot;What do you think of things in general?&quot; Callcott asked of Somers one
evening, a fortnight or so after their first encounter. They were
getting used to one another: and they liked one another, in a separated
sort of way. When neither of them was on the warpath, they were quite
happy together. They played chess together now and then, a wild and
haphazard game. Somers invented quite brilliant attacks, and rushed in
recklessly, occasionally wiping Jack off the board in a quarter of an
hour. But he was very careless of his defence. The other man played at
this. To give Callcott justice, he was more accustomed to draughts than
to chess, and Somers had never played draughts, not to remember. So Jack
played a draughts game, aiming at seizing odd pieces. It wasn't Somers'
idea of chess, so he wouldn't take the trouble to defend himself. His
men fell to this ambush, and he lost the game. Because at the end, when
he had only one or two pieces to attack, Jack was very clever at
cornering, having the draughts moves off by heart.&quot;But it isn't chess,&quot; protested Somers.&quot;You've lost, haven't you?&quot; said Jack.&quot;Yes. And I shall always lose that way. I can't piggle with those
draughtsmen dodges.&quot;&quot;Ah well, if I can win that way, I have to do it. I don't know the game
as well as you do,&quot; said Jack. And there was a quiet sense of victory,
&quot;done you down&quot;, in his tones. Somers required all his dignity not to
become angry. But he shrugged his shoulders.Sometimes, too, if he suggested a game, Callcott would object that he
had something he must do. Lovat took the slight rebuff without
troubling. Then an hour or an hour and a half later, Callcott would come
tapping at the door, and would enter saying:&quot;Well, if you are ready for a game.&quot;And Lovat would unsuspectingly acquiesce. But on these occasions Jack
had been silently, secretly accumulating his forces; there was a
silence, almost a stealth in his game. And at the same time his bearing
was soft, as it were submissive, and Somers was put quite off his guard.
He began to play with his usual freedom. And then Jack wiped the floor
with his little neighbour: simply wiped the floor with him, and left him
gasping. One, two, three games - it was the same every time.&quot;But I can't see the board,&quot; cried Somers, startled. &quot;I can hardly
distinguish black from white.&quot;He was really distressed. It was true what he said. He was as if
stupefied, as if some drug had been injected straight into his brain.
For his life he could not gather his consciousness together - not till he
realised the state he was in. And then he refused to try. Jack gave a
quiet little laugh. There was on his face a subtle little smile of
satisfaction. He had done his high-flying opponent down. He was the
better man.After the first evening that this had taken place, Somers was much more
wary of his neighbour, much less ready to open towards him than he had
been. HE NEVER AGAIN INVITED JACK TO A GAME OF CHESS. And when Callcott
suggested a game, Somers played, but coldly, without the recklessness
and the laughter which were the chief charm of his game. And Jack was
once more snubbed, put back into second place. Then once he was reduced,
Somers began to relent, and the old guerilla warfare started again.The moment Somers heard this question of Jack's: &quot;What do you think of
things in general?&quot; - he went on his guard.&quot;The man is trying to draw me, to fool me,&quot; he said to himself. He knew
by a certain quiet, almost sly intention in Jack's voice, and a certain
deference in his bearing. It was this false deference he was most wary
of. This was the Judas approach.&quot;How in general?&quot; he asked. &quot;Do you mean the cosmos?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Jack, foiled in his first move. He had been through the
Australian high-school course, and was accustomed to think for himself.
Over a great field he was quite indifferent to thought, and hostile to
consciousness. It seemed to him more manly to be unconscious, even
blank, to most of the great questions. But on his own subjects,
Australian politics, Japan, and machinery, he thought straight and manly
enough. And when he met a man whose being puzzled him, he wanted to get
at the bottom of that, too. He looked up at Somers with a searching,
penetrating, inimical look, that he tried to cover with an appearance of
false deference. For he was always aware of the big empty spaces of his
own consciousness; like his country, a vast empty &quot;desert&quot; at the centre
of him.&quot;No,&quot; he repeated. &quot;I mean the world - economics and politics. The
welfare of the world.&quot;&quot;It's no good asking me,&quot; said Somers. &quot;Since the war burst my bubble of
humanity I'm a pessimist, a black pessimist about the present human
world.&quot;&quot;You think it's going to the bad?&quot; said Jack, still drawing him with the
same appearance of deference, of wanting to hear.&quot;Yes, I do. Faster or slower. Probably I shall never see any great
change in my lifetime, but the tendency is all downhill, in my opinion.
But then I'm a pessimist, so you needn't bother about my opinion.&quot;Somers wanted to let it all go at that. But Callcott persisted.&quot;Do you think there'll be more wars? Do you think Germany will be in a
position to fight again very soon?&quot;&quot;Bah, you bolster up an old bogey out here. Germany is the bogey of
yesterday, not of to-morrow.&quot;&quot;She frightened us out of our sleep before,&quot; said Jack, resentful.&quot;And now, for the time being, she's done. As a war-machine she's done,
and done for ever. So much scrap-iron, her iron fist.&quot;&quot;You think so?&quot; said Jack, with all the animosity of a returned hero who
wants to think his old enemy the one and only bugbear, and who feels
quite injured if you tell him there's no more point in his old hate.&quot;That's my opinion. Of course I may be wrong.&quot;&quot;Yes, you may,&quot; said Jack.&quot;Sure,&quot; said Somers. And there was silence. This time Somers smiled a
little to himself.&quot;And what do you consider, then, is the bogey of to-morrow?&quot; asked Jack
at length, in a rather small, unwilling voice.&quot;I don't really know. What should you say?&quot;&quot;Me? I wanted to hear what you have to say.&quot;&quot;And I'd rather hear what you have to say,&quot; laughed Somers.There was a pause. Jack seemed to be pondering. At last he came out with
his bluff, manly Australian self.&quot;If you ask me,&quot; he said, &quot;I should say that Labour is the bogey you
speak of.&quot;Again Somers knew that this was a draw. &quot;He wants to find out if I'm
socialist or anti,&quot; he thought to himself.&quot;You think Labour is a menace to society?&quot; he returned.&quot;Well,&quot; Jack hedged. &quot;I won't say that Labour is the menace, exactly.
Perhaps the state of affairs forces Labour to be the menace.&quot;&quot;Oh, quite. But what's the state of affairs?&quot;&quot;That's what nobody seems to know.&quot;&quot;So it's quite safe to lay the blame on,&quot; laughed Somers. He looked with
real dislike at the other man, who sat silent and piqued and rather
diminished: &quot;Coming here just to draw me and get to know what's inside
me!&quot; he said to himself angrily. And he would carry the conversation no
further. He would not even offer Jack a whisky and soda. &quot;No,&quot; he
thought to himself. &quot;If he trespasses on my hospitality, coming creeping
in here, into my house, just to draw me and get the better of me,
underhandedly, then I'll pour no drink for him. He can go back to where
he came from.&quot; But Somers was mistaken. He only didn't understand Jack's
way of leaving seven-tenths of himself out of any intercourse. Richard
wanted the whole man there, openly. And Jack wanted his own way, of
seven-tenths left out.So that after a while Jack rose slowly, saying:&quot;Well, I'll be turning in. It's work to-morrow for some of us.&quot;&quot;If we're lucky enough to have jobs,&quot; laughed Somers.&quot;Or luckier still, to have the money so that we don't need a job,&quot;
returned Jack.&quot;Think how bored most folks would be on a little money and no settled
occupation,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Yes, I might be myself,&quot; said Jack, honestly admitting it, and at the
same time slightly despising the man who had no job, and therefore no
significance in life.&quot;Why, of course.&quot;When Callcott came over to Torestin, either Victoria came with him, or
she invited Harriet across to Wyewurk. Wyewurk was the name of Jack's
bungalow. It had been built by a man who had inherited from an aunt a
modest income, and who had written thus permanently his retort against
society on his door.&quot;Wyewurk?&quot; said Jack. &quot;Because you've jolly well got to.&quot;The neighbours nearly always spoke of their respective homes by their
elegant names. &quot;Won't Mrs. Somers go across to Wyewurk, Vicky said.
She's making a blouse or something, sewing some old bits of rag
together - or new bits - and I expect she'll need a pageful of advice
about it.&quot; This was what Jack had said. Harriet had gone with apparent
alacrity, but with real resentment. She had never in all her life had
&quot;neighbours&quot;, and she didn't know what neighbouring really meant. She
didn't care for it, on trial. Not after she and Victoria had said and
heard most of the things they wanted to say and hear. But they liked
each other also. And though Victoria could be a terribly venomous little
cat, once she unsheathed her claws and became rather &quot;common&quot;, still, so
long as her claws were sheathed her paws were quite velvety and pretty,
she was winsome and charming to Harriet, a bit deferential before her,
which flattered the other woman. And then, lastly, Victoria had quite a
decent piano, and played nicely, whereas Harriet had a good voice, and
played badly. So that often, as the two men played chess or had one of
their famous encounters, they would hear Harriet's strong, clear voice
singing Schubert or Schumann or French or English folk songs, whilst
Victoria played. And both women were happy, because though Victoria was
fond of music and had an instinct for it, her knowledge of songs was
slight, and to be learning these old English and old French melodies, as
well as the German and the Italian songs, was a real adventure and a
pleasure to her.They were still singing when Jack returned.&quot;Still at it!&quot; he said manfully, from the background chewing his little
pipe.Harriet looked round. She was just finishing the joyous moan of Plaisir
d'amour, a song she loved because it tickled her so. &quot;Dure toute la
vie - i - i - ie - i - e,&quot; she sang the concluding words at him, laughing in
his face.&quot;You're back early,&quot; she said.&quot;Felt a mental twilight coming on,&quot; he said, &quot;so thought we'd better
close down for the night.&quot;Harriet divined that, to use her expression, Somers had been
&quot;disagreeable to him&quot;.&quot;Don't you sing?&quot; she cried.&quot;Me! Have you ever heard a cow at a gate when she wants to come in and
be milked?&quot;&quot;Oh, he does!&quot; cried Victoria. &quot;He sang a duet at the Harbour Lights
Concert.&quot;&quot;There!&quot; cried Harriet. &quot;How exciting! What duet did he sing?&quot;&quot;Larboard Watch ahoy!&quot;&quot;Oh! Oh! I know that,&quot; cried Harriet remembering a farmer friend of
Somers', who had initiated her into the thrilling harmony, down in
Cornwall.&quot;There wasn't a soul left in the hall, when we'd finished, except
Victoria and the other chap's wife,&quot; said Jack.&quot;Oh, what a fib. They applauded like anything, and made you give an
encore.&quot;&quot;Ay, and we didn't know another bally duet between us, so we had to sing
Larboard Watch over again. It was Larboard Alarum Clock by the time we
got to the end of it, it went off with such a rattle.&quot;&quot;Oh, do let us sing it,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;You must help me when I go
wrong, because I don't know it well.&quot;&quot;What part do you want to sing?&quot; said Jack.&quot;Oh, I sing the first part.&quot;&quot;Nay,&quot; said Jack. &quot;I sing that part myself. I'm a high tenor, I am, once
I get the wind up.&quot;&quot;I couldn't possibly sing the alto,&quot; said Harriet.&quot;Oh, Jack, do sing the alto,&quot; said Victoria. &quot;Go on, do! I'll help you.&quot;&quot;Oh well, if you'll go bail for me, I don't care what I do,&quot; said Jack.And very shortly Somers heard a gorgeous uproar in Wyewurk. Harriet
breaking down occasionally and being picked up. She insisted on keeping
on till she had it perfect, and the other two banged and warbled away
with no signs of fatigue. So that they were still hailing the Larboard
Watch Ahoy when the clock struck eleven.Then when silence did ensue for a moment, Mrs. Callcott came flying over
to Torestin.&quot;Oh, Mr. Somers, won't you come and have a drink with Jack? Mrs. Somers
is having a glass of hop bitters.&quot;When Somers entered the living room of Wyewurk, Jack looked up at him
with a smile and a glow in his dark eyes, almost like love.&quot;Beer?&quot; he said.&quot;What's the alternative?&quot;&quot;Nothing but gas-water.&quot;&quot;Then beer.&quot;Harriet and Victoria were still at the piano, excitedly talking songs.
Harriet was teaching Victoria to pronounce the words of a Schubert song:
for there was still one person in the world unacquainted with: &quot;Du bist
wie eine Blume.&quot; And Victoria was singing it in a wavering, shy little
voice.&quot;Let's drink our beer by the kitchen fire,&quot; said Jack. &quot;Then we shall be
able to hear ourselves speak, which is more than we can do in this
aviary.&quot;Somers solemnly followed into the tiny kitchen, and they sat in front of
the still hot stove.&quot;The women will keep up the throat-stretching for quite a time yet,&quot;
said Jack.&quot;If we let them. It's getting late.&quot;&quot;Oh, I've just started my second awakening - feel as sharp as a new
tin-tack.&quot;&quot;Talking about pessimism,&quot; he resumed after a pause. &quot;There's some of us
here that feels things are pretty shaky, you know.&quot; He spoke in a
subdued, important sort of voice.&quot;What is shaky - Australian finance?&quot;&quot;Ay, Australian everything.&quot;&quot;Well, it's pretty much the same in every country. Where there's such a
lot of black smoke there's not a very big fire. The world's been going
to the dogs ever since it started to toddle, apparently.&quot;&quot;Ay, I suppose it has. But it'll get there one day. At least Australia
will.&quot;&quot;What kind of dogs?&quot;&quot;Maybe financial smash, and then hell to pay all round. Maybe, you know.
We've got to think about it.&quot;Somers watched him for some moments with serious eyes. Jack seemed as if
he were a little bit drunk. Yet he had only drunk a glass of lager beer.
He wasn't drunk. But his face had changed, it had a kind of eagerness,
and his eyes glowed big. Strange, he seemed, as if in a slight ecstasy.&quot;It may be,&quot; said Somers slowly. &quot;I am neither a financier nor a
politician. It seems as if the next thing to come a cropper were
capital: now there are no more kings to speak of. It may be the middle
classes are coming smash - which is the same thing as finance - as
capital. But also it may not be. I've given up trying to know.&quot;&quot;What will be will be, eh,&quot; said Jack with a smile.&quot;I suppose so, in this matter.&quot;&quot;Ay, but, look here, I believe it's right what you say. The middle
classes ARE coming down. What do they sit on? - they sit on money, on
capital. And this country is as good as bankrupt, so then what have they
left to stand on?&quot;&quot;They say most countries are really bankrupt. But if they agree among
themselves to carry on, the word doesn't amount to much.&quot;&quot;Oh, but it does. It amounts to a hell of a lot, here in this country.
If it ever came to the push, and the state was bankrupt, there'd be no
holding New South Wales in.&quot;&quot;The state never will be bankrupt.&quot;&quot;Won't it? Won't there be a financial smash, a proper cave-in, before
we're much older? Won't there? We'll see. But look here, do you care if
there is?&quot;&quot;I don't know what it means, so I can't say. Theoretically I don't mind
a bit if international finance goes bust: if it can go bust.&quot;&quot;Never mind about theoretically. You'd like to see the power of money,
the power of capital, BROKE. Would you or wouldn't you?&quot;Somers watched the excited, handsome face opposite him, and answered
slowly:&quot;Theoretically, yes. Actually, I really don't know.&quot;&quot;Oh to hell with your theoretically. Drown it. Speak like a man with
some feeling in your guts. You either would or wouldn't. Don't leave
your shirt-tail hanging out, with a theoretically. Would you or wouldn't
you?&quot;Somers laughed.&quot;Why, yes, I would,&quot; he said, &quot;and be damned to everything.&quot;&quot;Shake,&quot; cried Jack, stretching over. And he took Somers' small hand
between both his own. &quot;I knew,&quot; he said in a broken voice, &quot;that we was
mates.&quot;Somers was rather bewildered.&quot;But you know,&quot; he said, &quot;I never take any part in politics at all. They
aren't my affair.&quot;&quot;They're not! They're not! You're quite right. You're quite right, you
are. You're a damned sight too good to be mixing up in any dirty
politics. But all I want is that your feelings should be the same as
mine, and they are, thank my stars, they are.&quot;By this time Somers was almost scared.&quot;But why should you care?&quot; he said, with some reserve. The other however
did not heed him.&quot;You're not with the middle classes, as you call them, the money-men, as
I call them, and I know you're not. And if you're not with them you're
against them.&quot;&quot;My father was a working-man. I come from the working people. My
sympathy is with them, when it's with anybody, I assure you.&quot;Jack stared at Somers wide-eyed, a smile gathering round his mouth.&quot;Your father was a working-man, was he? Is that really so? Well, that IS
a surprise! And yet,&quot; he changed his tone, &quot;no, it isn't. I might have
known. Of course I might. How should I have felt for you as I did, the
very first minute I saw you, if it hadn't been so. Of course you're one
of us: same flesh and blood, same clay. Only you've had the advantages
of a money-man. But you've stuck true to your flesh and blood, which is
what most of them don't do. They turn into so much dirt, like the
washings in the pan, a lot of dirt to a very little gold. Well, well,
and your father was a working man! And you now being as you are!
Wonderful what we may be, isn't it?&quot;&quot;It is indeed,&quot; said Somers, who was infinitely more amazed at the
present Jack, than ever Jack could be at him.&quot;Well, well, that brings us a great deal nearer than ever, that does,&quot;
said Callcott, looking at Somers with glowing, smiling eyes which the
other man could not quite understand, eyes with something desirous, and
something perhaps fanatical in them. Somers could not understand. As for
the being brought nearer to Callcott, that was apparently entirely a
matter of Jack's own feeling. Somers himself had never felt more alone
and far off. Yet he trembled at the other man's strange fervour. He
vibrated helplessly in some sort of troubled response.The vibration from the two men had by this time quite penetrated into
the other room and into the consciousness of the two women. Harriet came
in all wondering and full of alert curiosity. She looked from one to the
other, saw the eyes of both men shining, saw the puzzled, slightly
scared look on her husband's face, and the glowing handsomeness on
Jack's, and she wondered more than ever.&quot;What are you two men talking about?&quot; she asked pointedly. &quot;You look
very much moved about something.&quot;&quot;Moved!&quot; laughed Jack, &quot;We're doing fifty miles an hour, and not turning
a hair.&quot;&quot;I'm glad I'm not going with you then,&quot; said Harriet. &quot;It's much too
late at night for me for that sort of thing.&quot;Victoria went over to her husband and stood close at his side, ruffling
up his brown, short, crisp, bright hair.&quot;Doesn't he talk nonsense, Mrs. Somers, doesn't he talk nonsense,&quot; the
young wife crooned, in her singing, contralto voice, as she looked down
at him.Harriet started at the sudden revelation of palpitating intimacy. She
wanted to go away, quick. So did Somers. But neither Jack nor Victoria
wanted them to go.Jack was looking up at Victoria with a curious smile, touched with a
leer. It gave his face, his rather long, clean-shaven face with the
thick eyebrows, most extraordinarily the look of an old mask. One of
those old Greek masks that give a fixed mockery to every feeling.
Leering up at his young wife with the hearty leer of a player masked as
a faun that is at home, on its own ground. Both Harriet and Somers felt
amazed, as if they had strayed into the wrong wood.&quot;You talk all the sense, don't you, kiddie?&quot; he said, with a strong
Australian accent again. And as he spoke with his face upturned to her,
his Adam's apple moved in his strong white throat as if it chuckled.&quot;Of course I do,&quot; she crooned in her mocking, crooning contralto. &quot;Of
course I do.&quot;He put his arm round her hips. They continued to look into each other's
faces.&quot;It's awfully late. We shall have simply to fly to bed. I'm so sleepy
now. Good-night. Thank you so much for the singing. I enjoyed it
awfully. Good-night!&quot;Victoria looked up with a brightly-flushed face, entirely unashamed, her
eyes glowing like an animal's. Jack relaxed his grip of her, but did not
rise. He looked at the Somers pair with eyes gone dusky, as if unseeing,
and the mask-like smile lingering on his face like the reflection from
some fire, curiously natural, not even grotesque.&quot;Find your way across all right?&quot; he said. &quot;Good-night! Good-night!&quot; But
he was as unaware of them, actually, as if they did not exist within his
ken.&quot;Well,&quot; said Harriet, as they closed the door of Torestin. &quot;I think they
might have waited just TWO minutes before they started their love
making. After all, one doesn't want to be implicated, does one?&quot;&quot;One emphatically doesn't,&quot; said Somers.&quot;Really, it was as if he'd got his arm round all the four of us!
Horrid!&quot; said Harriet resentfully.&quot;He felt he had, I'm sure,&quot; said Somers.It was a period when Sydney was again suffering from a bubonic plague
scare: a very mild scare, some fifteen cases to a million people,
according to the newspapers. But the town was placarded with notices
&quot;Keep your town clean,&quot; and there was a stall in Martin Place where you
could write your name down and become a member of a cleanliness league,
or something to that effect.The battle was against rats, fleas, and dirt. The plague affects rats
first, said the notices, then fleas, and then man. All citizens were
called upon to wage war with the vermin mentioned. Alas, there was no
need to call on Somers to wage the war. The first morning they had
awakened in Torestin, it was to a slight uneasy feeling of
uncleanliness. Harriet, who hated the thought of contamination, found
the apples gnawed, when she went to take one to eat before breakfast.
And rat dirts, she said, everywhere.Then had started such a cleaning, such a scouring, such a stopping of
holes, as Torestin had never known. Somers sourly re-christened the
house Toscrubin. And after that, every night he had the joyful business
of setting two rat-traps, those traps with the powerful fly-back
springs. Which springs were a holy terror to him, for he knew his
fingers would break like pipe-stems if the spring flew back on them. And
almost every morning he had the nauseous satisfaction of finding a rat
pinned by its nose in the trap, its eyes bulging out, a blot of deep red
blood just near. Sometimes two rats. They were not really ugly, save for
their tails. Smallish rats, perhaps only half grown, and with black,
silky fur. Not like the brown rats he had known in the English country.But big or little, ugly or not ugly, they were very objectionable to
him, and he hated to have to start the day by casting one or more
corpses gingerly, by the tip of the tail, into the garbage tin. He
railed against the practice of throwing cans and everything
promiscuously on to any bit of waste ground. It seemed to his embittered
fancy that Sydney harbour, and all the coast of New South Wales, was
moving with this pest. It reminded him of the land of Egypt, under the
hand of the Lord: plagues of mice and rats and rabbits and snails and
all manner of crawling things. And then he would say: &quot;Perhaps it must
be so in a new country.&quot; For all that, the words &quot;new country&quot; had
become like acid between his teeth. He was always recalling what
Flinders Petrie says somewhere: &quot;A colony is no younger than the parent
country.&quot; Perhaps it is even older, one step further gone.This evening - or rather midnight - he went to the back kitchen to put
every scrap of any sort of food beyond rat-reach, and to bait the two
traps with bits of cheese-rind. Then he bent back the two murderous
springs, and the traps were ready. He washed his hands hard from the
contamination of them. Then he went into the garden, even climbed the
tub-like summer house, to have a last look at the world. There was a big
slip of very bright moon risen, and the harbour was faintly distinct.Now that night had fallen, the wind was from the land, and cold. He
turned to go indoors. And as he did so he heard a motor-car run quickly
along the road, and saw the bright lights come to a stop at the gate of
Wyewurk. Wyewurk was in darkness already. But a man left the car and
came along the path to the house, giving a peculiar whistle as he did
so. He went round to the back door and knocked sharply, once, twice, in
a peculiar way. Then he whistled and knocked again. After which he must
have heard an answer, for he waited quietly.In a few minutes more the lights switched on and the door opened; Jack
was there in his pyjamas.&quot;That you, Jaz boy?&quot; he said in a quiet tone. &quot;Why the blazes didn't you
come half an hour sooner, or half a minute later? You got me just as I'd
taken the jump, and I fell all over the bloomin' hedge. Come in. You'll
make a nervous wreck of me between you.&quot;The figure entered. It was William James, the brother-in-law. Somers
heard him go again in about ten minutes. But Harriet did not notice.Lady Beveridge loved humanity, and come what might, she would
continue to love it.  Nay, in the human sense, she would love her
enemies.  Not the criminals among the enemy, the men who committed
atrocities.  But the men who were enemies through no choice of
their own.  She would be swept into no general hate.Somebody had called her the soul of England.  It was not ill said,
though she was half Irish.  But of an old, aristocratic, loyal
family famous for its brilliant men.  And she, Lady Beveridge, had
for years as much influence on the tone of English politics as any
individual alive.  The close friend of the real leaders in the
House of Lords and in the Cabinet, she was content that the men
should act, so long as they breathed from her as from the rose of
life the pure fragrance of truth and genuine love.  She had no
misgiving regarding her own spirit.She, she would never lower her delicate silken flag.  For instance,
throughout all the agony of the war she never forgot the enemy
prisoners; she was determined to do her best for them.  During the
first years she still had influence.  But during the last years of
the war power slipped out of the hands of her and her sort, and she
found she could do nothing any more: almost nothing.  Then it
seemed as if the many swords had gone home into the heart of this
little, unyielding Mater Dolorosa.  The new generation jeered at
her.  She was a shabby, old-fashioned little aristocrat, and her
drawing-room was out of date.But we anticipate.  The years 1916 and 1917 were the years when the
old spirit died for ever in England.  But Lady Beveridge struggled
on.  She was being beaten.It was in the winter of 1917 - or in the late autumn.  She had been
for a fortnight sick, stricken, paralysed by the fearful death of
her youngest boy.  She felt she MUST give in, and just die.  And
then she remembered how many others were lying in agony.So she rose, trembling, frail, to pay a visit to the hospital where
lay the enemy sick and wounded, near London.  Countess Beveridge
was still a privileged woman.  Society was beginning to jeer at
this little, worn bird of an out-of-date righteousness and
aesthetic.  But they dared not think ill of her.She ordered the car and went alone.  The Earl, her husband, had
taken his gloom to Scotland.  So, on a sunny, wan November morning
Lady Beveridge descended at the hospital, Hurst Place.  The guard
knew her, and saluted as she passed.  Ah, she was used to such deep
respect!  It was strange that she felt it so bitterly, when the
respect became shallower.  But she did.  It was the beginning of
the end to her.The matron went with her into the ward.  Alas, the beds were all
full, and men were even lying on pallets on the floor.  There was a
desperate, crowded dreariness and helplessness in the place: as if
nobody wanted to make a sound or utter a word.  Many of the men
were haggard and unshaven, one was delirious, and talking fitfully
in the Saxon dialect.  It went to Lady Beveridge's heart.  She had
been educated in Dresden, and had had many dear friendships in the
city.  Her children also had been educated there.  She heard the
Saxon dialect with pain.She was a little, frail, bird-like woman, elegant, but with that
touch of the blue-stocking of the nineties which was unmistakable.
She fluttered delicately from bed to bed, speaking in perfect
German, but with a thin, English intonation: and always asking if
there was anything she could do.  The men were mostly officers and
gentlemen.  They made little requests which she wrote down in a
book.  Her long, pale, rather worn face, and her nervous little
gestures somehow inspired confidence.One man lay quite still, with his eyes shut.  He had a black beard.
His face was rather small and sallow.  He might be dead.  Lady
Beveridge looked at him earnestly, and fear came into her face.'Why, Count Dionys!' she said, fluttered.  'Are you asleep?'It was Count Johann Dionys Psanek, a Bohemian.  She had known
him when he was a boy, and only in the spring of 1914 he and his
wife had stayed with Lady Beveridge in her country house in
Leicestershire.His black eyes opened: large, black, unseeing eyes, with curved
black lashes.  He was a small man, small as a boy, and his face too
was rather small.  But all the lines were fine, as if they had been
fired with a keen male energy.  Now the yellowish swarthy paste of
his flesh seemed dead, and the fine black brows seemed drawn on the
face of one dead.  The eyes, however, were alive: but only just
alive, unseeing and unknowing.'You know me, Count Dionys?  You know me, don't you?' said Lady
Beveridge, bending forward over the bed.There was no reply for some time.  Then the black eyes gathered a
look of recognition, and there came the ghost of a polite smile.'Lady Beveridge.'  The lips formed the words.  There was
practically no sound.'I am so glad you can recognize me.  And I am so sorry you are
hurt.  I am so sorry.'The black eyes watched her from that terrible remoteness of death,
without changing.'There is nothing I can do for you?  Nothing at all?' she said,
always speaking German.And after a time, and from a distance, came the answer from his
eyes, a look of weariness, of refusal, and a wish to be left alone;
he was unable to strain himself into consciousness.  His eyelids
dropped.'I am so sorry,' she said.  'If ever there is anything I can do - 'The eyes opened again, looking at her.  He seemed at last to hear,
and it was as if his eyes made the last weary gesture of a polite
bow.  Then slowly his eyelids closed again.Poor Lady Beveridge felt another sword-thrust of sorrow in her
heart, as she stood looking down at the motionless face, and at the
black fine beard.  The black hairs came out of his skin thin and
fine, not very close together.  A queer, dark, aboriginal little
face he had, with a fine little nose: not an Aryan, surely.  And he
was going to die.He had a bullet through the upper part of his chest, and another
bullet had broken one of his ribs.  He had been in hospital five
days.Lady Beveridge asked the matron to ring her up if anything
happened.  Then she drove away, saddened.  Instead of going to
Beveridge House, she went to her daughter's flat near the park - 
near Hyde Park.  Lady Daphne was poor.  She had married a commoner,
son of one of the most famous politicians in England, but a man
with no money.  And Earl Beveridge had wasted most of the large
fortune that had come to him, so that the daughter had very little,
comparatively.Lady Beveridge suffered, going in the narrow doorway into the
rather ugly flat.  Lady Daphne was sitting by the electric fire in
the small yellow drawing-room, talking to a visitor.  She rose at
once, seeing her little mother.'Why, mother, ought you to be out?  I'm sure not.''Yes, Daphne darling.  Of course I ought to be out.''How are you?'  The daughter's voice was slow and sonorous,
protective, sad.  Lady Daphne was tall, only twenty-five years old.
She had been one of the beauties, when the war broke out, and her
father had hoped she would make a splendid match.  Truly, she had
married fame: but without money.  Now, sorrow, pain, thwarted
passion had done her great damage.  Her husband was missing in the
East.  Her baby had been born dead.  Her two darling brothers were
dead.  And she was ill, always ill.A tall, beautifully-built girl, she had the fine stature of her
father.  Her shoulders were still straight.  But how thin her white
throat!  She wore a simple black frock stitched with coloured wool
round the top, and held in a loose coloured girdle: otherwise no
ornaments.  And her face was lovely, fair, with a soft exotic white
complexion and delicate pink cheeks.  Her hair was soft and heavy,
of a lovely pallid gold colour, ash-blond.  Her hair, her
complexion were so perfectly cared for as to be almost artificial,
like a hot-house flower.But alas, her beauty was a failure.  She was threatened with
phthisis, and was far too thin.  Her eyes were the saddest part of
her.  They had slightly reddened rims, nerve-worn, with heavy,
veined lids that seemed as if they did not want to keep up.  The
eyes themselves were large and of a beautiful green-blue colour.
But they were full, languid, almost glaucous.Standing as she was, a tall, finely-built girl, looking down with
affectionate care on her mother, she filled the heart with ashes.
The little pathetic mother, so wonderful in her way, was not really
to be pitied for all her sorrow.  Her life was in her sorrows, and
her efforts on behalf of the sorrows of others.  But Daphne was not
born for grief and philanthropy.  With her splendid frame, and her
lovely, long, strong legs, she was Artemis or Atalanta rather than
Daphne.  There was a certain width of brow and even of chin that
spoke a strong, reckless nature, and the curious, distraught slant
of her eyes told of a wild energy dammed up inside her.That was what ailed her: her own wild energy.  She had it from her
father, and from her father's desperate race.  The earldom had
begun with a riotous, dare-devil border soldier, and this was the
blood that flowed on.  And alas, what was to be done with it?Daphne had married an adorable husband: truly an adorable husband.
Whereas she needed a dare-devil.  But in her MIND she hated all
dare-devils: she had been brought up by her mother to admire only
the good.So, her reckless, anti-philanthropic passion could find no outlet - 
and SHOULD find no outlet, she thought.  So her own blood turned
against her, beat on her own nerves, and destroyed her.  It was
nothing but frustration and anger which made her ill, and made the
doctors fear consumption.  There it was, drawn on her rather wide
mouth: frustration, anger, bitterness.  There it was the same in
the roll of her green-blue eyes, a slanting, averted look: the same
anger furtively turning back on itself.  This anger reddened her
eyes and shattered her nerves.  And yet her whole will was fixed in
her adoption of her mother's creed, and in condemnation of her
handsome, proud, brutal father, who had made so much misery in the
family.  Yes, her will was fixed in the determination that life
should be gentle and good and benevolent.  Whereas her blood was
reckless, the blood of daredevils.  Her will was the stronger of
the two.  But her blood had its revenge on her.  So it is with
strong natures today: shattered from the inside.'You have no news, darling?' asked the mother.'No.  My father-in-law had information that British prisoners had
been brought into Hasrun, and that details would be forwarded by
the Turks.  And there was a rumour from some Arab prisoners that
Basil was one of the British brought in wounded.''When did you hear this?''Primrose came in this morning.''Then we can hope, dear.''Yes.'Never was anything more dull and bitter than Daphne's affirmative
of hope.  Hope had become almost a curse to her.  She wished there
need be no such thing.  Ha, the torment of hoping, and the INSULT
to one's soul.  Like the importunate widow dunning for her deserts.
Why could it not all be just clean disaster, and have done with it?
This dilly-dallying with despair was worse than despair.  She had
hoped so much: ah, for her darling brothers she had hoped with such
anguish.  And the two she loved best were dead.  So were most
others she had hoped for, dead.  Only this uncertainty about her
husband still rankling.'You feel better, dear?' said the little, unquenched mother.'Rather better,' came the resentful answer.'And your night?''No better.'There was a pause.'You are coming to lunch with me, Daphne darling?''No, mother dear.  I promised to lunch at the Howards with
Primrose.  But I needn't go for a quarter of an hour.  Do sit
down.'Both women seated themselves near the electric fire.  There was
that bitter pause, neither knowing what to say.  Then Daphne roused
herself to look at her mother.'Are you sure you were fit to go out?' she said.  'What took you
out so suddenly?''I went to Hurst Place, dear.  I had the men on my mind, after the
way the newspapers had been talking.''Why ever do you read the newspapers!' blurted Daphne, with a
certain burning, acid anger.  'Well,' she said, more composed.
'And do you feel better now you've been?''So many people suffer besides ourselves, darling.''I know they do.  Makes it all the worse.  It wouldn't matter if it
were only just us.  At least, it would matter, but one could bear
it more easily.  To be just one of a crowd all in the same state.''And some even worse, dear.''Oh, quite!  And the worse it is for all, the worse it is for one.''Is that so, darling?  Try not to see too darkly.  I feel if I can
give just a little bit of myself to help the others - you know - it
alleviates me.  I feel that what I can give to the men lying there,
Daphne, I give to my own boys.  I can only help them now through
helping others.  But I can still do that, Daphne, my girl.'And the mother put her little white hand into the long, white cold
hand of her daughter.  Tears came to Daphne's eyes, and a fearful
stony grimace to her mouth.'It's so wonderful of you that you can feel like that,' she said.'But you feel the same, my love.  I know you do.''No, I don't.  Everyone I see suffering these same awful things, it
makes me wish more for the end of the world.  And I quite see that
the world won't end - ''But it will get better, dear.  This time it's like a great
sickness - like a terrible pneumonia tearing the breast of the
world.''Do you believe it will get better?  I don't.''It will get better.  Of course it will get better.  It is perverse
to think otherwise, Daphne.  Remember what HAS been before, even in
Europe.  Ah, Daphne, we must take a bigger view.''Yes, I suppose we must.'The daughter spoke rapidly, from the lips, in a resonant,
monotonous tone.  The mother spoke from the heart.'And Daphne, I found an old friend among the men at Hurst Place.''Who?''Little Count Dionys.  You remember him?''Quite.  What's wrong?''Wounded rather badly - through the chest.  So ill.''Did you speak to him?''Yes.  I recognized him in spite of his beard.''Beard!''Yes - a black beard.  I suppose he could not be shaven.  It seems
strange that he is still alive, poor man.''Why strange?  He isn't old.  How old is he?''Between thirty and forty.  But so ill, so wounded, Daphne.  And so
small.  So small, so sallow - smorto, you know the Italian word.
The way dark people look.  There is something so distressing in
it.''Does he look VERY small now - uncanny?' asked the daughter.'No, not uncanny.  Something of the terrible far-awayness of a
child that is very ill and can't tell you what hurts it.  Poor
Count Dionys, Daphne.  I didn't know, dear, that his eyes were so
black, and his lashes so curved and long.  I had never thought of
him as beautiful.''Nor I.  Only a little comical.  Such a dapper little man.''Yes.  And yet now, Daphne, there is something remote and in a sad
way heroic in his dark face.  Something primitive.''What did he say to you?''He couldn't speak to me.  Only with his lips, just my name.''So bad as that?''Oh yes.  They are afraid he will die.''Poor Count Dionys.  I liked him.  He was a bit like a monkey, but
he had his points.  He gave me a thimble on my seventeenth
birthday.  Such an amusing thimble.''I remember, dear.''Unpleasant wife, though.  Wonder if he minds dying far away from
her.  Wonder if she knows.''I think not.  They didn't even know his name properly.  Only that
he was a colonel of such and such a regiment.''Fourth Cavalry,' said Daphne.  'Poor Count Dionys.  Such a lovely
name, I always thought: Count Johann Dionys Psanek.  Extraordinary
dandy he was.  And an amazingly good dancer, small, yet electric.
Wonder if he minds dying.''He was so full of life, in his own little animal way.  They say
small people are always conceited.  But he doesn't look conceited
now, dear.  Something ages old in his face - and, yes, a certain
beauty, Daphne.''You mean long lashes.''No.  So still, so solitary - and ages old, in his race.  I suppose
he must belong to one of those curious little aboriginal races of
Central Europe.  I felt quite new beside him.''How nice of you,' said Daphne.Nevertheless, next day Daphne telephoned to Hurst Place to ask for
news of him.  He was about the same.  She telephoned every day.
Then she was told he was a little stronger.  The day she received
the message that her husband was wounded and a prisoner in Turkey,
and that his wounds were healing, she forgot to telephone for news
of the little enemy Count.  And the following day she telephoned
that she was coming to the hospital to see him.He was awake, more restless, more in physical excitement.  They
could see the nausea of pain round his nose.  His face seemed to
Daphne curiously hidden behind the black beard, which nevertheless
was thin, each hair coming thin and fine, singly, from the sallow,
slightly translucent skin.  In the same way his moustache made a
thin black line round his mouth.  His eyes were wide open, very
black, and of no legible expression.  He watched the two women
coming down the crowded, dreary room, as if he did not see them.
His eyes seemed too wide.It was a cold day, and Daphne was huddled in a black sealskin coat
with a skunk collar pulled up to her ears, and a dull gold cap with
wings pulled down on her brow.  Lady Beveridge wore her sable coat,
and had that odd, untidy elegance which was natural to her, rather
like a ruffled chicken.Daphne was upset by the hospital.  She looked from right to left in
spite of herself, and everything gave her a dull feeling of horror:
the terror of these sick, wounded enemy men.  She loomed tall and
obtrusive in her furs by the bed, her little mother at her side.'I hope you don't mind my coming!' she said in German to the sick
man.  Her tongue felt rusty, speaking the language.'Who is it then?' he asked.'It is my daughter, Lady Daphne.  You remembered ME, Lady
Beveridge!  This is my daughter, whom you knew in Saxony.  She was
so sorry to hear you were wounded.'The black eyes rested on the little lady.  Then they returned to
the looming figure of Daphne.  And a certain fear grew on the low,
sick brow.  It was evident the presence loomed and frightened him.
He turned his face aside.  Daphne noticed how his fine black hair
grew uncut over his small, animal ears.'You don't remember me, Count Dionys?' she said dully.'Yes,' he said.  But he kept his face averted.She stood there feeling confused and miserable, as if she had made
a faux pas in coming.'Would you rather be left alone?' she said.  'I'm sorry.'Her voice was monotonous.  She felt suddenly stifled in her closed
furs, and threw her coat open, showing her thin white throat and
plain black slip dress on her flat breast.  He turned again
unwillingly to look at her.  He looked at her as if she were some
strange creature standing near him.'Good-bye,' she said.  'Do get better.'She was looking at him with a queer, slanting, downward look of her
heavy eyes as she turned away.  She was still a little red round
the eyes, with nervous exhaustion.'You are so tall,' he said, still frightened.'I was always tall,' she replied, turning half to him again.'And I, small,' he said.'I am so glad you are getting better,' she said.'I am not glad,' he said.'Why?  I'm sure you are.  Just as we are glad because we want you
to get better.''Thank you,' he said.  'I have wished to die.''Don't do that, Count Dionys.  Do get better,' she said, in the
rather deep, laconic manner of her girlhood.  He looked at her with
a farther look of recognition.  But his short, rather pointed nose
was lifted with the disgust and weariness of pain, his brows were
tense.  He watched her with that curious flame of suffering which
is forced to give a little outside attention, but which speaks only
to itself.'Why did they not let me die?' he said.  'I wanted death now.''No,' she said.  'You mustn't.  You must live.  If we CAN live we
must.''I wanted death,' he said.'Ah, well,' she said, 'even death we can't have when we want it, or
when we think we want it.''That is true,' he said, watching her with the same wide black
eyes.  'Please to sit down.  You are too tall as you stand.'It was evident he was a little frightened still by her looming,
overhanging figure.'I am sorry I am too tall,' she said, taking a chair which a man-
nurse had brought her.  Lady Beveridge had gone away to speak with
the men.  Daphne sat down, not knowing what to say further.  The
pitch-black look in the Count's wide eyes puzzled her.'Why do you come here?  Why does your lady mother come?' he said.'To see if we can do anything,' she answered.'When I am well, I will thank your ladyship.''All right,' she replied.  'When you are well I will let my lord
the Count thank me.  Please do get well.''We are enemies,' he said.'Who?  You and I and my mother?''Are we not?  The most difficult thing is to be sure of anything.
If they had let me die!''That is at least ungrateful, Count Dionys.''Lady Daphne!  Yes.  Lady Daphne!  Beautiful, the name is.  You are
always called Lady Daphne?  I remember you were so bright a
maiden.''More or less,' she said, answering his question.'Ach!  We should all have new names now.  I thought of a name for
myself, but I have forgotten it.  No longer Johann Dionys.  That is
shot away.  I am Karl or Wilhelm or Ernst or Georg.  Those are
names I hate.  Do you hate them?''I don't like them - but I don't hate them.  And you mustn't leave
off being Count Johann Dionys.  If you do I shall have to leave off
being Daphne.  I like your name so much.''Lady Daphne!  Lady Daphne!' he repeated.  'Yes, it rings well, it
sounds beautiful to me.  I think I talk foolishly.  I hear myself
talking foolishly to you.'  He looked at her anxiously.'Not at all,' she said.'Ach!  I have a head on my shoulders that is like a child's
windmill, and I can't prevent its making foolish words.  Please to
go away, not to hear me.  I can hear myself.''Can't I do anything for you?' she asked.'No, no!  No, no!  If I could be buried deep, very deep down, where
everything is forgotten!  But they draw me up, back to the surface.
I would not mind if they buried me alive, if it were very deep, and
dark, and the earth heavy above.''Don't say that,' she replied, rising.'No, I am saying it when I don't wish to say it.  Why am I here?
Why am I here?  Why have I survived into this?  Why can I not stop
talking?'He turned his face aside.  The black, fine, elfish hair was so
long, and pushed up in tufts from the smooth brown nape of his
neck.  Daphne looked at him in sorrow.  He could not turn his body.
He could only move his head.  And he lay with his face hard
averted, the fine hair of his beard coming up strange from under
his chin and from his throat, up to the socket of his ear.  He lay
quite still in this position.  And she turned away, looking for her
mother.  She had suddenly realized that the bonds, the connexions
between him and his life in the world had broken, and he lay there,
a bit of loose, palpitating humanity, shot away from the body of
humanity.It was ten days before she went to the hospital again.  She had
wanted never to go again, to forget him, as one tries to forget
incurable things.  But she could not forget him.  He came again and
again into her mind.  She had to go back.  She had heard that he
was recovering very slowly.He looked really better.  His eyes were not so wide open, they had
lost that black, inky exposure which had given him such an
unnatural look, unpleasant.  He watched her guardedly.  She had
taken off her furs, and wore only her dress and a dark, soft
feather toque.'How are you?' she said, keeping her face averted, unwilling to
meet his eyes.'Thank you, I am better.  The nights are not so long.'She shuddered, knowing what long nights meant.  He saw the worn
look in her face too, the reddened rims of her eyes.'Are you not well?  Have you some trouble?' he asked her.'No, no,' she answered.She had brought a handful of pinky, daisy-shaped flowers.'Do you care for flowers?' she asked.He looked at them.  Then he slowly shook his head.'No,' he said.  'If I am on horseback, riding through the marshes
or through the hills, I like to see them below me.  But not here.
Not now.  Please do not bring flowers into this grave.  Even in
gardens, I do not like them.  When they are upholstery to human
life.''I will take them away again,' she said.'Please do.  Please give them to the nurse.'Daphne paused.'Perhaps,' she said, 'you wish I would not come to disturb you.'He looked into her face.'No,' he said.  'You are like a flower behind a rock, near an icy
water.  No, you do not live too much.  I am afraid I cannot talk
sensibly.  I wish to hold my mouth shut.  If I open it, I talk this
absurdity.  It escapes from my mouth.''It is not so very absurd,' she said.But he was silent - looking away from her.'I want you to tell me if there is really nothing I can do for
you,' she said.'Nothing,' he answered.'If I can write any letter for you.''None,' he answered.'But your wife and your two children.  Do they know where you are?''I should think not.''And where are they?''I do not know.  Probably they are in Hungary.''Not at your home?''My castle was burnt down in a riot.  My wife went to Hungary with
the children.  She has her relatives there.  She went away from me.
I wished it too.  Alas for her, I wished to be dead.  Pardon me the
personal tone.'Daphne looked down at him - the queer, obstinate little fellow.'But you have somebody you wish to tell - somebody you want to hear
from?''Nobody.  Nobody.  I wish the bullet had gone through my heart.  I
wish to be dead.  It is only I have a devil in my body that will
not die.'She looked at him as he lay with closed, averted face.'Surely it is not a devil which keeps you alive,' she said.  'It is
something good.''No, a devil,' he said.She sat looking at him with a long, slow, wondering look.'Must one hate a devil that makes one live?' she asked.He turned his eyes to her with a touch of a satiric smile.'If one lives, no,' he said.She looked away from him the moment he looked at her.  For her life
she could not have met his dark eyes direct.She left him, and he lay still.  He neither read nor talked
throughout the long winter nights and the short winter days.  He
only lay for hours with black, open eyes, seeing everything around
with a touch of disgust, and heeding nothing.Daphne went to see him now and then.  She never forgot him for
long.  He seemed to come into her mind suddenly, as if by sorcery.One day he said to her:'I see you are married.  May I ask you who is your husband?'She told him.  She had had a letter also from Basil.  The Count
smiled slowly.'You can look forward,' he said, 'to a happy reunion and new,
lovely children, Lady Daphne.  Is it not so?''Yes, of course,' she said.'But you are ill,' he said to her.'Yes - rather ill.''Of what?''Oh!' she answered fretfully, turning her face aside.  'They talk
about lungs.'  She hated speaking of it.  'Why, how do you know I
am ill?' she added quickly.Again he smiled slowly.'I see it in your face, and hear it in your voice.  One would say
the Evil One had cast a spell on you.''Oh no,' she said hastily.  'But do I look ill?''Yes.  You look as if something had struck you across the face, and
you could not forget it.''Nothing has,' she said.  'Unless it's the war.''The war!' he repeated.'Oh, well, don't let us talk of it,' she said.Another time he said to her:'The year has turned - the sun must shine at last, even in England.
I am afraid of getting well too soon.  I am a prisoner, am I not?
But I wish the sun would shine.  I wish the sun would shine on my
face.''You won't always be a prisoner.  The war will end.  And the sun
DOES shine even in the winter in England,' she said.'I wish it would shine on my face,' he said.So that when in February there came a blue, bright morning, the
morning that suggests yellow crocuses and the smell of a mezereon
tree and the smell of damp, warm earth, Daphne hastily got a taxi
and drove out to the hospital.'You have come to put me in the sun,' he said the moment he saw
her.'Yes, that's what I came for,' she said.She spoke to the matron, and had his bed carried out where there
was a big window that came low.  There he was put full in the sun.
Turning, he could see the blue sky and the twinkling tops of
purplish, bare trees.'The world!  The world!' he murmured.He lay with his eyes shut, and the sun on his swarthy, transparent,
immobile face.  The breath came and went through his nostrils
invisibly.  Daphne wondered how he could lie so still, how he could
look so immobile.  It was true as her mother had said: he looked as
if he had been cast in the mould when the metal was white hot, all
his lines were so clean.  So small, he was, and in his way perfect.Suddenly his dark eyes opened and caught her looking.'The sun makes even anger open like a flower,' he said.'Whose anger?' she said.'I don't know.  But I can make flowers, looking through my
eyelashes.  Do you know how?''You mean rainbows?''Yes, flowers.'And she saw him, with a curious smile on his lips, looking through
his almost closed eyelids at the sun.'The sun is neither English nor German nor Bohemian,' he said.  'I
am a subject of the sun.  I belong to the fire-worshippers.''Do you?' she replied.'Yes, truly, by tradition.'  He looked at her smiling.  'You stand
there like a flower that will melt,' he added.She smiled slowly at him with a slow, cautious look of her eyes, as
if she feared something.'I am much more solid than you imagine,' she said.Still he watched her.'One day,' he said, 'before I go, let me wrap your hair round my
hands, will you?'  He lifted his thin, short, dark hands.  'Let me
wrap your hair round my hands, like a bandage.  They hurt me.  I
don't know what it is.  I think it is all the gun explosions.  But
if you let me wrap your hair round my hands.  You know, it is the
hermetic gold - but so much of water in it, of the moon.  That will
soothe my hands.  One day, will you?''Let us wait till the day comes,' she said.'Yes,' he answered, and was still again.'It troubles me,' he said after a while, 'that I complain like a
child, and ask for things.  I feel I have lost my manhood for the
time being.  The continual explosions of guns and shells!  It seems
to have driven my soul out of me like a bird frightened away at
last.  But it will come back, you know.  And I am so grateful to
you; you are good to me when I am soulless, and you don't take
advantage of me.  Your soul is quiet and heroic.''Don't,' she said.  'Don't talk!'The expression of shame and anguish and disgust crossed his face.'It is because I can't help it,' he said.  'I have lost my soul,
and I can't stop talking to you.  I can't stop.  But I don't talk
to anyone else.  I try not to talk, but I can't prevent it.  Do you
draw the words out of me?'Her wide, green-blue eyes seemed like the heart of some curious,
full-open flower, some Christmas rose with its petals of snow and
flush.  Her hair glinted heavy, like water-gold.  She stood there
passive and indomitable with the wide-eyed persistence of her
wintry, blond nature.Another day when she came to see him, he watched her for a time,
then he said:'Do they all tell you you are lovely, you are beautiful?''Not quite all,' she replied.'But your husband?''He has said so.''Is he gentle?  Is he tender?  Is he a dear lover?'She turned her face aside, displeased.'Yes,' she replied curtly.He did not answer.  And when she looked again he was lying with his
eyes shut, a faint smile seeming to curl round his short,
transparent nose.  She could faintly see the flesh through his
beard, as water through reeds.  His black hair was brushed smooth
as glass, his black eyebrows glinted like a curve of black glass on
the swarthy opalescence of his brow.Suddenly he spoke, without opening his eyes.'You have been very kind to me,' he said.'Have I?  Nothing to speak of.'He opened his eyes and looked at her.'Everything finds its mate,' he said.  'The ermine and the pole-cat
and the buzzard.  One thinks so often that only the dove and the
nightingale and the stag with his antlers have gentle mates.  But
the pole-cat and the ice-bears of the north have their mates.  And
a white she-bear lies with her cubs under a rock as a snake lies
hidden, and the male bear slowly swims back from the sea, like a
clot of snow or a shadow of a white cloud passing on the speckled
sea.  I have seen her too, and I did not shoot her, nor him when he
landed with fish in his mouth, wading wet and slow and yellow-white
over the black stones.''You have been in the North Sea?''Yes.  And with the Eskimo in Siberia, and across the Tundras.  And
a white sea-hawk makes a nest on a high stone, and sometimes looks
out with her white head over the edge of the rocks.  It is not only
a world of men, Lady Daphne.''Not by any means,' said she.'Else it were a sorry place.''It is bad enough,' said she.'Foxes have their holes.  They have even their mates, Lady Daphne,
that they bark to and are answered.  And an adder finds his female.
Psanek means an outlaw; did you know?''I did not.''Outlaws, and brigands, have often the finest woman-mates.''They do,' she said.'I will be Psanek, Lady Daphne.  I will not be Johann Dionys any
more, I will be Psanek.  The law has shot me through.''You might be Psanek and Johann and Dionys as well,' she said.'With the sun on my face?  Maybe,' he said, looking to the sun.There were some lovely days in the spring of 1918.  In March the
Count was able to get up.  They dressed him in a simple, dark-blue
uniform.  He was not very thin, only swarthy-transparent, now his
beard was shaven and his hair was cut.  His smallness made him
noticeable, but he was masculine, perfect in his small stature.
All the smiling dapperness that had made him seem like a monkey to
Daphne when she was a girl had gone now.  His eyes were dark and
haughty; he seemed to keep inside his own reserves, speaking to
nobody if he could help it, neither to the nurses nor the visitors
nor to his fellow-prisoners, fellow-officers.  He seemed to put a
shadow between himself and them, and from across this shadow he
looked with his dark, beautifully-fringed eyes, as a proud little
beast from the shadow of its lair.  Only to Daphne he laughed and
chatted.She sat with him one day in March on the terrace of the hospital,
on a morning when white clouds went endlessly and magnificently
about a blue sky, and the sunshine felt warm after the blots of
shadow.'When you had a birthday, and you were seventeen, didn't I give you
a thimble?' he asked her.'Yes.  I have it still.''With a gold snake at the bottom, and a Mary-beetle of green stone
at the top, to push the needle with.''Yes.''Do you ever use it?''No.  I sew rarely.''Would it displease you to sew something for me?''You won't admire my stitches.  What would you wish me to sew?''Sew me a shirt that I can wear.  I have never before worn shirts
from a shop, with a maker's name inside.  It is very distasteful to
me.'She looked at him - his haughty little brows.'Shall I ask my maid to do it?' she said.'Oh, please, no!  Oh, please, no, do not trouble.  No, please, I
would not want it unless you sewed it yourself, with the Psanek
thimble.'She paused before she answered.  Then came her slow:'Why?'He turned and looked at her with dark, searching eyes.'I have no reason,' he said, rather haughtily.She left the matter there.  For two weeks she did not go to see
him.  Then suddenly one day she took the bus down Oxford Street and
bought some fine white flannel.  She decided he must wear flannel.That afternoon she drove out to Hurst Place.  She found him sitting
on the terrace, looking across the garden at the red suburb of
London smoking fumily in the near distance, interrupted by patches
of uncovered ground and a flat, tin-roofed laundry.'Will you give me measurements for your shirt?' she said.'The number of the neck-band of this English shirt is fifteen.  If
you ask the matron she will give you the measurement.  It is a
little too large, too long in the sleeves, you see,' and he shook
his shirt cuff over his wrist.  'Also too long altogether.''Mine will probably be unwearable when I've made them,' said she.'Oh no.  Let your maid direct you.  But please do not let her sew
them.''Will you tell me why you want me to do it?''Because I am a prisoner, in other people's clothes, and I have
nothing of my own.  All the things I touch are distasteful to me.
If your maid sews for me, it will still be the same.  Only you
might give me what I want, something that buttons round my throat
and on my wrists.''And in Germany - or in Austria?''My mother sewed for me.  And after her, my mother's sister, who
was the head of my house.''Not your wife?''Naturally not.  She would have been insulted.  She was never more
than a guest in my house.  In my family there are old traditions - 
but with me they have come to an end.  I had best try to revive
them.''Beginning with traditions of shirts?''Yes.  In our family the shirt should be made and washed by a woman
of our own blood: but when we marry, by the wife.  So when I
married I had sixty shirts, and many other things - sewn by my
mother and my aunt, all with my initial, and the ladybird, which is
our crest.''And where did they put the initial?''Here!'  He put his finger on the back of his neck, on the swarthy,
transparent skin.  'I fancy I can feel the embroidered ladybird
still.  On our linen we had no crown: only the ladybird.'She was silent, thinking.'You will forgive what I ask you?' he said, 'since I am a prisoner
and can do no other, and since fate has made you so that you
understand the world as I understand it.  It is not really
indelicate, what I ask you.  There will be a ladybird on your
finger when you sew, and those who wear the ladybird understand.''I suppose,' she mused, 'it is as bad to have your bee in your
shirt as in your bonnet.'He looked at her with round eyes.'Don't you know what it is to have a bee in your bonnet?' she said.'No.''To have a bee buzzing among your hair!  To be out of your wits,'
she smiled at him.'So!' he said.  'Ah, the Psaneks have had a ladybird in their
bonnets for many hundred years.''Quite, quite mad,' she said.'It may be,' he answered.  'But with my wife I was quite sane for
ten years.  Now give me the madness of the ladybird.  The world I
was sane about has gone raving.  The ladybird I was mad with is
wise still.''At least, when I sew the shirts, if I sew them,' she said, 'I
shall have the ladybird at my finger's end.''You want to laugh at me.''But surely you know you are funny, with your family insect.''My family insect?  Now you want to be rude to me.''How many spots must it have?''Seven.''Three on each wing.  And what do I do with the odd one?''You put that one between its teeth, like the cake for Cerebus.''I'll remember that.'When she brought the first shirt, she gave it to the matron.  Then
she found Count Dionys sitting on the terrace.  It was a beautiful
spring day.  Near at hand were tall elm trees and some rooks
cawing.'What a lovely day!' she said.  'Are you liking the world any
better?''The world?' he said, looking up at her with the same old
discontent and disgust on his fine, transparent nose.'Yes,' she replied, a shadow coming over her face.'Is this the world - all those little red-brick boxes in rows, where
couples of little people live, who decree my destiny?''You don't like England?''Ah, England!  Little houses like little boxes, each with its
domestic Englishman and his domestic wife, each ruling the world
because all are alike, so alike.''But England isn't all houses.''Fields then!  Little fields with innumerable hedges.  Like a net
with an irregular mesh, pinned down over this island and everything
under the net.  Ah, Lady Daphne, forgive me.  I am ungrateful.  I
am so full of bile, of spleen, you say.  My only wisdom is to keep
my mouth shut.''Why do you hate everything?' she said, her own face going bitter.'Not everything.  If I were free!  If I were outside the law.  Ah,
Lady Daphne, how does one get outside the law?''By going inside oneself,' she said.  'Not outside.'His face took on a greater expression of disgust.'No, no.  I am a man, I am a man, even if I am little.  I am not a
spirit, that coils itself inside a shell.  In my soul is anger,
anger, anger.  Give me room for my anger.  Give me room for that.'His black eyes looked keenly into hers.  She rolled her eyes as if
in a half-trance.  And in a monotonous, tranced voice she said:'Much better get over your anger.  And WHY are you angry?''There is no why.  If it were love, you would not ask me, why do
you love?  But it is anger, anger, anger.  What else can I call it?
And there is no why.'Again he looked at her with his dark, sharp, questioning, tormented
eyes.'Can't you get rid of it?' she said, looking aside.'If a shell exploded and blew me into a thousand fragments,' he
said, 'it would not destroy the anger that is in me.  I know that.
No, it will never dissipate.  And to die is no release.  The anger
goes on gnashing and whimpering in death.  Lady Daphne, Lady
Daphne, we have used up all the love, and this is what is left.''Perhaps YOU have used up all your love,' she replied.  'You are
not everybody.''I know it.  I speak for me and you.''Not for me,' she said rapidly.He did not answer, and they remained silent.At length she turned her eyes slowly to him.'Why do you say you speak for me?' she said, in an accusing tone.'Pardon me.  I was hasty.'But a faint touch of superciliousness in his tone showed he meant
what he had said.  She mused, her brow cold and stony.'And why do you tell ME about your anger?' she said.  'Will that
make it better?''Even the adder finds his mate.  And she has as much poison in her
mouth as he.'She gave a little sudden squirt of laughter.'Awfully poetic thing to say about me,' she said.He smiled, but with the same corrosive quality.'Ah,' he said, 'you are not a dove.  You are a wild-cat with open
eyes, half dreaming on a bough, in a lonely place, as I have seen
her.  And I ask myself - What are her memories, then?''I wish I were a wild-cat,' she said suddenly.He eyed her shrewdly, and did not answer.'You want more war?' she said to him bitterly.'More trenches?  More Big Berthas, more shells and poison-gas, more
machine-drilled science-manoeuvred so-called armies?  Never.
Never.  I would rather work in a factory that makes boots and
shoes.  And I would rather deliberately starve to death than work
in a factory that makes boots and shoes.''Then what do you want?''I want my anger to have room to grow.''How?''I do not know.  That is why I sit here, day after day.  I wait.''For your anger to have room to grow?''For that.''Good-bye, Count Dionys.''Good-bye, Lady Daphne.'She had determined never to go and see him again.  She had no sign
from him.  Since she had begun the second shirt, she went on with
it.  And then she hurried to finish it, because she was starting a
round of visits that would end in the summer sojourn in Scotland.
She intended to post the shirt.  But after all, she took it
herself.She found Count Dionys had been removed from Hurst Place to Voynich
Hall, where other enemy officers were interned.  The being thwarted
made her more determined.  She took the train next day to go to
Voynich Hall.When he came into the ante-room where he was to receive her, she
felt at once the old influence of his silence and his subtle power.
His face had still that swarthy-transparent look of one who is
unhappy, but his bearing was proud and reserved.  He kissed her
hand politely, leaving her to speak.'How are you?' she said.  'I didn't know you were here.  I am going
away for the summer.''I wish you a pleasant time,' he said.  They were speaking English.'I brought the other shirt,' she said.  'It is finished at last.''That is a greater honour than I dared expect,' he said.'I'm afraid it may be more honourable than useful.  The other
didn't fit, did it?''Almost,' he said.  'It fitted the spirit, if not the flesh,' he
smiled.'I'd rather it had been the reverse, for once,' she said.  'Sorry.''I would not have it one stitch different.''Can we sit in the garden?''I think we may.'They sat on a bench.  Other prisoners were playing croquet not far
off.  But these two were left comparatively alone.'Do you like it better here?' she said.'I have nothing to complain of,' he said.'And the anger?''It is doing well, I thank you,' he smiled.'You mean getting better?''Making strong roots,' he said, laughing.'Ah, so long as it only makes roots!' she said.'And your ladyship, how is she?''My ladyship is rather better,' she replied.'Much better, indeed,' he said, looking into her face.'Do you mean I LOOK much better?' she asked quickly.'Very much.  It is your beauty you think of.  Well, your beauty is
almost itself again.''Thanks.''You brood on your beauty as I on my anger.  Ah, your ladyship, be
wise, and make friends with your anger.  That is the way to let
your beauty blossom.''I was not unfriendly with you, was I?' she said.'With me?'  His face flickered with a laugh.  'Am I your anger?
Your vicar in wrath?  So then, be friends with the angry me, your
ladyship.  I ask nothing better.''What is the use,' she said, 'being friends with the ANGRY you?  I
would much rather be friends with the happy you.''That little animal is extinct,' he laughed.  'And I am glad of
it.''But what remains?  Only the angry you?  Then it is no use my
trying to be friends.''You remember, dear Lady Daphne, that the adder does not suck his
poison all alone, and the pole-cat knows where to find his she-
pole-cat.  You remember that each one has his own dear mate,' he
laughed.  'Dear, deadly mate.''And what if I do remember those bits of natural history, Count
Dionys?''The she-adder is dainty, delicate, and carries her poison lightly.
The wild-cat has wonderful green eyes that she closes with memory
like a screen.  The ice-bear hides like a snake with her cubs, and
her snarl is the strangest thing in the world.''Have you ever heard me snarl?' she asked suddenly.He only laughed, and looked away.They were silent.  And immediately the strange thrill of secrecy
was between them.  Something had gone beyond sadness into another,
secret, thrilling communion which she would never admit.'What do you do all day here?' she asked.'Play chess, play this foolish croquet, play billiards, and read,
and wait, and remember.''What do you wait for?''I don't know.''And what do you remember?''Ah, that.  Shall I tell you what amuses me?  Shall I tell you a
secret?''Please don't, if it's anything that matters.''It matters to nobody but me.  Will you hear it?''If it does not implicate me in any way.''It does not.  Well, I am a member of a certain old secret society - 
no, don't look at me, nothing frightening - only a society like the
free-masons.''And?''And - well, as you know, one is initiated into certain so-called
secrets and rites.  My family has always been initiated.  So I am
an initiate too.  Does it interest you?''Why, of course.''Well.  I was always rather thrilled by these secrets.  Or some of
them.  Some seemed to me far-fetched.  The ones that thrilled me
even never had any relation to actual life.  When you knew me in
Dresden and Prague, you would not have thought me a man invested
with awful secret knowledge, now would you?''Never.''No.  It was just a little exciting side-show.  And I was a
grimacing little society man.  But now they become true.  It
becomes true.''The secret knowledge?''Yes.''What, for instance?''Take actual fire.  It will bore you.  Do you want to hear?''Go on.''This is what I was taught.  The true fire is invisible.  Flame,
and the red fire we see burning, has its back to us.  It is running
away from us.  Does that mean anything to you?''Yes.''Well then, the yellowness of sunshine - light itself - that is only
the glancing aside of the real original fire.  You know that is
true.  There would be no light if there was no refraction, no bits
of dust and stuff to turn the dark fire into visibility.  You know
that's a fact.  And that being so, even the sun is dark.  It is
only his jacket of dust that makes him visible.  You know that too.
And the true sunbeams coming towards us flow darkly, a moving
darkness of the genuine fire.  The sun is dark, the sunshine
flowing to us is dark.  And light is only the inside-turning away
of the sun's directness that was coming to us.  Does that interest
you at all?''Yes,' she said dubiously.'Well, we've got the world inside out.  The true living world of
fire is dark, throbbing, darker than blood.  Our luminous world
that we go by is only the reverse of this.''Yes, I like that,' she said.'Well!  Now listen.  The same with love.  This white love that we
have is the same.  It is only the reverse, the whited sepulchre of
the true love.  True love is dark, a throbbing together in
darkness, like the wild-cat in the night, when the green screen
opens and her eyes are on the darkness.''No, I don't see that,' she said in a slow, clanging voice.'You, and your beauty - that is only the inside-out of you.  The
real you is the wild-cat invisible in the night, with red fire
perhaps coming out of its wide, dark eyes.  Your beauty is your
whited sepulchre.''You mean cosmetics,' she said.  'I've got none on today - not even
powder.'He laughed.'Very good,' he said.  'Consider me.  I used to think myself small
but handsome, and the ladies used to admire me moderately, never
very much.  A trim little fellow, you know.  Well, that was just
the inside-out of me.  I am a black tom-cat howling in the night,
and it is then that fire comes out of me.  This me you look at is
my whited sepulchre.  What do you say?'She was looking into his eyes.  She could see the darkness swaying
in the depths.  She perceived the invisible, cat-like fire stirring
deep inside them, felt it coming towards her.  She turned her face
aside.  Then he laughed, showing his strong white teeth, that
seemed a little too large, rather dreadful.She rose to go.'Well,' she said.  'I shall have the summer in which to think about
the world inside-out.  Do write if there is anything to say.  Write
to Thoresway.  Good-bye!''Ah, your eyes!' he said.  'They are like jewels of stone.'Being away from the Count, she put him out of her mind.  Only she
was sorry for him a prisoner in that sickening Voynich Hall.  But
she did not write.  Nor did he.As a matter of fact, her mind was now much more occupied with her
husband.  All arrangements were being made to effect his exchange.
From month to month she looked for his return.  And so she thought
of him.Whatever happened to her, she thought about it, thought and thought
a great deal.  The consciousness of her mind was like tablets of
stone weighing her down.  And whoever would make a new entry into
her must break these tablets of stone piece by piece.  So it was
that in her own way she thought often enough of the Count's world
inside-out.  A curious latency stirred in her consciousness that
was not yet an idea.He said her eyes were like jewels of stone.  What a horrid thing to
say!  What did he want her eyes to be like?  He wanted them to
dilate and become all black pupil, like a cat's at night.  She
shrank convulsively from the thought, and tightened her breast.He said her beauty was her whited sepulchre.  Even that, she knew
what he meant.  The invisibility of her he wanted to love.  But ah,
her pearl-like beauty was so dear to her, and it was so famous in
the world.He said her white love was like moonshine, harmful, the reverse of
love.  He meant Basil, of course.  Basil always said she was the
moon.  But then Basil loved her for that.  The ecstasy of it!  She
shivered, thinking of her husband.  But it had also made her nerve-
worn, her husband's love.  Ah, nerve-worn.What then would the Count's love be like?  Something so secret and
different.  She would not be lovely and a queen to him.  He hated
her loveliness.  The wild-cat has its mate.  The little wild-cat
that he was.  Ah!She caught her breath, determined not to think.  When she thought
of Count Dionys she felt the world slipping away from her.  She
would sit in front of a mirror, looking at her wonderful cared-for
face that had appeared in so many society magazines.  She loved it
so, it made her feel so vain.  And she looked at her blue-green
eyes - the eyes of the wild-cat on a bough.  Yes, the lovely blue-
green iris drawn tight like a screen.  Supposing it should relax.
Supposing it should unfold, and open out the dark depths, the dark,
dilated pupil!  Supposing it should?Never!  She always caught herself back.  She felt she might be
killed before she could give way to that relaxation that the Count
wanted of her.  She could not.  She just could not.  At the very
thought of it some hypersensitive nerve started with a great twinge
in her breast; she drew back, forced to keep her guard.  Ah no,
Monsieur le Comte, you shall never take her ladyship off her guard.She disliked the thought of the Count.  An impudent little fellow.
An impertinent little fellow!  A little madman, really.  A little
outsider.  No, no.  She would think of her husband: an adorable,
tall, well-bred Englishman, so easy and simple, and with the amused
look in his blue eyes.  She thought of the cultured, casual trail
of his voice.  It set her nerves on fire.  She thought of his
strong, easy body - beautiful, white-fleshed, with the fine
springing of warm-brown hair like tiny flames.  He was the
Dionysos, full of sap, milk and honey, and northern golden wine:
he, her husband.  Not that little unreal Count.  Ah, she dreamed of
her husband, of the love-days, and the honeymoon, the lovely,
simple intimacy.  Ah, the marvellous revelation of that intimacy,
when he left himself to her so generously.  Ah, she was his wife
for this reason, that he had given himself to her so greatly, so
generously.  Like an ear of corn he was there for her gathering - 
her husband, her own, lovely, English husband.  Ah, when would he
come again, when would he come again!She had letters from him - and how he loved her.  Far away, his life
was all hers.  All hers, flowing to her as the beam flows from a
white star right down to us, to our heart.  Her lover, her husband.He was now expecting to come home soon.  It had all been arranged.
'I hope you won't be disappointed in me when I do get back,' he
wrote.  'I am afraid I am no longer the plump and well-looking
young man I was.  I've got a big scar at the side of my mouth, and
I'm as thin as a starved rabbit, and my hair's going grey.  Doesn't
sound attractive, does it?  And it isn't attractive.  But once I
can get out of this infernal place, and once I can be with you
again, I shall come in for my second blooming.  The very thought of
being quietly in the same house with you, quiet and in peace, makes
me realize that if I've been through hell, I have known heaven on
earth and can hope to know it again.  I am a miserable brute to
look at now.  But I have faith in you.  You will forgive my
appearance, and that alone will make me feel handsome.'She read this letter many times.  She was not afraid of his scar or
his looks.  She would love him all the more.Since she had started making shirts - those two for the Count had
been an enormous labour, even though her maid had come to her
assistance forty times: but since she had started making shirts,
she thought she might continue.  She had some good suitable silk:
her husband liked silk underwear.But she still used the Count's thimble.  It was gold outside and
silver inside, and was too heavy.  A snake was coiled round the
base, and at the top, for pressing the needle, was inlet a semi-
translucent apple-green stone, perhaps jade, carved like a scarab,
with little dots.  It was too heavy.  But then she sewed so slowly.
And she liked to feel her hand heavy, weighted.  And as she sewed
she thought about her husband, and she felt herself in love with
him.  She thought of him, how beautiful he was, and how she would
love him now he was thin: she would love him all the more.  She
would love to trace his bones, as if to trace his living skeleton.
The thought made her rest her hands in her lap and drift into a
muse.  Then she felt the weight of the thimble on her finger, and
took it off, and sat looking at the green stone.  The ladybird.
The ladybird.  And if only her husband would come soon, soon.  It
was wanting him that made her so ill.  Nothing but that.  She had
wanted him so badly.  She wanted now.  Ah, if she could go to him
now, and find him, wherever he was, and see him and touch him and
take all his love.As she mused, she put the thimble down in front of her, took up a
little silver pencil from her work-basket, and on a bit of blue
paper that had been the band of a small skein of silk she wrote the
lines of the silly little songThat was all she could get on her bit of pale-blue paper.Silly enough, in all conscience.  But she did not translate it, so
it did not seem quite so silly.At that moment her maid announced Lady Bingham - her husband's
sister.  Daphne crumpled up the bit of paper in a flurry, and in
another minute Primrose, his sister, came in.  The newcomer was not
a bit like a primrose, being long-faced and clever, smart, but not
a bit elegant, in her new clothes.'Daphne dear, what a domestic scene!  I suppose it's rehearsal.
Well, you may as well rehearse, he's with Admiral Burns on the
Ariadne.  Father just heard from the Admiralty: quite fit.  He'll
be here in a day or two.  Splendid, isn't it?  And the war is going
to end.  At least it seems like it.  You'll be safe of your man
now, dear.  Thank heaven when it's all over.  What are you sewing?''A shirt,' said Daphne.'A shirt!  Why, how clever of you.  I should never know which end
to begin.  Who showed you?''Millicent.''And how did SHE know?  She's no business to know how to sew
shirts: nor cushions nor sheets either.  Do let me look.  Why, how
perfectly marvellous you are! - every bit by hand too.  Basil isn't
worth it, dear, really he isn't.  Let him order his shirts in
Oxford Street.  Your business is to be beautiful, not to sew
shirts.  What a dear little pin-poppet, or rather needle-woman!  I
say, a satire on us, that is.  But what a darling, with mother-of-
pearl wings to her skirts!  And darling little gold-eyed needles
inside her.  You screw her head off, and you find she's full of
pins and needles.  Woman for you!  Mother says won't you come to
lunch tomorrow.  And won't you come to Brassey's to tea with me at
this minute.  Do, there's a dear.  I've got a taxi.'Daphne bundled her sewing loosely together.When she tried to do a bit more, two days later, she could not find
her thimble.  She asked her maid, whom she could absolutely trust.
The girl had not seen it.  She searched everywhere.  She asked her
nurse - who was now her housekeeper - and footman.  No, nobody had
seen it.  Daphne even asked her sister-in-law.'Thimble, darling?  No, I don't remember a thimble.  I remember a
dear little needle-lady, whom I thought such a precious satire on
us women.  I didn't notice a thimble.'Poor Daphne wandered about in a muse.  She did not want to believe
it lost.  It had been like a talisman to her.  She tried to forget
it.  Her husband was coming, quite soon, quite soon.  But she could
not raise herself to joy.  She had lost her thimble.  It was as if
Count Dionys accused her in her sleep of something, she did not
quite know what.And though she did not really want to go to Voynich Hall, yet like
a fatality she went, like one doomed.  It was already late autumn,
and some lovely days.  This was the last of the lovely days.  She
was told that Count Dionys was in the small park, finding
chestnuts.  She went to look for him.  Yes, there he was in his
blue uniform stooping over the brilliant yellow leaves of the sweet
chestnut tree, that lay around him like a fallen nimbus of glowing
yellow, under his feet, as he kicked and rustled, looking for the
chestnut burrs.  And with his short, brown hands he was pulling out
the small chestnuts and putting them in his pockets.  But as she
approached he peeled a nut to eat it.  His teeth were white and
powerful.'You remind me of a squirrel laying in a winter store,' said she.'Ah, Lady Daphne - I was thinking and did not hear you.''I thought you were gathering chestnuts - even eating them.''Also!' he laughed.  He had a dark, sudden charm when he laughed,
showing his rather large white teeth.  She was not quite sure
whether she found him a little repulsive.'Were you REALLY thinking?' she said, in her slow, resonant way.'Very truly.''And weren't you enjoying the chestnut a bit?''Very much.  Like sweet milk.  Excellent, excellent.'  He had the
fragments of the nut between his teeth, and bit them finely.  'Will
you take one too.'  He held out the little, pointed brown nuts on
the palm of his hand.She looked at them doubtfully.'Are they as tough as they always were?' she said.'No, they are fresh and good.  Wait, I will peel one for you.'They strayed about through the thin clump of trees.'You have had a pleasant summer; you are strong?''Almost QUITE strong,' said she.  'Lovely summer, thanks.  I
suppose it's no good asking you if you have been happy?''Happy?'  He looked at her direct.  His eyes were black, and seemed
to examine her.  She always felt he had a little contempt of her.
'Oh yes,' he said, smiling.  'I have been very happy.''So glad.'They drifted a little farther, and he picked up an apple-green
chestnut burr out of the yellow-brown leaves, handling it with
sensitive fingers that still suggested paws to her.'How did you succeed in being happy?' she said.'How shall I tell you?  I felt that the same power which put up the
mountains could pull them down again - no matter how long it took.''And was that all?''Was it not enough?''I should say decidedly too little.'He laughed broadly, showing the strong, negroid teeth.'You do not know all it means,' he said.'The thought that the mountains were going to be pulled down?' she
said.  'It will be so long after my day.''Ah, you are bored,' he said.  'But I - I found the God who pulls
things down: especially the things that men have put up.  Do they
not say that life is a search after God, Lady Daphne?  I have found
my God.''The god of destruction,' she said, blanching.'Yes - not the devil of destruction, but the god of destruction.
The blessed god of destruction.  It is strange' - he stood before
her, looking up at her - 'but I have found my God.  The god of
anger, who throws down the steeples and the factory chimneys.  Ah,
Lady Daphne, he is a man's God, he is a man's God.  I have found my
God, Lady Daphne.''Apparently.  And how are you going to serve him?'A naive glow transfigured his face.'Oh, I will help.  With my heart I will help while I can do nothing
with my hands.  I say to my heart:  Beat, hammer, beat with little
strokes.  Beat, hammer of God, beat them down.  Beat it all down.'Her brows knitted, her face took on a look of discontent.'Beat what down?' she asked harshly.'The world, the world of man.  Not the trees - these chestnuts, for
example' - he looked up at them, at the tufts and loose pinions of
yellow - 'not these - nor the chattering sorcerers, the squirrels - 
nor the hawk that comes.  Not those.''You mean beat England?' she said.'Ah, no.  Ah, no.  Not England any more than Germany - perhaps not
as much.  Not Europe any more than Asia.''Just the end of the world?''No, no.  No, no.  What grudge have I against a world where little
chestnuts are so sweet as these!  Do you like yours?  Will you take
another?''No, thanks.''What grudge have I against a world where even the hedges are full
of berries, bunches of black berries that hang down, and red
berries that thrust up.  Never would I hate the world.  But the
world of man.  Lady Daphne' - his voice sank to a whisper - 'I HATE
IT.  Zzz!' he hissed.  'Strike, little heart!  Strike, strike, hit,
smite!  Oh, Lady Daphne!' - his eyes dilated with a ring of fire.'What?' she said, scared.'I believe in the power of my red, dark heart.  God has put the
hammer in my breast - the little eternal hammer.  Hit - hit - hit!  It
hits on the world of man.  It hits, it hits!  And it hears the thin
sound of cracking.  The thin sound of cracking.  Hark!'He stood still and made her listen.  It was late afternoon.  The
strange laugh of his face made the air seem dark to her.  And she
could easily have believed that she heard a faint, fine shivering,
cracking, through the air, a delicate crackling noise.'You hear it?  Yes?  Oh, may I live long!  May I live long, so that
my hammer may strike and strike, and the cracks go deeper, deeper!
Ah, the world of man!  Ah, the joy, the passion in every heart-
beat!  Strike home, strike true, strike sure.  Strike to destroy
it.  Strike!  Strike!  To destroy the world of man.  Ah, God.  Ah,
God, prisoner of peace.  Do I not know you, Lady Daphne?  Do I not?
Do I not?'She was silent for some moments, looking away at the twinkling
lights of a station beyond.'Not the white plucked lily of your body.  I have gathered no
flower for my ostentatious life.  But in the cold dark, your lily
root, Lady Daphne.  Ah, yes, you will know it all your life, that I
know where your root lies buried, with its sad, sad quick of life.
What does it matter!'They had walked slowly towards the house.  She was silent.  Then at
last she said, in a peculiar voice:'And you would never want to kiss me?''Ah, no!' he answered sharply.She held out her hand.'Good-bye, Count Dionys,' she drawled, fashionably.  He bowed over
her hand, but did not kiss it.'Good-bye, Lady Daphne.'She went away, with her brow set hard.  And henceforth she thought
only of her husband, of Basil.  She made the Count die out of her.
Basil was coming, he was near.  He was coming back from the East,
from war and death.  Ah, he had been through awful fire of
experience.  He would be something new, something she did not know.
He was something new, a stronger lover who had been through
terrible fire, and had come out strange and new, like a god.  Ah,
new and terrible his love would be, pure and intensified by the
awful fire of suffering.  A new lover - a new bridegroom - a new,
supernatural wedding-night.  She shivered in anticipation, waiting
for her husband.  She hardly noticed the wild excitement of the
Armistice.  She was waiting for something more wonderful to her.And yet the moment she heard his voice on the telephone, her heart
contracted with fear.  It was his well-known voice, deliberate,
diffident, almost drawling, with the same subtle suggestion of
deference, and the rather exaggerated Cambridge intonation, up and
down.  But there was a difference, a new icy note that went through
her veins like death.'Is that you, Daphne?  I shall be with you in half an hour.  Is
that all right for you?  Yes, I've just landed, and shall come
straight to you.  Yes, a taxi.  Shall I be too sudden for you,
darling?  No?  Good, oh good!  Half an hour, then!  I say, Daphne?
There won't be anyone else there, will there?  Quite alone!  Good!
I can ring up Dad afterwards.  Yes, splendid, splendid.  Sure
you're all right, my darling?  I'm at death's door till I see you.
Yes.  Good-bye - half an hour.  Good-bye.'When Daphne had hung up the receiver she sat down almost in a
faint.  What was it that so frightened her?  His terrible, terrible
altered voice, like cold, blue steel.  She had no time to think.
She rang for her maid.'Oh, my lady, it isn't bad news?' cried Millicent, when she caught
sight of her mistress white as death.'No, good news.  Major Apsley will be here in half an hour.  Help
me to dress.  Ring to Murry's first to send in some roses, red
ones, and some lilac-coloured iris - two dozen of each, at once.'Daphne went to her room.  She didn't know what to wear, she didn't
know how she wanted her hair dressed.  She spoke hastily to her
maid.  She chose a violet-coloured dress.  She did not know what
she was doing.  In the middle of dressing the flowers came, and she
left off to put them in the bowls.  So that when she heard his
voice in the hall, she was still standing in front of the mirror
reddening her lips and wiping it away again.'Major Apsley, my lady!' murmured the maid, in excitement.'Yes, I can hear.  Go and tell him I shall be one minute.'Daphne's voice had become slow and sonorous, like bronze, as it
always did when she was upset.  Her face looked almost haggard, and
in vain she dabbed with the rouge.'How does he look?' she asked curtly, when her maid came back.'A long scar here,' said the maid, and she drew her finger from the
left-hand corner of her mouth into her cheek, slanting downwards.'Make him look very different?' asked Daphne.'Not so VERY different, my lady,' said Millicent gently.  'His eyes
are the same, I think.'  The girl also was distressed.'All right,' said Daphne.  She looked at herself a long, last look
as she turned away from the mirror.  The sight of her own face made
her feel almost sick.  She had seen so much of herself.  And yet
even now she was fascinated by the heavy droop of her lilac-veined
lids over her slow, strange, large, green-blue eyes.  They WERE
mysterious-looking.  And she gave herself a long, sideways glance,
curious and Chinese.  How was it possible there was a touch of the
Chinese in her face? - she so purely an English blonde, an Aphrodite
of the foam, as Basil had called her in poetry.  Ah well!  She left
off her thoughts and went through the hall to the drawing-room.He was standing nervously in the middle of the room in his uniform.
She hardly glanced at his face - and saw only the scar.'Hullo, Daphne,' he said, in a voice full of the expected emotion.
He stepped forward and took her in his arms, and kissed her
forehead.'So glad!  So glad it's happened at last,' she said, hiding her
tears.'So glad what has happened, darling?' he asked, in his deliberate
manner.'That you're back.'  Her voice had the bronze resonance, she spoke
rather fast.'Yes, I'm back, Daphne darling - as much of me as there is to bring
back.''Why?' she said.  'You've come back whole, surely?'  She was
frightened.'Yes, apparently I have.  Apparently.  But don't let's talk of
that.  Let's talk of you, darling.  How are you?  Let me look at
you.  You are thinner, you are older.  But you are more wonderful
than ever.  Far more wonderful.''How?' said she.'I can't exactly say how.  You were only a girl.  Now you are a
woman.  I suppose it's all that's happened.  But you are wonderful
as a woman, Daphne darling - more wonderful than all that's
happened.  I couldn't have believed you'd be so wonderful.  I'd
forgotten - or else I'd never known.  I say, I'm a lucky chap
really.  Here I am, alive and well, and I've got you for a wife.
It's brought you out like a flower.  I say, darling, there is more
now than Venus of the foam - grander.  How beautiful you are!  But
you look like the beauty of all life - as if you were moon-mother of
the world - Aphrodite.  God is good to me after all, darling.  I
ought never to utter a single complaint.  How lovely you are - how
lovely you are, my darling!  I'd forgotten you - and I thought I
knew you so well.  Is it true that you belong to me?  Are you
really mine?'They were seated on the yellow sofa.  He was holding her hand, and
his eyes were going up and down, from her face to her throat and
her breast.  The sound of his words, and the strong, cold desire in
his voice excited her, pleased her, and made her heart freeze.  She
turned and looked into his light blue eyes.  They had no longer the
amused light, nor the young look.  They burned with a hard, focused
light, whitish.'It's all right.  You are mine, aren't you, Daphne darling?' came
his cultured, musical voice, that had always the well-bred twang of
diffidence.She looked back into his eyes.'Yes, I am yours,' she said, from the lips.'Darling!  Darling!' he murmured, kissing her hand.Her heart beat suddenly so terribly, as if her breast would be
ruptured, and she rose in one movement and went across the room.
She leaned her hand on the mantelpiece and looked down at the
electric fire.  She could hear the faint, faint noise of it.  There
was silence for a few moments.Then she turned and looked at him.  He was watching her intently.
His face was gaunt, and there was a curious deathly sub-pallor,
though his cheeks were not white.  The scar ran livid from the side
of his mouth.  It was not so very big.  But it seemed like a scar
in him himself, in his brain, as it were.  In his eyes was that
hard, white, focused light that fascinated her and was terrible to
her.  He was different.  He was like death; like risen death.  She
felt she dared not touch him.  White death was still upon him.  She
could tell that he shrank with a kind of agony from contact.
'Touch me not, I am not yet ascended unto the Father.'  Yet for
contact he had come.  Something, someone seemed to be looking over
his shoulder.  His own young ghost looking over his shoulder.  Oh,
God!  She closed her eyes, seeming to swoon.  He remained leaning
forward on the sofa, watching her.'Aren't you well, darling?' he asked.  There was a strange,
incomprehensible coldness in his very fire.  He did not move to
come near her.'Yes, I'm well.  It is only that after all it is so sudden.  Let me
get used to you,' she said, turning aside her face from him.  She
felt utterly like a victim of his white, awful face.'I suppose I must be a bit of a shock to you,' he said.  'I hope
you won't leave off loving me.  It won't be that, will it?'The strange coldness in his voice!  And yet the white, uncanny
fire.'No, I shan't leave off loving you,' she admitted, in a low tone,
as if almost ashamed.  She DARED not have said otherwise.  And the
saying it made it true.'Ah, if you're sure of that,' he said.  'I'm a pretty unlovely
sight to behold, I know, with this wound-scar.  But if you can
forgive it me, darling.  Do you think you can?'  There was
something like compulsion in his tone.She looked at him, and shivered slightly.'I love you - more than before,' she said hurriedly.'Even the scar?' came his terrible voice, inquiring.She glanced again, with that slow, Chinese side-look, and felt she
would die.'Yes,' she said, looking away at nothingness.  It was an awful
moment to her.  A little, slightly imbecile smile widened on his
face.He suddenly knelt at her feet, and kissed the toe of her slipper,
and kissed the instep, and kissed the ankle in the thin black
stocking.'I knew,' he said in a muffled voice.  'I knew you would make good.
I knew if I had to kneel, it was before you.  I knew you were
divine, you were the one - Cybele - Isis.  I knew I was your slave.
I knew.  It has all been just a long initiation.  I had to learn
how to worship you.'He kissed her feet again and again, without the slightest self-
consciousness, or the slightest misgiving.  Then he went back to
the sofa, and sat there looking at her, saying:'It isn't love, it is worship.  Love between me and you will be a
sacrament, Daphne.  That's what I had to learn.  You are beyond me.
A mystery to me.  My God, how great it all is.  How marvellous!'She stood with her hand on the mantelpiece, looking down and not
answering.  She was frightened - almost horrified: but she was
thrilled deep down to her soul.  She really felt she could glow
white and fill the universe like the moon, like Astarte, like Isis,
like Venus.  The grandeur of her own pale power.  The man
religiously worshipped her, not merely amorously.  She was ready
for him - for the sacrament of his supreme worship.He sat on the sofa with his hands spread on the yellow brocade and
pushing downwards behind him, down between the deep upholstery of
the back and the seat.  He had long, white hands with pale
freckles.  And his fingers touched something.  With his long white
fingers he groped and brought it out.  It was the lost thimble.
And inside it was the bit of screwed-up blue paper.'I say, is that YOUR thimble?' he asked.She started, and went hurriedly forward for it.'Where was it?' she said, agitated.But he did not give it to her.  He turned it round and pulled out
the bit of blue paper.  He saw the faint pencil marks on the
screwed-up ball, and unrolled the band of paper, and slowly
deciphered the verse.'How awfully touching that is,' he said.  'A Voglein with two
little Fluglein!  But what a precious darling child you are!  Whom
did you want to fly to, if you were a Voglein?'  He looked up at
her with a curious smile.'I can't remember,' she said, turning aside her head.'I hope it was to me,' he said.  'Anyhow, I shall consider it was,
and shall love you all the more for it.  What a darling child!  A
Voglein if you please, with two little wings!  Why, how beautifully
absurd of you, darling!'He folded the scrap of paper carefully, and put it in his pocket-
book, keeping the thimble all the time between his knees.'Tell me when you lost it, Daphne,' he said, examining the bauble.'About a month ago - or two months.''About a month ago - or two months.  And what were you sewing?  Do
you mind if I ask?  I like to think of you then.  I was still in
that beastly El Hasrun.  What were you sewing, darling, two months
ago, when you lost your thimble?''A shirt.''I say, a shirt!  Whose shirt?''Yours.''There.  Now we've run it to earth.  Were you really sewing a shirt
for me!  Is it finished?  Can I put it on at this minute?''That one isn't finished, but the first one is.''I say, darling, let me go and put it on.  To think I should have
it next my skin!  I shall feel you all round me, all over me.  I
say how marvellous that will be!  Won't you come?''Won't you give me the thimble?' she said.'Yes, of course.  What a noble thimble too!  Who gave it you?''Count Dionys Psanek.''Who was he?''A Bohemian Count, in Dresden.  He once stayed with us in
Thoresway - with a tall wife.  Didn't you meet them?''I don't think I did.  I don't think I did.  I don't remember.
What was he like?''A little man with black hair and a rather low, dark forehead - 
rather dressy.''No, I don't remember him at all.  So he gave it you.  Well, I
wonder where he is now?  Probably rotted, poor devil.''No, he's interned in Voynich Hall.  Mother and I have been to see
him several times.  He was awfully badly wounded.''Poor little beggar!  In Voynich Hall!  I'll look at him before he
goes.  Odd thing, to give you a thimble.  Odd gift! You were a girl
then, though.  Do you think he had it made, or do you think he
found it in a shop?''I think it belonged to the family.  The ladybird at the top is
part of their crest - and the snake as well, I think.''A ladybird!  Funny thing for a crest.  Americans would call it a
bug.  I must look at him before he goes.  And you were sewing a
shirt for me!  And then you posted me this little letter into the
sofa.  Well, I'm awfully glad I received it, and that it didn't go
astray in the post, like so many things.  &quot;Wenn ich ein Voglein
war&quot; - you perfect child!  But that is the beauty of a woman like
you: you are so superb and beyond worship, and then such an
exquisite naive child.  Who could help worshipping you and loving
you: immortal and mortal together.  What, you want the thimble?
Here!  Wonderful, wonderful, white fingers.  Ah, darling, you are
more goddess than child, you long, limber Isis with sacred hands.
White, white, and immortal!  Don't tell me your hands could die,
darling: your wonderful Proserpine fingers.  They are immortal as
February and snowdrops.  If you lift your hands the spring comes.
I CAN'T help kneeling before you, darling.  I am no more than a
sacrifice to you, an offering.  I WISH I could die in giving myself
to you, give you all my blood on your altar, for ever.'She looked at him with a long, slow look, as he turned his face to
her.  His face was white with ecstasy.  And she was not afraid.
Somewhere, saturnine, she knew it was absurd.  But she chose not to
know.  A certain swoon-sleep was on her.  With her slow, green-blue
eyes she looked down on his ecstasized face, almost benign.  But in
her right hand unconsciously she held the thimble fast, she only
gave him her left hand.  He took her hand and rose to his feet in
that curious priestly ecstasy which made him more than a man or a
soldier, far, far more than a lover to her.Nevertheless, his home-coming made her begin to be ill again.
Afterwards, after his love, she had to bear herself in torment.  To
her shame and her heaviness, she knew she was not strong enough, or
pure enough, to bear this awful outpouring adoration-lust.  It was
not her fault she felt weak and fretful afterwards, as if she
wanted to cry and be fretful and petulant, wanted someone to save
her.  She could not turn to Basil, her husband.  After his ecstasy
of adoration-lust for her, she recoiled from him.  Alas, she was
not the goddess, the superb person he named her.  She was flawed
with the fatal humility of her age.  She could not harden her heart
and burn her soul pure of this humility, this misgiving.  She could
not finally believe in her own woman-godhead - only in her own
female mortality.That fierce power of being alone, even with your lover, the fierce
power of the woman in excelsis - alas, she could not keep it.  She
could rise to the height for the time, the incandescent,
transcendent, moon-fierce womanhood.  But alas, she could not stay
intensified and resplendent in her white, womanly powers, her
female mystery.  She relaxed, she lost her glory, and became
fretful.  Fretful and ill and never to be soothed.  And then
naturally her man became ashy and somewhat acrid, while she ached
with nerves, and could not eat.Of course she began to dream about Count Dionys: to yearn wistfully
for him.  And it was absolutely a fatal thought to her that he was
going away.  When she thought that - that he was leaving England
soon - going away into the dark for ever - then the last spark seemed
to die in her.  She felt her soul perish, whilst she herself was
worn and soulless like a prostitute.  A prostitute goddess.  And
her husband, the gaunt, white, intensified priest of her, who never
ceased from being before her like a lust.'Tomorrow,' she said to him, gathering her last courage and looking
at him with a side look, 'I want to go to Voynich Hall.''What, to see Count Psanek?  Oh, good!  Yes, very good!  I'll come
along as well.  I should like very much to see him.  I suppose
he'll be getting sent back before long.'It was a fortnight before Christmas, very dark weather.  Her
husband was in khaki.  She wore her black furs and a black lace
veil over her face, so that she seemed mysterious.  But she lifted
the veil and looped it behind, so that it made a frame for her
face.  She looked very lovely like that - her face pure like the
most white hellebore flower, touched with winter pink, amid the
blackness of her drapery and furs.  Only she was rather too much
like the picture of a modern beauty: too much the actual thing.
She had half an idea that Dionys would hate her for her effective
loveliness.  He would see it and hate it.  The thought was like a
bitter balm to her.  For herself, she loved her loveliness almost
with obsession.The Count came cautiously forward, glancing from the lovely figure
of Lady Daphne to the gaunt well-bred Major at her side.  Daphne
was so beautiful in her dark furs, the black lace of her veil
thrown back over her close-fitting, dull-gold-threaded hat, and her
face fair like a winter flower in a cranny of darkness.  But on her
face, that was smiling with a slow self-satisfaction of beauty and
of knowledge that she was dangling the two men, and setting all the
imprisoned officers wildly on the alert, the Count could read that
acridity of dissatisfaction and of inefficiency.  And he looked
away to the livid scar on the Major's cheek.'Count Dionys, I wanted to bring my husband to see you.  May I
introduce him to you?  Major Apsley - Count Dionys Psanek.'The two men shook hands rather stiffly.'I can sympathize with you being fastened up in this place,' said
Basil in his slow, easy fashion.  'I hated it, I assure you, out
there in the East.''But your conditions were much worse than mine,' smiled the Count.'Well, perhaps they were.  But prison is prison, even if it were
heaven itself.''Lady Apsley has been the one angel of my heaven,' smiled the
Count.'I'm afraid I was as inefficient as most angels,' said she.The small smile never left the Count's dark face.  It was true as
she said, he was low-browed, the black hair growing low on his
brow, and his eyebrows making a thick bow above his dark eyes,
which had again long black lashes.  So that the upper part of his
face seemed very dusky-black.  His nose was small and somewhat
translucent.  There was a touch of mockery about him, which was
intensified even by his small, energetic stature.  He was still
carefully dressed in the dark-blue uniform, whose shabbiness could
not hinder the dark flame of life which seemed to glow through the
cloth from his body.  He was not thin - but still had a curious
swarthy translucency of skin in his low-browed face.'What would you have been more?' he laughed, making equivocal dark
eyes at her.'Oh, of course, a delivering angel - a cinema heroine,' she replied,
closing her eyes and turning her face aside.All the while the white-faced, tall Major watched the little man
with a fixed, half-smiling scrutiny.  The Count seemed to notice.
He turned to the Englishman.'I am glad that I can congratulate you, Major Apsley, on your safe
and happy return to your home.''Thanks.  I hope I may be able to congratulate you in the same way
before long.''Oh yes,' said the Count.  'Before long I shall be shipped back.''Have you any news of your family?' interrupted Daphne.'No news,' he replied briefly, with sudden gravity.'It seems you'll find a fairish mess out in Austria,' said Basil.'Yes, probably.  It is what we had to expect,' replied the Count.'Well, I don't know.  Sometimes things do turn out for the best.  I
feel that's as good as true in my case,' said the Major.'Things have turned out for the best?' said the Count, with an
intonation of polite inquiry.'Yes.  Just for me personally, I mean - to put it quite selfishly.
After all, what we've learned is that a man can only speak for
himself.  And I feel it's been dreadful, but it's not been lost.
It was like an ordeal one had to go through,' said Basil.'You mean the war?''The war and everything that went with it.''And when you've been through the ordeal?' politely inquired the
Count.'Why, you arrive at a higher state of consciousness, and therefore
of life.  And so, of course, at a higher plane of love.  A
surprisingly higher plane of love, that you had never suspected the
existence of before.'The Count looked from Basil to Daphne, who was posing her head a
little self-consciously.'Then indeed the war has been a valuable thing,' he said.'Exactly!' cried Basil.  'I am another man.''And Lady Apsley?' queried the Count.'Oh' - her husband faced round to her - 'she is ABSOLUTELY another
woman - and MUCH more wonderful, more marvellous.'The Count smiled and bowed slightly.'When we knew her ten years ago, we should have said then that it
was impossible,' said he, 'for her to be more wonderful.''Oh, quite!' returned the husband.  'It always seems impossible.
And the impossible is always happening.  As a matter of fact, I
think the war has opened another circle of life to us - a wider
ring.''It may be so,' said the Count.'You don't feel it so yourself?'  The Major looked with his keen,
white attention into the dark, low-browed face of the other man.
The Count looked smiling at Daphne.'I am only a prisoner still, Major, therefore I feel my ring quite
small.''Yes, of course you do.  Of course.  Well, I do hope you won't be a
prisoner much longer.  You must be dying to get back into your own
country.''Yes, I shall be glad to be free.  Also,' he smiled.  'I shall miss
my prison and my visits from the angels.'Even Daphne could not be sure he was mocking her.  It was evident
the visit was unpleasant to him.  She could see he did not like
Basil.  Nay, more, she could feel that the presence of her tall,
gaunt, idealistic husband was hateful to the little swarthy man.
But he passed it all off in smiles and polite speeches.On the other hand, Basil was as if fascinated by the Count.  He
watched him absorbedly all the time, quite forgetting Daphne.  She
knew this.  She knew that she was quite gone out of her husband's
consciousness, like a lamp that has been carried away into another
room.  There he stood completely in the dark, as far as she was
concerned, and all his attention focused on the other man.  On his
pale, gaunt face was a fixed smile of amused attention.'But don't you get awfully bored,' he said, 'between the visits?'The Count looked up with an affection of frankness.'No, I do not,' he said.  'I can brood, you see, on the things that
come to pass.''I think that's where the harm comes in,' replied the Major.  'One
sits and broods, and is cut off from everything, and one loses
one's contact with reality.  That's the effect it had on me, being
a prisoner.''Contact with reality - what is that?''Well - contact with anybody, really - or anything.''Why must one have contact?''Well, because one must,' said Basil.The Count smiled slowly.'But I can sit and watch fate flowing, like black water, deep down
in my own soul,' he said.  'I feel that there, in the dark of my
own soul, things are happening.''That may be.  But whatever happens, it is only one thing, really.
It is a contact between your own soul and the soul of one other
being, or of many other beings.  Nothing else can happen to man.
That's how I figured it out for myself.  I may be wrong.  But
that's how I figured it out when I was wounded and a prisoner.'The Count's face had gone dark and serious.'But is this contact an aim in itself?' he asked.'Well' - said the Major - he had taken his degree in philosophy - 'it
seems to me it is.  It results inevitably in some form of activity.
But the cause and the origin and the life-impetus of all action,
activity, whether constructive or destructive, seems to me to be in
the dynamic contact between human beings.  You bring to pass a
certain dynamic contact between men, and you get war.  Another sort
of dynamic contact, and you get them all building a cathedral, as
they did in the Middle Ages.''But was not the war, or the cathedral, the real aim, and the
emotional contact just the means?' said the Count.'I don't think so,' said the Major, his curious white passion
beginning to glow through his face.  The three were seated in a
little card-room, left alone by courtesy by the other men.  Daphne
was still draped in her dark, too-becoming drapery.  But alas, she
sat now ignored by both men.  She might just as well have been an
ugly little nobody, for all the notice that was taken of her.  She
sat in the window-seat of the dreary small room with a look of
discontent on her exotic, rare face, that was like a delicate white
and pink hot-house flower.  From time to time she glanced with
long, slow looks from man to man: from her husband, whose pallid,
intense, white glowing face was pressed forward across the table to
the Count, who sat back in his chair, as if in opposition, and
whose dark face seemed clubbed together in a dark, unwilling stare.
Her husband was QUITE unaware of anything but his own white
identity.  But the Count still had a grain of secondary
consciousness which hovered round and remained aware of the woman
in the window-seat.  The whole of his face, and his forward-looking
attention was concentrated on Basil.  But somewhere at the back of
him he kept track of Daphne.  She sat uneasy, in discontent, as
women always do sit when men are locked together in a combustion of
words.  At the same time, she followed the argument.  It was
curious that, while her sympathy at this moment was with the Count,
it was her husband whose words she believed to be true.  The
contact, the emotional contact was the real thing, the so-called
'aim' was only a by-product.  Even wars and cathedrals, in her
mind, were only by-products.  The real thing was what the warriors
and cathedral-builders had had in common, as a great uniting
feeling: the thing they felt for one another, and for their women
in particular, of course.'There are a great many kinds of contact, nevertheless,' said
Dionys.'Well, do you know,' said the Major, 'it seems to me there is
really only one supreme contact, the contact of love.  Mind you,
the love may take on an infinite variety of forms.  And in my
opinion, no form of love is wrong, so long as it IS love, and you
yourself HONOUR what you are doing.  Love has an extraordinary
variety of forms!  And that is all that there is in life, it seems
to me.  But I grant you, if you deny the VARIETY of love you deny
love altogether.  If you try to specialize love into one set of
accepted feelings, you wound the very soul of love.  Love MUST be
multiform, else it is just tyranny, just death.''But why call it all LOVE?' said the Count.'Because it seems to me it IS love: the great power that draws
human beings together, no matter what the result of the contact may
be.  Of course there is hate, but hate is only the recoil of love.''Do you think the old Egypt was established on love?' asked Dionys.'Why, of course!  And perhaps the most multiform, the most
comprehensive love that the world has seen.  All that we suffer
from now is that our way of love is narrow, exclusive, and
therefore not love at all; more like death and tyranny.'The Count slowly shook his head, smiling slowly and as if sadly.'No,' he said.  'No.  It is no good.  You must use another word
than love.''I don't agree at all,' said Basil.'What word then?' blurted Daphne.The Count looked at her.'Obedience, submission, faith, belief, responsibility, power,' he
said slowly, picking out the words slowly, as if searching for what
he wanted, and never quite finding it.  He looked with his quiet
dark eyes into her eyes.  It was curious, she disliked his words
intensely, but she liked him.  On the other hand, she believed
absolutely what her husband said, yet her physical sympathy was
against him.'Do you agree, Daphne?' asked Basil.'Not a bit,' she replied, with a heavy look at her husband.'Nor I,' said Basil.  'It seems to me, if you love, there is no
obedience nor submission, except to the soul of love.  If you mean
obedience, submission, and all the rest, to the soul of love
itself, I quite agree.  But if you mean obedience, submission of
one person to another, and one man having power over others - I
don't agree, and never shall.  It seems to me just there where we
have gone wrong.  Kaiser Wilhelm II wanted power - ''No, no,' said the Count.  'He was a mountebank.  He had no
conception of the sacredness of power.''He proved himself very dangerous.''Oh yes.  But peace can be even more dangerous still.''Tell me, then.  Do you believe that you, as an aristocrat, should
have feudal power over a few hundreds of other men, who happen to
be born serfs, or not aristocrats?''Not as a hereditary aristocrat, but as a MAN who is by nature an
aristocrat,' said the Count, 'it is my sacred duty to hold the
lives of other men in my hands, and to shape the issue.  But I can
never fulfil my destiny till men will willingly put their lives in
my hands.''You don't expect them to, do you?' smiled Basil.'At this moment, no.''Or at any moment!'  The Major was sarcastic.'At a certain moment the men who are really living will come
beseeching to put their lives into the hands of the greater men
among them, beseeching the greater men to take the sacred
responsibility of power.''Do you think so?  Perhaps you mean men will at last begin to
choose leaders whom they will LOVE,' said Basil.  'I wish they
would.''No, I mean that they will at last yield themselves before men who
are greater than they: become vassals by choice.''Vassals!' exclaimed Basil, smiling.  'You are still in the feudal
ages, Count.''Vassals.  Not to any hereditary aristocrat - Hohenzollern or
Hapsburg or Psanek,' smiled the Count.  'But to the man whose soul
is born single, able to be alone, to choose and to command.  At
last the masses will come to such men and say:  &quot;You are greater
than we.  Be our lords.  Take our life and our death in your hands,
and dispose of us according to your will.  Because we see a light
in your face, and burning on your mouth.&quot;'The Major smiled for many moments, really piqued and amused,
watching the Count, who did not turn a hair.'I say, you must be awfully naive, Count, if you believe the modern
masses are ever going to behave like that.  I assure you, they
never will.''If they did,' said the Count, 'would you call it a new reign of
love, or something else?''Well, of course, it would contain an element of love.  There would
have to be an element of love in their feeling for their leaders.''Do you think so?  I thought that love assumed an equality in
difference.  I thought that love gave to every man the right to
judge the acts of other men - &quot;This was not an act of love,
therefore it was wrong.&quot;  Does not democracy, and love, give to
every man this right?''Certainly,' said Basil.'Ah, but my chosen aristocrat would say to those who chose him:
&quot;If you choose me, you give up forever your right to judge me.  If
you have truly chosen to follow me, you have thereby rejected all
your right to criticize me.  You can no longer either approve or
disapprove of me.  You have performed the sacred act of choice.
Henceforth you can only obey.&quot;''They wouldn't be able to help criticizing, for all that,' said
Daphne, blurting in her say.He looked at her slowly, and for the first time in her life she was
doubtful of what she was saying.'The day of Judas,' he said, 'ends with the day of love.'Basil woke up from a sort of trance.'I think, of course, Count,' he said, 'that it's an awfully amusing
idea.  A retrogression slap back to the Dark Ages.''Not so,' said the Count.  'Men - the mass of men - were never before
free to perform the sacred act of choice.  Today - soon - they may be
free.''Oh, I don't know.  Many tribes chose their kings and chiefs.''Men have never before been quite free to choose: and to know what
they are doing.''You mean they've only made themselves free in order voluntarily to
saddle themselves with new lords and masters?''I do mean that.''In short, life is just a vicious circle?''Not at all.  An ever-widening circle, as you say.  Always more
wonderful.''Well, it's all frightfully interesting and amusing - don't you
think so, Daphne?  By the way, Count, where would women be?  Would
they be allowed to criticize their husbands?''Only before marriage,' smiled the Count.  'Not after.''Splendid!' said Basil.  'I'm all for that bit of your scheme,
Count.  I hope you're listening, Daphne.''Oh yes.  But then I've only married YOU, I've got my right to
criticize all the other men,' she said in a dull, angry voice.'Exactly.  Clever of you!  So the Count won't get off!  Well now,
what do you think of the Count's aristocratic scheme for the
future, Daphne?  Do you approve?''Not at all.  But then little men have always wanted power,' she
said cruelly.'Oh, big men as well, for that matter,' said Basil, conciliatory.'I have been told before,' smiled the Count, 'little men are always
bossy.  I am afraid I have offended Lady Daphne?''No,' she said.  'Not really.  I'm amused, really.  But I always
dislike any suggestion of bullying.''Indeed, so do I,' said he.'The Count didn't mean bullying, Daphne,' said Basil.  'Come, there
is really an allowable distinction between responsible power and
bullying.''When men put their heads together about it,' said she.She was haughty and angry, as if she were afraid of losing
something.  The Count smiled mischievously at her.'You are offended, Lady Daphne?  But why?  You are safe from any
spark of my dangerous and extensive authority.'Basil burst into a roar of laughter.'It IS rather funny, you to be talking of power and of not being
criticized,' he said.  'But I should like to hear more: I would
like to hear more.'As they drove home, he said to his wife:'You know I like that little man.  He's a quaint little bantam.
And he sets one thinking.'Lady Daphne froze to four degrees below zero, under the north wind
of this statement, and not another word was to be thawed out of
her.Curiously enough, it was now Basil who was attracted by the Count,
and Daphne who was repelled.  Not that she was so bound up in her
husband.  Not at all.  She was feeling rather sore against men
altogether.  But as so often happens, in this life based on the
wicked triangle, Basil could only follow his enthusiasm for the
Count in his wife's presence.  When the two men were alone
together, they were awkward, resistant, they could hardly get out a
dozen words to one another.  When Daphne was there, however, to
complete the circuit of the opposing currents, things went like a
house on fire.This, however, was not much consolation to Lady Daphne.  Merely to
sit as a passive medium between two men who are squibbing
philosophical nonsense to one another: no, it was not good enough!
She almost hated the Count: low-browed little fellow, belonging to
the race of prehistoric slaves.  But her grudge against her white-
faced, spiritually intense husband was sharp as vinegar.  Let down:
she was let down between the pair of them.What next?  Well, what followed was entirely Basil's fault.  The
winter was passing: it was obvious the war was really over, that
Germany was finished.  The Hohenzollern had fizzled out like a very
poor squib, the Hapsburg was popping feebly in obscurity, the
Romanov was smudged out without a sputter.  So much for imperial
royalty.  Henceforth democratic peace.The Count, of course, would be shipped back now like returned goods
that had no market any more.  There was a world peace ahead.  A
week or two, and Voynich Hall would be empty.Basil, however, could not let matters follow their simple course.
He was awfully intrigued by the Count.  He wanted to entertain him
as a guest before he went.  And Major Apsley could get anything in
reason, at this moment.  So he obtained permission for the poor
little Count to stay a fortnight at Thoresway, before being shipped
back to Austria.  Earl Beveridge, whose soul was black as ink since
the war, would never have allowed the little alien enemy to enter
his house, had it not been for the hatred which had been aroused in
him, during the last two years, by the degrading spectacle of the
so-called patriots who had been howling their mongrel indecency in
the public face.  These mongrels had held the Press and the British
public in abeyance for almost two years.  Their one aim was to
degrade and humiliate anything that was proud or dignified
remaining in England.  It was almost the worst nightmare of all,
this coming to the top of a lot of public filth which was
determined to suffocate the souls of all dignified men.Hence, the Earl, who never intended to be swamped by unclean scum,
whatever else happened to him, stamped his heels in the ground and
stood on his own feet.  When Basil said to him, would he allow the
Count to have a fortnight's decent peace in Thoresway before all
was finished, Lord Beveridge gave a slow consent, scandal or no
scandal.  Indeed, it was really to defy scandal that he took such a
step.  For the thought of his dead boys was bitter to him: and the
thought of England fallen under the paws of smelly mongrels was
bitterer still.Lord Beveridge was at Thoresway to receive the Count, who arrived
escorted by Basil.  The English Earl was a big, handsome man,
rather heavy, with a dark, sombre face that would have been haughty
if haughtiness had not been made so ridiculous.  He was a
passionate man, with a passionate man's sensitiveness, generosity,
and instinctive overbearing.  But HIS dark passionate nature, and
his violent sensitiveness had been subjected now to fifty-five
years' subtle repression, condemnation, repudiation, till he had
almost come to believe in his own wrongness.  His little, frail
wife, all love for humanity, she was the genuine article.  Himself,
he was labelled selfish, sensual, cruel, etc., etc.  So by now he
always seemed to be standing aside, in the shadow, letting himself
be obliterated by the pallid rabble of the democratic hurry.  That
was the impression he gave of a man standing back, half-ashamed,
half-haughty, semi-hidden in the dark background.He was a little on the defensive as Basil came in with the Count.'Ah - how do you do, Count Psanek?' he said, striding largely
forward and holding out his hand.  Because he was the father of
Daphne the Count felt a certain tenderness for the taciturn
Englishman.'You do me too much honour, my lord, receiving me in your house,'
said the small Count proudly.The Earl looked at him slowly, without speaking: seemed to look
down on him, in every sense of the words.'We are still men, Count.  We are not beasts altogether.''You wish to say that my countrymen are so very nearly beasts, Lord
Beveridge?' smiled the Count, curling his fine nose.Again the Earl was slow in replying.'You have a low opinion of my manners, Count Psanek.''But perhaps a just appreciation of your meaning, Lord Beveridge,'
smiled the Count, with the same reckless little look of contempt on
his nose.Lord Beveridge flushed dark, with all his native anger offended.'I am glad Count Psanek makes my own meaning clear to me,' he said.'I beg your pardon a thousand times, my lord, if I give offence in
doing so,' replied the Count.The Earl went black, and felt a fool.  He turned his back on the
Count.  And then he turned round again, offering his cigar-case.'Will you smoke?' he said.  There was kindness in his tone.'Thank you,' said the Count, taking a cigar.'I dare say,' said Lord Beveridge, 'that all men are beasts in some
way.  I am afraid I have fallen into the common habit of speaking
by rote, and not what I really mean.  Won't you take a seat?''It is only as a prisoner that I have learned that I am NOT truly a
beast.  No, I am myself.  I am not a beast,' said the Count,
seating himself.The Earl eyed him curiously.'Well,' he said, smiling, 'I suppose it is best to come to a
decision about it.''It is necessary, if one is to be safe from vulgarity.'The Earl felt a twinge of accusation.  With his agate-brown, hard-
looking eyes he watched the black-browed little Count.'You are probably right,' he said.But he turned his face aside.They were five people at dinner - Lady Beveridge was there as
hostess.'Ah, Count Dionys,' she said with a sigh, 'do you really feel that
the war is over?''Oh yes,' he replied quickly.  'This war is over.  The armies will
go home.  THEIR cannon will not sound any more.  Never again like
this.''Ah, I hope so,' she sighed.'I am sure,' he said.'You think there'll be no more war?' said Daphne.For some reason she had made herself very fine, in her newest dress
of silver and black and pink-chenille, with bare shoulders, and her
hair fashionably done.  The Count in his shabby uniform turned to
her.  She was nervous, hurried.  Her slim white arm was near him,
with the bit of silver at the shoulder.  Her skin was white like a
hot-house flower.  Her lips moved hurriedly.'Such a war as this there will never be again,' he said.'What makes you so sure?' she replied, glancing into his eyes.'The machine of war has got out of our control.  We shall never
start it again, till it has fallen to pieces.  We shall be afraid.''Will everybody be afraid?' said she, looking down and pressing
back her chin.'I think so.''We will hope so,' said Lady Beveridge.'Do you mind if I ask you, Count,' said Basil, 'what you feel about
the way the war has ended?  The way it has ended for YOU, I mean.''You mean that Germany and Austria have lost the war?  It was bound
to be.  We have all lost the war.  All Europe.''I agreee there,' said Lord Beveridge.'We've all lost the war?' said Daphne, turning to look at him.There was pain on his dark, low-browed face.  He suffered having
the sensitive woman beside him.  Her skin had a hothouse delicacy
that made his head go round.  Her shoulders were broad, rather
thin, but the skin was white and so sensitive, so hot-house
delicate.  It affected him like the perfume of some white, exotic
flower.  And she seemed to be sending her heart towards him.  It
was as if she wanted to press her breast to his.  From the breast
she loved him, and sent out love to him.  And it made him unhappy;
he wanted to be quiet, and to keep his honour before these hosts.He looked into her eyes, his own eyes dark with knowledge and pain.
She, in her silence and her brief words seemed to be holding them
all under her spell.  She seemed to have cast a certain muteness on
the table, in the midst of which she remained silently master,
leaning forward to her plate, and silently mastering them all.'Don't I think we've all lost the war?' he replied, in answer to
her question.  'It was a war of suicide.  Nobody could win it.  It
was suicide for all of us.''Oh, I don't know,' she replied.  'What about America and Japan?''They don't count.  They only helped US to commit suicide.  They
did not enter vitally.'There was such a look of pain on his face, and such a sound of pain
in his voice, that the other three closed their ears, shut off from
attending.  Only Daphne was making him speak.  It was she who was
drawing the soul out of him, trying to read the future in him as
the augurs read the future in the quivering entrails of the
sacrificed beast.  She looked direct into his face, searching his
soul.'You think Europe has committed suicide?' she said.'Morally.''Only morally?' came her slow, bronze-like words, so fatal.'That is enough,' he smiled.'Quite,' she said, with a slow droop of her eyelids.  Then she
turned away her face.  But he felt the heart strangling inside his
breast.  What was she doing now?  What was she thinking?  She
filled him with uncertainty and with uncanny fear.'At least,' said Basil, 'those infernal guns are quiet.''For ever,' said Dionys.'I wish I could believe you, Count,' said the Major.The talk became more general - or more personal.  Lady Beveridge
asked Dionys about his wife and family.  He knew nothing save that
they had gone to Hungary in 1916, when his own house was burnt
down.  His wife might even have gone to Bulgaria with Prince
Bogorik.  He did not know.'But your children, Count!' cried Lady Beveridge.'I do not know.  Probably in Hungary, with their grandmother.  I
will go when I get back.''But have you never WRITTEN? - never inquired?''I could not write.  I shall know soon enough - everything.''You have no son?''No.  Two girls.''Poor things!''Yes.''I say, isn't it an odd thing to have a ladybird on your crest?'
asked Basil, to cheer up the conversation.'Why queer?  Charlemagne had bees.  And it is a Marienkafer - a
Mary-beetle.  The beetle of Our Lady.  I think it is quite a
heraldic insect, Major,' smiled the Count.'You're proud of it?' said Daphne, suddenly turning to look at him
again, with her slow, pregnant look.'I am, you know.  It has such a long genealogy - our spotted beetle.
Much longer than the Psaneks.  I think, you know, it is a
descendant of the Egyptian scarabeus, which is a very mysterious
emblem.  So I connect myself with the Pharaohs: just through my
ladybird.''You feel your ladybird has crept through so many ages,' she said.'Imagine it!' he laughed.'The scarab IS a piquant insect,' said Basil.'Do you know Fabre?' put in Lord Beveridge.  'He suggests that the
beetle rolling a little ball of dung before him, in a dry old
field, must have suggested to the Egyptians the First Principle
that set the globe rolling.  And so the scarab became the symbol of
the creative principle - or something like that.''That the earth is a tiny ball of dry dung is good,' said Basil.'Between the claws of a ladybird,' added Daphne.'That is what it is, to go back to one's origin,' said Lady
Beveridge.'Perhaps they meant that it was the principle of decomposition
which first set the ball rolling,' said the Count.'The ball would have to be THERE first,' said Basil.'Certainly.  But it hadn't started to roll.  Then the principle of
decomposition started it.'  The Count smiled as if it were a joke.'I am no Egyptologist,' said Lady Beveridge, 'so I can't judge.'The Earl and Countess Beveridge left next day.  Count Dionys was
left with the two young people in the house.  It was a beautiful
Elizabethan mansion, not very large, but with those magical rooms
that are all a twinkle of small-paned windows, looking out from the
dark panelled interior.  The interior was cosy, panelled to the
ceiling, and the ceiling moulded and touched with gold.  And then
the great square bow of the window with its little panes
intervening like magic between oneself and the world outside, the
crest in stained glass crowning its colour, the broad window-seat
cushioned in faded green.  Dionys wandered round the house like a
little ghost, through the succession of small and large twinkling
sitting-rooms and lounge rooms in front, down the long, wide
corridor with the wide stairhead at each end, and up the narrow
stairs to the bedrooms above, and on to the roof.It was early spring, and he loved to sit on the leaded, pale-grey
roof that had its queer seats and slopes, a little pale world in
itself.  Then to look down over the garden and the sloping lawn to
the ponds massed round with trees, and away to the elms and furrows
and hedges of the shires.  On the left of the house was the
farmstead, with ricks and great-roofed barns and dark-red cattle.
Away to the right, beyond the park, was a village among trees, and
the spark of a grey church spire.He liked to be alone, feeling his soul heavy with its own fate.  He
would sit for hours watching the elm trees standing in rows like
giants, like warriors across the country.  The Earl had told him
that the Romans had brought these elms to Britain.  And he seemed
to see the spirit of the Romans in them still.  Sitting there alone
in the spring sunshine, in the solitude of the roof, he saw the
glamour of this England of hedgerows and elm trees, and the
labourers with slow horses slowly drilling the sod, crossing the
brown furrow: and the roofs of the village, with the church steeple
rising beside a big black yew tree: and the chequer of fields away
to the distance.And the charm of the old manor around him, the garden with its grey
stone walls and yew hedges - broad, broad yew hedges and a peacock
pausing to glitter and scream in the busy silence of an English
spring, when celandines open their yellow under the hedges, and
violets are in the secret, and by the broad paths of the garden
polyanthus and crocuses vary the velvet and flame, and bits of
yellow wallflower shake raggedly, with a wonderful triumphance, out
of the cracks of the wall.  There was a fold somewhere near, and he
could hear the treble bleat of the growing lambs, and the deeper,
contented baa-ing of the ewes.This was Daphne's home, where she had been born.  She loved it with
an ache of affection.  But now it was hard to forget her dead
brothers.  She wandered about in the sun, with two old dogs padding
after her.  She talked with everybody - gardener, groom, stableman,
with the farm-hands.  That filled a large part of her life - 
straying round talking with the work-people.  They were, of course,
respectful to her - but not at all afraid of her.  They knew she was
poor, that she could not afford a car, nor anything.  So they
talked to her very freely: perhaps a little too freely.  Yet she
let it be.  It was her one passion at Thoresway to hear the
dependants talk and talk - about everything.  The curious feeling of
intimacy across a breach fascinated her.  Their lives fascinated
her: what they thought, what they FELT.  These, what they felt.
That fascinated her.  There was a gamekeeper she could have loved - 
an impudent, ruddy-faced, laughing, ingratiating fellow; she could
have loved him, if he had not been isolated beyond the breach of
his birth, her culture, her consciousness.  Her CONSCIOUSNESS
seemed to make a great gulf between her and the lower classes, the
unconscious classes.  She accepted it as her doom.  She could never
meet in real contact anyone but a super-conscious, finished being
like herself: or like her husband.  Her father had some of the
unconscious blood-warmth of the lower classes.  But he was like a
man who is damned.  And the Count, of course.  The Count had
something that was hot and invisible, a dark flame of life that
might warm the cold white fire of her own blood.  But -They avoided each other.  All three, they avoided one another.
Basil, too, went off alone.  Or he immersed himself in poetry.
Sometimes he and the Count played billiards.  Sometimes all three
walked in the park.  Often Basil and Daphne walked to the village,
to post.  But truly, they avoided one another, all three.  The days
slipped by.At evening they sat together in the small west room that had books
and a piano and comfortable shabby furniture of faded rose-coloured
tapestry: a shabby room.  Sometimes Basil read aloud: sometimes the
Count played the piano.  And they talked.  And Daphne stitch by
stitch went on with a big embroidered bedspread, which she might
finish if she lived long enough.  But they always went to bed
early.  They were nearly always avoiding one another.Dionys had a bedroom in the east bay - a long way from the rooms of
the others.  He had a habit, when he was quite alone, of singing,
or rather crooning, to himself the old songs of his childhood.  It
was only when he felt he was quite alone: when other people seemed
to fade out of him, and all the world seemed to dissolve into
darkness, and there was nothing but himself, his own soul, alive in
the middle of his own small night, isolate for ever.  Then, half
unconscious, he would croon in a small, high-pitched, squeezed
voice, a sort of high dream-voice, the songs of his childhood
dialect.  It was a curious noise: the sound of a man who is alone
in his own blood: almost the sound of a man who is going to be
executed.Daphne heard the sound one night when she was going downstairs
again with the corridor lantern to find a book.  She was a bad
sleeper, and her nights were a torture to her.  She, too, like a
neurotic, was nailed inside her own fretful self-consciousness.
But she had a very keen ear.  So she started as she heard the
small, bat-like sound of the Count's singing to himself.  She stood
in the midst of the wide corridor, that was wide as a room,
carpeted with a faded lavender-coloured carpet, with a piece of
massive dark furniture at intervals by the wall, and an oak arm-
chair and sometimes a faded, reddish Oriental rug.  The big horn
lantern which stood at nights at the end of the corridor she held
in her hand.  The intense 'peeping' sound of the Count, like a
witchcraft, made her forget everything.  She could not understand a
word, of course.  She could not understand the noise even.  After
listening for a long time, she went on downstairs.  When she came
back again he was still, and the light was gone from under his
door.After this, it became almost an obsession to her to listen for him.
She waited with fretful impatience for ten o'clock, when she could
retire.  She waited more fretfully still for the maid to leave her,
and for her husband to come and say good-night.  Basil had the room
across the corridor.  And then in resentful impatience she waited
for the sounds of the house to become still.  Then she opened her
door to listen.And far away, as if from far, far away in the unseen, like a
ventriloquist sound or a bat's uncanny peeping, came the frail,
almost inaudible sound of the Count's singing to himself before he
went to bed.  It WAS inaudible to anyone but herself.  But she, by
concentration, seemed to hear supernaturally.  She had a low arm-
chair by the door, and there, wrapped in a huge old black silk
shawl, she sat and listened.  At first she could not hear.  That
is, she could hear the sound.  But it was only a sound.  And then,
gradually, gradually she began to follow the thread of it.  It was
like a thread which she followed out of the world: out of the
world.  And as she went, slowly, by degrees, far, far away, down
the thin thread of his singing, she knew peace - she knew
forgetfulness.  She could pass beyond the world, away beyond where
her soul balanced like a bird on wings, and was perfected.So it was, in her upper spirit.  But underneath was a wild, wild
yearning, actually to go, actually to be given.  Actually to go,
actually to die the death, actually to cross the border and be
gone, to be gone.  To be gone from this herself, from this Daphne,
to be gone from father and mother, brothers and husband, and home
and land and world: to be gone.  To be gone to the call from the
beyond: the call.  It was the Count calling.  He was calling her.
She was sure he was calling her.  Out of herself, out of her world,
he was calling her.Two nights she sat just inside her room, by the open door, and
listened.  Then when he finished she went to sleep, a queer, light,
bewitched sleep.  In the day she was bewitched.  She felt strange
and light, as if pressure had been removed from around her.  Some
pressure had been clamped round her all her life.  She had never
realized it till now; now it was removed, and her feet felt so
light, and her breathing delicate and exquisite.  There had always
been a pressure against her breathing.  Now she breathed delicate
and exquisite, so that it was a delight to breathe.  Life came in
exquisite breaths, quickly, as if it delighted to come to her.The third night he was silent - though she waited and waited till
the small hours of the morning.  He was silent, he did not sing.
And then she knew the terror and blackness of the feeling that he
might never sing any more.  She waited like one doomed, throughout
the day.  And when the night came she trembled.  It was her
greatest nervous terror, lest her spell should be broken, and she
should be thrown back to what she was before.Night came, and the kind of swoon upon her.  Yes, and the call from
the night.  The call!  She rose helplessly and hurried down the
corridor.  The light was under his door.  She sat down in the big
oak arm-chair that stood near his door, and huddled herself tight
in her black shawl.  The corridor was dim with the big, star-
studded, yellow lantern-light.  Away down she could see the lamp-
light in her doorway; she had left her door ajar.But she saw nothing.  Only she wrapped herself close in the black
shawl, and listened to the sound from the room.  It called.  Oh, it
called her!  Why could she not go?  Why could she not cross through
the closed door.Then the noise ceased.  And then the light went out, under the door
of his room.  Must she go back?  Must she go back?  Oh, impossible.
As impossible as that the moon should go back on her tracks, once
she has risen.  Daphne sat on, wrapped in her black shawl.  If it
must be so, she would sit on through eternity.  Return she never
could.And then began the most terrible song of all.  It began with a
rather dreary, slow, horrible sound, like death.  And then suddenly
came a real call - fluty, and a kind of whistling and a strange
whirr at the changes, most imperative, and utterly inhuman.  Daphne
rose to her feet.  And at the same moment up rose the whistling
throb of a summons out of the death moan.Daphne tapped low and rapidly at the door.  'Count!  Count!' she
whispered.  The sound inside ceased.  The door suddenly opened.
The pale, obscure figure of Dionys.'Lady Daphne!' he said in astonishment, automatically standing
aside.'You called,' she murmured rapidly, and she passed intent into his
room.'No, I did not call,' he said gently, his hand on the door still.'Shut the door,' she said abruptly.He did as he was bid.  The room was in complete darkness.  There
was no moon outside.  She could not see him.'Where can I sit down?' she said abruptly.'I will take you to the couch,' he said, putting out his hand and
touching her in the dark.  She shuddered.She found the couch and sat down.  It was quite dark.'What are you singing?' she said rapidly.'I am so sorry.  I did not think anyone could hear.''What was it you were singing?''A song of my country.''Had it any words?''Yes, it is a woman who was a swan, and who loved a hunter by the
marsh.  So she became a woman and married him and had three
children.  Then in the night one night the king of the swans called
to her to come back, or else he would die.  So slowly she turned
into a swan again, and slowly she opened her wide, wide wings, and
left her husband and her children.'There was silence in the dark room.  The Count had been really
startled, startled out of his mood of the song into the day-mood of
human convention.  He was distressed and embarrassed by Daphne's
presence in his dark room.  She, however, sat on and did not make a
sound.  He, too, sat down in a chair by the window.  It was
everywhere dark.  A wind was blowing in gusts outside.  He could
see nothing inside his room: only the faint, faint strip of light
under the door.  But he could feel her presence in the darkness.
It was uncanny, to feel her near in the dark, and not to see any
sign of her, nor to hear any sound.She had been wounded in her bewitched state by the contact with the
every-day human being in him.  But now she began to relapse into
her spell, as she sat there in the dark.  And he, too, in the
silence, felt the world sinking away from him once more, leaving
him once more alone on a darkened earth, with nothing between him
and the infinite dark space.  Except now her presence.  Darkness
answering to darkness, and deep answering to deep.  An answer, near
to him, and invisible.But he did not know what to do.  He sat still and silent as she was
still and silent.  The darkness inside the room seemed alive like
blood.  He had no power to move.  The distance between them seemed
absolute.Then suddenly, without knowing, he went across in the dark, feeling
for the end of the couch.  And he sat beside her on the couch.  But
he did not touch her.  Neither did she move.  The darkness flowed
about them thick like blood, and time seemed dissolved in it.  They
sat with the small, invisible distance between them, motionless,
speechless, thoughtless.Then suddenly he felt her finger-tips touch his arm, and a flame
went over him that left him no more a man.  He was something seated
in flame, in flame unconscious, seated erect, like an Egyptian
King-god in the statues.  Her finger-tips slid down him, and she
herself slid down in a strange, silent rush, and he felt her face
against his closed feet and ankles, her hands pressing his ankles.
He felt her brow and hair against his ankles, her face against his
feet, and there she clung in the dark, as if in space below him.
He still sat erect and motionless.  Then he bent forward and put
his hand on her hair.'Do you come to me?' he murmured.  'Do you come to me?'The flame that enveloped him seemed to sway him silently.'Do you really come to me?' he repeated.  'But we have nowhere to
go.'He felt his bare feet wet with her tears.  Two things were
struggling in him, the sense of eternal solitude, like space, and
the rush of dark flame that would throw him out of his solitude
towards her.He was thinking too.  He was thinking of the future.  He had no
future in the world: of that he was conscious.  He had no future in
this life.  Even if he lived on, it would only be a kind of
enduring.  But he felt that in the after-life the inheritance was
his.  He felt the after-life belonged to him.Future in the world he could not give her.  Life in the world he
had not to offer her.  Better go on alone.  Surely better go on
alone.But then the tears on his feet: and her face that would face him as
he left her!  No, no.  The next life was his.  He was master of the
after-life.  Why fear for this life?  Why not take the soul she
offered him?  Now and for ever, for the life that would come when
they both were dead.  Take her into the underworld.  Take her into
the dark Hades with him, like Francesca and Paolo.  And in hell
hold her fast, queen of the underworld, himself master of the
underworld.  Master of the life to come.  Father of the soul that
would come after.'Listen,' he said to her softly.  'Now you are mine.  In the dark
you are mine.  And when you die you are mine.  But in the day you
are not mine, because I have no power in the day.  In the night, in
the dark, and in death, you are mine.  And that is for ever.  No
matter if I must leave you.  I shall come again from time to time.
In the dark you are mine.  But in the day I cannot claim you.  I
have no power in the day, and no place.  So remember.  When the
darkness comes, I shall always be in the darkness of you.  And as
long as I live, from time to time I shall come to find you, when I
am able to, when I am not a prisoner.  But I shall have to go away
soon.  So don't forget - you are the night wife of the ladybird,
while you live and even when you die.'Later, when he took her back to her room, he saw the door still
ajar.'You shouldn't leave a light in your room,' he murmured.In the morning there was a curious remote look about him.  He was
quieter than ever, and seemed very far away.  Daphne slept late.
She had a strange feeling as if she had slipped off all her cares.
She did not care, she did not grieve, she did not fret any more.
All that had left her.  She felt she could sleep, sleep, sleep - for
ever.  Her face, too, was very still, with a delicate look of
virginity that she had never had before.  She had always been
Aphrodite, the self-conscious one.  And her eyes, the green-blue,
had been like slow, living jewels, resistant.  Now they had
unfolded from the hard flower-bud, and had the wonder, and the
stillness of a quiet night.Basil noticed it at once.'You're different, Daphne,' he said.  'What are you thinking
about?''I wasn't thinking,' she said, looking at him with candour.'What were you doing then?''What does one do when one doesn't think?  Don't make me puzzle it
out, Basil.''Not a bit of it, if you don't want to.'But he was puzzled by her.  The sting of his ecstatic love for her
seemed to have left him.  Yet he did not know what else to do but
to make love to her.  She went very pale.  She submitted to him,
bowing her head because she was his wife.  But she looked at him
with fear, with sorrow, with real suffering.  He could feel the
heaving of her breast, and knew she was weeping.  But there were no
tears on her face, she was only death pale.  Her eyes were shut.'Are you in pain?' he asked her.'No! no!'  She opened her eyes, afraid lest she had disturbed him.
She did not want to disturb him.He was puzzled.  His own ecstatic, deadly love for her had received
a check.  He was out of the reckoning.He watched her when she was with the Count.  Then she seemed so
meek - so maidenly - so different from what he had known of her.  She
was so still, like a virgin girl.  And it was this quiet, intact
quality of Virginity in her which puzzled him most, puzzled his
emotions and his ideas.  He became suddenly ashamed to make love to
her.  And because he was ashamed, he said to her as he stood in her
room that night:'Daphne, are you in love with the Count?'He was standing by the dressing-table, uneasy.  She was seated in a
low chair by the tiny dying wood fire.  She looked up at him with
wide, slow eyes.  Without a word, with wide, soft, dilated eyes she
watched him.  What was it that made him feel all confused?  He
turned his face aside, away from her wide, soft eyes.'Pardon me, dear.  I didn't intend to ask such a question.  Don't
take any notice of it,' he said.  And he strode away and picked up
a book.  She lowered her head and gazed abstractedly into the fire,
without a sound.  Then he looked at her again, at her bright hair
that the maid had plaited for the night.  Her plait hung down over
her soft pinkish wrap.  His heart softened to her as he saw her
sitting there.  She seemed like his sister.  The excitement of
desire had left him, and now he seemed to see clear and feel true
for the first time in his life.  She was like a dear, dear sister
to him.  He felt that she was his blood-sister, nearer to him than
he had imagined any woman could be.  So near - so dear - and all the
sex and the desire gone.  He didn't want it - he hadn't wanted it.
This new pure feeling was so much more wonderful.He went to her side.'Forgive me, darling,' he said, 'for having questioned you.'She looked up at him with the wide eyes, without a word.  His face
was good and beautiful.  Tears came to her eyes.'You have the right to question me,' she said sadly.'No,' he said.  'No, darling.  I have no right to question you.
Daphne!  Daphne, darling!  It shall be as YOU wish, between us.
Shall it?  Shall it be as you wish?''You are the husband, Basil,' she said sadly.'Yes, darling.  But' - he went on his knees beside her - 'perhaps,
darling, something has changed in us.  I feel as if I ought never
to touch you again - as if I never WANTED to touch you - in that way.
I feel it was wrong, darling.  Tell me what you think.''Basil, don't be angry with me.''It isn't anger; it's pure love, darling - it is.''Let us not come any nearer to one another than this, Basil - 
physically - shall we?' she said.  'And don't be angry with me, will
you?''Why,' he said.  'I think myself the sexual part has been a
mistake.  I had rather love you - as I love now.  I KNOW that this
is true love.  The other was always a bit whipped up.  I KNOW I
love you now, darling: now I'm free from that other.  But what if
it comes upon me, that other, Daphne?''I am always your wife,' she said quietly.  'I am always your wife.
I want always to obey you, Basil: what you wish.''Give me your hand, dear.'She gave him her hand.  But the look in her eyes at the same time
warned him and frightened him.  He kissed her hand and left her.It was to the Count she belonged.  This had decided itself in her
down to the depths of her soul.  If she could not marry him and be
his wife in the world, it had nevertheless happened to her for
ever.  She could no more question it.  Question had gone out of
her.Strange how different she had become - a strange new quiescence.
The last days were slipping past.  He would be going away - Dionys:
he with the still remote face, the man she belonged to in the dark
and in the light, for ever.  He would be going away.  He said it
must be so.  And she acquiesced.  The grief was deep, deep inside
her.  He must go away.  Their lives could not be one life, in this
world's day.  Even in her anguish she knew it was so.  She knew he
was right.  He was for her infallible.  He spoke the deepest soul
in her.She never SAW him as a lover.  When she saw him, he was the little
officer, a prisoner, quiet, claiming nothing in all the world.  And
when she went to him as his lover, his wife, it was always dark.
She only knew his voice and his contact in darkness.  'My wife in
darkness,' he said to her.  And in this too she believed him.  She
would not have contradicted him, no, not for anything on earth:
lest contradicting him she should lose the dark treasures of
stillness and bliss which she kept in her breast even when her
heart was wrung with the agony of knowing he must go.No, she had found this wonderful thing after she had heard him
singing: she had suddenly collapsed away from her old self into
this darkness, this peace, this quiescence that was like a full
dark river flowing eternally in her soul.  She had gone to sleep
from the nuit blanche of her days.  And Basil, wonderful, had
changed almost at once.  She feared him, lest he might change back
again.  She would always have him to fear.  But deep inside her she
only feared for this love of hers for the Count: this dark,
everlasting love that was like a full river flowing for ever inside
her.  Ah, let that not be broken.She was so still inside her.  She could sit so still, and feel the
day slowly, richly changing to night.  And she wanted nothing, she
was short of nothing.  If only Dionys need not go away!  If only he
need not go away!But he said to her, the last morning:'Don't forget me.  Always remember me.  I leave my soul in your
hands and your womb.  Nothing can ever separate us, unless we
betray one another.  If you have to give yourself to your husband,
do so, and obey him.  If you are true to me, innerly, innerly true,
he will not hurt us.  He is generous, be generous to him.  And
never fail to believe in me.  Because even on the other side of
death I shall be watching for you.  I shall be king in Hades when I
am dead.  And you will be at my side.  You will never leave me any
more, in the after-death.  So don't be afraid in life.  Don't be
afraid.  If you have to cry tears, cry them.  But in your heart of
hearts know that I shall come again, and that I have taken you for
ever.  And so, in your heart of hearts be still, be still, since
you are the wife of the ladybird.'  He laughed as he left her, with
his own beautiful, fearless laugh.  But they were strange eyes that
looked after him.He went in the car with Basil back to Voynich Hall.'I believe Daphne will miss you,' said Basil.The Count did not reply for some moments.'Well, if she does,' he said, 'there will be no bitterness in it.''Are you sure?' smiled Basil.'Why - if we are sure of anything,' smiled the Count.'She's changed, isn't she?''Is she?''Yes, she's quite changed since you came, Count.''She does not seem to me so very different from the girl of
seventeen whom I knew.''No - perhaps not.  I didn't know her then.  But she's very
different from the wife I have known.''A regrettable difference?''Well - no, not as far as she goes.  She is much quieter inside
herself.  You know, Count, something of me died in the war.  I feel
it will take me an eternity to sit and think about it all.''I hope you may think it out to your satisfaction, Major.''Yes, I hope so too.  But that is how it has left me - feeling as if
I needed eternity now to brood about it all, you know.  Without the
need to act - or even to love, really.  I suppose love is action.''Intense action,' said the Count.'Quite so.  I know really how I feel.  I only ask of life to spare
me from further effort of action of any sort - even love.  And then
to fulfil myself, brooding through eternity.  Of course, I don't
mind WORK, mechanical action.  That in itself is a form of
inaction.''A man can only be happy following his own inmost need,' said the
Count.'Exactly!' said Basil.  'I will lay down the law for nobody, not
even for myself.  And live my day - ''Then you will be happy in your own way.  I find it so difficult to
keep from laying the law down for myself,' said the Count.  'Only
the thought of death and the after life saves me from doing it any
more.''As the thought of eternity helps me,' said Basil.  'I suppose it
amounts to the same thing.'>


Fine old Christmas, with the snowy hair and ruddy face, had done his
duty that year in the noblest fashion, and had set off his rich gifts
of warmth and color with all the heightening contrast of frost and
snow.Snow lay on the croft and river-bank in undulations softer than the
limbs of infancy; it lay with the neatliest finished border on every
sloping roof, making the dark-red gables stand out with a new depth of
color; it weighed heavily on the laurels and fir-trees, till it fell
from them with a shuddering sound; it clothed the rough turnip-field
with whiteness, and made the sheep look like dark blotches; the gates
were all blocked up with the sloping drifts, and here and there a
disregarded four-footed beast stood as if petrified &quot;in unrecumbent
sadness&quot;; there was no gleam, no shadow, for the heavens, too, were
one still, pale cloud; no sound or motion in anything but the dark
river that flowed and moaned like an unresting sorrow. But old
Christmas smiled as he laid this cruel-seeming spell on the outdoor
world, for he meant to light up home with new brightness, to deepen
all the richness of indoor color, and give a keener edge of delight to
the warm fragrance of food; he meant to prepare a sweet imprisonment
that would strengthen the primitive fellowship of kindred, and make
the sunshine of familiar human faces as welcome as the hidden
day-star. His kindness fell but hardly on the homeless, - fell but
hardly on the homes where the hearth was not very warm, and where the
food had little fragrance; where the human faces had had no sunshine
in them, but rather the leaden, blank-eyed gaze of unexpectant want.
But the fine old season meant well; and if he has not learned the
secret how to bless men impartially, it is because his father Time,
with ever-unrelenting unrelenting purpose, still hides that secret in
his own mighty, slow-beating heart.And yet this Christmas day, in spite of Tom's fresh delight in home,
was not, he thought, somehow or other, quite so happy as it had always
been before. The red berries were just as abundant on the holly, and
he and Maggie had dressed all the windows and mantlepieces and
picture-frames on Christmas eve with as much taste as ever, wedding
the thick-set scarlet clusters with branches of the black-berried ivy.
There had been singing under the windows after midnight, - supernatural
singing, Maggie always felt, in spite of Tom's contemptuous insistence
that the singers were old Patch, the parish clerk, and the rest of the
church choir; she trembled with awe when their carolling broke in upon
her dreams, and the image of men in fustian clothes was always thrust
away by the vision of angels resting on the parted cloud. The midnight
chant had helped as usual to lift the morning above the level of
common days; and then there were the smell of hot toast and ale from
the kitchen, at the breakfast hour; the favorite anthem, the green
boughs, and the short sermon gave the appropriate festal character to
the church-going; and aunt and uncle Moss, with all their seven
children, were looking like so many reflectors of the bright
parlor-fire, when the church-goers came back, stamping the snow from
their feet. The plum-pudding was of the same handsome roundness as
ever, and came in with the symbolic blue flames around it, as if it
had been heroically snatched from the nether fires, into which it had
been thrown by dyspeptic Puritans; the dessert was as splendid as
ever, with its golden oranges, brown nuts, and the crystalline light
and dark of apple-jelly and damson cheese; in all these things
Christmas was as it had always been since Tom could remember; it was
only distinguished, it by anything, by superior sliding and snowballs.Christmas was cheery, but not so Mr. Tulliver. He was irate and
defiant; and Tom, though he espoused his father's quarrels and shared
his father's sense of injury, was not without some of the feeling that
oppressed Maggie when Mr. Tulliver got louder and more angry in
narration and assertion with the increased leisure of dessert. The
attention that Tom might have concentrated on his nuts and wine was
distracted by a sense that there were rascally enemies in the world,
and that the business of grown-up life could hardly be conducted
without a good deal of quarrelling. Now, Tom was not fond of
quarrelling, unless it could soon be put an end to by a fair stand-up
fight with an adversary whom he had every chance of thrashing; and his
father's irritable talk made him uncomfortable, though he never
accounted to himself for the feeling, or conceived the notion that his
father was faulty in this respect.The particular embodiment of the evil principle now exciting Mr.
Tulliver's determined resistance was Mr. Pivart, who, having lands
higher up the Ripple, was taking measures for their irrigation, which
either were, or would be, or were bound to be (on the principle that
water was water), an infringement on Mr. Tulliver's legitimate share
of water-power. Dix, who had a mill on the stream, was a feeble
auxiliary of Old Harry compared with Pivart. Dix had been brought to
his senses by arbitration, and Wakem's advice had not carriedhimfar. No; Dix, Mr. Tulliver considered, had been as good as nowhere in
point of law; and in the intensity of his indignation against Pivart,
his contempt for a baffled adversary like Dix began to wear the air of
a friendly attachment. He had no male audience to-day except Mr. Moss,
who knew nothing, as he said, of the &quot;natur' o' mills,&quot; and could only
assent to Mr. Tulliver's arguments on thea prioriground of family
relationship and monetary obligation; but Mr. Tulliver did not talk
with the futile intention of convincing his audience, he talked to
relieve himself; while good Mr. Moss made strong efforts to keep his
eyes wide open, in spite of the sleepiness which an unusually good
dinner produced in his hard-worked frame. Mrs. Moss, more alive to the
subject, and interested in everything that affected her brother,
listened and put in a word as often as maternal preoccupations
allowed.&quot;Why, Pivart's a new name hereabout, brother, isn't it?&quot; she said; &quot;he
didn't own the land in father's time, nor yours either, before I was
married.&quot;&quot;New name? Yes, I should think itisa new name,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver,
with angry emphasis. &quot;Dorlcote Mill's been in our family a hundred
year and better, and nobody ever heard of a Pivart meddling with the
river, till this fellow came and bought Bincome's farm out of hand,
before anybody else could so much as say 'snap.' But I'llPivarthim!&quot; added Mr. Tulliver, lifting his glass with a sense that he had
defined his resolution in an unmistakable manner.&quot;You won't be forced to go to law with him, I hope, brother?&quot; said
Mrs. Moss, with some anxiety.&quot;I don't know what I shall be forced to; but I know what I shall forcehimto, with his dikes and erigations, if there's any law to be
brought to bear o' the right side. I know well enough who's at the
bottom of it; he's got Wakem to back him and egg him on. I know Wakem
tells him the law can't touch him for it, but there's folks can handle
the law besides Wakem. It takes a big raskil to beat him; but there's
bigger to be found, as know more o' th' ins and outs o' the law, else
how came Wakem to lose Brumley's suit for him?&quot;Mr. Tulliver was a strictly honest man, and proud of being honest, but
he considered that in law the ends of justice could only be achieved
by employing a stronger knave to frustrate a weaker. Law was a sort of
cock-fight, in which it was the business of injured honesty to get a
game bird with the best pluck and the strongest spurs.&quot;Gore's no fool; you needn't tell me that,&quot; he observed presently, in
a pugnacious tone, as if poor Gritty had been urging that lawyer's
capabilities; &quot;but, you see, he isn't up to the law as Wakem is. And
water's a very particular thing; you can't pick it up with a
pitchfork. That's why it's been nuts to Old Harry and the lawyers.
It's plain enough what's the rights and the wrongs of water, if you
look at it straight-forrard; for a river's a river, and if you've got
a mill, you must have water to turn it; and it's no use telling me
Pivart's erigation and nonsense won't stop my wheel; I know what
belongs to water better than that. Talk to me o' what th' engineers
say! I say it's common sense, as Pivart's dikes must do me an injury.
But if that's their engineering, I'll put Tom to it by-and-by, and he
shall see if he can't find a bit more sense in th' engineering
business than whatthatcomes to.&quot;Tom, looking round with some anxiety at this announcement of his
prospects, unthinkingly withdrew a small rattle he was amusing baby
Moss with, whereupon she, being a baby that knew her own mind with
remarkable clearness, instantaneously expressed her sentiments in a
piercing yell, and was not to be appeased even by the restoration of
the rattle, feeling apparently that the original wrong of having it
taken from her remained in all its force. Mrs. Moss hurried away with
her into another room, and expressed to Mrs. Tulliver, who accompanied
her, the conviction that the dear child had good reasons for crying;
implying that if it was supposed to be the rattle that baby clamored
for, she was a misunderstood baby. The thoroughly justifiable yell
being quieted, Mrs. Moss looked at her sister-in-law and said, -&quot;I'm sorry to see brother so put out about this water work.&quot;&quot;It's your brother's way, Mrs. Moss; I'd never anything o' that sort
before I was married,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, with a half-implied
reproach. She always spoke of her husband as &quot;your brother&quot; to Mrs.
Moss in any case when his line of conduct was not matter of pure
admiration. Amiable Mrs. Tulliver, who was never angry in her life,
had yet her mild share of that spirit without which she could hardly
have been at once a Dodson and a woman. Being always on the defensive
toward her own sisters, it was natural that she should be keenly
conscious of her superiority, even as the weakest Dodson, over a
husband's sister, who, besides being poorly off, and inclined to &quot;hang
on&quot; her brother, had the good-natured submissiveness of a large,
easy-tempered, untidy, prolific woman, with affection enough in her
not only for her own husband and abundant children, but for any number
of collateral relations.&quot;I hope and pray he won't go to law,&quot; said Mrs. Moss, &quot;for there's
never any knowing where that'll end. And the right doesn't allays win.
This Mr. Pivart's a rich man, by what I can make out, and the rich
mostly get things their own way.&quot;&quot;As to that,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, stroking her dress down, &quot;I've seen
what riches are in my own family; for my sisters have got husbands as
can afford to do pretty much what they like. But I think sometimes I
shall be drove off my head with the talk about this law and erigation;
and my sisters lay all the fault to me, for they don't know what it is
to marry a man like your brother; how should they? Sister Pullet has
her own way from morning till night.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Mrs. Moss, &quot;I don't think I should like my husband if he
hadn't got any wits of his own, and I had to find head-piece for him.
It's a deal easier to do what pleases one's husband, than to be
puzzling what else one should do.&quot;&quot;If people come to talk o' doing what pleases their husbands,&quot; said
Mrs. Tulliver, with a faint imitation of her sister Glegg, &quot;I'm sure
your brother might have waited a long while before he'd have found a
wife that 'ud have let him have his say in everything, as I do. It's
nothing but law and erigation now, from when we first get up in the
morning till we go to bed at night; and I never contradict him; I only
say, 'Well, Mr. Tulliver, do as you like; but whativer you do, don't
go to law.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver, as we have seen, was not without influence over her
husband. No woman is; she can always incline him to do either what she
wishes, or the reverse; and on the composite impulses that were
threatening to hurry Mr. Tulliver into &quot;law,&quot; Mrs. Tulliver's
monotonous pleading had doubtless its share of force; it might even be
comparable to that proverbial feather which has the credit or
discredit of breaking the camel's back; though, on a strictly
impartial view, the blame ought rather to lie with the previous weight
of feathers which had already placed the back in such imminent peril
that an otherwise innocent feather could not settle on it without
mischief. Not that Mrs. Tulliver's feeble beseeching could have had
this feather's weight in virtue of her single personality; but
whenever she departed from entire assent to her husband, he saw in her
the representative of the Dodson family; and it was a guiding
principle with Mr. Tulliver to let the Dodsons know that they were not
to domineer overhim, or - more specifically - that a male Tulliver
was far more than equal to four female Dodsons, even though one of
them was Mrs. Glegg.But not even a direct argument from that typical Dodson female herself
against his going to law could have heightened his disposition toward
it so much as the mere thought of Wakem, continually freshened by the
sight of the too able attorney on market-days. Wakem, to his certain
knowledge, was (metaphorically speaking) at the bottom of Pivart's
irrigation; Wakem had tried to make Dix stand out, and go to law about
the dam; it was unquestionably Wakem who had caused Mr. Tulliver to
lose the suit about the right of road and the bridge that made a
thoroughfare of his land for every vagabond who preferred an
opportunity of damaging private property to walking like an honest man
along the highroad; all lawyers were more or less rascals, but Wakem's
rascality was of that peculiarly aggravated kind which placed itself
in opposition to that form of right embodied in Mr. Tulliver's
interests and opinions. And as an extra touch of bitterness, the
injured miller had recently, in borrowing the five hundred pounds,
been obliged to carry a little business to Wakem's office on his own
account. A hook-nosed glib fellow! as cool as a cucumber, - always
looking so sure of his game! And it was vexatious that Lawyer Gore was
not more like him, but was a bald, round-featured man, with bland
manners and fat hands; a game-cock that you would be rash to bet upon
against Wakem. Gore was a sly fellow. His weakness did not lie on the
side of scrupulosity; but the largest amount of winking, however
significant, is not equivalent to seeing through a stone wall; and
confident as Mr. Tulliver was in his principle that water was water,
and in the direct inference that Pivart had not a leg to stand on in
this affair of irrigation, he had an uncomfortable suspicion that
Wakem had more law to show against this (rationally) irrefragable
inference than Gore could show for it. But then, if they went to law,
there was a chance for Mr. Tulliver to employ Counsellor Wylde on his
side, instead of having that admirable bully against him; and the
prospect of seeing a witness of Wakem's made to perspire and become
confounded, as Mr. Tulliver's witness had once been, was alluring to
the love of retributive justice.Much rumination had Mr. Tulliver on these puzzling subjects during his
rides on the gray horse; much turning of the head from side to side,
as the scales dipped alternately; but the probable result was still
out of sight, only to be reached through much hot argument and
iteration in domestic and social life. That initial stage of the
dispute which consisted in the narration of the case and the
enforcement of Mr. Tulliver's views concerning it throughout the
entire circle of his connections would necessarily take time; and at
the beginning of February, when Tom was going to school again, there
were scarcely any new items to be detected in his father's statement
of the case against Pivart, or any more specific indication of the
measures he was bent on taking against that rash contravener of the
principle that water was water. Iteration, like friction, is likely to
generate heat instead of progress, and Mr. Tulliver's heat was
certainly more and more palpable. If there had been no new evidence on
any other point, there had been new evidence that Pivart was as &quot;thick
as mud&quot; with Wakem.&quot;Father,&quot; said Tom, one evening near the end of the holidays, &quot;uncle
Glegg says Lawyer Wakemisgoing to send his son to Mr. Stelling. It
isn't true, what they said about his going to be sent to France. You
won't like me to go to school with Wakem's son, shall you?&quot;&quot;It's no matter for that, my boy,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver; &quot;don't you learn
anything bad of him, that's all. The lad's a poor deformed creatur,
and takes after his mother in the face; I think there isn't much of
his father in him. It's a sign Wakem thinks high o' Mr. Sterling, as
he sends his son to him, and Wakem knows meal from bran.&quot;Mr. Tulliver in his heart was rather proud of the fact that his son
was to have the same advantages as Wakem's; but Tom was not at all
easy on the point. It would have been much clearer if the lawyer's son
had not been deformed, for then Tom would have had the prospect of
pitching into him with all that freedom which is derived from a high
moral sanction.>


So Tom went on even to the fifth half-year - till he was turned
sixteen - at King's Lorton, while Maggie was growing with a rapidity
which her aunts considered highly reprehensible, at Miss Firniss's
boarding-school in the ancient town of Laceham on the Floss, with
cousin Lucy for her companion. In her early letters to Tom she had
always sent her love to Philip, and asked many questions about him,
which were answered by brief sentences about Tom's toothache, and a
turf-house which he was helping to build in the garden, with other
items of that kind. She was pained to hear Tom say in the holidays
that Philip was as queer as ever again, and often cross. They were no
longer very good friends, she perceived; and when she reminded Tom
that he ought always to love Philip for being so good to him when his
foot was bad, he answered: &quot;Well, it isn't my fault;Idon't do
anything to him.&quot; She hardly ever saw Philip during the remainder of
their school-life; in the Midsummer holidays he was always away at the
seaside, and at Christmas she could only meet him at long intervals in
the street of St. Ogg's. When they did meet, she remembered her
promise to kiss him, but, as a young lady who had been at a
boarding-school, she knew now that such a greeting was out of the
question, and Philip would not expect it. The promise was void, like
so many other sweet, illusory promises of our childhood; void as
promises made in Eden before the seasons were divided, and when the
starry blossoms grew side by side with the ripening peach, - impossible
to be fulfilled when the golden gates had been passed.But when their father was actually engaged in the long-threatened
lawsuit, and Wakem, as the agent at once of Pivart and Old Harry, was
acting against him, even Maggie felt, with some sadness, that they
were not likely ever to have any intimacy with Philip again; the very
name of Wakem made her father angry, and she had once heard him say
that if that crook-backed son lived to inherit his father's ill-gotten
gains, there would be a curse upon him. &quot;Have as little to do with him
at school as you can, my lad,&quot; he said to Tom; and the command was
obeyed the more easily because Mr. Sterling by this time had two
additional pupils; for though this gentleman's rise in the world was
not of that meteor-like rapidity which the admirers of his
extemporaneous eloquence had expected for a preacher whose voice
demanded so wide a sphere, he had yet enough of growing prosperity to
enable him to increase his expenditure in continued disproportion to
his income.As for Tom's school course, it went on with mill-like monotony, his
mind continuing to move with a slow, half-stifled pulse in a medium
uninteresting or unintelligible ideas. But each vacation he brought
home larger and larger drawings with the satiny rendering of
landscape, and water-colors in vivid greens, together with manuscript
books full of exercises and problems, in which the handwriting was all
the finer because he gave his whole mind to it. Each vacation he
brought home a new book or two, indicating his progress through
different stages of history, Christian doctrine, and Latin literature;
and that passage was not entirely without results, besides the
possession of the books. Tom's ear and tongue had become accustomed to
a great many words and phrases which are understood to be signs of an
educated condition; and though he had never really applied his mind to
any one of his lessons, the lessons had left a deposit of vague,
fragmentary, ineffectual notions. Mr. Tulliver, seeing signs of
acquirement beyond the reach of his own criticism, thought it was
probably all right with Tom's education; he observed, indeed, that
there were no maps, and not enough &quot;summing&quot;; but he made no formal
complaint to Mr. Stelling. It was a puzzling business, this schooling;
and if he took Tom away, where could he send him with better effect?By the time Tom had reached his last quarter at King's Lorton, the
years had made striking changes in him since the day we saw him
returning from Mr. Jacobs's academy. He was a tall youth now, carrying
himself without the least awkwardness, and speaking without more
shyness than was a becoming symptom of blended diffidence and pride;
he wore his tail-coat and his stand-up collars, and watched the down
on his lip with eager impatience, looking every day at his virgin
razor, with which he had provided himself in the last holidays. Philip
had already left, - at the autumn quarter, - that he might go to the
south for the winter, for the sake of his health; and this change
helped to give Tom the unsettled, exultant feeling that usually
belongs to the last months before leaving school. This quarter, too,
there was some hope of his father's lawsuit being decided;thatmade
the prospect of home more entirely pleasurable. For Tom, who had
gathered his view of the case from his father's conversation, had no
doubt that Pivart would be beaten.Tom had not heard anything from home for some weeks, - a fact which did
not surprise him, for his father and mother were not apt to manifest
their affection in unnecessary letters, - when, to his great surprise,
on the morning of a dark, cold day near the end of November, he was
told, soon after entering the study at nine o'clock, that his sister
was in the drawing-room. It was Mrs. Stelling who had come into the
study to tell him, and she left him to enter the drawing-room alone.Maggie, too, was tall now, with braided and coiled hair; she was
almost as tall as Tom, though she was only thirteen; and she really
looked older than he did at that moment. She had thrown off her
bonnet, her heavy braids were pushed back from her forehead, as if it
would not bear that extra load, and her young face had a strangely
worn look, as her eyes turned anxiously toward the door. When Tom
entered she did not speak, but only went up to him, put her arms round
his neck, and kissed him earnestly. He was used to various moods of
hers, and felt no alarm at the unusual seriousness of her greeting.&quot;Why, how is it you're come so early this cold morning, Maggie? Did
you come in the gig?&quot; said Tom, as she backed toward the sofa, and
drew him to her side.&quot;No, I came by the coach. I've walked from the turnpike.&quot;&quot;But how is it you're not at school? The holidays have not begun yet?&quot;&quot;Father wanted me at home,&quot; said Maggie, with a slight trembling of
the lip. &quot;I came home three or four days ago.&quot;&quot;Isn't my father well?&quot; said Tom, rather anxiously.&quot;Not quite,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;He's very unhappy, Tom. The lawsuit is
ended, and I came to tell you because I thought it would be better for
you to know it before you came home, and I didn't like only to send
you a letter.&quot;&quot;My father hasn't lost?&quot; said Tom, hastily, springing from the sofa,
and standing before Maggie with his hands suddenly thrust into his
pockets.&quot;Yes, dear Tom,&quot; said Maggie, looking up at him with trembling.Tom was silent a minute or two, with his eyes fixed on the floor. Then
he said:&quot;My father will have to pay a good deal of money, then?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Maggie, rather faintly.&quot;Well, it can't be helped,&quot; said Tom, bravely, not translating the
loss of a large sum of money into any tangible results. &quot;But my
father's very much vexed, I dare say?&quot; he added, looking at Maggie,
and thinking that her agitated face was only part of her girlish way
of taking things.&quot;Yes,&quot; said Maggie, again faintly. Then, urged to fuller speech by
Tom's freedom from apprehension, she said loudly and rapidly, as if
the wordswouldburst from her: &quot;Oh, Tom, he will lose the mill and
the land and everything; he will have nothing left.&quot;Tom's eyes flashed out one look of surprise at her, before he turned
pale, and trembled visibly. He said nothing, but sat down on the sofa
again, looking vaguely out of the opposite window.Anxiety about the future had never entered Tom's mind. His father had
always ridden a good horse, kept a good house, and had the cheerful,
confident air of a man who has plenty of property to fall back upon.
Tom had never dreamed that his father would &quot;fail&quot;;thatwas a form
of misfortune which he had always heard spoken of as a deep disgrace,
and disgrace was an idea that he could not associate with any of his
relations, least of all with his father. A proud sense of family
respectability was part of the very air Tom had been born and brought
up in. He knew there were people in St. Ogg's who made a show without
money to support it, and he had always heard such people spoken of by
his own friends with contempt and reprobation. He had a strong belief,
which was a lifelong habit, and required no definite evidence to rest
on, that his father could spend a great deal of money if he chose; and
since his education at Mr. Stelling's had given him a more expensive
view of life, he had often thought that when he got older he would
make a figure in the world, with his horse and dogs and saddle, and
other accoutrements of a fine young man, and show himself equal to any
of his contemporaries at St. Ogg's, who might consider themselves a
grade above him in society because their fathers were professional
men, or had large oil-mills. As to the prognostics and headshaking of
his aunts and uncles, they had never produced the least effect on him,
except to make him think that aunts and uncles were disagreeable
society; he had heard them find fault in much the same way as long as
he could remember. His father knew better than they did.The down had come on Tom's lip, yet his thoughts and expectations had
been hitherto only the reproduction, in changed forms, of the boyish
dreams in which he had lived three years ago. He was awakened now with
a violent shock.Maggie was frightened at Tom's pale, trembling silence. There was
something else to tell him, - something worse. She threw her arms round
him at last, and said, with a half sob:&quot;Oh, Tom - dear, dear Tom, don't fret too much; try and bear it well.&quot;Tom turned his cheek passively to meet her entreating kisses, and
there gathered a moisture in his eyes, which he just rubbed away with
his hand. The action seemed to rouse him, for he shook himself and
said: &quot;I shall go home, with you, Maggie. Didn't my father say I was
to go?&quot;&quot;No, Tom, father didn't wish it,&quot; said Maggie, her anxiety abouthisfeeling helping her to master her agitation. Whatwouldhe do when
she told him all? &quot;But mother wants you to come, - poor mother! - she
cries so. Oh, Tom, it's very dreadful at home.&quot;Maggie's lips grew whiter, and she began to tremble almost as Tom had
done. The two poor things clung closer to each other, both
trembling, - the one at an unshapen fear, the other at the image of a
terrible certainty. When Maggie spoke, it was hardly above a whisper.&quot;And - and - poor father -  - &quot;Maggie could not utter it. But the suspense was intolerable to Tom. A
vague idea of going to prison, as a consequence of debt, was the shape
his fears had begun to take.&quot;Where's my father?&quot; he said impatiently. &quot;Tellme, Maggie.&quot;&quot;He's at home,&quot; said Maggie, finding it easier to reply to that
question. &quot;But,&quot; she added, after a pause, &quot;not himself - he fell off
his horse. He has known nobody but me ever since - he seems to have
lost his senses. O father, father -  - &quot;With these last words, Maggie's sobs burst forth with the more
violence for the previous struggle against them. Tom felt that
pressure of the heart which forbids tears; he had no distinct vision
of their troubles as Maggie had, who had been at home; he only felt
the crushing weight of what seemed unmitigated misfortune. He
tightened his arm almost convulsively round Maggie as she sobbed, but
his face looked rigid and tearless, his eyes blank, - as if a black
curtain of cloud had suddenly fallen on his path.But Maggie soon checked herself abruptly; a single thought had acted
on her like a startling sound.&quot;We must set out, Tom, we must not stay. Father will miss me; we must
be at the turnpike at ten to meet the coach.&quot; She said this with hasty
decision, rubbing her eyes, and rising to seize her bonnet.Tom at once felt the same impulse, and rose too. &quot;Wait a minute,
Maggie,&quot; he said. &quot;I must speak to Mr. Stelling, and then we'll go.&quot;He thought he must go to the study where the pupils were; but on his
way he met Mr. Stelling, who had heard from his wife that Maggie
appeared to be in trouble when she asked for her brother, and now that
he thought the brother and sister had been alone long enough, was
coming to inquire and offer his sympathy.&quot;Please, sir, I must go home,&quot; Tom said abruptly, as he met Mr.
Stelling in the passage. &quot;I must go back with my sister directly. My
father's lost his lawsuit - he's lost all his property - and he's very
ill.&quot;Mr. Stelling felt like a kind-hearted man; he foresaw a probable money
loss for himself, but this had no appreciable share in his feeling,
while he looked with grave pity at the brother and sister for whom
youth and sorrow had begun together. When he knew how Maggie had come,
and how eager she was to get home again, he hurried their departure,
only whispering something to Mrs. Stelling, who had followed him, and
who immediately left the room.Tom and Maggie were standing on the door-step, ready to set out, when
Mrs. Stelling came with a little basket, which she hung on Maggie's
arm, saying: &quot;Do remember to eat something on the way, dear.&quot; Maggie's
heart went out toward this woman whom she had never liked, and she
kissed her silently. It was the first sign within the poor child of
that new sense which is the gift of sorrow, - that susceptibility to
the bare offices of humanity which raises them into a bond of loving
fellowship, as to haggard men among the ice-bergs the mere presence of
an ordinary comrade stirs the deep fountains of affection.Mr. Stelling put his hand on Tom's shoulder and said: &quot;God bless you,
my boy; let me know how you get on.&quot; Then he pressed Maggie's hand;
but there were no audible good-byes. Tom had so often thought how
joyful he should be the day he left school &quot;for good&quot;! And now his
school years seemed like a holiday that had come to an end.The two slight youthful figures soon grew indistinct on the distant
road, - were soon lost behind the projecting hedgerow.They had gone forth together into their life of sorrow, and they would
never more see the sunshine undimmed by remembered cares. They had
entered the thorny wilderness, and the golden gates of their childhood
had forever closed behind them.>


Poor Tom bore his severe pain heroically, and was resolute in not
&quot;telling&quot; of Mr. Poulter more than was unavoidable; the five-shilling
piece remained a secret even to Maggie. But there was a terrible dread
weighing on his mind, so terrible that he dared not even ask the
question which might bring the fatal &quot;yes&quot;; he dared not ask the
surgeon or Mr. Stelling, &quot;Shall I be lame, Sir?&quot; He mastered himself
so as not to cry out at the pain; but when his foot had been dressed,
and he was left alone with Maggie seated by his bedside, the children
sobbed together, with their heads laid on the same pillow. Tom was
thinking of himself walking about on crutches, like the wheelwright's
son; and Maggie, who did not guess what was in his mind, sobbed for
company. It had not occurred to the surgeon or to Mr. Stelling to
anticipate this dread in Tom's mind, and to reassure him by hopeful
words. But Philip watched the surgeon out of the house, and waylaid
Mr. Stelling to ask the very question that Tom had not dared to ask
for himself.&quot;I beg your pardon, sir, - but does Mr. Askern say Tulliver will be
lame?&quot;&quot;Oh, no; oh, no,&quot; said Mr. Stelling, &quot;not permanently; only for a
little while.&quot;&quot;Did he tell Tulliver so, sir, do you think?&quot;&quot;No; nothing was said to him on the subject.&quot;&quot;Then may I go and tell him, sir?&quot;&quot;Yes, to be sure; now you mention it, I dare say he may be troubling
about that. Go to his bedroom, but be very quiet at present.&quot;It had been Philip's first thought when he heard of the
accident, - &quot;Will Tulliver be lame? It will be very hard for him if he
is&quot;; and Tom's hitherto unforgiven offences were washed out by that
pity. Philip felt that they were no longer in a state of repulsion,
but were being drawn into a common current of suffering and sad
privation. His imagination did not dwell on the outward calamity and
its future effect on Tom's life, but it made vividly present to him
the probable state of Tom's feeling. Philip had only lived fourteen
years, but those years had, most of them, been steeped in the sense of
a lot irremediably hard.&quot;Mr. Askern says you'll soon be all right again, Tulliver, did you
know?&quot; he said rather timidly, as he stepped gently up to Tom's bed.
&quot;I've just been to ask Mr. Stelling, and he says you'll walk as well
as ever again by-and-day.&quot;Tom looked up with that momentary stopping of the breath which comes
with a sudden joy; then he gave a long sigh, and turned his blue-gray
eyes straight on Philip's face, as he had not done for a fortnight or
more. As for Maggie, this intimation of a possibility she had not
thought of before affected her as a new trouble; the bare idea of
Tom's being always lame overpowered the assurance that such a
misfortune was not likely to befall him, and she clung to him and
cried afresh.&quot;Don't be a little silly, Magsie,&quot; said Tom, tenderly, feeling very
brave now. &quot;I shall soon get well.&quot;&quot;Good-by, Tulliver,&quot; said Philip, putting out his small, delicate
hand, which Tom clasped immediately with his more substantial fingers.&quot;I say,&quot; said Tom, &quot;ask Mr. Stelling to let you come and sit with me
sometimes, till I get up again, Wakem; and tell me about Robert Bruce,
you know.&quot;After that, Philip spent all his time out of school-hours with Tom and
Maggie. Tom liked to hear fighting stories as much as ever, but he
insisted strongly on the fact that those great fighters who did so
many wonderful things and came off unhurt, wore excellent armor from
head to foot, which made fighting easy work, he considered. He should
not have hurt his foot if he had had an iron shoe on. He listened with
great interest to a new story of Philip's about a man who had a very
bad wound in his foot, and cried out so dreadfully with the pain that
his friends could bear with him no longer, but put him ashore on a
desert island, with nothing but some wonderful poisoned arrows to kill
animals with for food.&quot;I didn't roar out a bit, you know,&quot; Tom said, &quot;and I dare say my foot
was as bad as his. It's cowardly to roar.&quot;But Maggie would have it that when anything hurt you very much, it was
quite permissible to cry out, and it was cruel of people not to bear
it. She wanted to know if Philoctetes had a sister, and whyshedidn't go with him on the desert island and take care of him.One day, soon after Philip had told this story, he and Maggie were in
the study alone together while Tom's foot was being dressed. Philip
was at his books, and Maggie, after sauntering idly round the room,
not caring to do anything in particular, because she would soon go to
Tom again, went and leaned on the table near Philip to see what he was
doing, for they were quite old friends now, and perfectly at home with
each other.&quot;What are you reading about in Greek?&quot; she said. &quot;It's poetry, I can
see that, because the lines are so short.&quot;&quot;It's about Philoctetes, the lame man I was telling you of yesterday,&quot;
he answered, resting his head on his hand, and looking at her as if he
were not at all sorry to be interrupted. Maggie, in her absent way,
continued to lean forward, resting on her arms and moving her feet
about, while her dark eyes got more and more fixed and vacant, as if
she had quite forgotten Philip and his book.&quot;Maggie,&quot; said Philip, after a minute or two, still leaning on his
elbow and looking at her, &quot;if you had had a brother like me, do you
think you should have loved him as well as Tom?&quot;Maggie started a little on being roused from her reverie, and said,
&quot;What?&quot; Philip repeated his question.&quot;Oh, yes, better,&quot; she answered immediately. &quot;No, not better; because
I don't think Icouldlove you better than Tom. But I should be so
sorry, -so sorryfor you.&quot;Philip colored; he had meant to imply, would she love him as well in
spite of his deformity, and yet when she alluded to it so plainly, he
winced under her pity. Maggie, young as she was, felt her mistake.
Hitherto she had instinctively behaved as if she were quite
unconscious of Philip's deformity; her own keen sensitiveness and
experience under family criticism sufficed to teach her this as well
as if she had been directed by the most finished breeding.&quot;But you are so very clever, Philip, and you can play and sing,&quot; she
added quickly. &quot;I wish youweremy brother. I'm very fond of you.
And you would stay at home with me when Tom went out, and you would
teach me everything; wouldn't you, - Greek and everything?&quot;&quot;But you'll go away soon, and go to school, Maggie,&quot; said Philip, &quot;and
then you'll forget all about me, and not care for me any more. And
then I shall see you when you're grown up, and you'll hardly take any
notice of me.&quot;&quot;Oh, no, I sha'n't forget you, I'm sure,&quot; said Maggie, shaking her
head very seriously. &quot;I never forget anything, and I think about
everybody when I'm away from them. I think about poor Yap; he's got a
lump in his throat, and Luke says he'll die. Only don't you tell Tom.
because it will vex him so. You never saw Yap; he's a queer little
dog, - nobody cares about him but Tom and me.&quot;&quot;Do you care as much about me as you do about Yap, Maggie?&quot; said
Philip, smiling rather sadly.&quot;Oh, yes, I should think so,&quot; said Maggie, laughing.&quot;I'm very fond ofyou, Maggie; I shall never forgetyou,&quot; said
Philip, &quot;and when I'm very unhappy, I shall always think of you, and
wish I had a sister with dark eyes, just like yours.&quot;&quot;Why do you like my eyes?&quot; said Maggie, well pleased. She had never
heard any one but her father speak of her eyes as if they had merit.&quot;I don't know,&quot; said Philip. &quot;They're not like any other eyes. They
seem trying to speak, - trying to speak kindly. I don't like other
people to look at me much, but I like you to look at me, Maggie.&quot;&quot;Why, I think you're fonder of me than Tom is,&quot; said Maggie, rather
sorrowfully. Then, wondering how she could convince Philip that she
could like him just as well, although he was crooked, she said:&quot;Should you like me to kiss you, as I do Tom? I will, if you like.&quot;&quot;Yes, very much; nobody kisses me.&quot;Maggie put her arm round his neck and kissed him quite earnestly.&quot;There now,&quot; she said, &quot;I shall always remember you, and kiss you when
I see you again, if it's ever so long. But I'll go now, because I
think Mr. Askern's done with Tom's foot.&quot;When their father came the second time, Maggie said to him, &quot;Oh,
father, Philip Wakem is so very good to Tom; he is such a clever boy,
and Idolove him. And you love him too, Tom, don't you?Sayyou
love him,&quot; she added entreatingly.Tom colored a little as he looked at his father, and said: &quot;I sha'n't
be friends with him when I leave school, father; but we've made it up
now, since my foot has been bad, and he's taught me to play at
draughts, and I can beat him.&quot;&quot;Well, well,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, &quot;if he's good to you, try and make
him amends, and be good tohim. He's a poor crooked creature, and
takes after his dead mother. But don't you be getting too thick with
him; he's got his father's blood in him too. Ay, ay, the gray colt may
chance to kick like his black sire.&quot;The jarring natures of the two boys effected what Mr. Tulliver's
admonition alone might have failed to effect; in spite of Philip's new
kindness, and Tom's answering regard in this time of his trouble, they
never became close friends. When Maggie was gone, and when Tom
by-and-by began to walk about as usual, the friendly warmth that had
been kindled by pity and gratitude died out by degrees, and left them
in their old relation to each other. Philip was often peevish and
contemptuous; and Tom's more specific and kindly impressions gradually
melted into the old background of suspicion and dislike toward him as
a queer fellow, a humpback, and the son of a rogue. If boys and men
are to be welded together in the glow of transient feeling, they must
be made of metal that will mix, else they inevitably fall asunder when
the heat dies out.>


The alterations of feeling in that first dialogue between Tom and
Philip continued to make their intercourse even after many weeks of
schoolboy intimacy. Tom never quite lost the feeling that Philip,
being the son of a &quot;rascal,&quot; was his natural enemy; never thoroughly
overcame his repulsion to Philip's deformity. He was a boy who adhered
tenaciously to impressions once received; as with all minds in which
mere perception predominates over thought and emotion, the external
remained to him rigidly what it was in the first instance. But then it
was impossible not to like Philip's company when he was in a good
humor; he could help one so well in one's Latin exercises, which Tom
regarded as a kind of puzzle that could only be found out by a lucky
chance; and he could tell such wonderful fighting stories about Hal of
the Wynd, for example, and other heroes who were especial favorites
with Tom, because they laid about them with heavy strokes. He had
small opinion of Saladin, whose cimeter could cut a cushion in two in
an instant; who wanted to cut cushions? That was a stupid story, and
he didn't care to hear it again. But when Robert Bruce, on the black
pony, rose in his stirrups, and lifting his good battle-axe, cracked
at once the helmet and the skull of the too hasty knight at
Bannockburn, then Tom felt all the exaltation of sympathy, and if he
had had a cocoanut at hand, he would have cracked it at once with the
poker. Philip in his happier moods indulged Tom to the top of his
bent, heightening the crash and bang and fury of every fight with all
the artillery of epithets and similes at his command. But he was not
always in a good humor or happy mood. The slight spurt of peevish
susceptibility which had escaped him in their first interview was a
symptom of a perpetually recurring mental ailment, half of it nervous
irritability, half of it the heart-bitterness produced by the sense of
his deformity. In these fits of susceptibility every glance seemed to
him to be charged either with offensive pity or with ill-repressed
disgust; at the very least it was an indifferent glance, and Philip
felt indifference as a child of the south feels the chill air of a
northern spring. Poor Tom's blundering patronage when they were out of
doors together would sometimes make him turn upon the well-meaning lad
quite savagely; and his eyes, usually sad and quiet, would flash with
anything but playful lightning. No wonder Tom retained his suspicions
of the humpback.But Philip's self-taught skill in drawing was another link between
them; for Tom found, to his disgust, that his new drawing-master gave
him no dogs and donkeys to draw, but brooks and rustic bridges and
ruins, all with a general softness of black-lead surface, indicating
that nature, if anything, was rather satiny; and as Tom's feeling for
the picturesque in landscape was at present quite latent, it is not
surprising that Mr. Goodrich's productions seemed to him an
uninteresting form of art. Mr. Tulliver, having a vague intention that
Tom should be put to some business which included the drawing out of
plans and maps, had complained to Mr. Riley, when he saw him at
Mudport, that Tom seemed to be learning nothing of that sort;
whereupon that obliging adviser had suggested that Tom should have
drawing-lessons. Mr. Tulliver must not mind paying extra for drawing;
let Tom be made a good draughtsman, and he would be able to turn his
pencil to any purpose. So it was ordered that Tom should have
drawing-lessons; and whom should Mr. Stelling have selected as a
master if not Mr. Goodrich, who was considered quite at the head of
his profession within a circuit of twelve miles round King's Lorton?
By which means Tom learned to make an extremely fine point to his
pencil, and to represent landscape with a &quot;broad generality,&quot; which,
doubtless from a narrow tendency in his mind to details, he thought
extremely dull.All this, you remember, happened in those dark ages when there were no
schools of design; before schoolmasters were invariably men of
scrupulous integrity, and before the clergy were all men of enlarged
minds and varied culture. In those less favored days, it is no fable
that there were other clergymen besides Mr. Stelling who had narrow
intellects and large wants, and whose income, by a logical confusion
to which Fortune, being a female as well as blindfold, is peculiarly
liable, was proportioned not to their wants but to their intellect,
with which income has clearly no inherent relation. The problem these
gentlemen had to solve was to readjust the proportion between their
wants and their income; and since wants are not easily starved to
death, the simpler method appeared to be to raise their income. There
was but one way of doing this; any of those low callings in which men
are obliged to do good work at a low price were forbidden to
clergymen; was it their fault if their only resource was to turn out
very poor work at a high price? Besides, how should Mr. Stelling be
expected to know that education was a delicate and difficult business,
any more than an animal endowed with a power of boring a hole through
a rock should be expected to have wide views of excavation? Mr.
Stelling's faculties had been early trained to boring in a straight
line, and he had no faculty to spare. But among Tom's contemporaries,
whose fathers cast their sons on clerical instruction to find them
ignorant after many days, there were many far less lucky than Tom
Tulliver. Education was almost entirely a matter of luck - usually of
ill-luck - in those distant days. The state of mind in which you take a
billiard-cue or a dice-box in your hand is one of sober certainty
compared with that of old-fashioned fathers, like Mr. Tulliver, when
they selected a school or a tutor for their sons. Excellent men, who
had been forced all their lives to spell on an impromptu-phonetic
system, and having carried on a successful business in spite of this
disadvantage, had acquired money enough to give their sons a better
start in life than they had had themselves, must necessarily take
their chance as to the conscience and the competence of the
schoolmaster whose circular fell in their way, and appeared to promise
so much more than they would ever have thought of asking for,
including the return of linen, fork, and spoon. It was happy for them
if some ambitious draper of their acquaintance had not brought up his
son to the Church, and if that young gentleman, at the age of
four-and-twenty, had not closed his college dissipations by an
imprudent marriage; otherwise, these innocent fathers, desirous of
doing the best for their offspring, could only escape the draper's son
by happening to be on the foundation of a grammar-school as yet
unvisited by commissioners, where two or three boys could have, all to
themselves, the advantages of a large and lofty building, together
with a head-master, toothless, dim-eyed and deaf, whose erudite
indistinctness and inattention were engrossed by them at the rate of
three hundred pounds a-head, - a ripe scholar, doubtless, when first
appointed; but all ripeness beneath the sun has a further stage less
esteemed in the market.Tom Tulliver, then, compared with many other British youths of his
time who have since had to scramble through life with some fragments
of more or less relevant knowledge, and a great deal of strictly
relevant ignorance, was not so very unlucky. Mr. Stelling was a
broad-chested, healthy man, with the bearing of a gentleman, a
conviction that a growing boy required a sufficiency of beef, and a
certain hearty kindness in him that made him like to see Tom looking
well and enjoying his dinner; not a man of refined conscience, or with
any deep sense of the infinite issues belonging to every-day duties,
not quite competent to his high offices; but incompetent gentlemen
must live, and without private fortune it is difficult to see how they
could all live genteelly if they had nothing to do with education or
government. Besides, it was the fault of Tom's mental constitution
that his faculties could not be nourished on the sort of knowledge Mr.
Stelling had to communicate. A boy born with a deficient power of
apprehending signs and abstractions must suffer the penalty of his
congenital deficiency, just as if he had been born with one leg
shorter than the other. A method of education sanctioned by the long
practice of our venerable ancestors was not to give way before the
exceptional dulness of a boy who was merely living at the time then
present. And Mr. Stelling was convinced that a boy so stupid at signs
and abstractions must be stupid at everything else, even if that
reverend gentleman could have taught him everything else. It was the
practice of our venerable ancestors to apply that ingenious instrument
the thumb-screw, and to tighten and tighten it in order to elicit
non-existent facts; they had a fixed opinion to begin with, that the
facts were existent, and what had they to do but to tighten the
thumb-screw? In like manner, Mr. Stelling had a fixed opinion that all
boys with any capacity could learn what it was the only regular thing
to teach; if they were slow, the thumb-screw must be tightened, - the
exercises must be insisted on with increased severity, and a page of
Virgil be awarded as a penalty, to encourage and stimulate a too
languid inclination to Latin verse.The thumb-screw was a little relaxed, however, during this second
half-year. Philip was so advanced in his studies, and so apt, that Mr.
Stelling could obtain credit by his facility, which required little
help, much more easily than by the troublesome process of overcoming
Tom's dulness. Gentlemen with broad chests and ambitious intentions do
sometimes disappoint their friends by failing to carry the world
before them. Perhaps it is that high achievements demand some other
unusual qualification besides an unusual desire for high prizes;
perhaps it is that these stalwart gentlemen are rather indolent, theirdivin&Atilde;&brvbar; particulum aur&Atilde;&brvbar;being obstructed from soaring by a too hearty
appetite. Some reason or other there was why Mr. Stelling deferred the
execution of many spirited projects, - why he did not begin the editing
of his Greek play, or any other work of scholarship, in his leisure
hours, but, after turning the key of his private study with much
resolution, sat down to one of Theodore Hook's novels. Tom was
gradually allowed to shuffle through his lessons with less rigor, and
having Philip to help him, he was able to make some show of having
applied his mind in a confused and blundering way, without being
cross-examined into a betrayal that his mind had been entirely neutral
in the matter. He thought school much more bearable under this
modification of circumstances; and he went on contentedly enough,
picking up a promiscuous education chiefly from things that were not
intended as education at all. What was understood to be his education
was simply the practice of reading, writing, and spelling, carried on
by an elaborate appliance of unintelligible ideas, and by much failure
in the effort to learn by rote.Nevertheless, there was a visible improvement in Tom under this
training; perhaps because he was not a boy in the abstract, existing
solely to illustrate the evils of a mistaken education, but a boy made
of flesh and blood, with dispositions not entirely at the mercy of
circumstances.There was a great improvement in his bearing, for example; and some
credit on this score was due to Mr. Poulter, the village schoolmaster,
who, being an old Peninsular soldier, was employed to drill Tom, - a
source of high mutual pleasure. Mr. Poulter, who was understood by the
company at the Black Swan to have once struck terror into the hearts
of the French, was no longer personally formidable. He had rather a
shrunken appearance, and was tremulous in the mornings, not from age,
but from the extreme perversity of the King's Lorton boys, which
nothing but gin could enable him to sustain with any firmness. Still,
he carried himself with martial erectness, had his clothes
scrupulously brushed, and his trousers tightly strapped; and on the
Wednesday and Saturday afternoons, when he came to Tom, he was always
inspired with gin and old memories, which gave him an exceptionally
spirited air, as of a superannuated charger who hears the drum. The
drilling-lessons were always protracted by episodes of warlike
narrative, much more interesting to Tom than Philip's stories out of
the Iliad; for there were no cannon in the Iliad, and besides, Tom had
felt some disgust on learning that Hector and Achilles might possibly
never have existed. But the Duke of Wellington was really alive, and
Bony had not been long dead; therefore Mr. Poulter's reminiscences of
the Peninsular War were removed from all suspicion of being mythical.
Mr. Poulter, it appeared, had been a conspicuous figure at Talavera,
and had contributed not a little to the peculiar terror with which his
regiment of infantry was regarded by the enemy. On afternoons when his
memory was more stimulated than usual, he remembered that the Duke of
Wellington had (in strict privacy, lest jealousies should be awakened)
expressed his esteem for that fine fellow Poulter. The very surgeon
who attended him in the hospital after he had received his
gunshot-wound had been profoundly impressed with the superiority of
Mr. Poulter's flesh, - no other flesh would have healed in anything
like the same time. On less personal matters connected with the
important warfare in which he had been engaged, Mr. Poulter was more
reticent, only taking care not to give the weight of his authority to
any loose notions concerning military history. Any one who pretended
to a knowledge of what occurred at the siege of Badajos was especially
an object of silent pity to Mr. Poulter; he wished that prating person
had been run down, and had the breath trampled out of him at the first
go-off, as he himself had, - he might talk about the siege of Badajos
then! Tom did not escape irritating his drilling-master occasionally,
by his curiosity concerning other military matters than Mr. Poulter's
personal experience.&quot;And General Wolfe, Mr. Poulter, - wasn't he a wonderful fighter?&quot; said
Tom, who held the notion that all the martial heroes commemorated on
the public-house signs were engaged in the war with Bony.&quot;Not at all!&quot; said Mr. Poulter, contemptuously. &quot;Nothing o' the sort!
Heads up!&quot; he added, in a tone of stern command, which delighted Tom,
and made him feel as if he were a regiment in his own person.&quot;No, no!&quot; Mr. Poulter would continue, on coming to a pause in his
discipline; &quot;they'd better not talk to me about General Wolfe. He did
nothing but die of his wound; that's a poor haction, I consider. Any
other man 'ud have died o' the wounds I've had. One of my sword-cuts
'ud ha' killed a fellow like General Wolfe.&quot;&quot;Mr. Poulter,&quot; Tom would say, at any allusion to the sword, &quot;I wish
you'd bring your sword and do the sword-exercise!&quot;For a long while Mr. Poulter only shook his head in a significant
manner at this request, and smiled patronizingly, as Jupiter may have
done when Semele urged her too ambitious request. But one afternoon,
when a sudden shower of heavy rain had detained Mr. Poulter twenty
minutes longer than usual at the Black Swan, the sword was
brought, - just for Tom to look at.&quot;And this is the real sword you fought with in all the battles, Mr.
Poulter?&quot; said Tom, handling the hilt. &quot;Has it ever cut a Frenchman's
head off?&quot;&quot;Head off? Ah! and would, if he'd had three heads.&quot;&quot;But you had a gun and bayonet besides?&quot; said Tom. &quot;Ishould like
the gun and bayonet best, because you could shoot 'em first and spear
'em after. Bang! Ps-s-s-s!&quot; Tom gave the requisite pantomime to
indicate the double enjoyment of pulling the trigger and thrusting the
spear.&quot;Ah, but the sword's the thing when you come to close fighting,&quot; said
Mr. Poulter, involuntarily falling in with Tom's enthusiasm, and
drawing the sword so suddenly that Tom leaped back with much agility.&quot;Oh, but, Mr. Poulter, if you're going to do the exercise,&quot; said Tom,
a little conscious that he had not stood his ground as became an
Englishman, &quot;let me go and call Philip. He'll like to see you, you
know.&quot;&quot;What! the humpbacked lad?&quot; said Mr. Poulter, contemptuously; &quot;what's
the use ofhislooking on?&quot;&quot;Oh, but he knows a great deal about fighting,&quot; said Tom, &quot;and how
they used to fight with bows and arrows, and battle-axes.&quot;&quot;Let him come, then. I'll show him something different from his bows
and arrows,&quot; said Mr. Poulter, coughing and drawing himself up, while
he gave a little preliminary play to his wrist.Tom ran in to Philip, who was enjoying his afternoon's holiday at the
piano, in the drawing-room, picking out tunes for himself and singing
them. He was supremely happy, perched like an amorphous bundle on the
high stool, with his head thrown back, his eyes fixed on the opposite
cornice, and his lips wide open, sending forth, with all his might,
impromptu syllables to a tune of Arne's which had hit his fancy.&quot;Come, Philip,&quot; said Tom, bursting in; &quot;don't stay roaring 'la la'
there; come and see old Poulter do his sword-exercise in the
carriage-house!&quot;The jar of this interruption, the discord of Tom's tones coming across
the notes to which Philip was vibrating in soul and body, would have
been enough to unhinge his temper, even if there had been no question
of Poulter the drilling-master; and Tom, in the hurry of seizing
something to say to prevent Mr. Poulter from thinking he was afraid of
the sword when he sprang away from it, had alighted on this
proposition to fetch Philip, though he knew well enough that Philip
hated to hear him mention his drilling-lessons. Tom would never have
done so inconsiderate a thing except under the severe stress of his
personal pride.Philip shuddered visibly as he paused from his music. Then turning
red, he said, with violent passion, -&quot;Get away, you lumbering idiot! Don't come bellowing at me; you're not
fit to speak to anything but a cart-horse!&quot;It was not the first time Philip had been made angry by him, but Tom
had never before been assailed with verbal missiles that he understood
so well.&quot;I'm fit to speak to something better than you, you poor-spirited
imp!&quot; said Tom, lighting up immediately at Philip's fire. &quot;You know I
won't hit you, because you're no better than a girl. But I'm an honest
man's son, andyourfather's a rogue; everybody says so!&quot;Tom flung out of the room, and slammed the door after him, made
strangely heedless by his anger; for to slam doors within the hearing
of Mrs. Stelling, who was probably not far off, was an offence only to
be wiped out by twenty lines of Virgil. In fact, that lady did
presently descend from her room, in double wonder at the noise and the
subsequent cessation of Philip's music. She found him sitting in a
heap on the hassock, and crying bitterly.&quot;What's the matter, Wakem? what was that noise about? Who slammed the
door?&quot;Philip looked up, and hastily dried his eyes. &quot;It was Tulliver who
came in - to ask me to go out with him.&quot;&quot;And what are you in trouble about?&quot; said Mrs. Stelling.Philip was not her favorite of the two pupils; he was less obliging
than Tom, who was made useful in many ways. Still, his father paid
more than Mr. Tulliver did, and she meant him to feel that she behaved
exceedingly well to him. Philip, however, met her advances toward a
good understanding very much as a caressed mollusk meets an invitation
to show himself out of his shell. Mrs. Stelling was not a loving,
tender-hearted woman; she was a woman whose skirt sat well, who
adjusted her waist and patted her curls with a preoccupied air when
she inquired after your welfare. These things, doubtless, represent a
great social power, but it is not the power of love; and no other
power could win Philip from his personal reserve.He said, in answer to her question, &quot;My toothache came on, and made me
hysterical again.&quot;This had been the fact once, and Philip was glad of the recollection;
it was like an inspiration to enable him to excuse his crying. He had
to accept eau-de-Cologne and to refuse creosote in consequence; but
that was easy.Meanwhile Tom, who had for the first time sent a poisoned arrow into
Philip's heart, had returned to the carriage-house, where he found Mr.
Poulter, with a fixed and earnest eye, wasting the perfections of his
sword-exercise on probably observant but inappreciative rats. But Mr.
Poulter was a host in himself; that is to say, he admired himself more
than a whole army of spectators could have admired him. He took no
notice of Tom's return, being too entirely absorbed in the cut and
thrust, - the solemn one, two, three, four; and Tom, not without a
slight feeling of alarm at Mr. Poulter's fixed eye and hungry-looking
sword, which seemed impatient for something else to cut besides the
air, admired the performance from as great a distance as possible. It
was not until Mr. Poulter paused and wiped the perspiration from his
forehead, that Tom felt the full charm of the sword-exercise, and
wished it to be repeated.&quot;Mr. Poulter,&quot; said Tom, when the sword was being finally sheathed, &quot;I
wish you'd lend me your sword a little while to keep.&quot;&quot;No no, young gentleman,&quot; said Mr. Poulter, shaking his head
decidedly; &quot;you might do yourself some mischief with it.&quot;&quot;No, I'm sure I wouldn't; I'm sure I'd take care and not hurt myself.
I shouldn't take it out of the sheath much, but I could ground arms
with it, and all that.&quot;&quot;No, no, it won't do, I tell you; it won't do,&quot; said Mr. Poulter,
preparing to depart. &quot;What 'ud Mr. Stelling say to me?&quot;&quot;Oh, I say, do, Mr. Poulter! I'd give you my five-shilling piece if
you'd let me keep the sword a week. Look here!&quot; said Tom, reaching out
the attractively large round of silver. The young dog calculated the
effect as well as if he had been a philosopher.&quot;Well,&quot; said Mr. Poulter, with still deeper gravity, &quot;you must keep it
out of sight, you know.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, I'll keep it under the bed,&quot; said Tom, eagerly, &quot;or else at
the bottom of my large box.&quot;&quot;And let me see, now, whether you can draw it out of the sheath
without hurting yourself.&quot; That process having been gone through more
than once, Mr. Poulter felt that he had acted with scrupulous
conscientiousness, and said, &quot;Well, now, Master Tulliver, if I take
the crown-piece, it is to make sure as you'll do no mischief with the
sword.&quot;&quot;Oh no, indeed, Mr. Poulter,&quot; said Tom, delightedly handing him the
crown-piece, and grasping the sword, which, he thought, might have
been lighter with advantage.&quot;But if Mr. Stelling catches you carrying it in?&quot; said Mr. Poulter,
pocketing the crown-piece provisionally while he raised this new
doubt.&quot;Oh, he always keeps in his upstairs study on Saturday afternoon,&quot;
said Tom, who disliked anything sneaking, but was not disinclined to a
little stratagem in a worthy cause. So he carried off the sword in
triumph mixed with dread - dread that he might encounter Mr. or Mrs.
Stelling - to his bedroom, where, after some consideration, he hid it
in the closet behind some hanging clothes. That night he fell asleep
in the thought that he would astonish Maggie with it when she
came, - tie it round his waist with his red comforter, and make her
believe that the sword was his own, and that he was going to be a
soldier. There was nobody but Maggie who would be silly enough to
believe him, or whom he dared allow to know he had a sword; and Maggie
was really coming next week to see Tom, before she went to a
boarding-school with Lucy.If you think a lad of thirteen would have been so childish, you must
be an exceptionally wise man, who, although you are devoted to a civil
calling, requiring you to look bland rather than formidable, yet
never, since you had a beard, threw yourself into a martial attitude,
and frowned before the looking-glass. It is doubtful whether our
soldiers would be maintained if there were not pacific people at home
who like to fancy themselves soldiers. War, like other dramatic
spectacles, might possibly cease for want of a &quot;public.&quot;>


Tom Tulliver'S sufferings during the first quarter he was at King's
Lorton, under the distinguished care of the Rev. Walter Stelling, were
rather severe. At Mr. Jacob's academy life had not presented itself to
him as a difficult problem; there were plenty of fellows to play with,
and Tom being good at all active games, - fighting especially, - had
that precedence among them which appeared to him inseparable from the
personality of Tom Tulliver. Mr. Jacobs himself, familiarly known as
Old Goggles, from his habit of wearing spectacles, imposed no painful
awe; and if it was the property of snuffy old hypocrites like him to
write like copperplate and surround their signatures with arabesques,
to spell without forethought, and to spout &quot;my name is Norval&quot; without
bungling, Tom, for his part, was glad he was not in danger of those
mean accomplishments. He was not going to be a snuffy schoolmaster,
he, but a substantial man, like his father, who used to go hunting
when he was younger, and rode a capital black mare, - as pretty a bit
of horse-flesh as ever you saw; Tom had heard what her points were a
hundred times.Hemeant to go hunting too, and to be generally
respected. When people were grown up, he considered, nobody inquired
about their writing and spelling; when he was a man, he should be
master of everything, and do just as he liked. It had been very
difficult for him to reconcile himself to the idea that his
school-time was to be prolonged and that he was not to be brought up
to his father's business, which he had always thought extremely
pleasant; for it was nothing but riding about, giving orders, and
going to market; and he thought that a clergyman would give him a
great many Scripture lessons, and probably make him learn the Gospel
and Epistle on a Sunday, as well as the Collect. But in the absence of
specific information, it was impossible for him to imagine that school
and a schoolmaster would be something entirely different from the
academy of Mr. Jacobs. So, not to be at a deficiency, in case of his
finding genial companions, he had taken care to carry with him a small
box of percussion-caps; not that there was anything particular to be
done with them, but they would serve to impress strange boys with a
sense of his familiarity with guns. Thus poor Tom, though he saw very
clearly through Maggie's illusions, was not without illusions of his
own, which were to be cruelly dissipated by his enlarged experience at
King's Lorton.He had not been there a fortnight before it was evident to him that
life, complicated not only with the Latin grammar but with a new
standard of English pronunciation, was a very difficult business, made
all the more obscure by a thick mist of bash fulness. Tom, as you have
observed, was never an exception among boys for ease of address; but
the difficulty of enunciating a monosyllable in reply to Mr. or Mrs.
Stelling was so great, that he even dreaded to be asked at table
whether he would have more pudding. As to the percussion-caps, he had
almost resolved, in the bitterness of his heart, that he would throw
them into a neighboring pond; for not only was he the solitary pupil,
but he began even to have a certain scepticism about guns, and a
general sense that his theory of life was undermined. For Mr. Stelling
thought nothing of guns, or horses either, apparently; and yet it was
impossible for Tom to despise Mr. Stelling as he had despised Old
Goggles. If there were anything that was not thoroughly genuine about
Mr. Stelling, it lay quite beyond Tom's power to detect it; it is only
by a wide comparison of facts that the wisest full-grown man can
distinguish well-rolled barrels from mere supernal thunder.Mr. Stelling was a well-sized, broad-chested man, not yet thirty, with
flaxen hair standing erect, and large lightish-gray eyes, which were
always very wide open; he had a sonorous bass voice, and an air of
defiant self-confidence inclining to brazenness. He had entered on his
career with great vigor, and intended to make a considerable
impression on his fellowmen. The Rev. Walter Stelling was not a man
who would remain among the &quot;inferior clergy&quot; all his life. He had a
true British determination to push his way in the world, - as a
schoolmaster, in the first place, for there were capital masterships
of grammar-schools to be had, and Mr. Stelling meant to have one of
them; but as a preacher also, for he meant always to preach in a
striking manner, so as to have his congregation swelled by admirers
from neighboring parishes, and to produce a great sensation whenever
he took occasional duty for a brother clergyman of minor gifts. The
style of preaching he had chosen was the extemporaneous, which was
held little short of the miraculous in rural parishes like King's
Lorton. Some passages of Massillon and Bourdaloue, which he knew by
heart, were really very effective when rolled out in Mr. Stelling's
deepest tones; but as comparatively feeble appeals of his own were
delivered in the same loud and impressive manner, they were often
thought quite as striking by his hearers. Mr. Stelling's doctrine was
of no particular school; if anything, it had a tinge of
evangelicalism, for that was &quot;the telling thing&quot; just then in the
diocese to which King's Lorton belonged. In short, Mr. Stelling was a
man who meant to rise in his profession, and to rise by merit,
clearly, since he had no interest beyond what might be promised by a
problematic relationship to a great lawyer who had not yet become Lord
Chancellor. A clergyman who has such vigorous intentions naturally
gets a little into debt at starting; it is not to be expected that he
will live in the meagre style of a man who means to be a poor curate
all his life; and if the few hundreds Mr. Timpson advanced toward his
daughter's fortune did not suffice for the purchase of handsome
furniture, together with a stock of wine, a grand piano, and the
laying out of a superior flower-garden, it followed in the most
rigorous manner, either that these things must be procured by some
other means, or else that the Rev. Mr. Stelling must go without them,
which last alternative would be an absurd procrastination of the
fruits of success, where success was certain. Mr. Stelling was so
broad-chested and resolute that he felt equal to anything; he would
become celebrated by shaking the consciences of his hearers, and he
would by and by edit a Greek play, and invent several new readings. He
had not yet selected the play, for having been married little more
than two years, his leisure time had been much occupied with
attentions to Mrs. Stelling; but he had told that fine woman what he
meant to do some day, and she felt great confidence in her husband, as
a man who understood everything of that sort.But the immediate step to future success was to bring on Tom Tulliver
during this first half-year; for, by a singular coincidence, there had
been some negotiation concerning another pupil from the same
neighborhood and it might further a decision in Mr. Stelling's favor,
if it were understood that young Tulliver, who, Mr. Stelling observed
in conjugal privacy, was rather a rough cub, had made prodigious
progress in a short time. It was on this ground that he was severe
with Tom about his lessons; he was clearly a boy whose powers would
never be developed through the medium of the Latin grammar, without
the application of some sternness. Not that Mr. Stelling was a
harsh-tempered or unkind man; quite the contrary. He was jocose with
Tom at table, and corrected his provincialisms and his deportment in
the most playful manner; but poor Tom was only the more cowed and
confused by this double novelty, for he had never been used to jokes
at all like Mr. Stelling's; and for the first time in his life he had
a painful sense that he was all wrong somehow. When Mr. Stelling said,
as the roast-beef was being uncovered, &quot;Now, Tulliver! which would you
rather decline, roast-beef or the Latin for it?&quot; Tom, to whom in his
coolest moments a pun would have been a hard nut, was thrown into a
state of embarrassed alarm that made everything dim to him except the
feeling that he would rather not have anything to do with Latin; of
course he answered, &quot;Roast-beef,&quot; whereupon there followed much
laughter and some practical joking with the plates, from which Tom
gathered that he had in some mysterious way refused beef, and, in
fact, made himself appear &quot;a silly.&quot; If he could have seen a
fellow-pupil undergo these painful operations and survive them in good
spirits, he might sooner have taken them as a matter of course. But
there are two expensive forms of education, either of which a parent
may procure for his son by sending him as solitary pupil to a
clergyman: one is the enjoyment of the reverend gentleman's undivided
neglect; the other is the endurance of the reverend gentleman's
undivided attention. It was the latter privilege for which Mr.
Tulliver paid a high price in Tom's initiatory months at King's
Lorton.That respectable miller and maltster had left Tom behind, and driven
homeward in a state of great mental satisfaction. He considered that
it was a happy moment for him when he had thought of asking Riley's
advice about a tutor for Tom. Mr. Stelling's eyes were so wide open,
and he talked in such an off-hand, matter-of-fact way, answering every
difficult, slow remark of Mr. Tulliver's with, &quot;I see, my good sir, I
see&quot;; &quot;To be sure, to be sure&quot;; &quot;You want your son to be a man who
will make his way in the world,&quot; - that Mr. Tulliver was delighted to
find in him a clergyman whose knowledge was so applicable to the
every-day affairs of this life. Except Counsellor Wylde, whom he had
heard at the last sessions, Mr. Tulliver thought the Rev. Mr Stelling
was the shrewdest fellow he had ever met with, - not unlike Wylde, in
fact; he had the same way of sticking his thumbs in the armholes of
his waistcoat. Mr. Tulliver was not by any means an exception in
mistaking brazenness for shrewdness; most laymen thought Stelling
shrewd, and a man of remarkable powers generally; it was chiefly by
his clerical brethren that he was considered rather a full fellow. But
he told Mr. Tulliver several stories about &quot;Swing&quot; and incendiarism,
and asked his advice about feeding pigs in so thoroughly secular and
judicious a manner, with so much polished glibness of tongue, that the
miller thought, here was the very thing he wanted for Tom. He had no
doubt this first-rate man was acquainted with every branch of
information, and knew exactly what Tom must learn in order to become a
match for the lawyers, which poor Mr. Tulliver himself didnotknow,
and so was necessarily thrown for self-direction on this wide kind of
inference. It is hardly fair to laugh at him, for I have known much
more highly instructed persons than he make inferences quite as wide,
and not at all wiser.As for Mrs. Tulliver, finding that Mrs. Stelling's views as to the
airing of linen and the frequent recurrence of hunger in a growing boy
entirely coincided with her own; moreover, that Mrs. Stelling, though
so young a woman, and only anticipating her second confinement, had
gone through very nearly the same experience as herself with regard to
the behavior and fundamental character of the monthly nurse, - she
expressed great contentment to her husband, when they drove away, at
leaving Tom with a woman who, in spite of her youth, seemed quite
sensible and motherly, and asked advice as prettily as could be.&quot;They must be very well off, though,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, &quot;for
everything's as nice as can be all over the house, and that watered
silk she had on cost a pretty penny. Sister Pullet has got one like
it.&quot;&quot;Ah,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, &quot;he's got some income besides the curacy, I
reckon. Perhaps her father allows 'em something. There's Tom 'ull be
another hundred to him, and not much trouble either, by his own
account; he says teaching comes natural to him. That's wonderful,
now,&quot; added Mr. Tulliver, turning his head on one side, and giving his
horse a meditative tickling on the flank.Perhaps it was because teaching came naturally to Mr. Stelling, that
he set about it with that uniformity of method and independence of
circumstances which distinguish the actions of animals understood to
be under the immediate teaching of nature. Mr. Broderip's amiable
beaver, as that charming naturalist tells us, busied himself as
earnestly in constructing a dam, in a room up three pair of stairs in
London, as if he had been laying his foundation in a stream or lake in
Upper Canada. It was &quot;Binny's&quot; function to build; the absence of water
or of possible progeny was an accident for which he was not
accountable. With the same unerring instinct Mr. Stelling set to work
at his natural method of instilling the Eton Grammar and Euclid into
the mind of Tom Tulliver. This, he considered, was the only basis of
solid instruction; all other means of education were mere
charlatanism, and could produce nothing better than smatterers. Fixed
on this firm basis, a man might observe the display of various or
special knowledge made by irregularly educated people with a pitying
smile; all that sort of thing was very well, but it was impossible
these people could form sound opinions. In holding this conviction Mr.
Stelling was not biassed, as some tutors have been, by the excessive
accuracy or extent of his own scholarship; and as to his views about
Euclid, no opinion could have been freer from personal partiality. Mr.
Stelling was very far from being led astray by enthusiasm, either
religious or intellectual; on the other hand, he had no secret belief
that everything was humbug. He thought religion was a very excellent
thing, and Aristotle a great authority, and deaneries and prebends
useful institutions, and Great Britain the providential bulwark of
Protestantism, and faith in the unseen a great support to afflicted
minds; he believed in all these things, as a Swiss hotel-keeper
believes in the beauty of the scenery around him, and in the pleasure
it gives to artistic visitors. And in the same way Mr. Stelling
believed in his method of education; he had no doubt that he was doing
the very best thing for Mr. Tulliver's boy. Of course, when the miller
talked of &quot;mapping&quot; and &quot;summing&quot; in a vague and diffident manner, Mr
Stelling had set his mind at rest by an assurance that he understood
what was wanted; for how was it possible the good man could form any
reasonable judgment about the matter? Mr Stelling's duty was to teach
the lad in the only right way, - indeed he knew no other; he had not
wasted his time in the acquirement of anything abnormal.He very soon set down poor Tom as a thoroughly stupid lad; for though
by hard labor he could get particular declensions into his brain,
anything so abstract as the relation between cases and terminations
could by no means get such a lodgment there as to enable him to
recognize a chance genitive or dative. This struck Mr. Stelling as
something more than natural stupidity; he suspected obstinacy, or at
any rate indifference, and lectured Tom severely on his want of
thorough application. &quot;You feel no interest in what you're doing,
sir,&quot; Mr. Stelling would say, and the reproach was painfully true. Tom
had never found any difficulty in discerning a pointer from a setter,
when once he had been told the distinction, and his perceptive powers
were not at all deficient. I fancy they were quite as strong as those
of the Rev. Mr. Stelling; for Tom could predict with accuracy what
number of horses were cantering behind him, he could throw a stone
right into the centre of a given ripple, he could guess to a fraction
how many lengths of his stick it would take to reach across the
playground, and could draw almost perfect squares on his slate without
any measurement. But Mr. Stelling took no note of these things; he
only observed that Tom's faculties failed him before the abstractions
hideously symbolized to him in the pages of the Eton Grammar, and that
he was in a state bordering on idiocy with regard to the demonstration
that two given triangles must be equal, though he could discern with
great promptitude and certainty the fact that theywereequal.
Whence Mr. Stelling concluded that Tom's brain, being peculiarly
impervious to etymology and demonstrations, was peculiarly in need of
being ploughed and harrowed by these patent implements; it was his
favorite metaphor, that the classics and geometry constituted that
culture of the mind which prepared it for the reception of any
subsequent crop. I say nothing against Mr. Stelling's theory; if we
are to have one regimen for all minds, his seems to me as good as any
other. I only know it turned out as uncomfortably for Tom Tulliver as
if he had been plied with cheese in order to remedy a gastric weakness
which prevented him from digesting it. It is astonishing what a
different result one gets by changing the metaphor! Once call the
brain an intellectual stomach, and one's ingenious conception of the
classics and geometry as ploughs and harrows seems to settle nothing.
But then it is open to some one else to follow great authorities, and
call the mind a sheet of white paper or a mirror, in which case one's
knowledge of the digestive process becomes quite irrelevant. It was
doubtless an ingenious idea to call the camel the ship of the desert,
but it would hardly lead one far in training that useful beast. O
Aristotle! if you had had the advantage of being &quot;the freshest modern&quot;
instead of the greatest ancient, would you not have mingled your
praise of metaphorical speech, as a sign of high intelligence, with a
lamentation that intelligence so rarely shows itself in speech without
metaphor, - that we can so seldom declare what a thing is, except by
saying it is something else?Tom Tulliver, being abundant in no form of speech, did not use any
metaphor to declare his views as to the nature of Latin; he never
called it an instrument of torture; and it was not until he had got on
some way in the next half-year, and in the Delectus, that he was
advanced enough to call it a &quot;bore&quot; and &quot;beastly stuff.&quot; At present,
in relation to this demand that he should learn Latin declensions and
conjugations, Tom was in a state of as blank unimaginativeness
concerning the cause and tendency of his sufferings, as if he had been
an innocent shrewmouse imprisoned in the split trunk of an ash-tree in
order to cure lameness in cattle. It is doubtless almost incredible to
instructed minds of the present day that a boy of twelve, not
belonging strictly to &quot;the masses,&quot; who are now understood to have the
monopoly of mental darkness, should have had no distinct idea how
there came to be such a thing as Latin on this earth; yet so it was
with Tom. It would have taken a long while to make conceivable to him
that there ever existed a people who bought and sold sheep and oxen,
and transacted the every-day affairs of life, through the medium of
this language; and still longer to make him understand why he should
be called upon to learn it, when its connection with those affairs had
become entirely latent. So far as Tom had gained any acquaintance with
the Romans at Mr. Jacob's academy, his knowledge was strictly correct,
but it went no farther than the fact that they were &quot;in the New
Testament&quot;; and Mr. Stelling was not the man to enfeeble and
emasculate his pupil's mind by simplifying and explaining, or to
reduce the tonic effect of etymology by mixing it with smattering,
extraneous information, such as is given to girls.Yet, strange to say, under this vigorous treatment Tom became more
like a girl than he had ever been in his life before. He had a large
share of pride, which had hitherto found itself very comfortable in
the world, despising Old Goggles, and reposing in the sense of
unquestioned rights; but now this same pride met with nothing but
bruises and crushings. Tom was too clear-sighted not to be aware that
Mr. Stelling's standard of things was quite different, was certainly
something higher in the eyes of the world than that of the people he
had been living amongst, and that, brought in contact with it, he, Tom
Tulliver, appeared uncouth and stupid; he was by no means indifferent
to this, and his pride got into an uneasy condition which quite
nullified his boyish self-satisfaction, and gave him something of the
girl's susceptibility. He was a very firm, not to say obstinate,
disposition, but there was no brute-like rebellion and recklessness in
his nature; the human sensibilities predominated, and if it had
occurred to him that he could enable himself to show some quickness at
his lessons, and so acquire Mr. Stelling's approbation, by standing on
one leg for an inconvenient length of time, or rapping his head
moderately against the wall, or any voluntary action of that sort, he
would certainly have tried it. But no; Tom had never heard that these
measures would brighten the understanding, or strengthen the verbal
memory; and he was not given to hypothesis and experiment. It did
occur to him that he could perhaps get some help by praying for it;
but as the prayers he said every evening were forms learned by heart,
he rather shrank from the novelty and irregularity of introducing an
extempore passage on a topic of petition for which he was not aware of
any precedent. But one day, when he had broken down, for the fifth
time, in the supines of the third conjugation, and Mr. Stelling,
convinced that this must be carelessness, since it transcended the
bounds of possible stupidity, had lectured him very seriously,
pointing out that if he failed to seize the present golden opportunity
of learning supines, he would have to regret it when he became a
man, - Tom, more miserable than usual, determined to try his sole
resource; and that evening, after his usual form of prayer for his
parents and &quot;little sister&quot; (he had begun to pray for Maggie when she
was a baby), and that he might be able always to keep God's
commandments, he added, in the same low whisper, &quot;and please to make
me always remember my Latin.&quot; He paused a little to consider how he
should pray about Euclid - whether he should ask to see what it meant,
or whether there was any other mental state which would be more
applicable to the case. But at last he added: &quot;And make Mr. Stelling
say I sha'n't do Euclid any more. Amen.&quot;The fact that he got through his supines without mistake the next day,
encouraged him to persevere in this appendix to his prayers, and
neutralized any scepticism that might have arisen from Mr. Stelling's
continued demand for Euclid. But his faith broke down under the
apparent absence of all help when he got into the irregular verbs. It
seemed clear that Tom's despair under the caprices of the present
tense did not constitute anodusworthy of interference, and since
this was the climax of his difficulties, where was the use of praying
for help any longer? He made up his mind to this conclusion in one of
his dull, lonely evenings, which he spent in the study, preparing his
lessons for the morrow. His eyes were apt to get dim over the page,
though he hated crying, and was ashamed of it; he couldn't help
thinking with some affection even of Spouncer, whom he used to fight
and quarrel with; he would have felt at home with Spouncer, and in a
condition of superiority. And then the mill, and the river, and Yap
pricking up his ears, ready to obey the least sign when Tom said,
&quot;Hoigh!&quot; would all come before him in a sort of calenture, when his
fingers played absently in his pocket with his great knife and his
coil of whipcord, and other relics of the past.Tom, as I said, had never been so much like a girl in his life before,
and at that epoch of irregular verbs his spirit was further depressed
by a new means of mental development which had been thought of for him
out of school hours. Mrs. Stelling had lately had her second baby, and
as nothing could be more salutary for a boy than to feel himself
useful, Mrs. Stelling considered she was doing Tom a service by
setting him to watch the little cherub Laura while the nurse was
occupied with the sickly baby. It was quite a pretty employment for
Tom to take little Laura out in the sunniest hour of the autumn day;
it would help to make him feel that Lorton Parsonage was a home for
him, and that he was one of the family. The little cherub Laura, not
being an accomplished walker at present, had a ribbon fastened round
her waist, by which Tom held her as if she had been a little dog
during the minutes in which she chose to walk; but as these were rare,
he was for the most part carrying this fine child round and round the
garden, within sight of Mrs. Stelling's window, according to orders.
If any one considers this unfair and even oppressive toward Tom, I beg
him to consider that there are feminine virtues which are with
difficulty combined, even if they are not incompatible. When the wife
of a poor curate contrives, under all her disadvantages, to dress
extremely well, and to have a style of coiffure which requires that
her nurse shall occasionally officiate as lady's-maid; when, moreover,
her dinner-parties and her drawing-room show that effort at elegance
and completeness of appointment to which ordinary women might imagine
a large income necessary, it would be unreasonable to expect of her
that she should employ a second nurse, or even act as a nurse herself.
Mr. Stelling knew better; he saw that his wife did wonders already,
and was proud of her. It was certainly not the best thing in the world
for young Tulliver's gait to carry a heavy child, but he had plenty of
exercise in long walks with himself, and next half-year Mr. Stelling
would see about having a drilling-master. Among the many means whereby
Mr. Stelling intended to be more fortunate than the bulk of his
fellow-men, he had entirely given up that of having his own way in his
own house. What then? He had married &quot;as kind a little soul as ever
breathed,&quot; according to Mr. Riley, who had been acquainted with Mrs.
Stelling's blond ringlets and smiling demeanor throughout her maiden
life, and on the strength of that knowledge would have been ready any
day to pronounce that whatever domestic differences might arise in her
married life must be entirely Mr. Stelling's fault.If Tom had had a worse disposition, he would certainly have hated the
little cherub Laura, but he was too kind-hearted a lad for that; there
was too much in him of the fibre that turns to true manliness, and to
protecting pity for the weak. I am afraid he hated Mrs. Stelling, and
contracted a lasting dislike to pale blond ringlets and broad plaits,
as directly associated with haughtiness of manner, and a frequent
reference to other people's &quot;duty.&quot; But he couldn't help playing with
little Laura, and liking to amuse her; he even sacrificed his
percussion-caps for her sake, in despair of their ever serving a
greater purpose, - thinking the small flash and bang would delight her,
and thereby drawing down on himself a rebuke from Mrs. Stelling for
teaching her child to play with fire. Laura was a sort of
playfellow - and oh, how Tom longed for playfellows! In his secret
heart he yearned to have Maggie with him, and was almost ready to dote
on her exasperating acts of forgetfulness; though, when he was at
home, he always represented it as a great favor on his part to let
Maggie trot by his side on his pleasure excursions.And before this dreary half-year was ended, Maggie actually came. Mrs.
Stelling had given a general invitation for the little girl to come
and stay with her brother; so when Mr. Tulliver drove over to King's
Lorton late in October, Maggie came too, with the sense that she was
taking a great journey, and beginning to see the world. It was Mr.
Tulliver's first visit to see Tom, for the lad must learn not to think
too much about home.&quot;Well, my lad,&quot; he said to Tom, when Mr. Stelling had left the room to
announce the arrival to his wife, and Maggie had begun to kiss Tom
freely, &quot;you look rarely! School agrees with you.&quot;Tom wished he had looked rather ill.&quot;I don't think Iamwell, father,&quot; said Tom; &quot;I wish you'd ask Mr.
Stelling not to let me do Euclid; it brings on the toothache, I
think.&quot;(The toothache was the only malady to which Tom had ever been
subject.)&quot;Euclid, my lad, - why, what's that?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver.&quot;Oh, I don't know; it's definitions, and axioms, and triangles, and
things. It's a book I've got to learn in - there's no sense in it.&quot;&quot;Go, go!&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, reprovingly; &quot;you mustn't say so. You
must learn what your master tells you. He knows what it's right for
you to learn.&quot;&quot;I'llhelp you now, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, with a little air of
patronizing consolation. &quot;I'm come to stay ever so long, if Mrs.
Stelling asks me. I've brought my box and my pinafores, haven't I,
father?&quot;&quot;Youhelp me, you silly little thing!&quot; said Tom, in such high
spirits at this announcement that he quite enjoyed the idea of
confounding Maggie by showing her a page of Euclid. &quot;I should like to
see you doing one ofmylessons! Why, I learn Latin too! Girls never
learn such things. They're too silly.&quot;&quot;I know what Latin is very well,&quot; said Maggie, confidently, &quot;Latin's a
language. There are Latin words in the Dictionary. There's bonus, a
gift.&quot;&quot;Now, you're just wrong there, Miss Maggie!&quot; said Tom, secretly
astonished. &quot;You think you're very wise! But 'bonus' means 'good,' as
it happens, - bonus, bona, bonum.&quot;&quot;Well, that's no reason why it shouldn't mean 'gift,'&quot; said Maggie,
stoutly. &quot;It may mean several things; almost every word does. There's
'lawn,' - it means the grass-plot, as well as the stuff pocket-
handkerchiefs are made of.&quot;&quot;Well done, little 'un,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, laughing, while Tom felt
rather disgusted with Maggie's knowingness, though beyond measure
cheerful at the thought that she was going to stay with him. Her
conceit would soon be overawed by the actual inspection of his books.Mrs. Stelling, in her pressing invitation, did not mention a longer
time than a week for Maggie's stay; but Mr. Stelling, who took her
between his knees, and asked her where she stole her dark eyes from,
insisted that she must stay a fortnight. Maggie thought Mr. Stelling
was a charming man, and Mr. Tulliver was quite proud to leave his
little wench where she would have an opportunity of showing her
cleverness to appreciating strangers. So it was agreed that she should
not be fetched home till the end of the fortnight.&quot;Now, then, come with me into the study, Maggie,&quot; said Tom, as their
father drove away. &quot;What do you shake and toss your head now for, you
silly?&quot; he continued; for though her hair was now under a new
dispensation, and was brushed smoothly behind her ears, she seemed
still in imagination to be tossing it out of her eyes. &quot;It makes you
look as if you were crazy.&quot;&quot;Oh, I can't help it,&quot; said Maggie, impatiently. &quot;Don't tease me, Tom.
Oh, what books!&quot; she exclaimed, as she saw the bookcases in the study.
&quot;How I should like to have as many books as that!&quot;&quot;Why, you couldn't read one of 'em,&quot; said Tom, triumphantly. &quot;They're
all Latin.&quot;&quot;No, they aren't,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;I can read the back of
this, - 'History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire.'&quot;&quot;Well, what does that mean?Youdon't know,&quot; said Tom, wagging his
head.&quot;But I could soon find out,&quot; said Maggie, scornfully.&quot;Why, how?&quot;&quot;I should look inside, and see what it was about.&quot;&quot;You'd better not, Miss Maggie,&quot; said Tom, seeing her hand on the
volume. &quot;Mr. Stelling lets nobody touch his books without leave, andIshall catch it, if you take it out.&quot;&quot;Oh, very well. Let me see allyourbooks, then,&quot; said Maggie,
turning to throw her arms round Tom's neck, and rub his cheek with her
small round nose.Tom, in the gladness of his heart at having dear old Maggie to dispute
with and crow over again, seized her round the waist, and began to
jump with her round the large library table. Away they jumped with
more and more vigor, till Maggie's hair flew from behind her ears, and
twirled about like an animated mop. But the revolutions round the
table became more and more irregular in their sweep, till at last
reaching Mr. Stelling's reading stand, they sent it thundering down
with its heavy lexicons to the floor. Happily it was the ground-floor,
and the study was a one-storied wing to the house, so that the
downfall made no alarming resonance, though Tom stood dizzy and aghast
for a few minutes, dreading the appearance of Mr. or Mrs. Stelling.&quot;Oh, I say, Maggie,&quot; said Tom at last, lifting up the stand, &quot;we must
keep quiet here, you know. If we break anything Mrs. Stelling'll make
us cry peccavi.&quot;&quot;What's that?&quot; said Maggie.&quot;Oh, it's the Latin for a good scolding,&quot; said Tom, not without some
pride in his knowledge.&quot;Is she a cross woman?&quot; said Maggie.&quot;I believe you!&quot; said Tom, with an emphatic nod.&quot;I think all women are crosser than men,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;Aunt Glegg's a
great deal crosser than uncle Glegg, and mother scolds me more than
father does.&quot;&quot;Well,you'llbe a woman some day,&quot; said Tom, &quot;soyouneedn't
talk.&quot;&quot;But I shall be acleverwoman,&quot; said Maggie, with a toss.&quot;Oh, I dare say, and a nasty conceited thing. Everybody'll hate you.&quot;&quot;But you oughtn't to hate me, Tom; it'll be very wicked of you, for I
shall be your sister.&quot;&quot;Yes, but if you're a nasty disagreeable thing Ishallhate you.&quot;&quot;Oh, but, Tom, you won't! I sha'n't be disagreeable. I shall be very
good to you, and I shall be good to everybody. You won't hate me
really, will you, Tom?&quot;&quot;Oh, bother! never mind! Come, it's time for me to learn my lessons.
See here! what I've got to do,&quot; said Tom, drawing Maggie toward him
and showing her his theorem, while she pushed her hair behind her
ears, and prepared herself to prove her capability of helping him in
Euclid. She began to read with full confidence in her own powers, but
presently, becoming quite bewildered, her face flushed with
irritation. It was unavoidable; she must confess her incompetency, and
she was not fond of humiliation.&quot;It's nonsense!&quot; she said, &quot;and very ugly stuff; nobody need want to
make it out.&quot;&quot;Ah, there, now, Miss Maggie!&quot; said Tom, drawing the book away, and
wagging his head at her, &quot;You see you're not so clever as you thought
you were.&quot;&quot;Oh,&quot; said Maggie, pouting, &quot;I dare say I could make it out, if I'd
learned what goes before, as you have.&quot;&quot;But that's what you just couldn't, Miss Wisdom,&quot; said Tom. &quot;For it's
all the harder when you know what goes before; for then you've got to
say what definition 3 is, and what axiom V. is. But get along with you
now; I must go on with this. Here's the Latin Grammar. See what you
can make of that.&quot;Maggie found the Latin Grammar quite soothing after her mathematical
mortification; for she delighted in new words, and quickly found that
there was an English Key at the end, which would make her very wise
about Latin, at slight expense. She presently made up her mind to skip
the rules in the Syntax, the examples became so absorbing. These
mysterious sentences, snatched from an unknown context, - like strange
horns of beasts, and leaves of unknown plants, brought from some
far-off region, - gave boundless scope to her imagination, and were all
the more fascinating because they were in a peculiar tongue of their
own, which she could learn to interpret. It was really very
interesting, the Latin Grammar that Tom had said no girls could learn;
and she was proud because she found it interesting. The most
fragmentary examples were her favourites.Mors omnibus est communiswould have been jejune, only she liked to know the Latin; but the
fortunate gentleman whom every one congratulated because he had a son
&quot;endowed withsucha disposition&quot; afforded her a great deal of
pleasant conjecture, and she was quite lost in the &quot;thick grove
penetrable by no star,&quot; when Tom called out, -&quot;Now, then, Magsie, give us the Grammar!&quot;&quot;Oh, Tom, it's such a pretty book!&quot; she said, as she jumped out of the
large arm-chair to give it him; &quot;it's much prettier than the
Dictionary. I could learn Latin very soon. I don't think it's at all
hard.&quot;&quot;Oh, I know what you've been doing,&quot; said Tom; &quot;you've been reading
the English at the end. Any donkey can do that.&quot;Tom seized the book and opened it with a determined and business-like
air, as much as to say that he had a lesson to learn which no donkeys
would find themselves equal to. Maggie, rather piqued, turned to the
bookcases to amuse herself with puzzling out the titles.Presently Tom called to her: &quot;Here, Magsie, come and hear if I can say
this. Stand at that end of the table, where Mr. Stelling sits when he
hears me.&quot;Maggie obeyed, and took the open book.&quot;Where do you begin, Tom?&quot;&quot;Oh, I begin at'Appellativa arborum,'because I say all over again
what I've been learning this week.&quot;Tom sailed along pretty well for three lines; and Maggie was beginning
to forget her office of prompter in speculating as to whatmascould
mean, which came twice over, when he stuck fast at _Sunt etiam
volucrum_.&quot;Don't tell me, Maggie;Sunt etiam volucrum- _Sunt etiam
volucrum_ -ut ostrea, cetus-  - &quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Maggie, opening her mouth and shaking her head.&quot;Sunt etiam volucrum,&quot; said Tom, very slowly, as if the next words
might be expected to come sooner when he gave them this strong hint
that they were waited for.&quot;C, e, u,&quot; said Maggie, getting impatient.&quot;Oh, I know - hold your tongue,&quot; said Tom. &quot;_Ceu passer, hirundo;
Ferarum_ -ferarum-  - &quot; Tom took his pencil and made several hard
dots with it on his book-cover - &quot;ferarum-  - &quot;&quot;Oh dear, oh dear, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;what a time you are!Ut-  - &quot;&quot;Ut ostrea-  - &quot;&quot;No, no,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;ut tigris-  - &quot;&quot;Oh yes, now I can do,&quot; said Tom; &quot;it wastigris, vulpes, I'd
forgotten:ut tigris, volupes; et Piscium.&quot;With some further stammering and repetition, Tom got through the next
few lines.&quot;Now, then,&quot; he said, &quot;the next is what I've just learned for
to-morrow. Give me hold of the book a minute.&quot;After some whispered gabbling, assisted by the beating of his fist on
the table, Tom returned the book.&quot;Mascula nomina in a,&quot; he began.&quot;No, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;that doesn't come next. It's _Nomen non
creskens genittivo_ -  - &quot;&quot;Creskens genittivo!&quot; exclaimed Tom, with a derisive laugh, for Tom
had learned this omitted passage for his yesterday's lesson, and a
young gentleman does not require an intimate or extensive acquaintance
with Latin before he can feel the pitiable absurdity of a false
quantity. &quot;Creskens genittivo!What a little silly you are, Maggie!&quot;&quot;Well, you needn't laugh, Tom, for you didn't remember it at all. I'm
sure it's spelt so; how was I to know?&quot;&quot;Phee-e-e-h! I told you girls couldn't learn Latin. It's _Nomen non
crescens genitivo_.&quot;&quot;Very well, then,&quot; said Maggie, pouting. I can say that as well as you
can. And you don't mind your stops. For you ought to stop twice as
long at a semicolon as you do at a comma, and you make the longest
stops where there ought to be no stop at all.&quot;&quot;Oh, well, don't chatter. Let me go on.&quot;They were presently fetched to spend the rest of the evening in the
drawing-room, and Maggie became so animated with Mr. Stelling, who,
she felt sure, admired her cleverness, that Tom was rather amazed and
alarmed at her audacity. But she was suddenly subdued by Mr.
Stelling's alluding to a little girl of whom he had heard that she
once ran away to the gypsies.&quot;What a very odd little girl that must be!&quot; said Mrs. Stelling,
meaning to be playful; but a playfulness that turned on her supposed
oddity was not at all to Maggie's taste. She feared that Mr. Stelling,
after all, did not think much of her, and went to bed in rather low
spirits. Mrs. Stelling, she felt, looked at her as if she thought her
hair was very ugly because it hung down straight behind.Nevertheless it was a very happy fortnight to Maggie, this visit to
Tom. She was allowed to be in the study while he had his lessons, and
in her various readings got very deep into the examples in the Latin
Grammar. The astronomer who hated women generally caused her so much
puzzling speculation that she one day asked Mr. Stelling if all
astronomers hated women, or whether it was only this particular
astronomer. But forestalling his answer, she said, -&quot;I suppose it's all astronomers; because, you know, they live up in
high towers, and if the women came there they might talk and hinder
them from looking at the stars.&quot;Mr. Stelling liked her prattle immensely, and they were on the best
terms. She told Tom she should like to go to school to Mr. Stelling,
as he did, and learn just the same things. She knew she could do
Euclid, for she had looked into it again, and she saw what A B C
meant; they were the names of the lines.&quot;I'm sure you couldn't do it, now,&quot; said Tom; &quot;and I'll just ask Mr.
Stelling if you could.&quot;&quot;I don't mind,&quot; said the little conceited minx, &quot;I'll ask him myself.&quot;&quot;Mr. Stelling,&quot; she said, that same evening when they were in the
drawing-room, &quot;couldn't I do Euclid, and all Tom's lessons, if you
were to teach me instead of him?&quot;&quot;No, you couldn't,&quot; said Tom, indignantly. &quot;Girls can't do Euclid; can
they, sir?&quot;&quot;They can pick up a little of everything, I dare say,&quot; said Mr.
Stelling. &quot;They've a great deal of superficial cleverness; but they
couldn't go far into anything. They're quick and shallow.&quot;Tom, delighted with this verdict, telegraphed his triumph by wagging
his head at Maggie, behind Mr. Stelling's chair. As for Maggie, she
had hardly ever been so mortified. She had been so proud to be called
&quot;quick&quot; all her little life, and now it appeared that this quickness
was the brand of inferiority. It would have been better to be slow,
like Tom.&quot;Ha, ha! Miss Maggie!&quot; said Tom, when they were alone; &quot;you see it's
not such a fine thing to be quick. You'll never go far into anything,
you know.&quot;And Maggie was so oppressed by this dreadful destiny that she had no
spirit for a retort.But when this small apparatus of shallow quickness was fetched away in
the gig by Luke, and the study was once more quite lonely for Tom, he
missed her grievously. He had really been brighter, and had got
through his lessons better, since she had been there; and she had
asked Mr. Stelling so many questions about the Roman Empire, and
whether there really ever was a man who said, in Latin, &quot;I would not
buy it for a farthing or a rotten nut,&quot; or whether that had only been
turned into Latin, that Tom had actually come to a dim understanding
of the fact that there had once been people upon the earth who were so
fortunate as to know Latin without learning it through the medium of
the Eton Grammar. This luminous idea was a great addition to his
historical acquirements during this half-year, which were otherwise
confined to an epitomized history of the Jews.But the dreary half-yeardidcome to an end. How glad Tom was to see
the last yellow leaves fluttering before the cold wind! The dark
afternoons and the first December snow seemed to him far livelier than
the August sunshine; and that he might make himself the surer about
the flight of the days that were carrying him homeward, he stuck
twenty-one sticks deep in a corner of the garden, when he was three
weeks from the holidays, and pulled one up every day with a great
wrench, throwing it to a distance with a vigor of will which would
have carried it to limbo, if it had been in the nature of sticks to
travel so far.But it was worth purchasing, even at the heavy price of the Latin
Grammar, the happiness of seeing the bright light in the parlor at
home, as the gig passed noiselessly over the snow-covered bridge; the
happiness of passing from the cold air to the warmth and the kisses
and the smiles of that familiar hearth, where the pattern of the rug
and the grate and the fire-irons were &quot;first ideas&quot; that it was no
more possible to criticise than the solidity and extension of matter.
There is no sense of ease like the ease we felt in those scenes where
we were born, where objects became dear to us before we had known the
labor of choice, and where the outer world seemed only an extension of
our own personality; we accepted and loved it as we accepted our own
sense of existence and our own limbs. Very commonplace, even ugly,
that furniture of our early home might look if it were put up to
auction; an improved taste in upholstery scorns it; and is not the
striving after something better and better in our surroundings the
grand characteristic that distinguishes man from the brute, or, to
satisfy a scrupulous accuracy of definition, that distinguishes the
British man from the foreign brute? But heaven knows where that
striving might lead us, if our affections had not a trick of twining
round those old inferior things; if the loves and sanctities of our
life had no deep immovable roots in memory. One's delight in an
elderberry bush overhanging the confused leafage of a hedgerow bank,
as a more gladdening sight than the finest cistus or fuchsia spreading
itself on the softest undulating turf, is an entirely unjustifiable
preference to a nursery-gardener, or to any of those regulated minds
who are free from the weakness of any attachment that does not rest on
a demonstrable superiority of qualities. And there is no better reason
for preferring this elderberry bush than that it stirs an early
memory; that it is no novelty in my life, speaking to me merely
through my present sensibilities to form and color, but the long
companion of my existence, that wove itself into my joys when joys
were vivid.>


This last breach between the two lads was not readily mended, and for
some time they spoke to each other no more than was necessary. Their
natural antipathy of temperament made resentment an easy passage to
hatred, and in Philip the transition seemed to have begun; there was
no malignity in his disposition, but there was a susceptibility that
made him peculiarly liable to a strong sense of repulsion. The ox - we
may venture to assert it on the authority of a great classic - is not
given to use his teeth as an instrument of attack, and Tom was an
excellent bovine lad, who ran at questionable objects in a truly
ingenious bovine manner; but he had blundered on Philip's tenderest
point, and had caused him as much acute pain as if he had studied the
means with the nicest precision and the most envenomed spite. Tom saw
no reason why they should not make up this quarrel as they had done
many others, by behaving as if nothing had happened; for though he had
never before said to Philip that his father was a rogue, this idea had
so habitually made part of his feeling as to the relation between
himself and his dubious schoolfellow, who he could neither like nor
dislike, that the mere utterance did not make such an epoch to him as
it did to Philip. And he had a right to say so when Philip hectored
overhim, and called him names. But perceiving that his first
advances toward amity were not met, he relapsed into his least
favorable disposition toward Philip, and resolved never to appeal to
him either about drawing or exercise again. They were only so far
civil to each other as was necessary to prevent their state of feud
from being observed by Mr. Stelling, who would have &quot;put down&quot; such
nonsense with great vigor.When Maggie came, however, she could not help looking with growing
interest at the new schoolfellow, although he was the son of that
wicked Lawyer Wakem, who made her father so angry. She had arrived in
the middle of school-hours, and had sat by while Philip went through
his lessons with Mr. Stelling. Tom, some weeks ago, had sent her word
that Philip knew no end of stories, - not stupid stories like hers; and
she was convinced now from her own observation that he must be very
clever; she hoped he would thinkherrather clever too, when she
came to talk to him. Maggie, moreover, had rather a tenderness for
deformed things; she preferred the wry-necked lambs, because it seemed
to her that the lambs which were quite strong and well made wouldn't
mind so much about being petted; and she was especially fond of
petting objects that would think it very delightful to be petted by
her. She loved Tom very dearly, but she often wished that hecaredmore about her loving him.&quot;I think Philip Wakem seems a nice boy, Tom,&quot; she said, when they went
out of the study together into the garden, to pass the interval before
dinner. &quot;He couldn't choose his father, you know; and I've read of
very bad men who had good sons, as well as good parents who had bad
children. And if Philip is good, I think we ought to be the more sorry
for him because his father is not a good man.Youlike him, don't
you?&quot;&quot;Oh, he's a queer fellow,&quot; said Tom, curtly, &quot;and he's as sulky as can
be with me, because I told him his father was a rogue. And I'd a right
to tell him so, for it was true; andhebegan it, with calling me
names. But you stop here by yourself a bit, Maggie, will you? I've got
something I want to do upstairs.&quot;&quot;Can't I go too?&quot; said Maggie, who in this first day of meeting again
loved Tom's shadow.&quot;No, it's something I'll tell you about by-and-by, not yet,&quot; said Tom,
skipping away.In the afternoon the boys were at their books in the study, preparing
the morrow's lesson's that they might have a holiday in the evening in
honor of Maggie's arrival. Tom was hanging over his Latin grammar,
moving his lips inaudibly like a strict but impatient Catholic
repeating his tale of paternosters; and Philip, at the other end of
the room, was busy with two volumes, with a look of contented
diligence that excited Maggie's curiosity; he did not look at all as
if he were learning a lesson. She sat on a low stool at nearly a right
angle with the two boys, watching first one and then the other; and
Philip, looking off his book once toward the fire-place, caught the
pair of questioning dark eyes fixed upon him. He thought this sister
of Tulliver's seemed a nice little thing, quite unlike her brother; he
wishedhehad a little sister. What was it, he wondered, that made
Maggie's dark eyes remind him of the stories about princesses being
turned into animals? I think it was that her eyes were full of
unsatisfied intelligence, and unsatisfied beseeching affection.&quot;I say, Magsie,&quot; said Tom at last, shutting his books and putting them
away with the energy and decision of a perfect master in the art of
leaving off, &quot;I've done my lessons now. Come upstairs with me.&quot;&quot;What is it?&quot; said Maggie, when they were outside the door, a slight
suspicion crossing her mind as she remembered Tom's preliminary visit
upstairs. &quot;It isn't a trick you're going to play me, now?&quot;&quot;No, no, Maggie,&quot; said Tom, in his most coaxing tone; &quot;It's something
you'll likeever so.&quot;He put his arm round her neck, and she put hers round his waist, and
twined together in this way, they went upstairs.&quot;I say, Magsie, you must not tell anybody, you know,&quot; said Tom, &quot;else
I shall get fifty lines.&quot;&quot;Is it alive?&quot; said Maggie, whose imagination had settled for the
moment on the idea that Tom kept a ferret clandestinely.&quot;Oh, I sha'n't tell you,&quot; said he. &quot;Now you go into that corner and
hide your face, while I reach it out,&quot; he added, as he locked the
bedroom door behind them. I'll tell you when to turn round. You
mustn't squeal out, you know.&quot;&quot;Oh, but if you frighten me, I shall,&quot; said Maggie, beginning to look
rather serious.&quot;You won't be frightened, you silly thing,&quot; said Tom. &quot;Go and hide
your face, and mind you don't peep.&quot;&quot;Of course I sha'n't peep,&quot; said Maggie, disdainfully; and she buried
her face in the pillow like a person of strict honor.But Tom looked round warily as he walked to the closet; then he
stepped into the narrow space, and almost closed the door. Maggie kept
her face buried without the aid of principle, for in that
dream-suggestive attitude she had soon forgotten where she was, and
her thoughts were busy with the poor deformed boy, who was so clever,
when Tom called out, &quot;Now then, Magsie!&quot;Nothing but long meditation and preconcerted arrangement of effects
would have enabled Tom to present so striking a figure as he did to
Maggie when she looked up. Dissatisfied with the pacific aspect of a
face which had no more than the faintest hint of flaxen eyebrow,
together with a pair of amiable blue-gray eyes and round pink cheeks
that refused to look formidable, let him frown as he would before the
looking-glass (Philip had once told him of a man who had a horseshoe
frown, and Tom had tried with all his frowning might to make a
horseshoe on his forehead), he had had recourse to that unfailing
source of the terrible, burnt cork, and had made himself a pair of
black eyebrows that met in a satisfactory manner over his nose, and
were matched by a less carefully adjusted blackness about the chin. He
had wound a red handkerchief round his cloth cap to give it the air of
a turban, and his red comforter across his breast as a scarf, - an
amount of red which, with the tremendous frown on his brow, and the
decision with which he grasped the sword, as he held it with its point
resting on the ground, would suffice to convey an approximate idea of
his fierce and bloodthirsty disposition.Maggie looked bewildered for a moment, and Tom enjoyed that moment
keenly; but in the next she laughed, clapped her hands together, and
said, &quot;Oh, Tom, you've made yourself like Bluebeard at the show.&quot;It was clear she had not been struck with the presence of the
sword, - it was not unsheathed. Her frivolous mind required a more
direct appeal to its sense of the terrible, and Tom prepared for his
master-stroke. Frowning with a double amount of intention, if not of
corrugation, he (carefully) drew the sword from its sheath, and
pointed it at Maggie.&quot;Oh, Tom, please don't!&quot; exclaimed Maggie, in a tone of suppressed
dread, shrinking away from him into the opposite corner. &quot;Ishallscream - I'm sure I shall! Oh, don't I wish I'd never come upstairs!&quot;The corners of Tom's mouth showed an inclination to a smile of
complacency that was immediately checked as inconsistent with the
severity of a great warrior. Slowly he let down the scabbard on the
floor, lest it should make too much noise, and then said sternly, -&quot;I'm the Duke of Wellington! March!&quot; stamping forward with the right
leg a little bent, and the sword still pointing toward Maggie, who,
trembling, and with tear-filled eyes, got upon the bed, as the only
means of widening the space between them.Tom, happy in this spectator of his military performances, even though
the spectator was only Maggie, proceeded, with the utmost exertion of
his force, to such an exhibition of the cut and thrust as would
necessarily be expected of the Duke of Wellington.&quot;Tom, Iwill notbear it, Iwillscream,&quot; said Maggie, at the
first movement of the sword. &quot;You'll hurt yourself; you'll cut your
head off!&quot;&quot;One - two,&quot; said Tom, resolutely, though at &quot;two&quot; his wrist trembled a
little. &quot;Three&quot; came more slowly, and with it the sword swung
downward, and Maggie gave a loud shriek. The sword had fallen, with
its edge on Tom's foot, and in a moment after he had fallen too.
Maggie leaped from the bed, still shrieking, and immediately there was
a rush of footsteps toward the room. Mr. Stelling, from his upstairs
study, was the first to enter. He found both the children on the
floor. Tom had fainted, and Maggie was shaking him by the collar of
his jacket, screaming, with wild eyes. She thought he was dead, poor
child! and yet she shook him, as if that would bring him back to life.
In another minute she was sobbing with joy because Tom opened his
eyes. She couldn't sorrow yet that he had hurt his foot; it seemed as
if all happiness lay in his being alive.>


It was a cold, wet January day on which Tom went back to school; a day
quite in keeping with this severe phase of his destiny. If he had not
carried in his pocket a parcel of sugar-candy and a small Dutch doll
for little Laura, there would have been no ray of expected pleasure to
enliven the general gloom. But he liked to think how Laura would put
out her lips and her tiny hands for the bits of sugarcandy; and to
give the greater keenness to these pleasures of imagination, he took
out the parcel, made a small hole in the paper, and bit off a crystal
or two, which had so solacing an effect under the confined prospect
and damp odors of the gig-umbrella, that he repeated the process more
than once on his way.&quot;Well, Tulliver, we're glad to see you again,&quot; said Mr. Stelling,
heartily. &quot;Take off your wrappings and come into the study till
dinner. You'll find a bright fire there, and a new companion.&quot;Tom felt in an uncomfortable flutter as he took off his woollen
comforter and other wrappings. He had seen Philip Wakem at St. Ogg's,
but had always turned his eyes away from him as quickly as possible.
He would have disliked having a deformed boy for his companion, even
if Philip had not been the son of a bad man. And Tom did not see how a
bad man's son could be very good. His own father was a good man, and
he would readily have fought any one who said the contrary. He was in
a state of mingled embarrassment and defiance as he followed Mr.
Stelling to the study.&quot;Here is a new companion for you to shake hands with, Tulliver,&quot; said
that gentleman on entering the study, - &quot;Master Philip Wakem. I shall
leave you to make acquaintance by yourselves. You already know
something of each other, I imagine; for you are neighbors at home.&quot;Tom looked confused and awkward, while Philip rose and glanced at him
timidly. Tom did not like to go up and put out his hand, and he was
not prepared to say, &quot;How do you do?&quot; on so short a notice.Mr. Stelling wisely turned away, and closed the door behind him; boys'
shyness only wears off in the absence of their elders.Philip was at once too proud and too timid to walk toward Tom. He
thought, or rather felt, that Tom had an aversion to looking at him;
every one, almost, disliked looking at him; and his deformity was more
conspicuous when he walked. So they remained without shaking hands or
even speaking, while Tom went to the fire and warmed himself, every
now and then casting furtive glances at Philip, who seemed to be
drawing absently first one object and then another on a piece of paper
he had before him. He had seated himself again, and as he drew, was
thinking what he could say to Tom, and trying to overcome his own
repugnance to making the first advances.Tom began to look oftener and longer at Philip's face, for he could
see it without noticing the hump, and it was really not a disagreeable
face, - very old-looking, Tom thought. He wondered how much older
Philip was than himself. An anatomist - even a mere physiognomist - 
would have seen that the deformity of Philip's spine was not a
congenital hump, but the result of an accident in infancy; but you
do not expect from Tom any acquaintance with such distinctions;
to him, Philip was simply a humpback. He had a vague notion
that the deformity of Wakem's son had some relation to the lawyer's
rascality, of which he had so often heard his father talk with hot
emphasis; and he felt, too, a half-admitted fear of him as probably
a spiteful fellow, who, not being able to fight you, had cunning
ways of doing you a mischief by the sly. There was a humpbacked
tailor in the neighborhood of Mr. Jacobs's academy, who was considered
a very unamiable character, and was much hooted after by public-spirited
boys solely on the ground of his unsatisfactory moral qualities; so
that Tom was not without a basis of fact to go upon. Still, no face
could be more unlike that ugly tailor's than this melancholy boy's
face, - the brown hair round it waved and curled at the ends like a
girl's; Tom thought that truly pitiable. This Wakem was a pale,
puny fellow, and it was quite clear he would not be able to play at
anything worth speaking of; but he handled his pencil in an enviable
manner, and was apparently making one thing after another without
any trouble. What was he drawing? Tom was quite warm now, and wanted
something new to be going forward. It was certainly more agreeable
to have an ill-natured humpback as a companion than to stand looking
out of the study window at the rain, and kicking his foot against
the washboard in solitude; something would happen every day, - 
&quot;a quarrel or something&quot;; and Tom thought he should rather like to
show Philip that he had better not try his spiteful tricks onhim.
He suddenly walked across the hearth and looked over Philip's paper.&quot;Why, that's a donkey with panniers, and a spaniel, and partridges in
the corn!&quot; he exclaimed, his tongue being completely loosed by
surprise and admiration. &quot;Oh my buttons! I wish I could draw like
that. I'm to learn drawing this half; I wonder if I shall learn to
make dogs and donkeys!&quot;&quot;Oh, you can do them without learning,&quot; said Philip; &quot;I never learned
drawing.&quot;&quot;Never learned?&quot; said Tom, in amazement. &quot;Why, when I make dogs and
horses, and those things, the heads and the legs won't come right;
though I can see how they ought to be very well. I can make houses,
and all sorts of chimneys, - chimneys going all down the wall, - and
windows in the roof, and all that. But I dare say I could do dogs and
horses if I was to try more,&quot; he added, reflecting that Philip might
falsely suppose that he was going to &quot;knock under,&quot; if he were too
frank about the imperfection of his accomplishments.&quot;Oh, yes,&quot; said Philip, &quot;it's very easy. You've only to look well at
things, and draw them over and over again. What you do wrong once, you
can alter the next time.&quot;&quot;But haven't you been taught _any_thing?&quot; said Tom, beginning to have
a puzzled suspicion that Philip's crooked back might be the source of
remarkable faculties. &quot;I thought you'd been to school a long while.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Philip, smiling; &quot;I've been taught Latin and Greek and
mathematics, and writing and such things.&quot;&quot;Oh, but I say, you don't like Latin, though, do you?&quot; said Tom,
lowering his voice confidentially.&quot;Pretty well; I don't care much about it,&quot; said Philip.&quot;Ah, but perhaps you haven't got into thePropria qu&Atilde;&brvbar; maribus,&quot; said
Tom, nodding his head sideways, as much as to say, &quot;that was the test;
it was easy talking till you came tothat.&quot;Philip felt some bitter complacency in the promising stupidity of this
well-made, active-looking boy; but made polite by his own extreme
sensitiveness, as well as by his desire to conciliate, he checked his
inclination to laugh, and said quietly, -&quot;I've done with the grammar; I don't learn that any more.&quot;&quot;Then you won't have the same lessons as I shall?&quot; said Tom, with a
sense of disappointment.&quot;No; but I dare say I can help you. I shall be very glad to help you
if I can.&quot;Tom did not say &quot;Thank you,&quot; for he was quite absorbed in the thought
that Wakem's son did not seem so spiteful a fellow as might have been
expected.&quot;I say,&quot; he said presently, &quot;do you love your father?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Philip, coloring deeply; &quot;don't you love yours?&quot;&quot;Oh yes - I only wanted to know,&quot; said Tom, rather ashamed of himself,
now he saw Philip coloring and looking uncomfortable. He found much
difficulty in adjusting his attitude of mind toward the son of Lawyer
Wakem, and it had occurred to him that if Philip disliked his father,
that fact might go some way toward clearing up his perplexity.&quot;Shall you learn drawing now?&quot; he said, by way of changing the
subject.&quot;No,&quot; said Philip. &quot;My father wishes me to give all my time to other
things now.&quot;&quot;What! Latin and Euclid, and those things?&quot; said Tom.&quot;Yes,&quot; said Philip, who had left off using his pencil, and was resting
his head on one hand, while Tom was learning forward on both elbows,
and looking with increasing admiration at the dog and the donkey.&quot;And you don't mind that?&quot; said Tom, with strong curiosity.&quot;No; I like to know what everybody else knows. I can study what I like
by-and-by.&quot;&quot;I can't think why anybody should learn Latin,&quot; said Tom. &quot;It's no
good.&quot;&quot;It's part of the education of a gentleman,&quot; said Philip. &quot;All
gentlemen learn the same things.&quot;&quot;What! do you think Sir John Crake, the master of the harriers, knows
Latin?&quot; said Tom, who had often thought he should like to resemble Sir
John Crake.&quot;He learned it when he was a boy, of course,&quot; said Philip. &quot;But I dare
say he's forgotten it.&quot;&quot;Oh, well, I can do that, then,&quot; said Tom, not with any epigrammatic
intention, but with serious satisfaction at the idea that, as far as
Latin was concerned, there was no hindrance to his resembling Sir John
Crake. &quot;Only you're obliged to remember it while you're at school,
else you've got to learn ever so many lines of 'Speaker.' Mr.
Stelling's very particular - did you know? He'll have you up ten times
if you say 'nam' for 'jam,' - he won't let you go a letter wrong,Ican tell you.&quot;&quot;Oh, I don't mind,&quot; said Philip, unable to choke a laugh; &quot;I can
remember things easily. And there are some lessons I'm very fond of.
I'm very fond of Greek history, and everything about the Greeks. I
should like to have been a Greek and fought the Persians, and then
have come home and have written tragedies, or else have been listened
to by everybody for my wisdom, like Socrates, and have died a grand
death.&quot; (Philip, you perceive, was not without a wish to impress the
well-made barbarian with a sense of his mental superiority.)&quot;Why, were the Greeks great fighters?&quot; said Tom, who saw a vista in
this direction. &quot;Is there anything like David and Goliath and Samson
in the Greek history? Those are the only bits I like in the history of
the Jews.&quot;&quot;Oh, there are very fine stories of that sort about the Greeks, - about
the heroes of early times who killed the wild beasts, as Samson did.
And in the Odyssey - that's a beautiful poem - there's a more wonderful
giant than Goliath, - Polypheme, who had only one eye in the middle of
his forehead; and Ulysses, a little fellow, but very wise and cunning,
got a red-hot pine-tree and stuck it into this one eye, and made him
roar like a thousand bulls.&quot;&quot;Oh, what fun!&quot; said Tom, jumping away from the table, and stamping
first with one leg and then the other. &quot;I say, can you tell me all
about those stories? Because I sha'n't learn Greek, you know. Shall
I?&quot; he added, pausing in his stamping with a sudden alarm, lest the
contrary might be possible. &quot;Does every gentleman learn Greek? Will
Mr. Stelling make me begin with it, do you think?&quot;&quot;No, I should think not, very likely not,&quot; said Philip. &quot;But you may
read those stories without knowing Greek. I've got them in English.&quot;&quot;Oh, but I don't like reading; I'd sooner have you tell them me. But
only the fighting ones, you know. My sister Maggie is always wanting
to tell me stories, but they're stupid things. Girls' stories always
are. Can you tell a good many fighting stories?&quot;&quot;Oh yes,&quot; said Philip; &quot;lots of them, besides the Greek stories. I can
tell you about Richard C&Aring;&#147;ur-de-Lion and Saladin, and about William
Wallace and Robert Bruce and James Douglas, - I know no end.&quot;&quot;You're older than I am, aren't you?&quot; said Tom.&quot;Why, how old areyou?I'm fifteen.&quot;&quot;I'm only going in fourteen,&quot; said Tom. &quot;But I thrashed all the
fellows at Jacob's - that's where I was before I came here. And I beat
'em all at bandy and climbing. And I wish Mr. Stelling would let us go
fishing.Icould show you how to fish. Youcouldfish, couldn't
you? It's only standing, and sitting still, you know.&quot;Tom, in his turn, wished to make the balance dip in his favor. This
hunchback must not suppose that his acquaintance with fighting stories
put him on a par with an actual fighting hero, like Tom Tulliver.
Philip winced under this allusion to his unfitness for active sports,
and he answered almost peevishly, -&quot;I can't bear fishing. I think people look like fools sitting watching
a line hour after hour, or else throwing and throwing, and catching
nothing.&quot;&quot;Ah, but you wouldn't say they looked like fools when they landed a
big pike, I can tell you,&quot; said Tom, who had never caught anything
that was &quot;big&quot; in his life, but whose imagination was on the stretch
with indignant zeal for the honor of sport. Wakem's son, it was plain,
had his disagreeable points, and must be kept in due check. Happily
for the harmony of this first interview, they were now called to
dinner, and Philip was not allowed to develop farther his unsound
views on the subject of fishing. But Tom said to himself, that was
just what he should have expected from a hunchback.>


While Maggie's life-struggles had lain almost entirely within her own
soul, one shadowy army fighting another, and the slain shadows forever
rising again, Tom was engaged in a dustier, noisier warfare, grappling
with more substantial obstacles, and gaining more definite conquests.
So it has been since the days of Hecuba, and of Hector, Tamer of
horses; inside the gates, the women with streaming hair and uplifted
hands offering prayers, watching the world's combat from afar, filling
their long, empty days with memories and fears; outside, the men, in
fierce struggle with things divine and human, quenching memory in the
stronger light of purpose, losing the sense of dread and even of
wounds in the hurrying ardor of action.From what you have seen of Tom, I think he is not a youth of whom you
would prophesy failure in anything he had thoroughly wished; the
wagers are likely to be on his side, notwithstanding his small success
in the classics. For Tom had never desired success in this field of
enterprise; and for getting a fine flourishing growth of stupidity
there is nothing like pouring out on a mind a good amount of subjects
in which it feels no interest. But now Tom's strong will bound
together his integrity, his pride, his family regrets, and his
personal ambition, and made them one force, concentrating his efforts
and surmounting discouragements. His uncle Deane, who watched him
closely, soon began to conceive hopes of him, and to be rather proud
that he had brought into the employment of the firm a nephew who
appeared to be made of such good commercial stuff. The real kindness
of placing him in the warehouse first was soon evident to Tom, in the
hints his uncle began to throw out, that after a time he might perhaps
be trusted to travel at certain seasons, and buy in for the firm
various vulgar commodities with which I need not shock refined ears in
this place; and it was doubtless with a view to this result that Mr.
Deane, when he expected to take his wine alone, would tell Tom to step
in and sit with him an hour, and would pass that hour in much
lecturing and catechising concerning articles of export and import,
with an occasional excursus of more indirect utility on the relative
advantages to the merchants of St. Ogg's of having goods brought in
their own and in foreign bottoms, - a subject on which Mr. Deane, as a
ship-owner, naturally threw off a few sparks when he got warmed with
talk and wine.Already, in the second year, Tom's salary was raised; but all, except
the price of his dinner and clothes, went home into the tin box; and
he shunned comradeship, lest it should lead him into expenses in spite
of himself. Not that Tom was moulded on the spoony type of the
Industrious Apprentice; he had a very strong appetite for
pleasure, - would have liked to be a Tamer of horses and to make a
distinguished figure in all neighboring eyes, dispensing treats and
benefits to others with well-judged liberality, and being pronounced
one of the finest young fellows of those parts; nay, he determined to
achieve these things sooner or later; but his practical shrewdness
told him that the means no such achievements could only lie for him in
present abstinence and self-denial; there were certain milestones to
be passed, and one of the first was the payment of his father's debts.
Having made up his mind on that point, he strode along without
swerving, contracting some rather saturnine sternness, as a young man
is likely to do who has a premature call upon him for self-reliance.
Tom felt intensely that common cause with his father which springs
from family pride, and was bent on being irreproachable as a son; but
his growing experience caused him to pass much silent criticism on the
rashness and imprudence of his father's past conduct; their
dispositions were not in sympathy, and Tom's face showed little
radiance during his few home hours. Maggie had an awe of him, against
which she struggled as something unfair to her consciousness of wider
thoughts and deeper motives; but it was of no use to struggle. A
character at unity with itself - that performs what it intends, subdues
every counteracting impulse, and has no visions beyond the distinctly
possible - is strong by its very negations.You may imagine that Tom's more and more obvious unlikeness to his
father was well fitted to conciliate the maternal aunts and uncles;
and Mr. Deane's favorable reports and predictions to Mr. Glegg
concerning Tom's qualifications for business began to be discussed
amongst them with various acceptance. He was likely, it appeared, to
do the family credit without causing it any expense and trouble. Mrs.
Pullet had always thought it strange if Tom's excellent complexion, so
entirely that of the Dodsons, did not argue a certainty that he would
turn out well; his juvenile errors of running down the peacock, and
general disrespect to his aunts, only indicating a tinge of Tulliver
blood which he had doubtless outgrown. Mr. Glegg, who had contracted a
cautious liking for Tom ever since his spirited and sensible behavior
when the execution was in the house, was now warming into a resolution
to further his prospects actively, - some time, when an opportunity
offered of doing so in a prudent manner, without ultimate loss; but
Mrs. Glegg observed that she was not given to speak without book, as
some people were; that those who said least were most likely to find
their words made good; and that when the right moment came, it would
be seen who could do something better than talk. Uncle Pullet, after
silent meditation for a period of several lozenges, came distinctly to
the conclusion, that when a young man was likely to do well, it was
better not to meddle with him.Tom, meanwhile, had shown no disposition to rely on any one but
himself, though, with a natural sensitiveness toward all indications
of favorable opinion, he was glad to see his uncle Glegg look in on
him sometimes in a friendly way during business hours, and glad to be
invited to dine at his house, though he usually preferred declining on
the ground that he was not sure of being punctual. But about a year
ago, something had occurred which induced Tom to test his uncle
Glegg's friendly disposition.Bob Jakin, who rarely returned from one of his rounds without seeing
Tom and Maggie, awaited him on the bridge as he was coming home from
St. Ogg's one evening, that they might have a little private talk. He
took the liberty of asking if Mr. Tom had ever thought of making money
by trading a bit on his own account. Trading, how? Tom wished to know.
Why, by sending out a bit of a cargo to foreign ports; because Bob had
a particular friend who had offered to do a little business for him in
that way in Laceham goods, and would be glad to serve Mr. Tom on the
same footing. Tom was interested at once, and begged for full
explanation, wondering he had not thought of this plan before.He was so well pleased with the prospect of a speculation that might
change the slow process of addition into multiplication, that he at
once determined to mention the matter to his father, and get his
consent to appropriate some of the savings in the tin box to the
purchase of a small cargo. He would rather not have consulted his
father, but he had just paid his last quarter's money into the tin
box, and there was no other resource. All the savings were there; for
Mr. Tulliver would not consent to put the money out at interest lest
he should lose it. Since he had speculated in the purchase of some
corn, and had lost by it, he could not be easy without keeping the
money under his eye.Tom approached the subject carefully, as he was seated on the hearth
with his father that evening, and Mr. Tulliver listened, leaning
forward in his arm-chair and looking up in Tom's face with a sceptical
glance. His first impulse was to give a positive refusal, but he was
in some awe of Tom's wishes, and since he had the sense of being an
&quot;unlucky&quot; father, he had lost some of his old peremptoriness and
determination to be master. He took the key of the bureau from his
pocket, got out the key of the large chest, and fetched down the tin
box, - slowly, as if he were trying to defer the moment of a painful
parting. Then he seated himself against the table, and opened the box
with that little padlock-key which he fingered in his waistcoat pocket
in all vacant moments. There they were, the dingy bank-notes and the
bright sovereigns, and he counted them out on the table - only a
hundred and sixteen pounds in two years, after all the pinching.&quot;How much do you want, then?&quot; he said, speaking as if the words burnt
his lips.&quot;Suppose I begin with the thirty-six pounds, father?&quot; said Tom.Mr. Tulliver separated this sum from the rest, and keeping his hand
over it, said:&quot;It's as much as I can save out o' my pay in a year.&quot;&quot;Yes, father; it is such slow work, saving out of the little money we
get. And in this way we might double our savings.&quot;&quot;Ay, my lad,&quot; said the father, keeping his hand on the money, &quot;but you
might lose it, - you might lose a year o' my life, - and I haven't got
many.&quot;Tom was silent.&quot;And you know I wouldn't pay a dividend with the first hundred,
because I wanted to see it all in a lump, - and when I see it, I'm sure
on't. If you trust to luck, it's sure to be against me. It's Old
Harry's got the luck in his hands; and if I lose one year, I shall
never pick it up again; death 'ull o'ertake me.&quot;Mr. Tulliver's voice trembled, and Tom was silent for a few minutes
before he said:&quot;I'll give it up, father, since you object to it so strongly.&quot;But, unwilling to abandon the scheme altogether, he determined to ask
his uncle Glegg to venture twenty pounds, on condition of receiving
five per cent. of the profits. That was really a very small thing to
ask. So when Bob called the next day at the wharf to know the
decision, Tom proposed that they should go together to his uncle
Glegg's to open the business; for his diffident pride clung to him,
and made him feel that Bobs' tongue would relieve him from some
embarrassment.Mr. Glegg, at the pleasant hour of four in the afternoon of a hot
August day, was naturally counting his wall-fruit to assure himself
that the sum total had not varied since yesterday. To him entered Tom,
in what appeared to Mr. Glegg very questionable companionship, - that
of a man with a pack on his back, - for Bob was equipped for a new
journey, - and of a huge brindled bull-terrier, who walked with a slow,
swaying movement from side to side, and glanced from under his
eye-lids with a surly indifference which might after all be a cover to
the most offensive designs.Mr. Glegg's spectacles, which had been assisting him in counting the
fruit, made these suspicious details alarmingly evident to him.&quot;Heigh! heigh! keep that dog back, will you?&quot; he shouted, snatching up
a stake and holding it before him as a shield when the visitors were
within three yards of him.&quot;Get out wi' you, Mumps,&quot; said Bob, with a kick. &quot;He's as quiet as a
lamb, sir,&quot; - an observation which Mumps corroborated by a low growl as
he retreated behind his master's legs.&quot;Why, what ever does this mean, Tom?&quot; said Mr. Glegg. &quot;Have you
brought information about the scoundrels as cut my trees?&quot; If Bob came
in the character of &quot;information,&quot; Mr. Glegg saw reasons for
tolerating some irregularity.&quot;No, sir,&quot; said Tom; &quot;I came to speak to you about a little matter of
business of my own.&quot;&quot;Ay - well; but what has this dog got to do with it?&quot; said the old
gentleman, getting mild again.&quot;It's my dog, sir,&quot; said the ready Bob. &quot;An' it's me as put Mr. Tom up
to the bit o' business; for Mr. Tom's been a friend o' mine iver since
I was a little chap; fust thing iver I did was frightenin' the birds
for th' old master. An' if a bit o' luck turns up, I'm allays thinkin'
if I can let Mr. Tom have a pull at it. An' it's a downright roarin'
shame, as when he's got the chance o' making a bit o' money wi'
sending goods out, - ten or twelve per zent clear, when freight an'
commission's paid, - as he shouldn't lay hold o' the chance for want o'
money. An' when there's the Laceham goods, - lors! they're made o'
purpose for folks as want to send out a little carguy; light, an' take
up no room, - you may pack twenty pound so as you can't see the
passill; an' they're manifacturs as please fools, so I reckon they
aren't like to want a market. An' I'd go to Laceham an' buy in the
goods for Mr. Tom along wi' my own. An' there's the shupercargo o' the
bit of a vessel as is goin' to take 'em out. I know him partic'lar;
he's a solid man, an' got a family i' the town here. Salt, his name
is, - an' a briny chap he is too, - an' if you don't believe me, I can
take you to him.&quot;Uncle Glegg stood open-mouthed with astonishment at this unembarrassed
loquacity, with which his understanding could hardly keep pace. He
looked at Bob, first over his spectacles, then through them, then over
them again; while Tom, doubtful of his uncle's impression, began to
wish he had not brought this singular Aaron, or mouthpiece. Bob's talk
appeared less seemly, now some one besides himself was listening to
it.&quot;You seem to be a knowing fellow,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, at last.&quot;Ay, sir, you say true,&quot; returned Bob, nodding his head aside; &quot;I
think my head's all alive inside like an old cheese, for I'm so full
o' plans, one knocks another over. If I hadn't Mumps to talk to, I
should get top-heavy an' tumble in a fit. I suppose it's because I
niver went to school much. That's what I jaw my old mother for. I
says, 'You should ha' sent me to school a bit more,' I says, 'an' then
I could ha' read i' the books like fun, an' kep' my head cool an'
empty.' Lors, she's fine an' comfor'ble now, my old mother is; she
ates her baked meat an' taters as often as she likes. For I'm gettin'
so full o' money, I must hev a wife to spend it for me. But it's
botherin,' a wife is, - and Mumps mightn't like her.&quot;Uncle Glegg, who regarded himself as a jocose man since he had retired
from business, was beginning to find Bob amusing, but he had still a
disapproving observation to make, which kept his face serious.&quot;Ah,&quot; he said, &quot;I should think you're at a loss for ways o' spending
your money, else you wouldn't keep that big dog, to eat as much as two
Christians. It's shameful - shameful!&quot; But he spoke more in sorrow than
in anger, and quickly added:&quot;But, come now, let's hear more about this business, Tom. I suppose
you want a little sum to make a venture with. But where's all your own
money? You don't spend it all - eh?&quot;&quot;No, sir,&quot; said Tom, coloring; &quot;but my father is unwilling to risk it,
and I don't like to press him. If I could get twenty or thirty pounds
to begin with, I could pay five per cent for it, and then I could
gradually make a little capital of my own, and do without a loan.&quot;&quot;Ay - ay,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, in an approving tone; &quot;that's not a bad
notion, and I won't say as I wouldn't be your man. But it 'ull be as
well for me to see this Salt, as you talk on. And then - here's this
friend o' yours offers to buy the goods for you. Perhaps you've got
somebody to stand surety for you if the money's put into your hands?&quot;
added the cautious old gentleman, looking over his spectacles at Bob.&quot;I don't think that's necessary, uncle,&quot; said Tom. &quot;At least, I mean
it would not be necessary for me, because I know Bob well; but perhaps
it would be right for you to have some security.&quot;&quot;You get your percentage out o' the purchase, I suppose?&quot; said Mr.
Glegg, looking at Bob.&quot;No, sir,&quot; said Bob, rather indignantly; &quot;I didn't offer to get a
apple for Mr. Tom, o' purpose to hev a bite out of it myself. When I
play folks tricks, there'll be more fun in 'em nor that.&quot;&quot;Well, but it's nothing but right you should have a small percentage,&quot;
said Mr. Glegg. &quot;I've no opinion o' transactions where folks do things
for nothing. It allays looks bad.&quot;&quot;Well, then,&quot; said Bob, whose keenness saw at once what was implied,
&quot;I'll tell you what I get by't, an' it's money in my pocket in the
end, - I make myself look big, wi' makin' a bigger purchase. That's
what I'm thinking on. Lors! I'm a 'cute chap, - I am.&quot;&quot;Mr. Glegg, Mr. Glegg!&quot; said a severe voice from the open parlor
window, &quot;pray are you coming in to tea, or are you going to stand
talking with packmen till you get murdered in the open daylight?&quot;&quot;Murdered?&quot; said Mr. Glegg; &quot;what's the woman talking of? Here's your
nephey Tom come about a bit o' business.&quot;&quot;Murdered, - yes, - it isn't many 'sizes ago since a packman murdered a
young woman in a lone place, and stole her thimble, and threw her body
into a ditch.&quot;&quot;Nay, nay,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, soothingly, &quot;you're thinking o' the man
wi' no legs, as drove a dog-cart.&quot;&quot;Well, it's the same thing, Mr. Glegg, only you're fond o'
contradicting what I say; and if my nephey's come about business, it
'ud be more fitting if you'd bring him into the house, and let his
aunt know about it, instead o' whispering in corners, in that
plotting, underminding way.&quot;&quot;Well, well,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, &quot;we'll come in now.&quot;&quot;You needn't stay here,&quot; said the lady to Bob, in a loud voice,
adapted to the moral, not the physical, distance between them. &quot;We
don't want anything. I don't deal wi' packmen. Mind you shut the gate
after you.&quot;&quot;Stop a bit; not so fast,&quot; said Mr. Glegg; &quot;I haven't done with this
young man yet. Come in, Tom; come in,&quot; he added, stepping in at the
French window.&quot;Mr. Glegg,&quot; said Mrs. G., in a fatal tone, &quot;if you're going to let
that man and his dog in on my carpet, before my very face, be so good
as to let me know. A wife's got a right to ask that, I hope.&quot;&quot;Don't you be uneasy, mum,&quot; said Bob, touching his cap. He saw at once
that Mrs. Glegg was a bit of game worth running down, and longed to be
at the sport; &quot;we'll stay out upo' the gravel here, - Mumps and me
will. Mumps knows his company, - he does. I might hish at him by th'
hour together, before he'd fly at a real gentlewoman like you. It's
wonderful how he knows which is the good-looking ladies; and's
partic'lar fond of 'em when they've good shapes. Lors!&quot; added Bob,
laying down his pack on the gravel, &quot;it's a thousand pities such a
lady as you shouldn't deal with a packman, i' stead o' goin' into
these newfangled shops, where there's half-a-dozen fine gents wi'
their chins propped up wi' a stiff stock, a-looking like bottles wi'
ornamental stoppers, an' all got to get their dinner out of a bit o'
calico; it stan's to reason you must pay three times the price you pay
a packman, as is the nat'ral way o' gettin' goods, - an' pays no rent,
an' isn't forced to throttle himself till the lies are squeezed out on
him, whether he will or no. But lors! mum, you know what it is better
nor I do, -youcan see through them shopmen, I'll be bound.&quot;&quot;Yes, I reckon I can, and through the packmen too,&quot; observed Mrs.
Glegg, intending to imply that Bob's flattery had produced no effect
onher;while her husband, standing behind her with his hands in his
pockets and legs apart, winked and smiled with conjugal delight at the
probability of his wife's being circumvented.&quot;Ay, to be sure, mum,&quot; said Bob. &quot;Why, you must ha' dealt wi' no end
o' packmen when you war a young lass - before the master here had the
luck to set eyes on you. I know where you lived, I do, - seen th' house
many a time, - close upon Squire Darleigh's, - a stone house wi'
steps -  - &quot;&quot;Ah, that it had,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, pouring out the tea. &quot;You know
something o' my family, then? Are you akin to that packman with a
squint in his eye, as used to bring th' Irish linen?&quot;&quot;Look you there now!&quot; said Bob, evasively. &quot;Didn't I know as you'd
remember the best bargains you've made in your life was made wi'
packmen? Why, you see even a squintin' packman's better nor a shopman
as can see straight. Lors! if I'd had the luck to call at the stone
house wi' my pack, as lies here,&quot; - stooping and thumping the bundle
emphatically with his fist, - &quot;an' th' handsome young lasses all
stannin' out on the stone steps, it ud' ha' been summat like openin' a
pack, that would. It's on'y the poor houses now as a packman calls on,
if it isn't for the sake o' the sarvant-maids. They're paltry times,
these are. Why, mum, look at the printed cottons now, an' what they
was when you wore 'em, - why, you wouldn't put such a thing on now, I
can see. It must be first-rate quality, the manifactur as you'd
buy, - summat as 'ud wear as well as your own faitures.&quot;&quot;Yes, better quality nor any you're like to carry; you've got nothing
first-rate but brazenness, I'll be bound,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, with a
triumphant sense of her insurmountable sagacity. &quot;Mr. Glegg, are you
going ever to sit down to your tea? Tom, there's a cup for you.&quot;&quot;You speak true there, mum,&quot; said Bob. &quot;My pack isn't for ladies like
you. The time's gone by for that. Bargains picked up dirt cheap! A bit
o' damage here an' there, as can be cut out, or else niver seen i' the
wearin', but not fit to offer to rich folks as can pay for the look o'
things as nobody sees. I'm not the man as 'ud offer t' open my pack toyou, mum; no, no; I'm a imperent chap, as you say, - these times
makes folks imperent, - but I'm not up to the mark o' that.&quot;&quot;Why, what goods do you carry in your pack?&quot; said Mrs. Glegg.
&quot;Fine-colored things, I suppose, - shawls an' that?&quot;&quot;All sorts, mum, all sorts,&quot; said Bob, - thumping his bundle; &quot;but let
us say no more about that, ifyouplease. I'm here upo' Mr. Tom's
business, an' I'm not the man to take up the time wi' my own.&quot;&quot;And pray, whatisthis business as is to be kept from me?&quot; said
Mrs. Glegg, who, solicited by a double curiosity, was obliged to let
the one-half wait.&quot;A little plan o' nephey Tom's here,&quot; said good-natured Mr. Glegg;
&quot;and not altogether a bad 'un, I think. A little plan for making
money; that's the right sort o' plan for young folks as have got their
fortin to make, eh, Jane?&quot;&quot;But I hope it isn't a plan where he expects iverything to be done for
him by his friends; that's what the young folks think of mostly
nowadays. And pray, what has this packman got to do wi' what goes on
in our family? Can't you speak for yourself, Tom, and let your aunt
know things, as a nephey should?&quot;&quot;This is Bob Jakin, aunt,&quot; said Tom, bridling the irritation that aunt
Glegg's voice always produced. &quot;I've known him ever since we were
little boys. He's a very good fellow, and always ready to do me a
kindness. And he has had some experience in sending goods out, - a
small part of a cargo as a private speculation; and he thinks if I
could begin to do a little in the same way, I might make some money. A
large interest is got in that way.&quot;&quot;Large int'rest?&quot; said aunt Glegg, with eagerness; &quot;and what do you
call large int'rest?&quot;&quot;Ten or twelve per cent, Bob says, after expenses are paid.&quot;&quot;Then why wasn't I let to know o' such things before, Mr. Glegg?&quot; said
Mrs. Glegg, turning to her husband, with a deep grating tone of
reproach. &quot;Haven't you allays told me as there was no getting more nor
five per cent?&quot;&quot;Pooh, pooh, nonsense, my good woman,&quot; said Mr. Glegg. &quot;You couldn't
go into trade, could you? You can't get more than five per cent with
security.&quot;&quot;But I can turn a bit o' money for you, an' welcome, mum,&quot; said Bob,
&quot;if you'd like to risk it, - not as there's any risk to speak on. But
if you'd a mind to lend a bit o' money to Mr. Tom, he'd pay you six or
seven per zent, an' get a trifle for himself as well; an' a
good-natur'd lady like you 'ud like the feel o' the money better if
your nephey took part on it.&quot;&quot;What do you say, Mrs. G.?&quot; said Mr. Glegg. &quot;I've a notion, when I've
made a bit more inquiry, as I shall perhaps start Tom here with a bit
of a nest-egg, - he'll pay me int'rest, you know, - an' if you've got
some little sums lyin' idle twisted up in a stockin' toe, or that -  - &quot;&quot;Mr. Glegg, it's beyond iverything! You'll go and give information to
the tramps next, as they may come and rob me.&quot;&quot;Well, well, as I was sayin', if you like to join me wi' twenty
pounds, you can - I'll make it fifty. That'll be a pretty good
nest-egg, eh, Tom?&quot;&quot;You're not counting on me, Mr. Glegg, I hope,&quot; said his wife. &quot;You
could do fine things wi' my money, I don't doubt.&quot;&quot;Very well,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, rather snappishly, &quot;then we'll do without
you. I shall go with you to see this Salt,&quot; he added, turning to Bob.&quot;And now, I suppose, you'll go all the other way, Mr. Glegg,&quot; said
Mrs. G., &quot;and want to shut me out o' my own nephey's business. I never
said I wouldn't put money into it, - I don't say as it shall be twenty
pounds, though you're so ready to say it for me, - but he'll see some
day as his aunt's in the right not to risk the money she's saved for
him till it's proved as it won't be lost.&quot;&quot;Ay, that's a pleasant sort o'risk, that is,&quot; said Mr. Glegg,
indiscreetly winking at Tom, who couldn't avoid smiling. But Bob
stemmed the injured lady's outburst.&quot;Ay, mum,&quot; he said admiringly, &quot;you know what's what - you do. An' it's
nothing but fair.Yousee how the first bit of a job answers, an'
then you'll come down handsome. Lors, it's a fine thing to hev good
kin. I got my bit of a nest-egg, as the master calls it, all by my own
sharpness, - ten suvreigns it was, - wi' dousing the fire at Torry's
mill, an' it's growed an' growed by a bit an' a bit, till I'n got a
matter o' thirty pound to lay out, besides makin' my mother
comfor'ble. I should get more, on'y I'm such a soft wi' the women, - I
can't help lettin' 'em hev such good bargains. There's this bundle,
now,&quot; thumping it lustily, &quot;any other chap 'ud make a pretty penny out
on it. But me! - lors, I shall sell 'em for pretty near what I paid for
'em.&quot;&quot;Have you got a bit of good net, now?&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, in a
patronizing tone, moving from the tea-table, and folding her napkin.&quot;Eh, mum, not what you'd think it worth your while to look at. I'd
scorn to show it you. It 'ud be an insult to you.&quot;&quot;But let me see,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, still patronizing. &quot;If they're
damaged goods, they're like enough to be a bit the better quality.&quot;&quot;No, mum, I know my place,&quot; said Bob, lifting up his pack and
shouldering it. &quot;I'm not going t' expose the lowness o' my trade to a
lady like you. Packs is come down i' the world; it 'ud cut you to th'
heart to see the difference. I'm at your sarvice, sir, when you've a
mind to go and see Salt.&quot;&quot;All in good time,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, really unwilling to cut short the
dialogue. &quot;Are you wanted at the wharf, Tom?&quot;&quot;No, sir; I left Stowe in my place.&quot;&quot;Come, put down your pack, and let me see,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, drawing a
chair to the window and seating herself with much dignity.&quot;Don't you ask it, mum,&quot; said Bob, entreatingly.&quot;Make no more words,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, severely, &quot;but do as I tell
you.&quot;&quot;Eh mum, I'm loth, that I am,&quot; said Bob, slowly depositing his pack on
the step, and beginning to untie it with unwilling fingers. &quot;But what
you order shall be done&quot; (much fumbling in pauses between the
sentences). &quot;It's not as you'll buy a single thing on me, - I'd be
sorry for you to do it, - for think o' them poor women up i' the
villages there, as niver stir a hundred yards from home, - it 'ud be a
pity for anybody to buy up their bargains. Lors, it's as good as a
junketing to 'em when they see me wi' my pack, an' I shall niver pick
up such bargains for 'em again. Least ways, I've no time now, for I'm
off to Laceham. See here now,&quot; Bob went on, becoming rapid again, and
holding up a scarlet woollen Kerchief with an embroidered wreath in
the corner; &quot;here's a thing to make a lass's mouth water, an' on'y two
shillin' - an' why? Why, 'cause there's a bit of a moth-hole 'i this
plain end. Lors, I think the moths an' the mildew was sent by
Providence o' purpose to cheapen the goods a bit for the good-lookin'
women as han't got much money. If it hadn't been for the moths, now,
every hankicher on 'em 'ud ha' gone to the rich, handsome ladies, like
you, mum, at five shillin' apiece, - not a farthin' less; but what does
the moth do? Why, it nibbles off three shillin' o' the price i' no
time; an' then a packman like me can carry 't to the poor lasses as
live under the dark thack, to make a bit of a blaze for 'em. Lors,
it's as good as a fire, to look at such a hankicher!&quot;Bob held it at a distance for admiration, but Mrs. Glegg said sharply:&quot;Yes, but nobody wants a fire this time o' year. Put these colored
things by; let me look at your nets, if you've got 'em.&quot;&quot;Eh, mum, I told you how it 'ud be,&quot; said Bob, flinging aside the
colored things with an air of desperation. &quot;I knowed it ud' turn
again' you to look at such paltry articles as I carry. Here's a piece
o' figured muslin now, what's the use o' you lookin' at it? You might
as well look at poor folks's victual, mum; it 'ud on'y take away your
appetite. There's a yard i' the middle on't as the pattern's all
missed, - lors, why, it's a muslin as the Princess Victoree might ha'
wore; but,&quot; added Bob, flinging it behind him on to the turf, as if to
save Mrs. Glegg's eyes, &quot;it'll be bought up by the huckster's wife at
Fibb's End, - that's whereit'llgo - ten shillin' for the whole
lot - ten yards, countin' the damaged un - five-an'-twenty shillin' 'ud
ha' been the price, not a penny less. But I'll say no more, mum; it's
nothing to you, a piece o' muslin like that; you can afford to pay
three times the money for a thing as isn't half so good. It's netsyoutalked on; well, I've got a piece as 'ull serve you to make fun
on -  - &quot;&quot;Bring me that muslin,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg. &quot;It's a buff; I'm partial to
buff.&quot;&quot;Eh, but adamagedthing,&quot; said Bob, in a tone of deprecating
disgust. &quot;You'd do nothing with it, mum, you'd give it to the cook, I
know you would, an' it 'ud be a pity, - she'd look too much like a lady
in it; it's unbecoming for servants.&quot;&quot;Fetch it, and let me see you measure it,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg,
authoritatively.Bob obeyed with ostentatious reluctance.&quot;See what there is over measure!&quot; he said, holding forth the extra
half-yard, while Mrs. Glegg was busy examining the damaged yard, and
throwing her head back to see how far the fault would be lost on a
distant view.&quot;I'll give you six shilling for it,&quot; she said, throwing it down with
the air of a person who mentions an ultimatum.&quot;Didn't I tell you now, mum, as it 'ud hurt your feelings to look at
my pack? That damaged bit's turned your stomach now; I see it has,&quot;
said Bob, wrapping the muslin up with the utmost quickness, and
apparently about to fasten up his pack. &quot;You're used to seein' a
different sort o' article carried by packmen, when you lived at the
stone house. Packs is come down i' the world; I told you that;mygoods are for common folks. Mrs. Pepper 'ull give me ten shillin' for
that muslin, an' be sorry as I didn't ask her more. Such articles
answer i' the wearin', - they keep their color till the threads melt
away i' the wash-tub, an' that won't be whileI'ma young un.&quot;&quot;Well, seven shilling,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg.&quot;Put it out o' your mind, mum, now do,&quot; said Bob. &quot;Here's a bit o'
net, then, for you to look at before I tie up my pack, just for you to
see what my trade's come to, - spotted and sprigged, you see, beautiful
but yallow, - 's been lyin' by an' got the wrong color. I could niver
ha' bought such net, if it hadn't been yallow. Lors, it's took me a
deal o' study to know the vally o' such articles; when I begun to
carry a pack, I was as ignirant as a pig; net or calico was all the
same to me. I thought them things the most vally as was the thickest.
I was took in dreadful, for I'm a straightforrard chap, - up to no
tricks, mum. I can only say my nose is my own, for if I went beyond, I
should lose myself pretty quick. An' I gev five-an'-eightpence for
that piece o' net, - if I was to tell y' anything else I should be
tellin' you fibs, - an' five-an'-eightpence I shall ask of it, not a
penny more, for it's a woman's article, an' I like to 'commodate the
women. Five-an'-eightpence for six yards, - as cheap as if it was only
the dirt on it as was paid for.'&quot;&quot;I don't mind having three yards of it,'&quot; said Mrs. Glegg.&quot;Why, there's but six altogether,&quot; said Bob. &quot;No, mum, it isn't worth
your while; you can go to the shop to-morrow an' get the same pattern
ready whitened. It's on'y three times the money; what's that to a lady
like you?&quot; He gave an emphatic tie to his bundle.&quot;Come, lay me out that muslin,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg. &quot;Here's eight
shilling for it.&quot;&quot;Youwillbe jokin',&quot; said Bob, looking up with a laughing face; &quot;I
see'd you was a pleasant lady when I fust come to the winder.&quot;&quot;Well, put it me out,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, peremptorily.&quot;But if I let you have it for ten shillin', mum, you'll be so good as
not tell nobody. I should be a laughin'-stock; the trade 'ud hoot me,
if they knowed it. I'm obliged to make believe as I ask more nor I do
for my goods, else they'd find out I was a flat. I'm glad you don't
insist upo' buyin' the net, for then I should ha' lost my two best
bargains for Mrs. Pepper o' Fibb's End, an' she's a rare customer.&quot;&quot;Let me look at the net again,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, yearning after the
cheap spots and sprigs, now they were vanishing.&quot;Well, I can't denyyou, mum,&quot; said Bob handing it out.&quot;Eh!, see what a pattern now! Real Laceham goods. Now, this is the
sort o' article I'm recommendin' Mr. Tom to send out. Lors, it's a
fine thing for anybody as has got a bit o' money; these Laceham goods
'ud make it breed like maggits. If I was a lady wi' a bit o'
money! - why, I know one as put thirty pounds into them goods, - a lady
wi' a cork leg, but as sharp, - you wouldn't catchherrunnin' her
head into a sack;she'dsee her way clear out o' anything afore
she'd be in a hurry to start. Well, she let out thirty pound to a
young man in the drapering line, and he laid it out i' Laceham goods,
an' a shupercargo o' my acquinetance (not Salt) took 'em out, an' she
got her eight per zent fust go off; an' now you can't hold her but she
must be sendin' out carguies wi' every ship, till she's gettin' as
rich as a Jew. Bucks her name is, she doesn't live i' this town. Now
then, mum, if you'll please to give me the net -  - &quot;&quot;Here's fifteen shilling, then, for the two,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg. &quot;But
it's a shameful price.&quot;&quot;Nay, mum, you'll niver say that when you're upo' your knees i' church
i' five years' time. I'm makin' you a present o' th' articles; I am,
indeed. That eightpence shaves off my profits as clean as a razor. Now
then, sir,&quot; continued Bob, shouldering his pack, &quot;if you please, I'll
be glad to go and see about makin' Mr. Tom's fortin. Eh, I wish I'd
got another twenty pound to lay out _my_sen; I shouldn't stay to say
my Catechism afore I knowed what to do wi't.&quot;&quot;Stop a bit, Mr. Glegg,&quot; said the lady, as her husband took his hat,
&quot;you neverwillgive me the chance o' speaking. You'll go away now,
and finish everything about this business, and come back and tell me
it's too late for me to speak. As if I wasn't my nephey's own aunt,
and the head o' the family on his mother's side! and laid by guineas,
all full weight, for him, as he'll know who to respect when I'm laid
in my coffin.&quot;&quot;Well, Mrs. G., say what you mean,&quot; said Mr. G., hastily.&quot;Well, then, I desire as nothing may be done without my knowing. I
don't say as I sha'n't venture twenty pounds, if you make out as
everything's right and safe. And if I do, Tom,&quot; concluded Mrs. Glegg,
turning impressively to her nephew, &quot;I hope you'll allays bear it in
mind and be grateful for such an aunt. I mean you to pay me interest,
you know; I don't approve o' giving; we niver looked for that inmyfamily.&quot;&quot;Thank you, aunt,&quot; said Tom, rather proudly. &quot;I prefer having the
money only lent to me.&quot;&quot;Very well; that's the Dodson sperrit,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, rising to get
her knitting with the sense that any further remark after this would
be bathos.Salt - that eminently &quot;briny chap&quot; - having been discovered in a cloud
of tobacco-smoke at the Anchor Tavern, Mr. Glegg commenced inquiries
which turned out satisfactorily enough to warrant the advance of the
&quot;nest-egg,&quot; to which aunt Glegg contributed twenty pounds; and in this
modest beginning you see the ground of a fact which might otherwise
surprise you; namely, Tom's accumulation of a fund, unknown to his
father, that promised in no very long time to meet the more tardy
process of saving, and quite cover the deficit. When once his
attention had been turned to this source of gain, Tom determined to
make the most of it, and lost on opportunity of obtaining information
and extending his small enterprises. In not telling his father, he was
influenced by that strange mixture of opposite feelings which often
gives equal truth to those who blame an action and those who admire
it, - partly, it was that disinclination to confidence which is seen
between near kindred, that family repulsion which spoils the most
sacred relations of our lives; partly, it was the desire to surprise
his father with a great joy. He did not see that it would have been
better to soothe the interval with a new hope, and prevent the
delirium of a too sudden elation.At the time of Maggie's first meeting with Philip, Tom had already
nearly a hundred and fifty pounds of his own capital; and while they
were walking by the evening light in the Red Deeps, he, by the same
evening light, was riding into Laceham, proud of being on his first
journey on behalf of Guest &amp; Co., and revolving in his mind all the
chances that by the end of another year he should have doubled his
gains, lifted off the obloquy of debt from his father's name, and
perhaps - for he should be twenty-one - have got a new start for
himself, on a higher platform of employment. Did he not desire it? He
was quite sure that he did.>


Mr. Tulliver was an essentially sober man, - able to take his glass and
not averse to it, but never exceeding the bounds of moderation. He had
naturally an active Hotspur temperament, which did not crave liquid
fire to set it aglow; his impetuosity was usually equal to an exciting
occasion without any such reinforcements; and his desire for the
brandy-and-water implied that the too sudden joy had fallen with a
dangerous shock on a frame depressed by four years of gloom and
unaccustomed hard fare. But that first doubtful tottering moment
passed, he seemed to gather strength with his gathering excitement;
and the next day, when he was seated at table with his creditors, his
eye kindling and his cheek flushed with the consciousness that he was
about to make an honorable figure once more, he looked more like the
proud, confident, warm-hearted, and warm-tempered Tulliver of old
times than might have seemed possible to any one who had met him a
week before, riding along as had been his wont for the last four years
since the sense of failure and debt had been upon him, - with his head
hanging down, casting brief, unwilling looks on those who forced
themselves on his notice. He made his speech, asserting his honest
principles with his old confident eagerness, alluding to the rascals
and the luck that had been against him, but that he had triumphed
over, to some extent, by hard efforts and the aid of a good son; and
winding up with the story of how Tom had got the best part of the
needful money. But the streak of irritation and hostile triumph seemed
to melt for a little while into purer fatherly pride and pleasure,
when, Tom's health having been proposed, and uncle Deane having taken
occasion to say a few words of eulogy on his general character and
conduct, Tom himself got up and made the single speech of his life. It
could hardly have been briefer. He thanked the gentlmen for the honor
they had done him. He was glad that he had been able to help his
father in proving his integrity and regaining his honest name; and,
for his own part, he hoped he should never undo that work and disgrace
that name. But the applause that followed was so great, and Tom looked
so gentlemanly as well as tall and straight, that Mr. Tulliver
remarked, in an explanatory manner, to his friends on his right and
left, that he had spent a deal of money on his son's education.The party broke up in very sober fashion at five o'clock. Tom remained
in St. Ogg's to attend to some business, and Mr. Tulliver mounted his
horse to go home, and describe the memorable things that had been said
and done, to &quot;poor Bessy and the little wench.&quot; The air of excitement
that hung about him was but faintly due to good cheer or any stimulus
but the potent wine of triumphant joy. He did not choose any back
street to-day, but rode slowly, with uplifted head and free glances,
along the principal street all the way to the bridge.Why did he not happen to meet Wakem? The want of that coincidence
vexed him, and set his mind at work in an irritating way. Perhaps
Wakem was gone out of town to-day on purpose to avoid seeing or
hearing anything of an honorable action which might well cause him
some unpleasant twinges. If Wakem were to meet him then, Mr. Tulliver
would look straight at him, and the rascal would perhaps be forsaken a
little by his cool, domineering impudence. He would know by and by
that an honest man was not going to servehimany longer, and lend
his honesty to fill a pocket already over-full of dishonest gains.
Perhaps the luck was beginning to turn; perhaps the Devil didn't
always hold the best cards in this world.Simmering in this way, Mr. Tulliver approached the yardgates of
Dorlcote Mill, near enough to see a well-known figure coming out of
them on a fine black horse. They met about fifty yards from the gates,
between the great chestnuts and elms and the high bank.&quot;Tulliver,&quot; said Wakem, abruptly, in a haughtier tone than usual,
&quot;what a fool's trick you did, - spreading those hard lumps on that Far
Close! I told you how it would be; but you men never learn to farm
with any method.&quot;&quot;Oh!&quot; said Tulliver, suddenly boiling up; &quot;get somebody else to farm
for you, then, as'll askyouto teach him.&quot;&quot;You have been drinking, I suppose,&quot; said Wakem, really believing that
this was the meaning of Tulliver's flushed face and sparkling eyes.&quot;No, I've not been drinking,&quot; said Tulliver; &quot;I want no drinking to
help me make up my mind as I'll serve no longer under a scoundrel.&quot;&quot;Very well! you may leave my premises to-morrow, then; hold your
insolent tongue and let me pass.&quot; (Tulliver was backing his horse
across the road to hem Wakem in.)&quot;No, Isha'n'tlet you pass,&quot; said Tulliver, getting fiercer. &quot;I
shall tell you what I think of you first. You're too big a raskill to
get hanged - you're -  - &quot;&quot;Let me pass, you ignorant brute, or I'll ride over you.&quot;Mr. Tulliver, spurring his horse and raising his whip, made a rush
forward; and Wakem's horse, rearing and staggering backward, threw his
rider from the saddle and sent him sideways on the ground. Wakem had
had the presence of mind to loose the bridle at once, and as the horse
only staggered a few paces and then stood still, he might have risen
and remounted without more inconvenience than a bruise and a shake.
But before he could rise, Tulliver was off his horse too. The sight of
the long-hated predominant man down, and in his power, threw him into
a frenzy of triumphant vengeance, which seemed to give him
preternatural agility and strength. He rushed on Wakem, who was in the
act of trying to recover his feet, grasped him by the left arm so as
to press Wakem's whole weight on the right arm, which rested on the
ground, and flogged him fiercely across the back with his riding-whip.
Wakem shouted for help, but no help came, until a woman's scream was
heard, and the cry of &quot;Father, father!&quot;Suddenly, Wakem felt, something had arrested Mr. Tulliver's arm; for
the flogging ceased, and the grasp on his own arm was relaxed.&quot;Get away with you - go!&quot; said Tulliver, angrily. But it was not to
Wakem that he spoke. Slowly the lawyer rose, and, as he turned his
head, saw that Tulliver's arms were being held by a girl, rather by
the fear of hurting the girl that clung to him with all her young
might.&quot;Oh, Luke - mother - come and help Mr. Wakem!&quot; Maggie cried, as she
heard the longed-for footsteps.&quot;Help me on to that low horse,&quot; said Wakem to Luke, &quot;then I shall
perhaps manage; though - confound it - I think this arm is sprained.&quot;With some difficulty, Wakem was heaved on to Tulliver's horse. Then he
turned toward the miller and said, with white rage, &quot;You'll suffer for
this, sir. Your daughter is a witness that you've assaulted me.&quot;&quot;I don't care,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, in a thick, fierce voice; &quot;go and
show your back, and tell 'em I thrashed you. Tell 'em I've made things
a bit more even i' the world.&quot;&quot;Ride my horse home with me,&quot; said Wakem to Luke. &quot;By the Tofton
Ferry, not through the town.&quot;&quot;Father, come in!&quot; said Maggie, imploringly. Then, seeing that Wakem
had ridden off, and that no further violence was possible, she
slackened her hold and burst into hysteric sobs, while poor Mrs.
Tulliver stood by in silence, quivering with fear. But Maggie became
conscious that as she was slackening her hold her father was beginning
to grasp her and lean on her. The surprise checked her sobs.&quot;I feel ill - faintish,&quot; he said. &quot;Help me in, Bessy - I'm giddy - I've a
pain i' the head.&quot;He walked in slowly, propped by his wife and daughter and tottered
into his arm-chair. The almost purple flush had given way to paleness,
and his hand was cold.&quot;Hadn't we better send for the doctor?&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver.He seemed to be too faint and suffering to hear her; but presently,
when she said to Maggie, &quot;Go and seek for somebody to fetch the
doctor,&quot; he looked up at her with full comprehension, and said,
&quot;Doctor? No - no doctor. It's my head, that's all. Help me to bed.&quot;Sad ending to the day that had risen on them all like a beginning of
better times! But mingled seed must bear a mingled crop.In half an hour after his father had lain down Tom came home. Bob
Jakin was with him, come to congratulate &quot;the old master,&quot; not without
some excusable pride that he had had his share in bringing about Mr.
Tom's good luck; and Tom had thought his father would like nothing
better, as a finish to the day, than a talk with Bob. But now Tom
could only spend the evening in gloomy expectation of the unpleasant
consequences that must follow on this mad outbreak of his father's
long-smothered hate. After the painful news had been told, he sat in
silence; he had not spirit or inclination to tell his mother and
sister anything about the dinner; they hardly cared to ask it.
Apparently the mingled thread in the web of their life was so
curiously twisted together that there could be no joy without a sorrow
coming close upon it. Tom was dejected by the thought that his
exemplary effort must always be baffled by the wrong-doing of others;
Maggie was living through, over and over again, the agony of the
moment in which she had rushed to throw herself on her father's arm,
with a vague, shuddering foreboding of wretched scenes to come. Not
one of the three felt any particular alarm about Mr. Tulliver's
health; the symptoms did not recall his former dangerous attack, and
it seemed only a necessary consequence that his violent passion and
effort of strength, after many hours of unusual excitement, should
have made him feel ill. Rest would probably cure him.Tom, tired out by his active day, fell asleep soon, and slept soundly;
it seemed to him as if he had only just come to bed, when he waked to
see his mother standing by him in the gray light of early morning.&quot;My boy, you must get up this minute; I've sent for the doctor, and
your father wants you and Maggie to come to him.&quot;&quot;Is he worse, mother?&quot;&quot;He's been very ill all night with his head, but he doesn't say it's
worse; he only said suddenly, 'Bessy, fetch the boy and girl. Tell 'em
to make haste.'&quot;Maggie and Tom threw on their clothes hastily in the chill gray light,
and reached their father's room almost at the same moment. He was
watching for them with an expression of pain on his brow, but with
sharpened, anxious consciousness in his eyes. Mrs. Tulliver stood at
the foot of the bed, frightened and trembling, looking worn and aged
from disturbed rest. Maggie was at the bedside first, but her father's
glance was toward Tom, who came and stood next to her.&quot;Tom, my lad, it's come upon me as I sha'n't get up again. This
world's been too many for me, my lad, but you've done what you could
to make things a bit even. Shake hands wi' me again, my lad, before I
go away from you.&quot;The father and son clasped hands and looked at each other an instant.
Then Tom said, trying to speak firmly, -&quot;Have you any wish, father - that I can fulfil, when -  - &quot;&quot;Ay, my lad - you'll try and get the old mill back.&quot;&quot;Yes, father.&quot;&quot;And there's your mother - you'll try and make her amends, all you can,
for my bad luck - and there's the little wench -  - &quot;The father turned his eyes on Maggie with a still more eager look,
while she, with a bursting heart, sank on her knees, to be closer to
the dear, time-worn face which had been present with her through long
years, as the sign of her deepest love and hardest trial.&quot;You must take care of her, Tom - don't you fret, my wench - there'll
come somebody as'll love you and take your part - and you must be good
to her, my lad. I was good tomysister. Kiss me, Maggie. - Come,
Bessy. - You'll manage to pay for a brick grave, Tom, so as your mother
and me can lie together.&quot;He looked away from them all when he had said this, and lay silent for
some minutes, while they stood watching him, not daring to move. The
morning light was growing clearer for them, and they could see the
heaviness gathering in his face, and the dulness in his eyes. But at
last he looked toward Tom and said, -&quot;I had my turn - I beat him. That was nothing but fair. I never wanted
anything but what was fair.&quot;&quot;But, father, dear father,&quot; said Maggie, an unspeakable anxiety
predominating over her grief, &quot;you forgive him - you forgive every one
now?&quot;He did not move his eyes to look at her, but he said, -&quot;No, my wench. I don't forgive him. What's forgiving to do? I can't
love a raskill -  - &quot;His voice had become thicker; but he wanted to say more, and moved his
lips again and again, struggling in vain to speak. At length the words
forced their way.&quot;Does God forgive raskills? - but if He does, He won't be hard wi' me.&quot;His hands moved uneasily, as if he wanted them to remove some
obstruction that weighed upon him. Two or three times there fell from
him some broken words, -&quot;This world's - too many - honest man - puzzling -  - &quot;Soon they merged into mere mutterings; the eyes had ceased to discern;
and then came the final silence.But not of death. For an hour or more the chest heaved, the loud, hard
breathing continued, getting gradually slower, as the cold dews
gathered on the brow.At last there was total stillness, and poor Tulliver's dimly lighted
soul had forever ceased to be vexed with the painful riddle of this
world.Help was come now; Luke and his wife were there, and Mr. Turnbull had
arrived, too late for everything but to say, &quot;This is death.&quot;Tom and Maggie went downstairs together into the room where their
father's place was empty. Their eyes turned to the same spot, and
Maggie spoke, -&quot;Tom, forgive me - let us always love each other&quot;; and they clung and
wept together.>


Three weeks later, when Dorlcote Mill was at its prettiest moment in
all the year, - the great chestnuts in blossom, and the grass all deep
and daisied, - Tom Tulliver came home to it earlier than usual in the
evening, and as he passed over the bridge, he looked with the old
deep-rooted affection at the respectable red brick house, which always
seemed cheerful and inviting outside, let the rooms be as bare and the
hearts as sad as they might inside. There is a very pleasant light in
Tom's blue-gray eyes as he glances at the house-windows; that fold in
his brow never disappears, but it is not unbecoming; it seems to imply
a strength of will that may possibly be without harshness, when the
eyes and mouth have their gentlest expression. His firm step becomes
quicker, and the corners of his mouth rebel against the compression
which is meant to forbid a smile.The eyes in the parlor were not turned toward the bridge just then,
and the group there was sitting in unexpectant silence, - Mr. Tulliver
in his arm-chair, tired with a long ride, and ruminating with a worn
look, fixed chiefly on Maggie, who was bending over her sewing while
her mother was making the tea.They all looked up with surprise when they heard the well-known foot.&quot;Why, what's up now, Tom?&quot; said his father. &quot;You're a bit earlier than
usual.&quot;&quot;Oh, there was nothing more for me to do, so I came away. Well,
mother!&quot;Tom went up to his mother and kissed her, a sign of unusual good-humor
with him. Hardly a word or look had passed between him and Maggie in
all the three weeks; but his usual incommunicativeness at home
prevented this from being noticeable to their parents.&quot;Father,&quot; said Tom, when they had finished tea, &quot;do you know exactly
how much money there is in the tin box?&quot;&quot;Only a hundred and ninety-three pound,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;You've
brought less o' late; but young fellows like to have their own way
with their money. Though I didn't do as I liked beforeIwas of
age.&quot; He spoke with rather timid discontent.&quot;Are you quite sure that's the sum, father?&quot; said Tom. &quot;I wish you
would take the trouble to fetch the tin box down. I think you have
perhaps made a mistake.&quot;&quot;How should I make a mistake?&quot; said his father, sharply. &quot;I've counted
it often enough; but I can fetch it, if you won't believe me.&quot;It was always an incident Mr. Tulliver liked, in his gloomy life, to
fetch the tin box and count the money.&quot;Don't go out of the room, mother,&quot; said Tom, as he saw her moving
when his father was gone upstairs.&quot;And isn't Maggie to go?&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver; &quot;because somebody must
take away the things.&quot;&quot;Just as she likes,&quot; said Tom indifferently.That was a cutting word to Maggie. Her heart had leaped with the
sudden conviction that Tom was going to tell their father the debts
could be paid; and Tom would have let her be absent when that news was
told! But she carried away the tray and came back immediately. The
feeling of injury on her own behalf could not predominate at that
moment.Tom drew to the corner of the table near his father when the tin box
was set down and opened, and the red evening light falling on them
made conspicuous the worn, sour gloom of the dark-eyed father and the
suppressed joy in the face of the fair-complexioned son. The mother
and Maggie sat at the other end of the table, the one in blank
patience, the other in palpitating expectation.Mr. Tulliver counted out the money, setting it in order on the table,
and then said, glancing sharply at Tom:&quot;There now! you see I was right enough.&quot;He paused, looking at the money with bitter despondency.&quot;There's more nor three hundred wanting; it'll be a fine while beforeIcan save that. Losing that forty-two pound wi' the corn was a sore
job. This world's been too many for me. It's took four year to laythisby; it's much if I'm above ground for another four year. I must
trusten to you to pay 'em,&quot; he went on, with a trembling voice, &quot;if
you keep i' the same mind now you're coming o' age. But you're like
enough to bury me first.&quot;He looked up in Tom's face with a querulous desire for some assurance.&quot;No, father,&quot; said Tom, speaking with energetic decision, though there
was tremor discernible in his voice too, &quot;you will live to see the
debts all paid. You shall pay them with your own hand.&quot;His tone implied something more than mere hopefulness or resolution. A
slight electric shock seemed to pass through Mr. Tulliver, and he kept
his eyes fixed on Tom with a look of eager inquiry, while Maggie,
unable to restrain herself, rushed to her father's side and knelt down
by him. Tom was silent a little while before he went on.&quot;A good while ago, my uncle Glegg lent me a little money to trade
with, and that has answered. I have three hundred and twenty pounds in
the bank.&quot;His mother's arms were round his neck as soon as the last words were
uttered, and she said, half crying:&quot;Oh, my boy, I knew you'd make iverything right again, when you got a
man.&quot;But his father was silent; the flood of emotion hemmed in all power of
speech. Both Tom and Maggie were struck with fear lest the shock of
joy might even be fatal. But the blessed relief of tears came. The
broad chest heaved, the muscles of the face gave way, and the
gray-haired man burst into loud sobs. The fit of weeping gradually
subsided, and he sat quiet, recovering the regularity of his
breathing. At last he looked up at his wife and said, in a gentle
tone:&quot;Bessy, you must come and kiss me now - the lad has made you amends.
You'll see a bit o' comfort again, belike.&quot;When she had kissed him, and he had held her hand a minute, his
thoughts went back to the money.&quot;I wish you'd brought me the money to look at, Tom,&quot; he said,
fingering the sovereigns on the table; &quot;I should ha' felt surer.&quot;&quot;You shall see it to-morrow, father,&quot; said Tom. &quot;My uncle Deane has
appointed the creditors to meet to-morrow at the Golden Lion, and he
has ordered a dinner for them at two o'clock. My uncle Glegg and he
will both be there. It was advertised in the 'Messenger' on Saturday.&quot;&quot;Then Wakem knows on't!&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, his eye kindling with
triumphant fire. &quot;Ah!&quot; he went on, with a long-drawn guttural
enunciation, taking out his snuff-box, the only luxury he had left
himself, and tapping it with something of his old air of defiance.
&quot;I'll get from underhisthumb now, though Imustleave the old
mill. I thought I could ha' held out to die here - but I can't -  - we've
got a glass o' nothing in the house, have we, Bessy?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, drawing out her much-reduced bunch of keys,
&quot;there's some brandy sister Deane brought me when I was ill.&quot;&quot;Get it me, then; get it me. I feel a bit weak.&quot;&quot;Tom, my lad,&quot; he said, in a stronger voice, when he had taken some
brandy-and-water, &quot;you shall make a speech to 'em. I'll tell 'em it's
you as got the best part o' the money. They'll see I'm honest at last,
and ha' got an honest son. Ah! Wakem 'ud be fine and glad to have a
son like mine, - a fine straight fellow, - i'stead o' that poor crooked
creatur! You'll prosper i' the world, my lad; you'll maybe see the day
when Wakem and his son 'ull be a round or two below you. You'll like
enough be ta'en into partnership, as your uncle Deane was before
you, - you're in the right way for't; and then there's nothing to
hinder your getting rich. And if ever you're rich enough - mind
this - try and get th' old mill again.&quot;Mr. Tulliver threw himself back in his chair; his mind, which had so
long been the home of nothing but bitter discontent and foreboding,
suddenly filled, by the magic of joy, with visions of good fortune.
But some subtle influence prevented him from foreseeing the good
fortune as happening to himself.&quot;Shake hands wi' me, my lad,&quot; he said, suddenly putting out his hand.
&quot;It's a great thing when a man can be proud as he's got a good son.
I've hadthatluck.&quot;Tom never lived to taste another moment so delicious as that; and
Maggie couldn't help forgetting her own grievances. Tomwasgood;
and in the sweet humility that springs in us all in moments of true
admiration and gratitude, she felt that the faults he had to pardon in
her had never been redeemed, as his faults were. She felt no jealousy
this evening that, for the first time, she seemed to be thrown into
the background in her father's mind.There was much more talk before bedtime. Mr. Tulliver naturally wanted
to hear all the particulars of Tom's trading adventures, and he
listened with growing excitement and delight. He was curious to know
what had been said on every occasion; if possible, what had been
thought; and Bob Jakin's part in the business threw him into peculiar
outbursts of sympathy with the triumphant knowingness of that
remarkable packman. Bob's juvenile history, so far as it had come
under Mr. Tulliver's knowledge, was recalled with that sense of
astonishing promise it displayed, which is observable in all
reminiscences of the childhood of great men.It was well that there was this interest of narrative to keep under
the vague but fierce sense of triumph over Wakem, which would
otherwise have been the channel his joy would have rushed into with
dangerous force. Even as it was, that feeling from time to time gave
threats of its ultimate mastery, in sudden bursts of irrelevant
exclamation.It was long before Mr. Tulliver got to sleep that night; and the
sleep, when it came, was filled with vivid dreams. At half-past five
o'clock in the morning, when Mrs. Tulliver was already rising, he
alarmed her by starting up with a sort of smothered shout, and looking
round in a bewildered way at the walls of the bedroom.&quot;What's the matter, Mr. Tulliver?&quot; said his wife. He looked at her,
still with a puzzled expression, and said at last:&quot;Ah! - I was dreaming - did I make a noise? - I thought I'd got hold of
him.&quot;>


Early in the following April, nearly a year after that dubious parting
you have just witnessed, you may, if you like, again see Maggie
entering the Red Deeps through the group of Scotch firs. But it is
early afternoon and not evening, and the edge of sharpness in the
spring air makes her draw her large shawl close about her and trip
along rather quickly; though she looks round, as usual, that she may
take in the sight of her beloved trees. There is a more eager,
inquiring look in her eyes than there was last June, and a smile is
hovering about her lips, as if some playful speech were awaiting the
right hearer. The hearer was not long in appearing.&quot;Take back yourCorinne,&quot; said Maggie, drawing a book from under her
shawl. &quot;You were right in telling me she would do me no good; but you
were wrong in thinking I should wish to be like her.&quot;&quot;Wouldn't you really like to be a tenth Muse, then, Maggie?&quot; said
Philip looking up in her face as we look at a first parting in the
clouds that promises us a bright heaven once more.&quot;Not at all,&quot; said Maggie, laughing. &quot;The Muses were uncomfortable
goddesses, I think, - obliged always to carry rolls and musical
instruments about with them. If I carried a harp in this climate, you
know, I must have a green baize cover for it; and I should be sure to
leave it behind me by mistake.&quot;&quot;You agree with me in not liking Corinne, then?&quot;&quot;I didn't finish the book,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;As soon as I came to the
blond-haired young lady reading in the park, I shut it up, and
determined to read no further. I foresaw that that light-complexioned
girl would win away all the love from Corinne and make her miserable.
I'm determined to read no more books where the blond-haired women
carry away all the happiness. I should begin to have a prejudice
against them. If you could give me some story, now, where the dark
woman triumphs, it would restore the balance. I want to avenge Rebecca
and Flora MacIvor and Minna, and all the rest of the dark unhappy
ones. Since you are my tutor, you ought to preserve my mind from
prejudices; you are always arguing against prejudices.&quot;&quot;Well, perhaps you will avenge the dark women in your own person, and
carry away all the love from your cousin Lucy. She is sure to have
some handsome young man of St. Ogg's at her feet now; and you have
only to shine upon him - your fair little cousin will be quite quenched
in your beams.&quot;&quot;Philip, that is not pretty of you, to apply my nonsense to anything
real,&quot; said Maggie, looking hurt. &quot;As if I, with my old gowns and want
of all accomplishments, could be a rival of dear little Lucy, - who
knows and does all sorts of charming things, and is ten times prettier
than I am, - even if I were odious and base enough to wish to be her
rival. Besides, I never go to aunt Deane's when any one is there; it
is only because dear Lucy is good, and loves me, that she comes to see
me, and will have me go to see her sometimes.&quot;&quot;Maggie,&quot; said Philip, with surprise, &quot;it is not like you to take
playfulness literally. You must have been in St. Ogg's this morning,
and brought away a slight infection of dulness.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Maggie, smiling, &quot;if you meant that for a joke, it was a
poor one; but I thought it was a very good reproof. I thought you
wanted to remind me that I am vain, and wish every one to admire me
most. But it isn't for that that I'm jealous for the dark women, - not
because I'm dark myself; it's because I always care the most about the
unhappy people. If the blond girl were forsaken, I should likeherbest. I always take the side of the rejected lover in the stories.&quot;&quot;Then you would never have the heart to reject one yourself, should
you, Maggie?&quot; said Philip, flushing a little.&quot;I don't know,&quot; said Maggie, hesitatingly. Then with a bright smile,
&quot;I think perhaps I could if he were very conceited; and yet, if he got
extremely humiliated afterward, I should relent.&quot;&quot;I've often wondered, Maggie,&quot; Philip said, with some effort, &quot;whether
you wouldn't really be more likely to love a man that other women were
not likely to love.&quot;&quot;That would depend on what they didn't like him for,&quot; said Maggie,
laughing. &quot;He might be very disagreeable. He might look at me through
an eye-glass stuck in his eye, making a hideous face, as young Torry
does. I should think other women are not fond of that; but I never
felt any pity for young Torry. I've never any pity for conceited
people, because I think they carry their comfort about with them.&quot;&quot;But suppose, Maggie, - suppose it was a man who was not conceited, who
felt he had nothing to be conceited about; who had been marked from
childhood for a peculiar kind of suffering, and to whom you were the
day-star of his life; who loved you, worshipped you, so entirely that
he felt it happiness enough for him if you would let him see you at
rare moments -  - &quot;Philip paused with a pang of dread lest his confession should cut
short this very happiness, - a pang of the same dread that had kept his
love mute through long months. A rush of self-consciousness told him
that he was besotted to have said all this. Maggie's manner this
morning had been as unconstrained and indifferent as ever.But she was not looking indifferent now. Struck with the unusual
emotion in Philip's tone, she had turned quickly to look at him; and
as he went on speaking, a great change came over her face, - a flush
and slight spasm of the features, such as we see in people who hear
some news that will require them to readjust their conceptions of the
past. She was quite silent, and walking on toward the trunk of a
fallen tree, she sat down, as if she had no strength to spare for her
muscles. She was trembling.&quot;Maggie,&quot; said Philip, getting more and more alarmed in every fresh
moment of silence, &quot;I was a fool to say it; forget that I've said it.
I shall be contented if things can be as they were.&quot;The distress with which he spoke urged Maggie to say something. &quot;I am
so surprised, Philip; I had not thought of it.&quot; And the effort to say
this brought the tears down too.&quot;Has it made you hate me, Maggie?&quot; said Philip, impetuously. &quot;Do you
think I'm a presumptuous fool?&quot;&quot;Oh, Philip!&quot; said Maggie, &quot;how can you think I have such feelings? As
if I were not grateful foranylove. But - but I had never thought of
your being my lover. It seemed so far off - like a dream - only like one
of the stories one imagines - that I should ever have a lover.&quot;&quot;Then can you bear to think of me as your lover, Maggie?&quot; said Philip,
seating himself by her, and taking her hand, in the elation of a
sudden hope. &quot;Doyou love me?&quot;Maggie turned rather pale; this direct question seemed not easy to
answer. But her eyes met Philip's, which were in this moment liquid
and beautiful with beseeching love. She spoke with hesitation, yet
with sweet, simple, girlish tenderness.&quot;I think I could hardly love any one better; there is nothing but what
I love you for.&quot; She paused a little while, and then added: &quot;But it
will be better for us not to say any more about it, won't it, dear
Philip? You know we couldn't even be friends, if our friendship were
discovered. I have never felt that I was right in giving way about
seeing you, though it has been so precious to me in some ways; and now
the fear comes upon me strongly again, that it will lead to evil.&quot;&quot;But no evil has come, Maggie; and if you had been guided by that fear
before, you would only have lived through another dreary, benumbing
year, instead of reviving into your real self.&quot;Maggie shook her head. &quot;It has been very sweet, I know, - all the
talking together, and the books, and the feeling that I had the walk
to look forward to, when I could tell you the thoughts that had come
into my head while I was away from you. But it has made me restless;
it has made me think a great deal about the world; and I have
impatient thoughts again, - I get weary of my home; and then it cuts me
to the heart afterward, that I should ever have felt weary of my
father and mother. I think what you call being benumbed was
better - better for me - for then my selfish desires were benumbed.&quot;Philip had risen again, and was walking backward and forward
impatiently.&quot;No, Maggie, you have wrong ideas of self-conquest, as I've often told
you. What you call self-conquest - binding and deafening yourself to
all but one train of impressions - is only the culture of monomania in
a nature like yours.&quot;He had spoken with some irritation, but now he sat down by her again
and took her hand.&quot;Don't think of the past now, Maggie; think only of our love. If you
can really cling to me with all your heart, every obstacle will be
overcome in time; we need only wait. I can live on hope. Look at me,
Maggie; tell me again it is possible for you to love me. Don't look
away from me to that cloven tree; it is a bad omen.&quot;She turned her large dark glance upon him with a sad smile.&quot;Come, Maggie, say one kind word, or else you were better to me at
Lorton. You asked me if I should like you to kiss me, - don't you
remember? - and you promised to kiss me when you met me again. You
never kept the promise.&quot;The recollection of that childish time came as a sweet relief to
Maggie. It made the present moment less strange to her. She kissed him
almost as simply and quietly as she had done when she was twelve years
old. Philip's eyes flashed with delight, but his next words were words
of discontent.&quot;You don't seem happy enough, Maggie; you are forcing yourself to say
you love me, out of pity.&quot;&quot;No, Philip,&quot; said Maggie, shaking her head, in her old childish way;
&quot;I'm telling you the truth. It is all new and strange to me; but I
don't think I could love any one better than I love you. I should like
always to live with you - to make you happy. I have always been happy
when I have been with you. There is only one thing I will not do for
your sake; I will never do anything to wound my father. You must never
ask that from me.&quot;&quot;No, Maggie, I will ask nothing; I will bear everything; I'll wait
another year only for a kiss, if you will only give me the first place
in your heart.&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Maggie, smiling, &quot;I won't make you wait so long as that.&quot;
But then, looking serious again, she added, as she rose from her
seat, -&quot;But what would your own father say, Philip? Oh, it is quite
impossible we can ever be more than friends, - brother and sister in
secret, as we have been. Let us give up thinking of everything else.&quot;&quot;No, Maggie, I can't give you up, - unless you are deceiving me; unless
you really only care for me as if I were your brother. Tell me the
truth.&quot;&quot;Indeed I do, Philip. What happiness have I ever had so great as being
with you, - since I was a little girl, - the days Tom was good to me?
And your mind is a sort of world to me; you can tell me all I want to
know. I think I should never be tired of being with you.&quot;They were walking hand in hand, looking at each other; Maggie, indeed,
was hurrying along, for she felt it time to be gone. But the sense
that their parting was near made her more anxious lest she should have
unintentionally left some painful impression on Philip's mind. It was
one of those dangerous moments when speech is at once sincere and
deceptive; when feeling, rising high above its average depth, leaves
floodmarks which are never reached again.They stopped to part among the Scotch firs.&quot;Then my life will be filled with hope, Maggie, and I shall be happier
than other men, in spite of all? Wedobelong to each other - for
always - whether we are apart or together?&quot;&quot;Yes, Philip; I should like never to part; I should like to make your
life very happy.&quot;&quot;I am waiting for something else. I wonder whether it will come.&quot;Maggie smiled, with glistening tears, and then stooped her tall head
to kiss the pale face that was full of pleading, timid love, - like a
woman's.She had a moment of real happiness then, - a moment of belief that, if
there were sacrifice in this love, it was all the richer and more
satisfying.She turned away and hurried home, feeling that in the hour since she
had trodden this road before, a new era had begun for her. The tissue
of vague dreams must now get narrower and narrower, and all the
threads of thought and emotion be gradually absorbed in the woof of
her actual daily life.>


The family sitting-room was a long room with a window at each end; one
looking toward the croft and along the Ripple to the banks of the
Floss, the other into the mill-yard. Maggie was sitting with her work
against the latter window when she saw Mr. Wakem entering the yard, as
usual, on his fine black horse; but not alone, as usual. Some one was
with him, - a figure in a cloak, on a handsome pony. Maggie had hardly
time to feel that it was Philip come back, before they were in front
of the window, and he was raising his hat to her; while his father,
catching the movement by a side-glance, looked sharply round at them
both.Maggie hurried away from the window and carried her work upstairs; for
Mr. Wakem sometimes came in and inspected the books, and Maggie felt
that the meeting with Philip would be robbed of all pleasure in the
presence of the two fathers. Some day, perhaps, she could see him when
they could just shake hands, and she could tell him that she
remembered his goodness to Tom, and the things he had said to her in
the old days, though they could never be friends any more. It was not
at all agitating to Maggie to see Philip again; she retained her
childish gratitude and pity toward him, and remembered his cleverness;
and in the early weeks of her loneliness she had continually recalled
the image of him among the people who had been kind to her in life,
often wishing she had him for a brother and a teacher, as they had
fancied it might have been, in their talk together. But that sort of
wishing had been banished along with other dreams that savored of
seeking her own will; and she thought, besides, that Philip might be
altered by his life abroad, - he might have become worldly, and really
not care about her saying anything to him now. And yet his face was
wonderfully little altered, - it was only a larger, more manly copy of
the pale, small-featured boy's face, with the gray eyes, and the
boyish waving brown hair; there was the old deformity to awaken the
old pity; and after all her meditations, Maggie felt that she reallyshouldlike to say a few words to him. He might still be melancholy,
as he always used to be, and like her to look at him kindly. She
wondered if he remembered how he used to like her eyes; with that
thought Maggie glanced toward the square looking-glass which was
condemned to hang with its face toward the wall, and she half started
from her seat to reach it down; but she checked herself and snatched
up her work, trying to repress the rising wishes by forcing her memory
to recall snatches of hymns, until she saw Philip and his father
returning along the road, and she could go down again.It was far on in June now, and Maggie was inclined to lengthen the
daily walk which was her one indulgence; but this day and the
following she was so busy with work which must be finished that she
never went beyond the gate, and satisfied her need of the open air by
sitting out of doors. One of her frequent walks, when she was not
obliged to go to St. Ogg's, was to a spot that lay beyond what was
called the &quot;Hill,&quot; - an insignificant rise of ground crowned by trees,
lying along the side of the road which ran by the gates of Dorlcote
Mill. Insignificant I call it, because in height it was hardly more
than a bank; but there may come moments when Nature makes a mere bank
a means toward a fateful result; and that is why I ask you to imagine
this high bank crowned with trees, making an uneven wall for some
quarter of a mile along the left side of Dorlcote Mill and the
pleasant fields behind it, bounded by the murmuring Ripple. Just where
this line of bank sloped down again to the level, a by-road turned off
and led to the other side of the rise, where it was broken into very
capricious hollows and mounds by the working of an exhausted
stone-quarry, so long exhausted that both mounds and hollows were now
clothed with brambles and trees, and here and there by a stretch of
grass which a few sheep kept close-nibbled. In her childish days
Maggie held this place, called the Red Deeps, in very great awe, and
needed all her confidence in Tom's bravery to reconcile her to an
excursion thither, - visions of robbers and fierce animals haunting
every hollow. But now it had the charm for her which any broken
ground, any mimic rock and ravine, have for the eyes that rest
habitually on the level; especially in summer, when she could sit on a
grassy hollow under the shadow of a branching ash, stooping aslant
from the steep above her, and listen to the hum of insects, like
tiniest bells on the garment of Silence, or see the sunlight piercing
the distant boughs, as if to chase and drive home the truant heavenly
blue of the wild hyacinths. In this June time, too, the dog-roses were
in their glory, and that was an additional reason why Maggie should
direct her walk to the Red Deeps, rather than to any other spot, on
the first day she was free to wander at her will, - a pleasure she
loved so well, that sometimes, in her ardors of renunciation, she
thought she ought to deny herself the frequent indulgence in it.You may see her now, as she walks down the favorite turning and enters
the Deeps by a narrow path through a group of Scotch firs, her tall
figure and old lavender gown visible through an hereditary black silk
shawl of some wide-meshed net-like material; and now she is sure of
being unseen she takes off her bonnet and ties it over her arm. One
would certainly suppose her to be farther on in life than her
seventeenth year - perhaps because of the slow resigned sadness of the
glance from which all search and unrest seem to have departed; perhaps
because her broad-chested figure has the mould of early womanhood.
Youth and health have withstood well the involuntary and voluntary
hardships of her lot, and the nights in which she has lain on the hard
floor for a penance have left no obvious trace; the eyes are liquid,
the brown cheek is firm and round, the full lips are red. With her
dark coloring and jet crown surmounting her tall figure, she seems to
have a sort of kinship with the grand Scotch firs, at which she is
looking up as if she loved them well. Yet one has a sense of
uneasiness in looking at her, - a sense of opposing elements, of which
a fierce collision is imminent; surely there is a hushed expression,
such as one often sees in older faces under borderless caps, out of
keeping with the resistant youth, which one expects to flash out in a
sudden, passionate glance, that will dissipate all the quietude, like
a damp fire leaping out again when all seemed safe.But Maggie herself was not uneasy at this moment. She was clamly
enjoying the free air, while she looked up at the old fir-trees, and
thought that those broken ends of branches were the records of past
storms, which had only made the red stems soar higher. But while her
eyes were still turned upward, she became conscious of a moving shadow
cast by the evening sun on the grassy path before her, and looked down
with a startled gesture to see Philip Wakem, who first raised his hat,
and then, blushing deeply, came forward to her and put out his hand.
Maggie, too, colored with surprise, which soon gave way to pleasure.
She put out her hand and looked down at the deformed figure before her
with frank eyes, filled for the moment with nothing but the memory of
her child's feelings, - a memory that was always strong in her. She was
the first to speak.&quot;You startled me,&quot; she said, smiling faintly; &quot;I never meet any one
here. How came you to be walking here? Did you come to meetme?&quot;It was impossible not to perceive that Maggie felt herself a child
again.&quot;Yes, I did,&quot; said Philip, still embarrassed; &quot;I wished to see you
very much. I watched a long while yesterday on the bank near your
house to see if you would come out, but you never came. Then I watched
again to-day, and when I saw the way you took, I kept you in sight and
came down the bank, behind there. I hope you will not be displeased
with me.&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Maggie, with simple seriousness, walking on as if she meant
Philip to accompany her, &quot;I'm very glad you came, for I wished very
much to have an opportunity of speaking to you. I've never forgotten
how good you were long ago to Tom, and me too; but I was not sure that
you would remember us so well. Tom and I have had a great deal of
trouble since then, and I thinkthatmakes one think more of what
happened before the trouble came.&quot;&quot;I can't believe that you have thought of me so much as I have thought
of you,&quot; said Philip, timidly. &quot;Do you know, when I was away, I made a
picture of you as you looked that morning in the study when you said
you would not forget me.&quot;Philip drew a large miniature-case from his pocket, and opened it.
Maggie saw her old self leaning on a table, with her black locks
hanging down behind her ears, looking into space, with strange, dreamy
eyes. It was a water-color sketch, of real merit as a portrait.&quot;Oh dear,&quot; said Maggie, smiling, and flushed with pleasure, &quot;what a
queer little girl I was! I remember myself with my hair in that way,
in that pink frock. I reallywaslike a gypsy. I dare say I am now,&quot;
she added, after a little pause; &quot;am I like what you expected me to
be?&quot;The words might have been those of a coquette, but the full, bright
glance Maggie turned on Philip was not that of a coquette. She really
did hope he liked her face as it was now, but it was simply the rising
again of her innate delight in admiration and love. Philip met her
eyes and looked at her in silence for a long moment, before he said
quietly, &quot;No, Maggie.&quot;The light died out a little from Maggie's face, and there was a slight
trembling of the lip. Her eyelids fell lower, but she did not turn
away her head, and Philip continued to look at her. Then he said
slowly:&quot;You are very much more beautiful than I thought you would be.&quot;&quot;Am I?&quot; said Maggie, the pleasure returning in a deeper flush. She
turned her face away from him and took some steps, looking straight
before her in silence, as if she were adjusting her consciousness to
this new idea. Girls are so accustomed to think of dress as the main
ground of vanity, that, in abstaining from the looking-glass, Maggie
had thought more of abandoning all care for adornment than of
renouncing the contemplation of her face. Comparing herself with
elegant, wealthy young ladies, it had not occurred to her that she
could produce any effect with her person. Philip seemed to like the
silence well. He walked by her side, watching her face, as if that
sight left no room for any other wish. They had passed from among the
fir-trees, and had now come to a green hollow almost surrounded by an
amphitheatre of the pale pink dog-roses. But as the light about them
had brightened, Maggie's face had lost its glow.She stood still when they were in the hollows, and looking at Philip
again, she said in a serious, sad voice:&quot;I wish we could have been friends, - I mean, if it would have been
good and right for us. But that is the trial I have to bear in
everything; I may not keep anything I used to love when I was little.
The old books went; and Tom is different, and my father. It is like
death. I must part with everything I cared for when I was a child. And
I must part with you; we must never take any notice of each other
again. That was what I wanted to speak to you for. I wanted to let you
know that Tom and I can't do as we like about such things, and that if
I behave as if I had forgotten all about you, it is not out of envy or
pride - or - or any bad feeling.&quot;Maggie spoke with more and more sorrowful gentleness as she went on,
and her eyes began to fill with tears. The deepening expression of
pain on Philip's face gave him a stronger resemblance to his boyish
self, and made the deformity appeal more strongly to her pity.&quot;I know; I see all that you mean,&quot; he said, in a voice that had become
feebler from discouragement; &quot;I know what there is to keep us apart on
both sides. But it is not right, Maggie, - don't you be angry with me,
I am so used to call you Maggie in my thoughts, - it is not right to
sacrifice everything to other people's unreasonable feelings. I would
give up a great deal formyfather; but I would not give up a
friendship or - or an attachment of any sort, in obedience to any wish
of his that I didn't recognize as right.&quot;&quot;I don't know,&quot; said Maggie, musingly. &quot;Often, when I have been angry
and discontented, it has seemed to me that I was not bound to give up
anything; and I have gone on thinking till it has seemed to me that I
could think away all my duty. But no good has ever come of that; it
was an evil state of mind. I'm quite sure that whatever I might do, I
should wish in the end that I had gone without anything for myself,
rather than have made my father's life harder to him.&quot;&quot;But would it make his life harder if we were to see each other
sometimes?&quot; said Philip. He was going to say something else, but
checked himself.&quot;Oh, I'm sure he wouldn't like it. Don't ask me why, or anything about
it,&quot; said Maggie, in a distressed tone. &quot;My father feels so strongly
about some things. He is not at all happy.&quot;&quot;No more am I,&quot; said Philip, impetuously; &quot;I am not happy.&quot;&quot;Why?&quot; said Maggie, gently. &quot;At least - I ought not to ask - but I'm
very, very sorry.&quot;Philip turned to walk on, as if he had not patience to stand still any
longer, and they went out of the hollow, winding amongst the trees and
bushes in silence. After that last word of Philip's, Maggie could not
bear to insist immediately on their parting.&quot;I've been a great deal happier,&quot; she said at last, timidly, &quot;since I
have given up thinking about what is easy and pleasant, and being
discontented because I couldn't have my own will. Our life is
determined for us; and it makes the mind very free when we give up
wishing, and only think of bearing what is laid upon us, and doing
what is given us to do.&quot;&quot;But I can't give up wishing,&quot; said Philip, impatiently. &quot;It seems to
me we can never give up longing and wishing while we are thoroughly
alive. There are certain things we feel to be beautiful and good, and
wemusthunger after them. How can we ever be satisfied without them
until our feelings are deadened? I delight in fine pictures; I long to
be able to paint such. I strive and strive, and can't produce what I
want. That is pain to me, and alwayswillbe pain, until my
faculties lose their keenness, like aged eyes. Then there are many
other things I long for,&quot; - here Philip hesitated a little, and then
said, - &quot;things that other men have, and that will always be denied me.
My life will have nothing great or beautiful in it; I would rather not
have lived.&quot;&quot;Oh, Philip,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;I wish you didn't feel so.&quot; But her heart
began to beat with something of Philip's discontent.&quot;Well, then,&quot; said he, turning quickly round and fixing his gray eyes
entreatingly on her face, &quot;I should be contented to live, if you would
let me see you sometimes.&quot; Then, checked by a fear which her face
suggested, he looked away again and said more calmly, &quot;I have no
friend to whom I can tell everything, no one who cares enough about
me; and if I could only see you now and then, and you would let me
talk to you a little, and show me that you cared for me, and that we
may always be friends in heart, and help each other, then I might come
to be glad of life.&quot;&quot;But how can I see you, Philip?&quot; said Maggie, falteringly. (Could she
really do him good? It would be very hard to say &quot;good-by&quot; this day,
and not speak to him again. Here was a new interest to vary the days;
it was so much easier to renounce the interest before it came.)&quot;If you would let me see you here sometimes, - walk with you here, - I
would be contented if it were only once or twice in a month.Thatcould injure no one's happiness, and it would sweeten my life.
Besides,&quot; Philip went on, with all the inventive astuteness of love at
one-and-twenty, &quot;if there is any enmity between those who belong to
us, we ought all the more to try and quench it by our friendship; I
mean, that by our influence on both sides we might bring about a
healing of the wounds that have been made in the past, if I could know
everything about them. And I don't believe there is any enmity in my
own father's mind; I think he has proved the contrary.&quot;Maggie shook her head slowly, and was silent, under conflicting
thoughts. It seemed to her inclination, that to see Philip now and
then, and keep up the bond of friendship with him, was something not
only innocent, but good; perhaps she might really help him to find
contentment as she had found it. The voice that said this made sweet
music to Maggie; but athwart it there came an urgent, monotonous
warning from another voice which she had been learning to obey, - the
warning that such interviews implied secrecy; implied doing something
she would dread to be discovered in, something that, if discovered,
must cause anger and pain; and that the admission of anything so near
doubleness would act as a spiritual blight. Yet the music would swell
out again, like chimes borne onward by a recurrent breeze, persuading
her that the wrong lay all in the faults and weaknesses of others, and
that there was such a thing as futile sacrifice for one to the injury
of another. It was very cruel for Philip that he should be shrunk
from, because of an unjustifiable vindictiveness toward his
father, - poor Philip, whom some people would shrink from only because
he was deformed. The idea that he might become her lover or that her
meeting him could cause disapproval in that light, had not occurred to
her; and Philip saw the absence of this idea clearly enough, saw it
with a certain pang, although it made her consent to his request the
less unlikely. There was bitterness to him in the perception that
Maggie was almost as frank and unconstrained toward him as when she
was a child.&quot;I can't say either yes or no,&quot; she said at last, turning round and
walking toward the way she come; &quot;I must wait, lest I should decide
wrongly. I must seek for guidance.&quot;&quot;May I come again, then, to-morrow, or the next day, or next week?&quot;&quot;I think I had better write,&quot; said Maggie, faltering again. &quot;I have to
go to St. Ogg's sometimes, and I can put the letter in the post.&quot;&quot;Oh no,&quot; said Philip eagerly; &quot;that would not be so well. My father
might see the letter - and - he has not any enmity, I believe, but he
views things differently from me; he thinks a great deal about wealth
and position. Pray let me come here once more.Tellme when it shall
be; or if you can't tell me, I will come as often as I can till I do
see you.&quot;&quot;I think it must be so, then,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;for I can't be quite
certain of coming here any particular evening.&quot;Maggie felt a great relief in adjourning the decision. She was free
now to enjoy the minutes of companionship; she almost thought she
might linger a little; the next time they met she should have to pain
Philip by telling him her determination.&quot;I can't help thinking,&quot; she said, looking smilingly at him, after a
few moments of silence, &quot;how strange it is that we should have met and
talked to each other, just as if it had been only yesterday when we
parted at Lorton. And yet we must both be very much altered in those
five years, - I think it is five years. How was it you seemed to have a
sort of feeling that I was the same Maggie? I was not quite so sure
that you would be the same; I know you are so clever, and you must
have seen and learnt so much to fill your mind; I was not quite sure
you would care about me now.&quot;&quot;I have never had any doubt that you would be the same, whenever I
migh see you,&quot; said Philip, - &quot;I mean, the same in everything that made
me like you better than any one else. I don't want to explain that; I
don't think any of the strongest effects our natures are susceptible
of can ever be explained. We can neither detect the process by which
they are arrived at, nor the mode in which they act on us. The
greatest of painters only once painted a mysteriously divine child; he
couldn't have told how he did it, and we can't tell why we feel it to
be divine. I think there are stores laid up in our human nature that
our understandings can make no complete inventory of. Certain strains
of music affect me so strangely; I can never hear them without their
changing my whole attitude of mind for a time, and if the effect would
last, I might be capable of heroisms.&quot;&quot;Ah! I know what you mean about music;Ifeel so,&quot; said Maggie,
clasping her hands with her old impetuosity. &quot;At least,&quot; she added, in
a saddened tone, &quot;I used to feel so when I had any music; I never have
any now except the organ at church.&quot;&quot;And you long for it, Maggie?&quot; said Philip, looking at her with
affectionate pity. &quot;Ah, you can have very little that is beautiful in
your life. Have you many books? You were so fond of them when you were
a little girl.&quot;They were come back to the hollow, round which the dog-roses grew, and
they both paused under the charm of the fa&Atilde;&laquo;ry evening light, reflected
from the pale pink clusters.&quot;No, I have given up books,&quot; said Maggie, quietly, &quot;except a very,
very few.&quot;Philip had already taken from his pocket a small volume, and was
looking at the back as he said:&quot;Ah, this is the second volume, I see, else you might have liked to
take it home with you. I put it in my pocket because I am studying a
scene for a picture.&quot;Maggie had looked at the back too, and saw the title; it revived an
old impression with overmastering force.&quot;'The Pirate,'&quot; she said, taking the book from Philip's hands. &quot;Oh, I
began that once; I read to where Minna is walking with Cleveland, and
I could never get to read the rest. I went on with it in my own head,
and I made several endings; but they were all unhappy. I could never
make a happy ending out of that beginning. Poor Minna! I wonder what
is the real end. For a long while I couldn't get my mind away from the
Shetland Isles, - I used to feel the wind blowing on me from the rough
sea.&quot;Maggie spoke rapidly, with glistening eyes.&quot;Take that volume home with you, Maggie,&quot; said Philip, watching her
with delight. &quot;I don't want it now. I shall make a picture of you
instead, - you, among the Scotch firs and the slanting shadows.&quot;Maggie had not heard a word he had said; she was absorbed in a page at
which she had opened. But suddenly she closed the book, and gave it
back to Philip, shaking her head with a backward movement, as if to
say &quot;avaunt&quot; to floating visions.&quot;Do keep it, Maggie,&quot; said Philip, entreatingly; &quot;it will give you
pleasure.&quot;&quot;No, thank you,&quot; said Maggie, putting it aside with her hand and
walking on. &quot;It would make me in love with this world again, as I used
to be; it would make me long to see and know many things; it would
make me long for a full life.&quot;&quot;But you will not always be shut up in your present lot; why should
you starve your mind in that way? It is narrow asceticism; I don't
like to see you persisting in it, Maggie. Poetry and art and knowledge
are sacred and pure.&quot;&quot;But not for me, not for me,&quot; said Maggie, walking more hurriedly;
&quot;because I should want too much. I must wait; this life will not last
long.&quot;&quot;Don't hurry away from me without saying 'good-by,' Maggie,&quot; said
Philip, as they reached the group of Scotch firs, and she continued
still to walk along without speaking. &quot;I must not go any farther, I
think, must I?&quot;&quot;Oh no, I forgot; good-by,&quot; said Maggie, pausing, and putting out her
hand to him. The action brought her feeling back in a strong current
to Philip; and after they had stood looking at each other in silence
for a few moments, with their hands clasped, she said, withdrawing her
hand:&quot;I'm very grateful to you for thinking of me all those years. It is
very sweet to have people love us. What a wonderful, beautiful thing
it seems that God should have made your heart so that you could care
about a queer little girl whom you only knew for a few weeks! I
remember saying to you that I thought you cared for me more than Tom
did.&quot;&quot;Ah, Maggie,&quot; said Philip, almost fretfully, &quot;you would never love me
so well as you love your brother.&quot;&quot;Perhaps not,&quot; said Maggie, simply; &quot;but then, you know, the first
thing I ever remember in my life is standing with Tom by the side of
the Floss, while he held my hand; everything before that is dark to
me. But I shall never forget you, though we must keep apart.&quot;&quot;Don't say so, Maggie,&quot; said Philip. &quot;If I kept that little girl in my
mind for five years, didn't I earn some part in her? She ought not to
take herself quite away from me.&quot;&quot;Not if I were free,&quot; said Maggie; &quot;but I am not, I must submit.&quot; She
hesitated a moment, and then added, &quot;And I wanted to say to you, that
you had better not take more notice of my brother than just bowing to
him. He once told me not to speak to you again, and he doesn't change
his mind - Oh dear, the sun is set. I am too long away. Good-by.&quot; She
gave him her hand once more.&quot;I shall come here as often as I can till I see you again, Maggie.
Have some feeling formeas well as for others.&quot;&quot;Yes, yes, I have,&quot; said Maggie, hurrying away, and quickly
disappearing behind the last fir-tree; though Philip's gaze after her
remained immovable for minutes as if he saw her still.Maggie went home, with an inward conflict already begun; Philip went
home to do nothing but remember and hope. You can hardly help blaming
him severely. He was four or five years older than Maggie, and had a
full consciousness of his feeling toward her to aid him in foreseeing
the character his contemplated interviews with her would bear in the
opinion of a third person. But you must not suppose that he was
capable of a gross selfishness, or that he could have been satisfied
without persuading himself that he was seeking to infuse some
happiness into Maggie's life, - seeking this even more than any direct
ends for himself. He could give her sympathy; he could give her help.
There was not the slightest promise of love toward him in her manner;
it was nothing more than the sweet girlish tenderness she had shown
him when she was twelve. Perhaps she would never love him; perhaps no
woman evercouldlove him. Well, then, he would endure that; he
should at least have the happiness of seeing her, of feeling some
nearness to her. And he clutched passionately the possibility that shemightlove him; perhaps the feeling would grow, if she could come to
associate him with that watchful tenderness which her nature would be
so keenly alive to. If any woman could love him, surely Maggie was
that woman; there was such wealth of love in her, and there was no one
to claim it all. Then, the pity of it, that a mind like hers should be
withering in its very youth, like a young forest-tree, for want of the
light and space it was formed to flourish in! Could he not hinder
that, by persuading her out of her system of privation? He would be
her guardian angel; he would do anything, bear anything, for her
sake - except not seeing her.>


Secrets are rarely betrayed or discovered according to any programme
our fear has sketched out. Fear is almost always haunted by terrible
dramatic scenes, which recur in spite of the best-argued probabilities
against them; and during a year that Maggie had had the burthen of
concealment on her mind, the possibility of discovery had continually
presented itself under the form of a sudden meeting with her father or
Tom when she was walking with Philip in the Red Deeps. She was aware
that this was not one of the most likely events; but it was the scene
that most completely symbolized her inward dread. Those slight
indirect suggestions which are dependent on apparently trivial
coincidences and incalculable states of mind, are the favorite
machinery of Fact, but are not the stuff in which Imagination is apt
to work.Certainly one of the persons about whom Maggie's fears were furthest
from troubling themselves was her aunt Pullet, on whom, seeing that
she did not live in St. Ogg's, and was neither sharp-eyed nor
sharp-tempered, it would surely have been quite whimsical of them to
fix rather than on aunt Glegg. And yet the channel of fatality - the
pathway of the lightning - was no other than aunt Pullet. She did not
live at St. Ogg's, but the road from Garum Firs lay by the Red Deeps,
at the end opposite that by which Maggie entered.The day after Maggie's last meeting with Philip, being a Sunday on
which Mr. Pullet was bound to appear in funeral hatband and scarf at
St. Ogg's church, Mrs. Pullet made this the occasion of dining with
sister Glegg, and taking tea with poor sister Tulliver. Sunday was the
one day in the week on which Tom was at home in the afternoon; and
today the brighter spirits he had been in of late had flowed over in
unusually cheerful open chat with his father, and in the invitation,
&quot;Come, Magsie, you come too!&quot; when he strolled out with his mother in
the garden to see the advancing cherry-blossoms. He had been better
pleased with Maggie since she had been less odd and ascetic; he was
even getting rather proud of her; several persons had remarked in his
hearing that his sister was a very fine girl. To-day there was a
peculiar brightness in her face, due in reality to an undercurrent of
excitement, which had as much doubt and pain as pleasure in it; but it
might pass for a sign of happiness.&quot;You look very well, my dear,&quot; said aunt Pullet, shaking her head
sadly, as they sat round the tea-table. &quot;I niver thought your girl 'ud
be so good-looking, Bessy. But you must wear pink, my dear; that blue
thing as your aunt Glegg gave you turns you into a crowflower. Jane
neverwastasty. Why don't you wear that gown o' mine?&quot;&quot;It is so pretty and so smart, aunt. I think it's too showy for
me, - at least for my other clothes, that I must wear with it.&quot;To be sure, it 'ud be unbecoming if it wasn't well known you've got
them belonging to you as can afford to give you such things when
they've done with 'em themselves. It stands to reason I must give my
own niece clothes now and then, - such things asIbuy every year,
and never wear anything out. And as for Lucy, there's no giving to
her, for she's got everything o' the choicest; sister Deane may well
hold her head up, - though she looks dreadful yallow, poor thing - I
doubt this liver complaint 'ull carry her off. That's what this new
vicar, this Dr. Kenn, said in the funeral sermon to-day.&quot;&quot;Ah, he's a wonderful preacher, by all account, - isn't he, Sophy?&quot;
said Mrs. Tulliver.&quot;Why, Lucy had got a collar on this blessed day,&quot; continued Mrs.
Pullet, with her eyes fixed in a ruminating manner, &quot;as I don't say I
haven't got as good, but I must look out my best to match it.&quot;&quot;Miss Lucy's called the bell o' St. Ogg's, they say; that's a cur'ous
word,&quot; observed Mr. Pullet, on whom the mysteries of etymology
sometimes fell with an oppressive weight.&quot;Pooh!&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, jealous for Maggie, &quot;she's a small thing,
not much of a figure. But fine feathers make fine birds. I see nothing
to admire so much in those diminutive women; they look silly by the
side o' the men, - out o' proportion. When I chose my wife, I chose her
the right size, - neither too little nor too big.&quot;The poor wife, with her withered beauty, smiled complacently.&quot;But the men aren'tallbig,&quot; said uncle Pullet, not without some
self-reference; &quot;a young fellow may be good-looking and yet not be a
six-foot, like Master Tom here.&quot;Ah, it's poor talking about littleness and bigness, - anybody may
think it's a mercy they're straight,&quot; said aunt Pullet. &quot;There's that
mismade son o' Lawyer Wakem's, I saw him at church to-day. Dear, dear!
to think o' the property he's like to have; and they say he's very
queer and lonely, doesn't like much company. I shouldn't wonder if he
goes out of his mind; for we never come along the road but he's
a-scrambling out o' the trees and brambles at the Red Deeps.&quot;This wide statement, by which Mrs. Pullet represented the fact that
she had twice seen Philip at the spot indicated, produced an effect on
Maggie which was all the stronger because Tom sate opposite her, and
she was intensely anxious to look indifferent. At Philip's name she
had blushed, and the blush deepened every instant from consciousness,
until the mention of the Red Deeps made her feel as if the whole
secret were betrayed, and she dared not even hold her tea-spoon lest
she should show how she trembled. She sat with her hands clasped under
the table, not daring to look round. Happily, her father was seated on
the same side with herself, beyond her uncle Pullet, and could not see
her face without stooping forward. Her mother's voice brought the
first relief, turning the conversation; for Mrs. Tulliver was always
alarmed when the name of Wakem was mentioned in her husband's
presence. Gradually Maggie recovered composure enough to look up; her
eyes met Tom's, but he turned away his head immediately; and she went
to bed that night wondering if he had gathered any suspicion from her
confusion. Perhaps not; perhaps he would think it was only her alarm
at her aunt's mention of Wakem before her father; that was the
interpretation her mother had put in it. To her father, Wakem was like
a disfiguring disease, of which he was obliged to endure the
consciousness, but was exasperated to have the existence recognized by
others; and no amount of sensitiveness in her about her father could
be surprising, Maggie thought.But Tom was too keen-sighted to rest satisfied with such an
interpretation; he had seen clearly enough that there was something
distinct from anxiety about her father in Maggie's excessive
confusion. In trying to recall all the details that could give shape
to his suspicions, he remembered only lately hearing his mother scold
Maggie for walking in the Red Deeps when the ground was wet, and
bringing home shoes clogged with red soil; still Tom, retaining all
his old repulsion for Philip's deformity, shrank from attributing to
his sister the probability of feeling more than a friendly interest in
such an unfortunate exception to the common run of men. Tom's was a
nature which had a sort of superstitious repugnance to everything
exceptional. A love for a deformed man would be odious in any woman,
in a sister intolerable. But if she had been carrying on any kind of
intercourse whatever with Philip, a stop must be put to it at once;
she was disobeying her father's strongest feelings and her brother's
express commands, besides compromising herself by secret meetings. He
left home the next morning in that watchful state of mind which turns
the most ordinary course of things into pregnant coincidences.That afternoon, about half-past three o'clock, Tom was standing on the
wharf, talking with Bob Jakin about the probability of the good ship
Adelaide coming in, in a day or two, with results highly important to
both of them.&quot;Eh,&quot; said Bob, parenthetically, as he looked over the fields on the
other side of the river, &quot;there goes that crooked young Wakem. I know
him or his shadder as far off as I can see 'em; I'm allays lighting on
him o' that side the river.&quot;A sudden thought seemed to have darted through Tom's mind. &quot;I must go,
Bob,&quot; he said; &quot;I've something to attend to,&quot; hurrying off to the
warehouse, where he left notice for some one to take his place; he was
called away home on peremptory business.The swiftest pace and the shortest road took him to the gate, and he
was pausing to open it deliberately, that he might walk into the house
with an appearance of perfect composure, when Maggie came out at the
front door in bonnet and shawl. His conjecture was fulfilled, and he
waited for her at the gate. She started violently when she saw him.&quot;Tom, how is it you are come home? Is there anything the matter?&quot;
Maggie spoke in a low, tremulous voice.&quot;I'm come to walk with you to the Red Deeps, and meet Philip Wakem,&quot;
said Tom, the central fold in his brow, which had become habitual with
him, deepening as he spoke.Maggie stood helpless, pale and cold. By some means, then, Tom knew
everything. At last she said, &quot;I'm, not going,&quot; and turned round.&quot;Yes, you are; but I want to speak to you first. Where is my father?&quot;&quot;Out on horseback.&quot;&quot;And my mother?&quot;&quot;In the yard, I think, with the poultry.&quot;&quot;I can go in, then, without her seeing me?&quot;They walked in together, and Tom, entering the parlor, said to Maggie,
&quot;Come in here.&quot;She obeyed, and he closed the door behind her.&quot;Now, Maggie, tell me this instant everything that has passed between
you and Philip Wakem.&quot;&quot;Does my father know anything?&quot; said Maggie, still trembling.&quot;No,&quot; said Tom indignantly. &quot;But heshallknow, if you attempt to
use deceit toward me any further.&quot;&quot;I don't wish to use deceit,&quot; said Maggie, flushing into resentment at
hearing this word applied to her conduct.&quot;Tell me the whole truth, then.&quot;&quot;Perhaps you know it.&quot;&quot;Never mind whether I know it or not. Tell me exactly what has
happened, or my father shall know everything.&quot;&quot;I tell it for my father's sake, then.&quot;&quot;Yes, it becomes you to profess affection for your father, when you
have despised his strongest feelings.&quot;&quot;You never do wrong, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, tauntingly.&quot;Not if I know it,&quot; answered Tom, with proud sincerity.&quot;But I have nothing to say to you beyond this: tell me what has passed
between you and Philip Wakem. When did you first meet him in the Red
Deeps?&quot;&quot;A year ago,&quot; said Maggie, quietly. Tom's severity gave her a certain
fund of defiance, and kept her sense of error in abeyance. &quot;You need
ask me no more questions. We have been friendly a year. We have met
and walked together often. He has lent me books.&quot;&quot;Is that all?&quot; said Tom, looking straight at her with his frown.Maggie paused a moment; then, determined to make an end of Tom's right
to accuse her of deceit, she said haughtily:&quot;No, not quite all. On Saturday he told me that he loved me. I didn't
think of it before then; I had only thought of him as an old friend.&quot;&quot;And youencouragedhim?&quot; said Tom, with an expression of disgust.&quot;I told him that I loved him too.&quot;Tom was silent a few moments, looking on the ground and frowning, with
his hands in his pockets. At last he looked up and said coldly, -&quot;Now, then, Maggie, there are but two courses for you to take, - either
you vow solemnly to me, with your hand on my father's Bible, that you
will never have another meeting or speak another word in private with
Philip Wakem, or you refuse, and I tell my father everything; and this
month, when by my exertions he might be made happy once more, you will
cause him the blow of knowing that you are a disobedient, deceitful
daughter, who throws away her own respectability by clandestine
meetings with the son of a man that has helped to ruin her father.
Choose!&quot; Tom ended with cold decision, going up to the large Bible,
drawing it forward, and opening it at the fly-leaf, where the writing
was.It was a crushing alternative to Maggie.&quot;Tom,&quot; she said, urged out of pride into pleading, &quot;don't ask me that.
I will promise you to give up all intercourse with Philip, if you will
let me see him once, or even only write to him and explain
everything, - to give it up as long as it would ever cause any pain to
my father. I feel something for Philip too.Heis not happy.&quot;&quot;I don't wish to hear anything of your feelings; I have said exactly
what I mean. Choose, and quickly, lest my mother should come in.&quot;&quot;If I give you my word, that will be as strong a bond to me as if I
laid my hand on the Bible. I don't require that to bind me.&quot;&quot;Do whatIrequire,&quot; said Tom. &quot;I can't trust you, Maggie. There is
no consistency in you. Put your hand on this Bible, and say, 'I
renounce all private speech and intercourse with Philip Wakem from
this time forth.' Else you will bring shame on us all, and grief on my
father; and what is the use of my exerting myself and giving up
everything else for the sake of paying my father's debts, if you are
to bring madness and vexation on him, just when he might be easy and
hold up his head once more?&quot;&quot;Oh, Tom,willthe debts be paid soon?&quot; said Maggie, clasping her
hands, with a sudden flash of joy across her wretchedness.&quot;If things turn out as I expect,&quot; said Tom. &quot;But,&quot; he added, his voice
trembling with indignation, &quot;while I have been contriving and working
that my father may have some peace of mind before he dies, - working
for the respectability of our family, - you have done all you can to
destroy both.&quot;Maggie felt a deep movement of compunction; for the moment, her mind
ceased to contend against what she felt to be cruel and unreasonable,
and in her self-blame she justified her brother.&quot;Tom,&quot; she said in a low voice, &quot;it was wrong of me; but I was so
lonely, and I was sorry for Philip. And I think enmity and hatred are
wicked.&quot;&quot;Nonsense!&quot; said Tom. &quot;Your duty was clear enough. Say no more; but
promise, in the words I told you.&quot;&quot;Imustspeak to Philip once more.&quot;&quot;You will go with me now and speak to him.&quot;&quot;I give you my word not to meet him or write to him again without your
knowledge. That is the only thing I will say. I will put my hand on
the Bible if you like.&quot;&quot;Say it, then.&quot;Maggie laid her hand on the page of manuscript and repeated the
promise. Tom closed the book, and said, &quot;Now let us go.&quot;Not a word was spoken as they walked along. Maggie was suffering in
anticipation of what Philip was about to suffer, and dreading the
galling words that would fall on him from Tom's lips; but she felt it
was in vain to attempt anything but submission. Tom had his terrible
clutch on her conscience and her deepest dread; she writhed under the
demonstrable truth of the character he had given to her conduct, and
yet her whole soul rebelled against it as unfair from its
incompleteness. He, meanwhile, felt the impetus of his indignation
diverted toward Philip. He did not know how much of an old boyish
repulsion and of mere personal pride and animosity was concerned in
the bitter severity of the words by which he meant to do the duty of a
son and a brother. Tom was not given to inquire subtly into his own
motives any more than into other matters of an intangible kind; he was
quite sure that his own motives as well as actions were good, else he
would have had nothing to do with them.Maggie's only hope was that something might, for the first time, have
prevented Philip from coming. Then there would be delay, - then she
might get Tom's permission to write to him. Her heart beat with double
violence when they got under the Scotch firs. It was the last moment
of suspense, she thought; Philip always met her soon after she got
beyond them. But they passed across the more open green space, and
entered the narrow bushy path by the mound. Another turning, and they
came so close upon him that both Tom and Philip stopped suddenly
within a yard of each other. There was a moment's silence, in which
Philip darted a look of inquiry at Maggie's face. He saw an answer
there, in the pale, parted lips, and the terrified tension of the
large eyes. Her imagination, always rushing extravagantly beyond an
immediate impression, saw her tall, strong brother grasping the feeble
Philip bodily, crushing him and trampling on him.&quot;Do you call this acting the part of a man and a gentleman, sir?&quot; Tom
said, in a voice of harsh scorn, as soon as Philip's eyes were turned
on him again.&quot;What do you mean?&quot; answered Philip, haughtily.&quot;Mean? Stand farther from me, lest I should lay hands on you, and I'll
tell you what I mean. I mean, taking advantage of a young girl's
foolishness and ignorance to get her to have secret meetings with you.
I mean, daring to trifle with the respectability of a family that has
a good and honest name to support.&quot;&quot;I deny that,&quot; interrupted Philip, impetuously. &quot;I could never trifle
with anything that affected your sister's happiness. She is dearer to
me than she is to you; I honor her more than you can ever honor her; I
would give up my life to her.&quot;&quot;Don't talk high-flown nonsense to me, sir! Do you mean to pretend
that you didn't know it would be injurious to her to meet you here
week after week? Do you pretend you had any right to make professions
of love to her, even if you had been a fit husband for her, when
neither her father nor your father would ever consent to a marriage
between you? Andyou, -youto try and worm yourself into the
affections of a handsome girl who is not eighteen, and has been shut
out from the world by her father's misfortunes! That's your crooked
notion of honor, is it? I call it base treachery; I call it taking
advantage of circumstances to win what's too good for you, - what you'd
never get by fair means.&quot;&quot;It is manly of you to talk in this way tome,&quot; said Philip,
bitterly, his whole frame shaken by violent emotions. &quot;Giants have an
immemorial right to stupidity and insolent abuse. You are incapable
even of understanding what I feel for your sister. I feel so much for
her that I could even desire to be at friendship withyou.&quot;&quot;I should be very sorry to understand your feelings,&quot; said Tom, with
scorching contempt. &quot;What I wish is that you should understandme, - that I shall take care ofmysister, and that if you dare to
make the least attempt to come near her, or to write to her, or to
keep the slightest hold on her mind, your puny, miserable body, that
ought to have put some modesty into your mind, shall not protect you.
I'll thrash you; I'll hold you up to public scorn. Who wouldn't laugh
at the idea ofyourturning lover to a fine girl?&quot;Tom and Maggie walked on in silence for some yards. He burst out, in a
convulsed voice.&quot;Stay, Maggie!&quot; said Philip, making a strong effort to speak. Then
looking at Tom, &quot;You have dragged your sister here, I suppose, that
she may stand by while you threaten and insult me. These naturally
seemed to you the right means to influence me. But you are mistaken.
Let your sister speak. If she says she is bound to give me up, I shall
abide by her wishes to the slightest word.&quot;&quot;It was for my father's sake, Philip,&quot; said Maggie, imploringly. &quot;Tom
threatens to tell my father, and he couldn't bear it; I have promised,
I have vowed solemnly, that we will not have any intercourse without
my brother's knowledge.&quot;&quot;It is enough, Maggie.Ishall not change; but I wish you to hold
yourself entirely free. But trust me; remember that I can never seek
for anything but good to what belongs to you.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Tom, exasperated by this attitude of Philip's, &quot;you can
talk of seeking good for her and what belongs to her now; did you seek
her good before?&quot;&quot;I did, - at some risk, perhaps. But I wished her to have a friend for
life, - who would cherish her, who would do her more justice than a
coarse and narrow-minded brother, that she has always lavished her
affections on.&quot;&quot;Yes, my way of befriending her is different from yours; and I'll tell
you what is my way. I'll save her from disobeying and disgracing her
father; I'll save her from throwing herself away on you, - from making
herself a laughing-stock, - from being flouted by a man likeyourfather, because she's not good enough for his son. You know well
enough what sort of justice and cherishing you were preparing for her.
I'm not to be imposed upon by fine words; I can see what actions mean.
Come away, Maggie.&quot;He seized Maggie's right wrist as he spoke, and she put out her left
hand. Philip clasped it an instant, with one eager look, and then
hurried away.Tom and Maggie walked on in silence for some yards. He was still
holding her wrist tightly, as if he were compelling a culprit from the
scene of action. At last Maggie, with a violent snatch, drew her hand
away, and her pent-up, long-gathered irritation burst into utterance.&quot;Don't suppose that I think you are right, Tom, or that I bow to your
will. I despise the feelings you have shown in speaking to Philip; I
detest your insulting, unmanly allusions to his deformity. You have
been reproaching other people all your life; you have been always sure
you yourself are right. It is because you have not a mind large enough
to see that there is anything better than your own conduct and your
own petty aims.&quot;&quot;Certainly,&quot; said Tom, coolly. &quot;I don't see that your conduct is
better, or your aims either. If your conduct, and Philip Wakem's
conduct, has been right, why are you ashamed of its being known?
Answer me that. I know what I have aimed at in my conduct, and I've
succeeded; pray, what good has your conduct brought to you or any one
else?&quot;&quot;I don't want to defend myself,&quot; said Maggie, still with vehemence: &quot;I
know I've been wrong, - often, continually. But yet, sometimes when I
have done wrong, it has been because I have feelings that you would be
the better for, if you had them. Ifyouwere in fault ever, if you
had done anything very wrong, I should be sorry for the pain it
brought you; I should not want punishment to be heaped on you. But you
have always enjoyed punishing me; you have always been hard and cruel
to me; even when I was a little girl, and always loved you better than
any one else in the world, you would let me go crying to bed without
forgiving me. You have no pity; you have no sense of your own
imperfection and your own sins. It is a sin to be hard; it is not
fitting for a mortal, for a Christian. You are nothing but a Pharisee.
You thank God for nothing but your own virtues; you think they are
great enough to win you everything else. You have not even a vision of
feelings by the side of which your shining virtues are mere darkness!&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Tom, with cold scorn, &quot;if your feelings are so much
better than mine, let me see you show them in some other way than by
conduct that's likely to disgrace us all, - than by ridiculous flights
first into one extreme and then into another. Pray, how have you shown
your love, that you talk of, either to me or my father? By disobeying
and deceiving us. I have a different way of showing my affection.&quot;&quot;Because you are a man, Tom, and have power, and can do something in
the world.&quot;&quot;Then, if you can do nothing, submit to those that can.&quot;&quot;So Iwillsubmit to what I acknowledge and feel to be right. I will
submit even to what is unreasonable from my father, but I will not
submit to it from you. You boast of your virtues as if they purchased
you a right to be cruel and unmanly, as you've been to-day. Don't
suppose I would give up Philip Wakem in obedience to you. The
deformity you insult would make me cling to him and care for him the
more.&quot;&quot;Very well; that is your view of things.&quot; said Tom, more coldly than
ever; &quot;you need say no more to show me what a wide distance there is
between us. Let us remember that in future, and be silent.&quot;Tom went back to St. Ogg's, to fulfill an appointment with his uncle
Deane, and receive directions about a journey on which he was to set
out the next morning.Maggie went up to her own room to pour out all that indignant
remonstrance, against which Tom's mind was close barred, in bitter
tears. Then, when the first burst of unsatisfied anger was gone by,
came the recollection of that quiet time before the pleasure which had
ended in to-day's misery had perturbed the clearness and simplicity of
her life. She used to think in that time that she had made great
conquests, and won a lasting stand on serene heights above worldly
temptations and conflict. And here she was down again in the thick of
a hot strife with her own and others' passions. Life was not so short,
then, and perfect rest was not so near as she had dreamed when she was
two years younger. There was more struggle for her, and perhaps more
falling. If she had felt that she was entirely wrong, and that Tom had
been entirely right, she could sooner have recovered more inward
harmony; but now her penitence and submission were constantly
obstructed by resentment that would present itself to her no otherwise
than as a just indignation. Her heart bled for Philip; she went on
recalling the insults that had been flung at him with so vivid a
conception of what he had felt under them, that it was almost like a
sharp bodily pain to her, making her beat the floor with her foot and
tighten her fingers on her palm.And yet, how was it that she was now and then conscious of a certain
dim background of relief in the forced separation from Philip? Surely
it was only because the sense of a deliverance from concealment was
welcome at any cost.>


I said that Maggie went home that evening from the Red Deeps with a
mental conflict already begun. You have seen clearly enough, in her
interview with Philip, what that conflict was. Here suddenly was an
opening in the rocky wall which shut in the narrow valley of
humiliation, where all her prospect was the remote, unfathomed sky;
and some of the memory-haunting earthly delights were no longer out of
her reach. She might have books, converse, affection; she might hear
tidings of the world from which her mind had not yet lost its sense of
exile; and it would be a kindness to Philip too, who was
pitiable, - clearly not happy. And perhaps here was an opportunity
indicated for making her mind more worthy of its highest service;
perhaps the noblest, completest devoutness could hardly exist without
some width of knowledge;mustshe always live in this resigned
imprisonment? It was so blameless, so good a thing that there should
be friendship between her and Philip; the motives that forbade it were
so unreasonable, so unchristian! But the severe monotonous warning
came again and again, - that she was losing the simplicity and
clearness of her life by admitting a ground of concealment; and that,
by forsaking the simple rule of renunciation, she was throwing herself
under the seductive guidance of illimitable wants. She thought she had
won strength to obey the warning before she allowed herself the next
week to turn her steps in the evening to the Red Deeps. But while she
was resolved to say an affectionate farewell to Philip, how she looked
forward to that evening walk in the still, fleckered shade of the
hollows, away from all that was harsh and unlovely; to the
affectionate, admiring looks that would meet her; to the sense of
comradeship that childish memories would give to wiser, older talk; to
the certainty that Philip would care to hear everything she said,
which no one else cared for! It was a half-hour that it would be very
hard to turn her back upon, with the sense that there would be no
other like it. Yet she said what she meant to say; she looked firm as
well as sad.&quot;Philip, I have made up my mind; it is right that we should give each
other up, in everything but memory. I could not see you without
concealment - stay, I know what you are going to say, - it is other
people's wrong feelings that make concealment necessary; but
concealment is bad, however it may be caused. I feel that it would be
bad for me, for us both. And then, if our secret were discovered,
there would be nothing but misery, - dreadful anger; and then we must
part after all, and it would be harder, when we were used to seeing
each other.&quot;Philip's face had flushed, and there was a momentary eagerness of
expression, as if he had been about to resist this decision with all
his might.But he controlled himself, and said, with assumed calmness: &quot;Well,
Maggie, if we must part, let us try and forget it for one half hour;
let us talk together a little while, for the last time.&quot;He took her hand, and Maggie felt no reason to withdraw it; his
quietness made her all the more sure she had given him great pain, and
she wanted to show him how unwillingly she had given it. They walked
together hand in hand in silence.&quot;Let us sit down in the hollow,&quot; said Philip, &quot;where we stood the last
time. See how the dog-roses have strewed the ground, and spread their
opal petals over it.&quot;They sat down at the roots of the slanting ash.&quot;I've begun my picture of you among the Scotch firs, Maggie,&quot; said
Philip, &quot;so you must let me study your face a little, while you
stay, - since I am not to see it again. Please turn your head this
way.&quot;This was said in an entreating voice, and it would have been very hard
of Maggie to refuse. The full, lustrous face, with the bright black
coronet, looked down like that of a divinity well pleased to be
worshipped, on the pale-hued, small-featured face that was turned up
to it.&quot;I shall be sitting for my second portrait then,&quot; she said, smiling.
&quot;Will it be larger than the other?&quot;&quot;Oh yes, much larger. It is an oil-painting. You will look like a tall
Hamadryad, dark and strong and noble, just issued from one of the
fir-trees, when the stems are casting their afternoon shadows on the
grass.&quot;&quot;You seem to think more of painting than of anything now, Philip?&quot;&quot;Perhaps I do,&quot; said Philip, rather sadly; &quot;but I think of too many
things, - sow all sorts of seeds, and get no great harvest from any one
of them. I'm cursed with susceptibility in every direction, and
effective faculty in none. I care for painting and music; I care for
classic literature, and medi&Atilde;&brvbar;val literature, and modern literature; I
flutter all ways, and fly in none.&quot;&quot;But surely that is a happiness to have so many tastes, - to enjoy so
many beautiful things, when they are within your reach,&quot; said Maggie,
musingly. &quot;It always seemed to me a sort of clever stupidity only to
have one sort of talent, - almost like a carrier-pigeon.&quot;&quot;It might be a happiness to have many tastes if I were like other
men,&quot; said Philip, bitterly. &quot;I might get some power and distinction
by mere mediocrity, as they do; at least I should get those middling
satisfactions which make men contented to do without great ones. I
might think society at St. Ogg's agreeable then. But nothing could
make life worth the purchase-money of pain to me, but some faculty
that would lift me above the dead level of provincial existence. Yes,
there is one thing, - a passion answers as well as a faculty.&quot;Maggie did not hear the last words; she was struggling against the
consciousness that Philip's words had set her own discontent vibrating
again as it used to do.&quot;I understand what you mean,&quot; she said, &quot;though I know so much less
than you do. I used to think I could never bear life if it kept on
being the same every day, and I must always be doing things of no
consequence, and never know anything greater. But, dear Philip, I
think we are only like children that some one who is wiser is taking
care of. Is it not right to resign ourselves entirely, whatever may be
denied us? I have found great peace in that for the last two or three
years, even joy in subduing my own will.&quot;&quot;Yes, Maggie,&quot; said Philip, vehemently; &quot;and you are shutting yourself
up in a narrow, self-delusive fanaticism, which is only a way of
escaping pain by starving into dulness all the highest powers of your
nature. Joy and peace are not resignation; resignation is the willing
endurance of a pain that is not allayed, that you don't expect to be
allayed. Stupefaction is not resignation; and it is stupefaction to
remain in ignorance, - to shut up all the avenues by which the life of
your fellow-men might become known to you. I am not resigned; I am not
sure that life is long enough to learn that lesson.Youare not
resigned; you are only trying to stupefy yourself.&quot;Maggie's lips trembled; she felt there was some truth in what Philip
said, and yet there was a deeper consciousness that, for any immediate
application it had to her conduct, it was no better than falsity. Her
double impression corresponded to the double impulse of the speaker.
Philip seriously believed what he said, but he said it with vehemence
because it made an argument against the resolution that opposed his
wishes. But Maggie's face, made more childlike by the gathering tears,
touched him with a tenderer, less egotistic feeling. He took her hand
and said gently:Don't let us think of such things in this short half-hour, Maggie. Let
us only care about being together. We shall be friends in spite of
separation. We shall always think of each other. I shall be glad to
live as long as you are alive, because I shall think there may always
come a time when I can - when you will let me help you in some way.&quot;&quot;What a dear, good brother you would have been, Philip,&quot; said Maggie,
smiling through the haze of tears. &quot;I think you would have made as
much fuss about me, and been as pleased for me to love you, as would
have satisfied even me. You would have loved me well enough to bear
with me, and forgive me everything. That was what I always longed that
Tom should do. I was never satisfied with alittleof anything. That
is why it is better for me to do without earthly happiness altogether.
I never felt that I had enough music, - I wanted more instruments
playing together; I wanted voices to be fuller and deeper. Do you ever
sing now, Philip?&quot; she added abruptly, as if she had forgotten what
went before.&quot;Yes,&quot; he said, &quot;every day, almost. But my voice is only middling,
like everything else in me.&quot;&quot;Oh, sing me something, - just one song. Imaylisten to that before
I go, - something you used to sing at Lorton on a Saturday afternoon,
when we had the drawing-room all to ourselves, and I put my apron over
my head to listen.&quot;&quot;Iknow,&quot; said Philip; and Maggie buried her face in her hands while
he sangsotto voce, &quot;Love in her eyes sits playing,&quot; and then said,
&quot;That's it, isn't it?&quot;&quot;Oh no, I won't stay,&quot; said Maggie, starting up. &quot;It will only haunt
me. Let us walk, Philip. I must go home.&quot;She moved away, so that he was obliged to rise and follow her.&quot;Maggie,&quot; he said, in a tone of remonstrance, &quot;don't persist in this
wilful, senseless privation. It makes me wretched to see you benumbing
and cramping your nature in this way. You were so full of life when
you were a child; I thought you would be a brilliant woman, - all wit
and bright imagination. And it flashes out in your face still, until
you draw that veil of dull quiescence over it.&quot;&quot;Why do you speak so bitterly to me, Philip?&quot; said Maggie.&quot;Because I foresee it will not end well; you can never carry on this
self-torture.&quot;&quot;I shall have strength given me,&quot; said Maggie, tremulously.&quot;No, you will not, Maggie; no one has strength given to do what is
unnatural. It is mere cowardice to seek safety in negations. No
character becomes strong in that way. You will be thrown into the
world some day, and then every rational satisfaction of your nature
that you deny now will assault you like a savage appetite.&quot;Maggie started and paused, looking at Philip with alarm in her face.&quot;Philip, how dare you shake me in this way? You are a tempter.&quot;&quot;No, I am not; but love gives insight, Maggie, and insight often gives
foreboding.Listento me, - letmesupply you with books; do let me
see you sometimes, - be your brother and teacher, as you said at
Lorton. It is less wrong that you should see me than that you should
be committing this long suicide.&quot;Maggie felt unable to speak. She shook her head and walked on in
silence, till they came to the end of the Scotch firs, and she put out
her hand in sign of parting.&quot;Do you banish me from this place forever, then, Maggie? Surely I may
come and walk in it sometimes? If I meet you by chance, there is no
concealment in that?&quot;It is the moment when our resolution seems about to become
irrevocable - when the fatal iron gates are about to close upon
us - that tests our strength. Then, after hours of clear reasoning and
firm conviction, we snatch at any sophistry that will nullify our long
struggles, and bring us the defeat that we love better than victory.Maggie felt her heart leap at this subterfuge of Philip's, and there
passed over her face that almost imperceptible shock which accompanies
any relief. He saw it, and they parted in silence.Philip's sense of the situation was too complete for him not to be
visited with glancing fears lest he had been intervening too
presumptuously in the action of Maggie's conscience, perhaps for a
selfish end. But no! - he persuaded himself his end was not selfish. He
had little hope that Maggie would ever return the strong feeling he
had for her; and it must be better for Maggie's future life, when
these petty family obstacles to her freedom had disappeared, that the
present should not be entirely sacrificed, and that she should have
some opportunity of culture, - some interchange with a mind above the
vulgar level of those she was now condemned to live with. If we only
look far enough off for the consequence of our actions, we can always
find some point in the combination of results by which those actions
can be justified; by adopting the point of view of a Providence who
arranges results, or of a philosopher who traces them, we shall find
it possible to obtain perfect complacency in choosing to do what is
most agreeable to us in the present moment. And it was in this way
that Philip justified his subtle efforts to overcome Maggie's true
prompting against a concealment that would introduce doubleness into
her own mind, and might cause new misery to those who had the primary
natural claim on her. But there was a surplus of passion in him that
made him half independent of justifying motives. His longing to see
Maggie, and make an element in her life, had in it some of that savage
impulse to snatch an offered joy which springs from a life in which
the mental and bodily constitution have made pain predominate. He had
not his full share in the common good of men; he could not even pass
muster with the insignificant, but must be singled out for pity, and
excepted from what was a matter of course with others. Even to Maggie
he was an exception; it was clear that the thought of his being her
lover had never entered her mind.Do not think too hardly of Philip. Ugly and deformed people have great
need of unusual virtues, because they are likely to be extremely
uncomfortable without them; but the theory that unusual virtues spring
by a direct consequence out of personal disadvantages, as animals get
thicker wool in severe climates, is perhaps a little overstrained. The
temptations of beauty are much dwelt upon, but I fancy they only bear
the same relation to those of ugliness, as the temptation to excess at
a feast, where the delights are varied for eye and ear as well as
palate, bears to the temptations that assail the desperation of
hunger. Does not the Hunger Tower stand as the type of the utmost
trial to what is human in us?Philip had never been soothed by that mother's love which flows out to
us in the greater abundance because our need is greater, which clings
to us the more tenderly because we are the less likely to be winners
in the game of life; and the sense of his father's affection and
indulgence toward him was marred by the keener perception of his
father's faults. Kept aloof from all practical life as Philip had
been, and by nature half feminine in sensitiveness, he had some of the
woman's intolerant repulsion toward worldliness and the deliberate
pursuit of sensual enjoyment; and this one strong natural tie in his
life, - his relation as a son, - was like an aching limb to him. Perhaps
there is inevitably something morbid in a human being who is in any
way unfavorably excepted from ordinary conditions, until the good
force has had time to triumph; and it has rarely had time for that at
two-and-twenty. That force was present in Philip in much strength, but
the sun himself looks feeble through the morning mists.>


There is something sustaining in the very agitation that accompanies
the first shocks of trouble, just as an acute pain is often a
stimulus, and produces an excitement which is transient strength. It
is in the slow, changed life that follows; in the time when sorrow has
become stale, and has no longer an emotive intensity that counteracts
its pain; in the time when day follows day in dull, unexpectant
sameness, and trial is a dreary routine, - it is then that despair
threatens; it is then that the peremptory hunger of the soul is felt,
and eye and ear are strained after some unlearned secret of our
existence, which shall give to endurance the nature of satisfaction.This time of utmost need was come to Maggie, with her short span of
thirteen years. To the usual precocity of the girl, she added that
early experience of struggle, of conflict between the inward impulse
and outward fact, which is the lot of every imaginative and passionate
nature; and the years since she hammered the nails into her wooden
Fetish among the worm-eaten shelves of the attic had been filled with
so eager a life in the triple world of Reality, Books, and Waking
Dreams, that Maggie was strangely old for her years in everything
except in her entire want of that prudence and self-command which were
the qualities that made Tom manly in the midst of his intellectual
boyishness. And now her lot was beginning to have a still, sad
monotony, which threw her more than ever on her inward self. Her
father was able to attend to business again, his affairs were settled,
and he was acting as Wakem's manager on the old spot. Tom went to and
fro every morning and evening, and became more and more silent in the
short intervals at home; what was there to say? One day was like
another; and Tom's interest in life, driven back and crushed on every
other side, was concentrating itself into the one channel of ambitious
resistance to misfortune. The peculiarities of his father and mother
were very irksome to him, now they were laid bare of all the softening
accompaniments of an easy, prosperous home; for Tom had very clear,
prosaic eyes, not apt to be dimmed by mists of feeling or imagination.
Poor Mrs. Tulliver, it seemed, would never recover her old self, her
placid household activity; how could she? The objects among which her
mind had moved complacently were all gone, - all the little hopes and
schemes and speculations, all the pleasant little cares about her
treasures which had made the world quite comprehensible to her for a
quarter of a century, since she had made her first purchase of the
sugar-tongs, had been suddenly snatched away from her, and she
remained bewildered in this empty life. Why that should have happened
to her which had not happened to other women remained an insoluble
question by which she expressed her perpetual ruminating comparison of
the past with the present. It was piteous to see the comely woman
getting thinner and more worn under a bodily as well as mental
restlessness, which made her often wander about the empty house after
her work was done, until Maggie, becoming alarmed about her, would
seek her, and bring her down by telling her how it vexed Tom that she
was injuring her health by never sitting down and resting herself. Yet
amidst this helpless imbecility there was a touching trait of humble,
self-devoting maternity, which made Maggie feel tenderly toward her
poor mother amidst all the little wearing griefs caused by her mental
feebleness. She would let Maggie do none of the work that was heaviest
and most soiling to the hands, and was quite peevish when Maggie
attempted to relieve her from her grate-brushing and scouring: &quot;Let it
alone, my dear; your hands 'ull get as hard as hard,&quot; she would say;
&quot;it's your mother's place to do that. I can't do the sewing - my eyes
fail me.&quot; And she would still brush and carefully tend Maggie's hair,
which she had become reconciled to, in spite of its refusal to curl,
now it was so long and massy. Maggie was not her pet child, and, in
general, would have been much better if she had been quite different;
yet the womanly heart, so bruised in its small personal desires, found
a future to rest on in the life of this young thing, and the mother
pleased herself with wearing out her own hands to save the hands that
had so much more life in them.But the constant presence of her mother's regretful bewilderment was
less painful to Maggie than that of her father's sullen,
incommunicative depression. As long as the paralysis was upon him, and
it seemed as if he might always be in a childlike condition of
dependence, - as long as he was still only half awakened to his
trouble, - Maggie had felt the strong tide of pitying love almost as an
inspiration, a new power, that would make the most difficult life easy
for his sake; but now, instead of childlike dependence, there had come
a taciturn, hard concentration of purpose, in strange contrast with
his old vehement communicativeness and high spirit; and this lasted
from day to day, and from week to week, the dull eye never brightening
with any eagerness or any joy. It is something cruelly incomprehensible
to youthful natures, this sombre sameness in middle-aged and elderly
people, whose life has resulted in disappointment and discontent, to
whose faces a smile becomes so strange that the sad lines all about
the lips and brow seem to take no notice of it, and it hurries away
again for want of a welcome. &quot;Why will they not kindle up and be
glad sometimes?&quot; thinks young elasticity. &quot;It would be so easy if they
only liked to do it.&quot; And these leaden clouds that never part are apt
to create impatience even in the filial affection that streams forth in
nothing but tenderness and pity in the time of more obvious affliction.Mr. Tulliver lingered nowhere away from home; he hurried away from
market, he refused all invitations to stay and chat, as in old times,
in the houses where he called on business. He could not be reconciled
with his lot. There was no attitude in which his pride did not feel
its bruises; and in all behavior toward him, whether kind or cold, he
detected an allusion to the change in his circumstances. Even the days
on which Wakem came to ride round the land and inquire into the
business were not so black to him as those market-days on which he had
met several creditors who had accepted a composition from him. To save
something toward the repayment of those creditors was the object
toward which he was now bending all his thoughts and efforts; and
under the influence of this all-compelling demand of his nature, the
somewhat profuse man, who hated to be stinted or to stint any one else
in his own house, was gradually metamorphosed into the keen-eyed
grudger of morsels. Mrs. Tulliver could not economize enough to
satisfy him, in their food and firing; and he would eat nothing
himself but what was of the coarsest quality. Tom, though depressed
and strongly repelled by his father's sullenness, and the dreariness
of home, entered thoroughly into his father's feelings about paying
the creditors; and the poor lad brought his first quarter's money,
with a delicious sense of achievement, and gave it to his father to
put into the tin box which held the savings. The little store of
sovereigns in the tin box seemed to be the only sight that brought a
faint beam of pleasure into the miller's eyes, - faint and transient,
for it was soon dispelled by the thought that the time would be
long - perhaps longer than his life, - before the narrow savings could
remove the hateful incubus of debt. A deficit of more than five
hundred pounds, with the accumulating interest, seemed a deep pit to
fill with the savings from thirty shillings a-week, even when Tom's
probable savings were to be added. On this one point there was entire
community of feeling in the four widely differing beings who sat round
the dying fire of sticks, which made a cheap warmth for them on the
verge of bedtime. Mrs. Tulliver carried the proud integrity of the
Dodsons in her blood, and had been brought up to think that to wrong
people of their money, which was another phrase for debt, was a sort
of moral pillory; it would have been wickedness, to her mind, to have
run counter to her husband's desire to &quot;do the right thing,&quot; and
retrieve his name. She had a confused, dreamy notion that, if the
creditors were all paid, her plate and linen ought to come back to
her; but she had an inbred perception that while people owed money
they were unable to pay, they couldn't rightly call anything their
own. She murmured a little that Mr. Tulliver so peremptorily refused
to receive anything in repayment from Mr. and Mrs. Moss; but to all
his requirements of household economy she was submissive to the point
of denying herself the cheapest indulgences of mere flavor; her only
rebellion was to smuggle into the kitchen something that would make
rather a better supper than usual for Tom.These narrow notions about debt, held by the old fashioned Tullivers,
may perhaps excite a smile on the faces of many readers in these days
of wide commercial views and wide philosophy, according to which
everything rights itself without any trouble of ours. The fact that my
tradesman is out of pocket by me is to be looked at through the serene
certainty that somebody else's tradesman is in pocket by somebody
else; and since there must be bad debts in the world, why, it is mere
egoism not to like that we in particular should make them instead of
our fellow-citizens. I am telling the history of very simple people,
who had never had any illuminating doubts as to personal integrity and
honor.Under all this grim melancholy and narrowing concentration of desire,
Mr. Tulliver retained the feeling toward his &quot;little wench&quot; which made
her presence a need to him, though it would not suffice to cheer him.
She was still the desire of his eyes; but the sweet spring of fatherly
love was now mingled with bitterness, like everything else. When
Maggie laid down her work at night, it was her habit to get a low
stool and sit by her father's knee, leaning her cheek against it. How
she wished he would stroke her head, or give some sign that he was
soothed by the sense that he had a daughter who loved him! But now she
got no answer to her little caresses, either from her father or from
Tom, - the two idols of her life. Tom was weary and abstracted in the
short intervals when he was at home, and her father was bitterly
preoccupied with the thought that the girl was growing up, was
shooting up into a woman; and how was she to do well in life? She had
a poor chance for marrying, down in the world as they were. And he
hated the thought of her marrying poorly, as her aunt Gritty had done;thatwould be a thing to make him turn in his grave, - the little
wench so pulled down by children and toil, as her aunt Moss was. When
uncultured minds, confined to a narrow range of personal experience,
are under the pressure of continued misfortune, their inward life is
apt to become a perpetually repeated round of sad and bitter thoughts;
the same words, the same scenes, are revolved over and over again, the
same mood accompanies them; the end of the year finds them as much
what they were at the beginning as if they were machines set to a
recurrent series of movements.The sameness of the days was broken by few visitors. Uncles and aunts
paid only short visits now; of course, they could not stay to meals,
and the constraint caused by Mr. Tulliver's savage silence, which
seemed to add to the hollow resonance of the bare, uncarpeted room
when the aunts were talking, heightened the unpleasantness of these
family visits on all sides, and tended to make them rare. As for other
acquaintances, there is a chill air surrounding those who are down in
the world, and people are glad to get away from them, as from a cold
room; human beings, mere men and women, without furniture, without
anything to offer you, who have ceased to count as anybody, present an
embarrassing negation of reasons for wishing to see them, or of
subjects on which to converse with them. At that distant day, there
was a dreary isolation in the civilized Christian society of these
realms for families that had dropped below their original level,
unless they belonged to a sectarian church, which gets some warmth of
brotherhood by walling in the sacred fire.>


Journeying down the Rhone on a summer's day, you have perhaps felt the
sunshine made dreary by those ruined villages which stud the banks in
certain parts of its course, telling how the swift river once rose,
like an angry, destroying god, sweeping down the feeble generations
whose breath is in their nostrils, and making their thought, between
the effect produced on us by these dismal remnants of commonplace
houses, which in their best days were but the sign of a sordid life,
belonging in all its details to our own vulgar era, and the effect
produced by those ruins on the castled Rhine, which have crumbled and
mellowed into such harmony with the green and rocky steeps that they
seem to have a natural fitness, like the mountain-pine; nay, even in
the day when they were built they must have had this fitness, as if
they had been raised by an earth-born race, who had inherited from
their mighty parent a sublime instinct of form. And that was a day of
romance; If those robber-barons were somewhat grim and drunken ogres,
they had a certain grandeur of the wild beast in them, - they were
forest boars with tusks, tearing and rending, not the ordinary
domestic grunter; they represented the demon forces forever in
collision with beauty, virtue, and the gentle uses of life; they made
a fine contrast in the picture with the wandering minstrel, the
soft-lipped princess, the pious recluse, and the timid Israelite. That
was a time of color, when the sunlight fell on glancing steel and
floating banners; a time of adventure and fierce struggle, - nay, of
living, religious art and religious enthusiasm; for were not
cathedrals built in those days, and did not great emperors leave their
Western palaces to die before the infidel strongholds in the sacred
East? Therefore it is that these Rhine castles thrill me with a sense
of poetry; they belong to the grand historic life of humanity, and
raise up for me the vision of an echo. But these dead-tinted,
hollow-eyed, angular skeletons of villages on the Rhone oppress me
with the feeling that human life - very much of it - is a narrow, ugly,
grovelling existence, which even calamity does not elevate, but rather
tends to exhibit in all its bare vulgarity of conception; and I have a
cruel conviction that the lives these ruins are the traces of were
part of a gross sum of obscure vitality, that will be swept into the
same oblivion with the generations of ants and beavers.Perhaps something akin to this oppressive feeling may have weighed
upon you in watching this old-fashioned family life on the banks of
the Floss, which even sorrow hardly suffices to lift above the level
of the tragi-comic. It is a sordid life, you say, this of the
Tullivers and Dodsons, irradiated by no sublime principles, no
romantic visions, no active, self-renouncing faith; moved by none of
those wild, uncontrollable passions which create the dark shadows of
misery and crime; without that primitive, rough simplicity of wants,
that hard, submissive, ill-paid toil, that childlike spelling-out of
what nature has written, which gives its poetry to peasant life. Here
one has conventional worldly notions and habits without instruction
and without polish, surely the most prosaic form of human life; proud
respectability in a gig of unfashionable build; worldliness without
side-dishes. Observing these people narrowly, even when the iron hand
of misfortune has shaken them from their unquestioning hold on the
world, one sees little trace of religion, still less of a
distinctively Christian creed. Their belief in the Unseen, so far as
it manifests itself at all, seems to be rather a pagan kind; their
moral notions, though held with strong tenacity, seem to have no
standard beyond hereditary custom. You could not live among such
people; you are stifled for want of an outlet toward something
beautiful, great, or noble; you are irritated with these dull men and
women, as a kind of population out of keeping with the earth on which
they live, - with this rich plain where the great river flows forever
onward, and links the small pulse of the old English town with the
beatings of the world's mighty heart. A vigorous superstition, that
lashes its gods or lashes its own back, seems to be more congruous
with the mystery of the human lot, than the mental condition of these
emmet-like Dodsons and Tullivers.I share with you this sense of oppressive narrowness; but it is
necessary that we should feel it, if we care to understand how it
acted on the lives of Tom and Maggie, - how it has acted on young
natures in many generations, that in the onward tendency of human
things have risen above the mental level of the generation before
them, to which they have been nevertheless tied by the strongest
fibres of their hearts. The suffering, whether of martyr or victim,
which belongs to every historical advance of mankind, is represented
in this way in every town, and by hundreds of obscure hearths; and we
need not shrink from this comparison of small things with great; for
does not science tell us that its highest striving is after the
ascertainment of a unity which shall bind the smallest things with the
greatest? In natural science, I have understood, there is nothing
petty to the mind that has a large vision of relations, and to which
every single object suggests a vast sum of conditions. It is surely
the same with the observation of human life.Certainly the religious and moral ideas of the Dodsons and Tullivers
were of too specific a kind to be arrived at deductively, from the
statement that they were part of the Protestant population of Great
Britain. Their theory of life had its core of soundness, as all
theories must have on which decent and prosperous families have been
reared and have flourished; but it had the very slightest tincture of
theology. If, in the maiden days of the Dodson sisters, their Bibles
opened more easily at some parts than others, it was because of dried
tulip-petals, which had been distributed quite impartially, without
preference for the historical, devotional, or doctrinal. Their
religion was of a simple, semi-pagan kind, but there was no heresy in
it, - if heresy properly means choice, - for they didn't know there was
any other religion, except that of chapel-goers, which appeared to run
in families, like asthma. Howshouldthey know? The vicar of their
pleasant rural parish was not a controversialist, but a good hand at
whist, and one who had a joke always ready for a blooming female
parishioner. The religion of the Dodsons consisted in revering
whatever was customary and respectable; it was necessary to be
baptized, else one could not be buried in the church-yard, and to take
the sacrament before death, as a security against more dimly
understood perils; but it was of equal necessity to have the proper
pall-bearers and well-cured hams at one's funeral, and to leave an
unimpeachable will. A Dodson would not be taxed with the omission of
anything that was becoming, or that belonged to that eternal fitness
of things which was plainly indicated in the practice of the most
substantial parishioners, and in the family traditions, - such as
obedience to parents, faithfulness to kindred, industry, rigid
honesty, thrift, the thorough scouring of wooden and copper utensils,
the hoarding of coins likely to disappear from the currency, the
production of first-rate commodities for the market, and the general
preference of whatever was home-made. The Dodsons were a very proud
race, and their pride lay in the utter frustration of all desire to
tax them with a breach of traditional duty or propriety. A wholesome
pride in many respects, since it identified honor with perfect
integrity, thoroughness of work, and faithfulness to admitted rules;
and society owes some worthy qualities in many of her members to
mothers of the Dodson class, who made their butter and their fromenty
well, and would have felt disgraced to make it otherwise. To be honest
and poor was never a Dodson motto, still less to seem rich though
being poor; rather, the family badge was to be honest and rich, and
not only rich, but richer than was supposed. To live respected, and
have the proper bearers at your funeral, was an achievement of the
ends of existence that would be entirely nullified if, on the reading
of your will, you sank in the opinion of your fellow-men, either by
turning out to be poorer than they expected, or by leaving your money
in a capricious manner, without strict regard to degrees of kin. The
right thing must always be done toward kindred. The right thing was to
correct them severely, if they were other than a credit to the family,
but still not to alienate from them the smallest rightful share in the
family shoebuckles and other property. A conspicuous quality in the
Dodson character was its genuineness; its vices and virtues alike were
phases of a proud honest egoism, which had a hearty dislike to
whatever made against its own credit and interest, and would be
frankly hard of speech to inconvenient &quot;kin,&quot; but would never forsake
or ignore them, - would not let them want bread, but only require them
to eat it with bitter herbs.The same sort of traditional belief ran in the Tulliver veins, but it
was carried in richer blood, having elements of generous imprudence,
warm affection, and hot-tempered rashness. Mr. Tulliver's grandfather
had been heard to say that he was descended from one Ralph Tulliver, a
wonderfully clever fellow, who had ruined himself. It is likely enough
that the clever Ralph was a high liver, rode spirited horses, and was
very decidedly of his own opinion. On the other hand, nobody had ever
heard of a Dodson who had ruined himself; it was not the way of that
family.If such were the views of life on which the Dodsons and Tullivers had
been reared in the praiseworthy past of Pitt and high prices, you will
infer from what you already know concerning the state of society in
St. Ogg's, that there had been no highly modifying influence to act on
them in their maturer life. It was still possible, even in that later
time of anti-Catholic preaching, for people to hold many pagan ideas,
and believe themselves good church-people, notwithstanding; so we need
hardly feel any surprise at the fact that Mr. Tulliver, though a
regular church-goer, recorded his vindictiveness on the fly-leaf of
his Bible. It was not that any harm could be said concerning the vicar
of that charming rural parish to which Dorlcote Mill belonged; he was
a man of excellent family, an irreproachable bachelor, of elegant
pursuits, - had taken honors, and held a fellowship. Mr. Tulliver
regarded him with dutiful respect, as he did everything else belonging
to the church-service; but he considered that church was one thing and
common-sense another, and he wanted nobody to tellhimwhat
commonsense was. Certain seeds which are required to find a nidus for
themselves under unfavorable circumstances have been supplied by
nature with an apparatus of hooks, so that they will get a hold on
very unreceptive surfaces. The spiritual seed which had been scattered
over Mr. Tulliver had apparently been destitute of any corresponding
provision, and had slipped off to the winds again, from a total
absence of hooks.>


One afternoon, when the chestnuts were coming into flower, Maggie had
brought her chair outside the front door, and was seated there with a
book on her knees. Her dark eyes had wandered from the book, but they
did not seem to be enjoying the sunshine which pierced the screen of
jasmine on the projecting porch at her right, and threw leafy shadows
on her pale round cheek; they seemed rather to be searching for
something that was not disclosed by the sunshine. It had been a more
miserable day than usual; her father, after a visit of Wakem's had had
a paroxysm of rage, in which for some trifling fault he had beaten the
boy who served in the mill. Once before, since his illness, he had had
a similar paroxysm, in which he had beaten his horse, and the scene
had left a lasting terror in Maggie's mind. The thought had risen,
that some time or other he might beat her mother if she happened to
speak in her feeble way at the wrong moment. The keenest of all dread
with her was lest her father should add to his present misfortune the
wretchedness of doing something irretrievably disgraceful. The
battered school-book of Tom's which she held on her knees could give
her no fortitude under the pressure of that dread; and again and again
her eyes had filled with tears, as they wandered vaguely, seeing
neither the chestnut-trees, nor the distant horizon, but only future
scenes of home-sorrow.Suddenly she was roused by the sound of the opening gate and of
footsteps on the gravel. It was not Tom who was entering, but a man in
a sealskin cap and a blue plush waistcoat, carrying a pack on his
back, and followed closely by a bullterrier of brindled coat and
defiant aspect.&quot;Oh, Bob, it's you!&quot; said Maggie, starting up with a smile of pleased
recognition, for there had been no abundance of kind acts to efface
the recollection of Bob's generosity; &quot;I'm so glad to see you.&quot;&quot;Thank you, Miss,&quot; said Bob, lifting his cap and showing a delighted
face, but immediately relieving himself of some accompanying
embarrassment by looking down at his dog, and saying in a tone of
disgust, &quot;Get out wi' you, you thunderin' sawney!&quot;&quot;My brother is not at home yet, Bob,&quot; said Maggie; &quot;he is always at
St. Ogg's in the daytime.&quot;&quot;Well, Miss,&quot; said Bob, &quot;I should be glad to see Mr. Tom, but that
isn't just what I'm come for, - look here!&quot;Bob was in the act of depositing his pack on the door-step, and with
it a row of small books fastened together with string.Apparently, however, they were not the object to which he wished to
call Maggie's attention, but rather something which he had carried
under his arm, wrapped in a red handkerchief.&quot;See here!&quot; he said again, laying the red parcel on the others and
unfolding it; &quot;you won't think I'm a-makin' too free, Miss, I hope,
but I lighted on these books, and I thought they might make up to you
a bit for them as you've lost; for I heared you speak o' picturs, - an'
as for picturs,lookhere!&quot;The opening of the red handkerchief had disclosed a superannuated
&quot;Keepsake&quot; and six or seven numbers of a &quot;Portrait Gallery,&quot; in royal
octavo; and the emphatic request to look referred to a portrait of
George the Fourth in all the majesty of his depressed cranium and
voluminous neckcloth.&quot;There's all sorts o' genelmen here,&quot; Bob went on, turning over the
leaves with some excitement, &quot;wi' all sorts o' nones, - an' some bald
an' some wi' wigs, - Parlament genelmen, I reckon. An' here,&quot; he added,
opening the &quot;Keepsake,&quot; - &quot;here'sladies for you, some wi' curly hair
and some wi' smooth, an' some a-smiling wi' their heads o' one side,
an' some as if they were goin' to cry, - look here, - a-sittin' on the
ground out o' door, dressed like the ladies I'n seen get out o' the
carriages at the balls in th' Old Hall there. My eyes! I wonder what
the chaps wear as go a-courtin' 'em! I sot up till the clock was gone
twelve last night, a-lookin' at 'em, - I did, - till they stared at me
out o' the picturs as if they'd know when I spoke to 'em. But, lors! I
shouldn't know what to say to 'em. They'll be more fittin' company for
you, Miss; and the man at the book-stall, he said they banged
iverything for picturs; he said they was a fust-rate article.&quot;&quot;And you've bought them for me, Bob?&quot; said Maggie, deeply touched by
this simple kindness. &quot;How very, very good of you! But I'm afraid you
gave a great deal of money for them.&quot;&quot;Not me!&quot; said Bob. &quot;I'd ha' gev three times the money if they'll make
up to you a bit for them as was sold away from you, Miss. For I'n
niver forgot how you looked when you fretted about the books bein'
gone; it's stuck by me as if it was a pictur hingin' before me. An'
when I see'd the book open upo' the stall, wi' the lady lookin' out of
it wi' eyes a bit like your'n when you was frettin', - you'll excuse my
takin' the liberty, Miss, - I thought I'd make free to buy it for you,
an' then I bought the books full o' genelmen to match; an' then&quot; - here
Bob took up the small stringed packet of books - &quot;I thought you might
like a bit more print as well as the picturs, an' I got these for a
sayso, - they're cram-full o' print, an' I thought they'd do no harm
comin' along wi' these bettermost books. An' I hope you won't say me
nay, an' tell me as you won't have 'em, like Mr. Tom did wi' the
suvreigns.&quot;&quot;No, indeed, Bob,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;I'm very thankful to you for thinking
of me, and being so good to me and Tom. I don't think any one ever did
such a kind thing for me before. I haven't many friends who care for
me.&quot;&quot;Hev a dog, Miss! - they're better friends nor any Christian,&quot; said
Bob, laying down his pack again, which he had taken up with the
intention of hurrying away; for he felt considerable shyness in
talking to a young lass like Maggie, though, as he usually said of
himself, &quot;his tongue overrun him&quot; when he began to speak. &quot;I can't
give you Mumps, 'cause he'd break his heart to go away from me - eh,
Mumps, what do you say, you riff-raff?&quot; (Mumps declined to express
himself more diffusely than by a single affirmative movement of his
tail.) &quot;But I'd get you a pup, Miss, an' welcome.&quot;&quot;No, thank you, Bob. We have a yard dog, and I mayn't keep a dog of my
own.&quot;&quot;Eh, that's a pity; else there's a pup, - if you didn't mind about it
not being thoroughbred; its mother acts in the Punch show, - an
uncommon sensible bitch; she means more sense wi' her bark nor half
the chaps can put into their talk from breakfast to sundown. There's
one chap carries pots, - a poor, low trade as any on the road, - he
says, 'Why Toby's nought but a mongrel; there's nought to look at in
her.' But I says to him, 'Why, what are you yoursen but a mongrel?
There wasn't much pickin' o'yourfeyther an' mother, to look at
you.' Not but I like a bit o' breed myself, but I can't abide to see
one cur grinnin' at another. I wish you good evenin', Miss,&quot; said Bob,
abruptly taking up his pack again, under the consciousness that his
tongue was acting in an undisciplined manner.&quot;Won't you come in the evening some time, and see my brother, Bob?&quot;
said Maggie.&quot;Yes, Miss, thank you - another time. You'll give my duty to him, if
you please. Eh, he's a fine growed chap, Mr. Tom is; he took to
growin' i' the legs, an'Ididn't.&quot;The pack was down again, now, the hook of the stick having somehow
gone wrong.&quot;You don't call Mumps a cur, I suppose?&quot; said Maggie, divining that
any interest she showed in Mumps would be gratifying to his master.&quot;No, Miss, a fine way off that,&quot; said Bob, with pitying smile; &quot;Mumps
is as fine a cross as you'll see anywhere along the Floss, an' I'n
been up it wi' the barge times enow. Why, the gentry stops to look at
him; but you won't catch Mumps a-looking at the gentry much, - he minds
his own business, he does.&quot;The expression of Mump's face, which seemed to be tolerating the
superfluous existence of objects in general, was strongly confirmatory
of this high praise.&quot;He looks dreadfully surly,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;Would he let me pat him?&quot;&quot;Ay, that would he, and thank you. He knows his company, Mumps does.
He isn't a dog as 'ull be caught wi' gingerbread; he'd smell a thief a
good deal stronger nor the gingerbread, he would. Lors, I talk to him
by th' hour together, when I'm walking i' lone places, and if I'n done
a bit o' mischief, I allays tell him. I'n got no secrets but what
Mumps knows 'em. He knows about my big thumb, he does.&quot;&quot;Your big thumb - what's that, Bob?&quot; said Maggie.&quot;That's what it is, Miss,&quot; said Bob, quickly, exhibiting a singularly
broad specimen of that difference between the man and the monkey. &quot;It
tells i' measuring out the flannel, you see. I carry flannel, 'cause
it's light for my pack, an' it's dear stuff, you see, so a big thumb
tells. I clap my thumb at the end o' the yard and cut o' the hither
side of it, and the old women aren't up to't.&quot;&quot;But Bob,&quot; said Maggie, looking serious, &quot;that's cheating; I don't
like to hear you say that.&quot;&quot;Don't you, Miss?&quot; said Bob regretfully. &quot;Then I'm sorry I said it.
But I'm so used to talking to Mumps, an' he doesn't mind a bit o'
cheating, when it's them skinflint women, as haggle an' haggle, an'
'ud like to get their flannel for nothing, an' 'ud niver ask
theirselves how I got my dinner out on't. I niver cheat anybody as
doesn't want to cheat me, Miss, - lors, I'm a honest chap, I am; only I
must hev a bit o' sport, an' now I don't go wi' th' ferrets, I'n got
no varmint to come over but them haggling women. I wish you good
evening, Miss.&quot;&quot;Good-by, Bob. Thank you very much for bringing me the books. And come
again to see Tom.&quot;&quot;Yes, Miss,&quot; said Bob, moving on a few steps; then turning half round
he said, &quot;I'll leave off that trick wi' my big thumb, if you don't
think well on me for it, Miss; but it 'ud be a pity, it would. I
couldn't find another trick so good, - an' what 'ud be the use o'
havin' a big thumb? It might as well ha' been narrow.&quot;Maggie, thus exalted into Bob's exalting Madonna, laughed in spite of
herself; at which her worshipper's blue eyes twinkled too, and under
these favoring auspices he touched his cap and walked away.The days of chivalry are not gone, notwithstanding Burke's grand dirge
over them; they live still in that far-off worship paid by many a
youth and man to the woman of whom he never dreams that he shall touch
so much as her little finger or the hem of her robe. Bob, with the
pack on his back, had as respectful an adoration for this dark-eyed
maiden as if he had been a knight in armor calling aloud on her name
as he pricked on to the fight.That gleam of merriment soon died away from Maggie's face, and perhaps
only made the returning gloom deeper by contrast. She was too
dispirited even to like answering questions about Bob's present of
books, and she carried them away to her bedroom, laying them down
there and seating herself on her one stool, without caring to look at
them just yet. She leaned her cheek against the window-frame, and
thought that the light-hearted Bob had a lot much happier than hers.Maggie's sense of loneliness, and utter privation of joy, had deepened
with the brightness of advancing spring. All the favorite outdoor
nooks about home, which seemed to have done their part with her
parents in nurturing and cherishing her, were now mixed up with the
home-sadness, and gathered no smile from the sunshine. Every
affection, every delight the poor child had had, was like an aching
nerve to her. There was no music for her any more, - no piano, no
harmonized voices, no delicious stringed instruments, with their
passionate cries of imprisoned spirits sending a strange vibration
through her frame. And of all her school-life there was nothing left
her now but her little collection of school-books, which she turned
over with a sickening sense that she knew them all, and they were all
barren of comfort. Even at school she had often wished for books withmorein them; everything she learned there seemed like the ends of
long threads that snapped immediately. And now - without the indirect
charm of school-emulation - T&Atilde;&copy;l&Atilde;&copy;maque was mere bran; so were the hard,
dry questions on Christian Doctrine; there was no flavor in them, no
strength. Sometimes Maggie thought she could have been contented with
absorbing fancies; if she could have had all Scott's novels and all
Byron's poems! - then, perhaps, she might have found happiness enough
to dull her sensibility to her actual daily life. And yet they were
hardly what she wanted. She could make dream-worlds of her own, but no
dream-world would satisfy her now. She wanted some explanation of this
hard, real life, - the unhappy-looking father, seated at the dull
breakfast-table; the childish, bewildered mother; the little sordid
tasks that filled the hours, or the more oppressive emptiness of
weary, joyless leisure; the need of some tender, demonstrative love;
the cruel sense that Tom didn't mind what she thought or felt, and
that they were no longer playfellows together; the privation of all
pleasant things that had come tohermore than to others, - she
wanted some key that would enable her to understand, and in
understanding, to endure, the heavy weight that had fallen on her
young heart. If she had been taught &quot;real learning and wisdom, such as
great men knew,&quot; she thought she should have held the secrets of life;
if she had only books, that she might learn for herself what wise men
knew! Saints and martyrs had never interested Maggie so much as sages
and poets. She knew little of saints and martyrs, and had gathered, as
a general result of her teaching, that they were a temporary provision
against the spread of Catholicism, and had all died at Smithfield.In one of these meditations it occurred to her that she had forgotten
Tom's school-books, which had been sent home in his trunk. But she
found the stock unaccountably shrunk down to the few old ones which
had been well thumbed, - the Latin Dictionary and Grammar, a Delectus,
a torn Eutropius, the well-worn Virgil, Aldrich's Logic, and the
exasperating Euclid. Still, Latin, Euclid, and Logic would surely be a
considerable step in masculine wisdom, - in that knowledge which made
men contented, and even glad to live. Not that the yearning for
effectual wisdom was quite unmixed; a certain mirage would now and
then rise on the desert of the future, in which she seemed to see
herself honored for her surprising attainments. And so the poor child,
with her soul's hunger and her illusions of self-flattery, began to
nibble at this thick-rinded fruit of the tree of knowledge, filling
her vacant hours with Latin, geometry, and the forms of the syllogism,
and feeling a gleam of triumph now and then that her understanding was
quite equal to these peculiarly masculine studies. For a week or two
she went on resolutely enough, though with an occasional sinking of
heart, as if she had set out toward the Promised Land alone, and found
it a thirsty, trackless, uncertain journey. In the severity of her
early resolution, she would take Aldrich out into the fields, and then
look off her book toward the sky, where the lark was twinkling, or to
the reeds and bushes by the river, from which the waterfowl rustled
forth on its anxious, awkward flight, - with a startled sense that the
relation between Aldrich and this living world was extremely remote
for her. The discouragement deepened as the days went on, and the
eager heart gained faster and faster on the patient mind. Somehow,
when she sat at the window with her book, her eyeswouldfix
themselves blankly on the outdoor sunshine; then they would fill with
tears, and sometimes, if her mother was not in the room, the studies
would all end in sobbing. She rebelled against her lot, she fainted
under its loneliness, and fits even of anger and hatred toward her
father and mother, who were so unlike what she would have them to be;
toward Tom, who checked her, and met her thought or feeling always by
some thwarting difference, - would flow out over her affections and
conscience like a lava stream, and frighten her with a sense that it
was not difficult for her to become a demon. Then her brain would be
busy with wild romances of a flight from home in search of something
less sordid and dreary; she would go to some great man - Walter Scott,
perhaps - and tell him how wretched and how clever she was, and he
would surely do something for her. But, in the middle of her vision,
her father would perhaps enter the room for the evening, and,
surprised that she sat still without noticing him, would say
complainingly, &quot;Come, am I to fetch my slippers myself?&quot; The voice
pierced through Maggie like a sword; there was another sadness besides
her own, and she had been thinking of turning her back on it and
forsaking it.This afternoon, the sight of Bob's cheerful freckled face had given
her discontent a new direction. She thought it was part of the
hardship of her life that there was laid upon her the burthen of
larger wants than others seemed to feel, - that she had to endure this
wide, hopeless yearning for that something, whatever it was, that was
greatest and best on this earth. She wished she could have been like
Bob, with his easily satisfied ignorance, or like Tom, who had
something to do on which he could fix his mind with a steady purpose,
and disregard everything else. Poor child! as she leaned her head
against the window-frame, with her hands clasped tighter and tighter,
and her foot beating the ground, she was as lonely in her trouble as
if she had been the only gril in the civilized world of that day who
had come out of her school-life with a soul untrained for inevitable
struggles, with no other part of her inherited share in the hard-won
treasures of thought which generations of painful toil have laid up
for the race of men, than shreds and patches of feeble literature and
false history, with much futile information about Saxon and other
kings of doubtful example, but unhappily quite without that knowledge
of the irreversible laws within and without her, which, governing the
habits, becomes morality, and developing the feelings of submission
and dependence, becomes religion, - as lonely in her trouble as if
every other girl besides herself had been cherished and watched over
by elder minds, not forgetful of their own early time, when need was
keen and impulse strong.At last Maggie's eyes glanced down on the books that lay on the
window-shelf, and she half forsook her reverie to turn over listlessly
the leaves of the &quot;Portrait Gallery,&quot; but she soon pushed this aside
to examine the little row of books tied together with string.
&quot;Beauties of the Spectator,&quot; &quot;Rasselas,&quot; &quot;Economy of Human Life,&quot;
&quot;Gregory's Letters,&quot; - she knew the sort of matter that was inside all
these; the &quot;Christian Year,&quot; - that seemed to be a hymnbook, and she
laid it down again; butThomas &Atilde;&nbsp; Kempis?- the name had come across
her in her reading, and she felt the satisfaction, which every one
knows, of getting some ideas to attach to a name that strays solitary
in the memory. She took up the little, old, clumsy book with some
curiosity; it had the corners turned down in many places, and some
hand, now forever quiet, had made at certain passages strong
pen-and-ink marks, long since browned by time. Maggie turned from leaf
to leaf, and read where the quiet hand pointed: &quot;Know that the love of
thyself doth hurt thee more than anything in the world.... If thou
seekest this or that, and wouldst be here or there to enjoy thy own
will and pleasure, thou shalt never be quiet nor free from care; for
in everything somewhat will be wanting, and in every place there will
be some that will cross thee.... Both above and below, which way
soever thou dost turn thee, everywhere thou shalt find the Cross; and
everywhere of necessity thou must have patience, if thou wilt have
inward peace, and enjoy an everlasting crown.... If thou desirest to
mount unto this height, thou must set out courageously, and lay the
axe to the root, that thou mayest pluck up and destroy that hidden
inordinate inclination to thyself, and unto all private and earthly
good. On this sin, that a man inordinately loveth himself, almost all
dependeth, whatsoever is thoroughly to be overcome; which evil being
once overcome and subdued, there will presently ensue great peace and
tranquillity.... It is but little thou sufferest in comparison of them
that have suffered so much, were so strongly tempted, so grievously
afflicted, so many ways tried and exercised. Thou oughtest therefore
to call to mind the more heavy sufferings of others, that thou mayest
the easier bear thy little adversities. And if they seem not little
unto thee, beware lest thy impatience be the cause thereof.... Blessed
are those ears that receive the whispers of the divine voice, and
listen not to the whisperings of the world. Blessed are those ears
which hearken not unto the voice which soundeth outwardly, but unto
the Truth, which teacheth inwardly.&quot;A strange thrill of awe passed through Maggie while she read, as if
she had been wakened in the night by a strain of solemn music, telling
of beings whose souls had been astir while hers was in stupor. She
went on from one brown mark to another, where the quiet hand seemed to
point, hardly conscious that she was reading, seeming rather to listen
while a low voice said;&quot;Why dost thou here gaze about, since this is not the place of thy
rest? In heaven ought to be thy dwelling, and all earthly things are
to be looked on as they forward thy journey thither. All things pass
away, and thou together with them. Beware thou cleavest not unto them,
lest thou be entangled and perish.... If a man should give all his
substance, yet it is as nothing. And if he should do great penances,
yet are they but little. And if he should attain to all knowledge, he
is yet far off. And if he should be of great virtue, and very fervent
devotion, yet is there much wanting; to wit, one thing, which is most
necessary for him. What is that? That having left all, he leave
himself, and go wholly out of himself, and retain nothing of
self-love.... I have often said unto thee, and now again I say the
same, Forsake thyself, resign thyself, and thou shalt enjoy much
inward peace.... Then shall all vain imaginations, evil perturbations,
and superfluous cares fly away; then shall immoderate fear leave thee,
and inordinate love shall die.&quot;Maggie drew a long breath and pushed her heavy hair back, as if to see
a sudden vision more clearly. Here, then, was a secret of life that
would enable her to renounce all other secrets; here was a sublime
height to be reached without the help of outward things; here was
insight, and strength, and conquest, to be won by means entirely
within her own soul, where a supreme Teacher was waiting to be heard.
It flashed through her like the suddenly apprehended solution of a
problem, that all the miseries of her young life had come from fixing
her heart on her own pleasure, as if that were the central necessity
of the universe; and for the first time she saw the possibility of
shifting the position from which she looked at the gratification of
her own desires, - of taking her stand out of herself, and looking at
her own life as an insignificant part of a divinely guided whole. She
read on and on in the old book, devouring eagerly the dialogues with
the invisible Teacher, the pattern of sorrow, the source of all
strength; returning to it after she had been called away, and reading
till the sun went down behind the willows. With all the hurry of an
imagination that could never rest in the present, she sat in the
deepening twilight forming plans of self-humiliation and entire
devotedness; and in the ardor of first discovery, renunciation seemed
to her the entrance into that satisfaction which she had so long been
craving in vain. She had not perceived - how could she until she had
lived longer? - the inmost truth of the old monk's out-pourings, that
renunciation remains sorrow, though a sorrow borne willingly. Maggie
was still panting for happiness, and was in ecstasy because she had
found the key to it. She knew nothing of doctrines and systems, of
mysticism or quietism; but this voice out of the far-off middle ages
was the direct communication of a human soul's belief and experience,
and came to Maggie as an unquestioned message.I suppose that is the reason why the small old-fashioned book, for
which you need only pay sixpence at a book-stall, works miracles to
this day, turning bitter waters into sweetness; while expensive
sermons and treatises, newly issued, leave all things as they were
before. It was written down by a hand that waited for the heart's
prompting; it is the chronicle of a solitary, hidden anguish,
struggle, trust, and triumph, not written on velvet cushions to teach
endurance to those who are treading with bleeding feet on the stones.
And so it remains to all time a lasting record of human needs and
human consolations; the voice of a brother who, ages ago, felt and
suffered and renounced, - in the cloister, perhaps, with serge gown and
tonsured head, with much chanting and long fasts, and with a fashion
of speech different from ours, - but under the same silent far-off
heavens, and with the same passionate desires, the same strivings, the
same failures, the same weariness.In writing the history of unfashionable families, one is apt to fall
into a tone of emphasis which is very far from being the tone of good
society, where principles and beliefs are not only of an extremely
moderate kind, but are always presupposed, no subjects being eligible
but such as can be touched with a light and graceful irony. But then
good society has its claret and its velvet carpets, its
dinner-engagements six weeks deep, its opera and its fa&Atilde;&laquo;ry ball-rooms;
rides off itsennuion thoroughbred horses; lounges at the club; has
to keep clear of crinoline vortices; gets its science done by Faraday,
and its religion by the superior clergy who are to be met in the best
houses, - how should it have time or need for belief and emphasis? But
good society, floated on gossamer wings of light irony, is of very
expensive production; requiring nothing less than a wide and arduous
national life condensed in unfragrant deafening factories, cramping
itself in mines, sweating at furnaces, grinding, hammering, weaving
under more or less oppression of carbonic acid, or else, spread over
sheepwalks, and scattered in lonely houses and huts on the clayey or
chalky corn-lands, where the rainy days look dreary. This wide
national life is based entirely on emphasis, - the emphasis of want,
which urges it into all the activities necessary for the maintenance
of good society and light irony; it spends its heavy years often in a
chill, uncarpeted fashion, amidst family discord unsoftened by long
corridors. Under such circumstances, there are many among its myriads
of souls who have absolutely needed an emphatic belief, life in this
unpleasurable shape demanding some solution even to unspeculative
minds, - just as you inquire into the stuffing of your couch when
anything galls you there, whereas eider-down and perfect French
springs excite no question. Some have an emphatic belief in alcohol,
and seek theirekstasisor outside standing-ground in gin; but the
rest require something that good society calls &quot;enthusiasm,&quot; something
that will present motives in an entire absence of high prizes;
something that will give patience and feed human love when the limbs
ache with weariness, and human looks are hard upon us; something,
clearly, that lies outside personal desires, that includes resignation
for ourselves and active love for what is not ourselves. Now and then
that sort of enthusiasm finds a far-echoing voice that comes from an
experience springing out of the deepest need; and it was by being
brought within the long lingering vibrations of such a voice that
Maggie, with her girl's face and unnoted sorrows, found an effort and
a hope that helped her through years of loneliness, making out a faith
for herself without the aid of established authorities and appointed
guides; for they were not at hand, and her need was pressing. From
what you know of her, you will not be surprised that she threw some
exaggeration and wilfulness, some pride and impetuosity, even into her
self-renunciation; her own life was still a drama for her, in which
she demanded of herself that her part should be played with intensity.
And so it came to pass that she often lost the spirit of humility by
being excessive in the outward act; she often strove after too high a
flight, and came down with her poor little half-fledged wings dabbled
in the mud. For example, she not only determined to work at plain
sewing, that she might contribute something toward the fund in the tin
box, but she went, in the first instance, in her zeal of
self-mortification, to ask for it at a linen shop in St. Ogg's,
instead of getting it in a more quiet and indirect way; and could see
nothing but what was entirely wrong and unkind, nay, persecuting, in
Tom's reproof of her for this unnecessary act. &quot;I don't likemysister to do such things,&quot; said Tom, &quot;I'lltake care that the debts
are paid, without your lowering yourself in that way.&quot; Surely there
was some tenderness and bravery mingled with the worldliness and
self-assertion of that little speech; but Maggie held it as dross,
overlooking the grains of gold, and took Tom's rebuke as one of her
outward crosses. Tom was very hard to her, she used to think, in her
long night-watchings, - to her who had always loved him so; and then
she strove to be contented with that hardness, and to require nothing.
That is the path we all like when we set out on our abandonment of
egoism, - the path of martyrdom and endurance, where the palm-branches
grow, rather than the steep highway of tolerance, just allowance, and
self-blame, where there are no leafy honors to be gathered and worn.The old books, Virgil, Euclid, and Aldrich - that wrinkled fruit of the
tree of knowledge - had been all laid by; for Maggie had turned her
back on the vain ambition to share the thoughts of the wise. In her
first ardor she flung away the books with a sort of triumph that she
had risen above the need of them; and if they had been her own, she
would have burned them, believing that she would never repent. She
read so eagerly and constantly in her three books, the Bible, Thomas &Atilde;&nbsp;
Kempis, and the &quot;Christian Year&quot; (no longer rejected as a
&quot;hymn-book&quot;), that they filled her mind with a continual stream of
rhythmic memories; and she was too ardently learning to see all nature
and life in the light of her new faith, to need any other material for
her mind to work on, as she sat with her well-plied needle, making
shirts and other complicated stitchings, falsely called &quot;plain,&quot; - by
no means plain to Maggie, since wristband and sleeve and the like had
a capability of being sewed in wrong side outward in moments of mental
wandering.Hanging diligently over her sewing, Maggie was a sight any one might
have been pleased to look at. That new inward life of hers,
notwithstanding some volcanic upheavings of imprisoned passions, yet
shone out in her face with a tender soft light that mingled itself as
added loveliness with the gradually enriched color and outline of her
blossoming youth. Her mother felt the change in her with a sort of
puzzled wonder that Maggie should be &quot;growing up so good&quot;; it was
amazing that this once &quot;contrairy&quot; child was become so submissive, so
backward to assert her own will. Maggie used to look up from her work
and find her mother's eyes fixed upon her; they were watching and
waiting for the large young glance, as if her elder frame got some
needful warmth from it. The mother was getting fond of her tall, brown
girl, - the only bit of furniture now on which she could bestow her
anxiety and pride; and Maggie, in spite of her own ascetic wish to
have no personal adornment, was obliged to give way to her mother
about her hair, and submit to have the abundant black locks plaited
into a coronet on the summit of her head, after the pitiable fashion
of those antiquated times.&quot;Let your mother have that bit o' pleasure, my dear,&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver; &quot;I'd trouble enough with your hair once.&quot;So Maggie, glad of anything that would soothe her mother, and cheer
their long day together, consented to the vain decoration, and showed
a queenly head above her old frocks, steadily refusing, however, to
look at herself in the glass. Mrs. Tulliver liked to call the father's
attention to Maggie's hair and other unexpected virtues, but he had a
brusk reply to give.&quot;I knew well enough what she'd be, before now, - it's nothing new to
me. But it's a pity she isn't made o' commoner stuff; she'll be thrown
away, I doubt, - there'll be nobody to marry her as is fit for her.&quot;And Maggie's graces of mind and body fed his gloom. He sat patiently
enough while she read him a chapter, or said something timidly when
they were alone together about trouble being turned into a blessing.
He took it all as part of his daughter's goodness, which made his
misfortunes the sadder to him because they damaged her chance in life.
In a mind charged with an eager purpose and an unsatisfied
vindictiveness, there is no room for new feelings; Mr. Tulliver did
not want spiritual consolation - he wanted to shake off the degradation
of debt, and to have his revenge.>


&quot;He is very clever, Maggie,&quot; said Lucy. She was kneeling on a
footstool at Maggie's feet, after placing that dark lady in the large
crimson-velvet chair. &quot;I feel sure you will like him. I hope you
will.&quot;&quot;I shall be very difficult to please,&quot; said Maggie, smiling, and
holding up one of Lucy's long curls, that the sunlight might shine
through it. &quot;A gentleman who thinks he is good enough for Lucy must
expect to be sharply criticised.&quot;&quot;Indeed, he's a great deal too good for me. And sometimes, when he is
away, I almost think it can't really be that he loves me. But I can
never doubt it when he is with me, though I couldn't bear any one but
you to know that I feel in that way, Maggie.&quot;&quot;Oh, then, if I disapprove of him you can give him up, since you are
not engaged,&quot; said Maggie, with playful gravity.&quot;I would rather not be engaged. When people are engaged, they begin to
think of being married soon,&quot; said Lucy, too thoroughly preoccupied to
notice Maggie's joke; &quot;and I should like everything to go on for a
long while just as it is. Sometimes I am quite frightened lest Stephen
should say that he has spoken to papa; and from something that fell
from papa the other day, I feel sure he and Mr. Guest are expecting
that. And Stephen's sisters are very civil to me now. At first, I
think they didn't like his paying me attention; and that was natural.
Itdoesseem out of keeping that I should ever live in a great place
like the Park House, such a little insignificant thing as I am.&quot;&quot;But people are not expected to be large in proportion to the houses
they live in, like snails,&quot; said Maggie, laughing. &quot;Pray, are Mr.
Guest's sisters giantesses?&quot;&quot;Oh no; and not handsome, - that is, not very,&quot; said Lucy,
half-penitent at this uncharitable remark. &quot;Butheis - at least he
is generally considered very handsome.&quot;&quot;Though you are unable to share that opinion?&quot;&quot;Oh, I don't know,&quot; said Lucy, blushing pink over brow and neck. &quot;It
is a bad plan to raise expectation; you will perhaps be disappointed.
But I have prepared a charming surprise forhim;I shall have a
glorious laugh against him. I shall not tell you what it is, though.&quot;Lucy rose from her knees and went to a little distance, holding her
pretty head on one side, as if she had been arranging Maggie for a
portrait, and wished to judge of the general effect.&quot;Stand up a moment, Maggie.&quot;&quot;What is your pleasure now?&quot; said Maggie, smiling languidly as she
rose from her chair and looked down on her slight, aerial cousin,
whose figure was quite subordinate to her faultless drapery of silk
and crape.Lucy kept her contemplative attitude a moment or two in silence, and
then said, -&quot;I can't think what witchery it is in you, Maggie, that makes you look
best in shabby clothes; though you really must have a new dress now.
But do you know, last night I was trying to fancy you in a handsome,
fashionable dress, and do what I would, that old limp merino would
come back as the only right thing for you. I wonder if Marie
Antoinette looked all the grander when her gown was darned at the
elbows. Now, ifIwere to put anything shabby on, I should be quite
unnoticeable. I should be a mere rag.&quot;&quot;Oh, quite,&quot; said Maggie, with mock gravity. &quot;You would be liable to
be swept out of the room with the cobwebs and carpet-dust, and to find
yourself under the grate, like Cinderella. Mayn't I sit down now?&quot;&quot;Yes, now you may,&quot; said Lucy, laughing. Then, with an air of serious
reflection, unfastening her large jet brooch, &quot;But you must change
brooches, Maggie; that little butterfly looks silly on you.&quot;&quot;But won't that mar the charming effect of my consistent shabbiness?&quot;
said Maggie, seating herself submissively, while Lucy knelt again and
unfastened the contemptible butterfly. &quot;I wish my mother were of your
opinion, for she was fretting last night because this is my best
frock. I've been saving my money to pay for some lessons; I shall
never get a better situation without more accomplishments.&quot;Maggie gave a little sigh.&quot;Now, don't put on that sad look again,&quot; said Lucy, pinning the large
brooch below Maggie's fine throat. &quot;You're forgetting that you've left
that dreary schoolroom behind you, and have no little girls' clothes
to mend.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;It is with me as I used to think it would be with
the poor uneasy white bear I saw at the show. I thought he must have
got so stupid with the habit of turning backward and forward in that
narrow space that he would keep doing it if they set him free. One
gets a bad habit of being unhappy.&quot;&quot;But I shall put you under a discipline of pleasure that will make you
lose that bad habit,&quot; said Lucy, sticking the black butterfly absently
in her own collar, while her eyes met Maggie's affectionately.&quot;You dear, tiny thing,&quot; said Maggie, in one of her bursts of loving
admiration, &quot;you enjoy other people's happiness so much, I believe you
would do without any of your own. I wish I were like you.&quot;&quot;I've never been tried in that way,&quot; said Lucy. &quot;I've always been so
happy. I don't know whether I could bear much trouble; I never had any
but poor mamma's death. Youhavebeen tried, Maggie; and I'm sure
you feel for other people quite as much as I do.&quot;&quot;No, Lucy,&quot; said Maggie, shaking her head slowly, &quot;I don't enjoy their
happiness as you do, else I should be more contented. I do feel for
them when they are in trouble; I don't think I could ever bear to make
any one _un_happy; and yet I often hate myself, because I get angry
sometimes at the sight of happy people. I think I get worse as I get
older, more selfish. That seems very dreadful.&quot;&quot;Now, Maggie!&quot; said Lucy, in a tone of remonstrance, &quot;I don't believe
a word of that. It is all a gloomy fancy, just because you are
depressed by a dull, wearisome life.&quot;&quot;Well, perhaps it is,&quot; said Maggie, resolutely clearing away the
clouds from her face with a bright smile, and throwing herself
backward in her chair. &quot;Perhaps it comes from the school diet, - watery
rice-pudding spiced with Pinnock. Let us hope it will give way before
my mother's custards and this charming Geoffrey Crayon.&quot;Maggie took up the &quot;Sketch Book,&quot; which lay by her on the table.&quot;Do I look fit to be seen with this little brooch?&quot; said Lucy, going
to survey the effect in the chimney-glass.&quot;Oh no, Mr. Guest will be obliged to go out of the room again if he
sees you in it. Pray make haste and put another on.&quot;Lucy hurried out of the room, but Maggie did not take the opportunity
of opening her book; she let it fall on her knees, while her eyes
wandered to the window, where she could see the sunshine falling on
the rich clumps of spring flowers and on the long hedge of laurels,
and beyond, the silvery breadth of the dear old Floss, that at this
distance seemed to be sleeping in a morning holiday. The sweet fresh
garden-scent came through the open window, and the birds were busy
flitting and alighting, gurgling and singing. Yet Maggie's eyes began
to fill with tears. The sight of the old scenes had made the rush of
memories so painful that even yesterday she had only been able to
rejoice in her mother's restored comfort and Tom's brotherly
friendliness as we rejoice in good news of friends at a distance,
rather than in the presence of a happiness which we share. Memory and
imagination urged upon her a sense of privation too keen to let her
taste what was offered in the transient present. Her future, she
thought, was likely to be worse than her past, for after her years of
contented renunciation, she had slipped back into desire and longing;
she found joyless days of distasteful occupation harder and harder;
she found the image of the intense and varied life she yearned for,
and despaired of, becoming more and more importunate. The sound of the
opening door roused her, and hastily wiping away her tears, she began
to turn over the leaves of her book.&quot;There is one pleasure, I know, Maggie, that your deepest dismalness
will never resist,&quot; said Lucy, beginning to speak as soon as she
entered the room. &quot;That is music, and I mean you to have quite a
riotous feast of it. I mean you to get up your playing again, which
used to be so much better than mine, when we were at Laceham.&quot;&quot;You would have laughed to see me playing the little girls' tunes over
and over to them, when I took them to practise,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;just
for the sake of fingering the dear keys again. But I don't know
whether I could play anything more difficult now than 'Begone, dull
care!'&quot;&quot;I know what a wild state of joy you used to be in when the glee-men
came round,&quot; said Lucy, taking up her embroidery; &quot;and we might have
all those old glees that you used to love so, if I were certain that
you don't feel exactly as Tom does about some things.&quot;&quot;I should have thought there was nothing you might be more certain
of,&quot; said Maggie, smiling.&quot;I ought rather to have said, one particular thing. Because if you
feel just as he does about that, we shall want our third voice. St.
Ogg's is so miserably provided with musical gentlemen. There are
really only Stephen and Philip Wakem who have any knowledge of music,
so as to be able to sing a part.&quot;Lucy had looked up from her work as she uttered the last sentence, and
saw that there was a change in Maggie's face.&quot;Does it hurt you to hear the name mentioned, Maggie? If it does, I
will not speak of him again. I know Tom will not see him if he can
avoid it.&quot;&quot;I don't feel at all as Tom does on that subject,&quot; said Maggie, rising
and going to the window as if she wanted to see more of the landscape.
&quot;I've always liked Philip Wakem ever since I was a little girl, and
saw him at Lorton. He was so good when Tom hurt his foot.&quot;&quot;Oh, I'm so glad!&quot; said Lucy. &quot;Then you won't mind his coming
sometimes, and we can have much more music than we could without him.
I'm very fond of poor Philip, only I wish he were not so morbid about
his deformity. I suppose itishis deformity that makes him so sad,
and sometimes bitter. It is certainly very piteous to see his poor
little crooked body and pale face among great, strong people.&quot;&quot;But, Lucy -  - &quot; said Maggie, trying to arrest the prattling stream.&quot;Ah, there is the door-bell. That must be Stephen,&quot; Lucy went on, not
noticing Maggie's faint effort to speak. &quot;One of the things I most
admire in Stephen is that he makes a greater friend of Philip than any
one.&quot;It was too late for Maggie to speak now; the drawingroom door was
opening, and Minny was already growling in a small way at the entrance
of a tall gentleman, who went up to Lucy and took her hand with a
half-polite, half-tender glance and tone of inquiry, which seemed to
indicate that he was unconscious of any other presence.&quot;Let me introduce you to my cousin, Miss Tulliver,&quot; said Lucy, turning
with wicked enjoyment toward Maggie, who now approached from the
farther window. &quot;This is Mr. Stephen Guest.&quot;For one instant Stephen could not conceal his astonishment at the
sight of this tall, dark-eyed nymph with her jet-black coronet of
hair; the next, Maggie felt herself, for the first time in her life,
receiving the tribute of a very deep blush and a very deep bow from a
person toward whom she herself was conscious of timidity.This new experience was very agreeable to her, so agreeable that it
almost effaced her previous emotion about Philip. There was a new
brightness in her eyes, and a very becoming flush on her cheek, as she
seated herself.&quot;I hope you perceive what a striking likeness you drew the day before
yesterday,&quot; said Lucy, with a pretty laugh of triumph. She enjoyed her
lover's confusion; the advantage was usually on his side.&quot;This designing cousin of yours quite deceived me, Miss Tulliver,&quot;
said Stephen, seating himself by Lucy, and stooping to play with
Minny, only looking at Maggie furtively. &quot;She said you had light hair
and blue eyes.&quot;&quot;Nay, it was you who said so,&quot; remonstrated Lucy. &quot;I only refrained
from destroying your confidence in your own second-sight.&quot;&quot;I wish I could always err in the same way,&quot; said Stephen, &quot;and find
reality so much more beautiful than my preconceptions.&quot;&quot;Now you have proved yourself equal to the occasion,&quot; said Maggie,
&quot;and said what it was incumbent on you to say under the
circumstances.&quot;She flashed a slightly defiant look at him; it was clear to her that
he had been drawing a satirical portrait of her beforehand. Lucy had
said he was inclined to be satirical, and Maggie had mentally supplied
the addition, &quot;and rather conceited.&quot;&quot;An alarming amount of devil there,&quot; was Stephen's first thought. The
second, when she had bent over her work, was, &quot;I wish she would look
at me again.&quot; The next was to answer, -&quot;I suppose all phrases of mere compliment have their turn to be true.
A man is occasionally grateful when he says 'Thank you.' It's rather
hard upon him that he must use the same words with which all the world
declines a disagreeable invitation, don't you think so, Miss
Tulliver?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Maggie, looking at him with her direct glance; &quot;if we use
common words on a great occasion, they are the more striking, because
they are felt at once to have a particular meaning, like old banners,
or every-day clothes, hung up in a sacred place.&quot;&quot;Then my compliment ought to be eloquent,&quot; said Stephen, really not
quite knowing what he said while Maggie looked at him, &quot;seeing that
the words were so far beneath the occasion.&quot;&quot;No compliment can be eloquent, except as an expression of
indifference,&quot; said Maggie, flushing a little.Lucy was rather alarmed; she thought Stephen and Maggie were not going
to like each other. She had always feared lest Maggie should appear
too old and clever to please that critical gentleman. &quot;Why, dear
Maggie,&quot; she interposed, &quot;you have always pretended that you are too
fond of being admired; and now, I think, you are angry because some
one ventures to admire you.&quot;&quot;Not at all,&quot; said Maggie; &quot;I like too well to feel that I am admired,
but compliments never make me feel that.&quot;&quot;I will never pay you a compliment again, Miss Tulliver,&quot; said
Stephen.&quot;Thank you; that will be a proof of respect.&quot;Poor Maggie! She was so unused to society that she could take nothing
as a matter of course, and had never in her life spoken from the lips
merely, so that she must necessarily appear absurd to more experienced
ladies, from the excessive feeling she was apt to throw into very
trivial incidents. But she was even conscious herself of a little
absurdity in this instance. It was true she had a theoretic objection
to compliments, and had once said impatiently to Philip that she
didn't see why women were to be told with a simper that they were
beautiful, any more than old men were to be told that they were
venerable; still, to be so irritated by a common practice in the case
of a stranger like Mr. Stephen Guest, and to care about his having
spoken slightingly of her before he had seen her, was certainly
unreasonable, and as soon as she was silent she began to be ashamed of
herself. It did not occur to her that her irritation was due to the
pleasanter emotion which preceded it, just as when we are satisfied
with a sense of glowing warmth an innocent drop of cold water may fall
upon us as a sudden smart.Stephen was too well bred not to seem unaware that the previous
conversation could have been felt embarrassing, and at once began to
talk of impersonal matters, asking Lucy if she knew when the bazaar
was at length to take place, so that there might be some hope of
seeing her rain the influence of her eyes on objects more grateful
than those worsted flowers that were growing under her fingers.&quot;Some day next month, I believe,&quot; said Lucy. &quot;But your sisters are
doing more for it than I am; they are to have the largest stall.&quot;&quot;Ah yes; but they carry on their manufactures in their own
sitting-room, where I don't intrude on them. I see you are not
addicted to the fashionable vice of fancy-work, Miss Tulliver,&quot; said
Stephen, looking at Maggie's plain hemming.&quot;No,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;I can do nothing more difficult or more elegant
than shirt-making.&quot;&quot;And your plain sewing is so beautiful, Maggie,&quot; said Lucy, &quot;that I
think I shall beg a few specimens of you to show as fancy-work. Your
exquisite sewing is quite a mystery to me, you used to dislike that
sort of work so much in old days.&quot;&quot;It is a mystery easily explained, dear,&quot; said Maggie, looking up
quietly. &quot;Plain sewing was the only thing I could get money by, so I
was obliged to try and do it well.&quot;Lucy, good and simple as she was, could not help blushing a little.
She did not quite like that Stephen should know that; Maggie need not
have mentioned it. Perhaps there was some pride in the confession, - 
the pride of poverty that will not be ashamed of itself. But if Maggie
had been the queen of coquettes she could hardly have invented a means
of giving greater piquancy to her beauty in Stephen's eyes; I am not
sure that the quiet admission of plain sewing and poverty would have
done alone, but assisted by the beauty, they made Maggie more unlike
other women even than she had seemed at first.&quot;But I can knit, Lucy,&quot; Maggie went on, &quot;if that will be of any use
for your bazaar.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, of infinite use. I shall set you to work with scarlet wool
to-morrow. But your sister is the most enviable person,&quot; continued
Lucy, turning to Stephen, &quot;to have the talent of modelling. She is
doing a wonderful bust of Dr. Kenn entirely from memory.&quot;&quot;Why, if she can remember to put the eyes very near together, and the
corners of the mouth very far apart, the likeness can hardly fail to
be striking in St. Ogg's.&quot;&quot;Now that is very wicked of you,&quot; said Lucy, looking rather hurt. &quot;I
didn't think you would speak disrespectfully of Dr. Kenn.&quot;&quot;I say anything disrespectful of Dr. Kenn? Heaven forbid! But I am not
bound to respect a libellous bust of him. I think Kenn one of the
finest fellows in the world. I don't care much about the tall
candlesticks he has put on the communion-table, and I shouldn't like
to spoil my temper by getting up to early prayers every morning. But
he's the only man I ever knew personally who seems to me to have
anything of the real apostle in him, - a man who has eight hundred
a-year and is contented with deal furniture and boiled beef because he
gives away two-thirds of his income. That was a very fine thing of
him, - taking into his house that poor lad Grattan, who shot his mother
by accident. He sacrifices more time than a less busy man could spare,
to save the poor fellow from getting into a morbid state of mind about
it. He takes the lad out with him constantly, I see.&quot;&quot;That is beautiful,&quot; said Maggie, who had let her work fall, and was
listening with keen interest. &quot;I never knew any one who did such things.&quot;&quot;And one admires that sort of action in Kenn all the more,&quot; said
Stephen, &quot;because his manners in general are rather cold and severe.
There's nothing sugary and maudlin about him.&quot;&quot;Oh, I think he's a perfect character!&quot; said Lucy, with pretty
enthusiasm.&quot;No; there I can't agree with you,&quot; said Stephen, shaking his head
with sarcastic gravity.&quot;Now, what fault can you point out in him?&quot;&quot;He's an Anglican.&quot;&quot;Well, those are the right views, I think,&quot; said Lucy, gravely.&quot;That settles the question in the abstract,&quot; said Stephen, &quot;but not
from a parliamentary point of view. He has set the Dissenters and the
Church people by the ears; and a rising senator like myself, of whose
services the country is very much in need, will find it inconvenient
when he puts up for the honor of representing St. Ogg's in
Parliament.&quot;&quot;Do you really think of that?&quot; said Lucy, her eyes brightening with a
proud pleasure that made her neglect the argumentative interests of
Anglicanism.&quot;Decidedly, whenever old Mr. Leyburn's public spirit and gout induce
him to give way. My father's heart is set on it; and gifts like mine,
you know&quot; - here Stephen drew himself up, and rubbed his large white
hands over his hair with playful self-admiration - &quot;gifts like mine
involve great responsibilities. Don't you think so, Miss Tulliver?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Maggie, smiling, but not looking up; &quot;so much fluency and
self-possession should not be wasted entirely on private occasions.&quot;&quot;Ah, I see how much penetration you have,&quot; said Stephen. &quot;You have
discovered already that I am talkative and impudent. Now superficial
people never discern that, owing to my manner, I suppose.&quot;&quot;She doesn't look at me when I talk of myself,&quot; he thought, while his
listeners were laughing. &quot;I must try other subjects.&quot;Did Lucy intend to be present at the meeting of the Book Club next
week? was the next question. Then followed the recommendation to
choose Southey's &quot;Life of Cowper,&quot; unless she were inclined to be
philosophical, and startle the ladies of St. Ogg's by voting for one
of the Bridgewater Treatises. Of course Lucy wished to know what these
alarmingly learned books were; and as it is always pleasant to improve
the minds of ladies by talking to them at ease on subjects of which
they know nothing, Stephen became quite brilliant in an account of
Buckland's Treatise, which he had just been reading. He was rewarded
by seeing Maggie let her work fall, and gradually get so absorbed in
his wonderful geological story that she sat looking at him, leaning
forward with crossed arms, and with an entire absence of
self-consciousness, as if he had been the snuffiest of old professors,
and she a downy-lipped alumna. He was so fascinated by the clear,
large gaze that at last he forgot to look away from it occasionally
toward Lucy; but she, sweet child, was only rejoicing that Stephen was
proving to Maggie how clever he was, and that they would certainly be
good friends after all.&quot;I will bring you the book, shall I, Miss Tulliver?&quot; said Stephen,
when he found the stream of his recollections running rather shallow.
&quot;There are many illustrations in it that you will like to see.&quot;&quot;Oh, thank you,&quot; said Maggie, blushing with returning
self-consciousness at this direct address, and taking up her work
again.&quot;No, no,&quot; Lucy interposed. &quot;I must forbid your plunging Maggie in
books. I shall never get her away from them; and I want her to have
delicious do-nothing days, filled with boating and chatting and riding
and driving; that is the holiday she needs.&quot;&quot;Apropos!&quot; said Stephen, looking at his watch. &quot;Shall we go out for a
row on the river now? The tide will suit for us to the Tofton way, and
we can walk back.&quot;That was a delightful proposition to Maggie, for it was years since
she had been on the river. When she was gone to put on her bonnet,
Lucy lingered to give an order to the servant, and took the
opportunity of telling Stephen that Maggie had no objection to seeing
Philip, so that it was a pity she had sent that note the day before
yesterday. But she would write another to-morrow and invite him.&quot;I'll call and beat him up to-morrow,&quot; said Stephen, &quot;and bring him
with me in the evening, shall I? My sisters will want to call on you
when I tell them your cousin is with you. I must leave the field clear
for them in the morning.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, pray bring him,&quot; said Lucy. &quot;And youwilllike Maggie,
sha'n't you?&quot; she added, in a beseeching tone. &quot;Isn't she a dear,
noble-looking creature?&quot;&quot;Too tall,&quot; said Stephen, smiling down upon her, &quot;and a little too
fiery. She is not my type of woman, you know.&quot;Gentlemen, you are aware, are apt to impart these imprudent
confidences to ladies concerning their unfavorable opinion of sister
fair ones. That is why so many women have the advantage of knowing
that they are secretly repulsive to men who have self-denyingly made
ardent love to them. And hardly anything could be more distinctively
characteristic of Lucy than that she both implicitly believed what
Stephen said, and was determined that Maggie should not know it. But
you, who have a higher logic than the verbal to guide you, have
already foreseen, as the direct sequence to that unfavorable opinion
of Stephen's, that he walked down to the boathouse calculating, by the
aid of a vivid imagination, that Maggie must give him her hand at
least twice in consequence of this pleasant boating plan, and that a
gentleman who wishes ladies to look at him is advantageously situated
when he is rowing them in a boat. What then? Had he fallen in love
with this surprising daughter of Mrs. Tulliver at first sight?
Certainly not. Such passions are never heard of in real life. Besides,
he was in love already, and half-engaged to the dearest little
creature in the world; and he was not a man to make a fool of himself
in any way. But when one is five-and-twenty, one has not chalk-stones
at one's finger-ends that the touch of a handsome girl should be
entirely indifferent. It was perfectly natural and safe to admire
beauty and enjoy looking at it, - at least under such circumstances as
the present. And there was really something very interesting about
this girl, with her poverty and troubles; it was gratifying to see the
friendship between the two cousins. Generally, Stephen admitted, he
was not fond of women who had any peculiarity of character, but here
the peculiarity seemed really of a superior kind, and provided one is
not obliged to marry such women, why, they certainly make a variety in
social intercourse.Maggie did not fulfil Stephen's hope by looking at him during the
first quarter of an hour; her eyes were too full of the old banks that
she knew so well. She felt lonely, cut off from Philip, - the only
person who had ever seemed to love her devotedly, as she had always
longed to be loved. But presently the rhythmic movement of the oars
attracted her, and she thought she should like to learn how to row.
This roused her from her reverie, and she asked if she might take an
oar. It appeared that she required much teaching, and she became
ambitious. The exercise brought the warm blood into her cheeks, and
made her inclined to take her lesson merrily.&quot;I shall not be satisfied until I can manage both oars, and row you
and Lucy,&quot; she said, looking very bright as she stepped out of the
boat. Maggie, we know, was apt to forget the thing she was doing, and
she had chosen an inopportune moment for her remark; her foot slipped,
but happily Mr. Stephen Guest held her hand, and kept her up with a
firm grasp.&quot;You have not hurt yourself at all, I hope?&quot; he said, bending to look
in her face with anxiety. It was very charming to be taken care of in
that kind, graceful manner by some one taller and stronger than one's
self. Maggie had never felt just in the same way before.When they reached home again, they found uncle and aunt Pullet seated
with Mrs. Tulliver in the drawing-room, and Stephen hurried away,
asking leave to come again in the evening.&quot;And pray bring with you the volume of Purcell that you took away,&quot;
said Lucy. &quot;I want Maggie to hear your best songs.&quot;Aunt Pullet, under the certainty that Maggie would be invited to go
out with Lucy, probably to Park House, was much shocked at the
shabbiness of her clothes, which when witnessed by the higher society
of St. Ogg's, would be a discredit to the family, that demanded a
strong and prompt remedy; and the consultation as to what would be
most suitable to this end from among the superfluities of Mrs.
Pullet's wardrobe was one that Lucy as well as Mrs. Tulliver entered
into with some zeal. Maggie must really have an evening dress as soon
as possible, and she was about the same height as aunt Pullet.&quot;But she's so much broader across the shoulders than I am, it's very
ill-convenient,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, &quot;else she might wear that beautiful
black brocade o' mine without any alteration; and her arms are beyond
everything,&quot; added Mrs. Pullet, sorrowfully, as she lifted Maggie's
large round arm, &quot;She'd never get my sleeves on.&quot;&quot;Oh, never mind that, aunt; send us the dress,&quot; said Lucy. &quot;I don't
mean Maggie to have long sleeves, and I have abundance of black lace
for trimming. Her arms will look beautiful.&quot;&quot;Maggie's armsarea pretty shape,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver. &quot;They're
like mine used to be, only mine was never brown; I wish she'd hadourfamily skin.&quot;&quot;Nonsense, aunty!&quot; said Lucy, patting her aunt Tulliver's shoulder,
&quot;you don't understand those things. A painter would think Maggie's
complexion beautiful.&quot;&quot;Maybe, my dear,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, submissively. &quot;You know better
than I do. Only when I was young a brown skin wasn't thought well on
among respectable folks.&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said uncle Pullet, who took intense interest in the ladies'
conversation as he sucked his lozenges. &quot;Though there was a song about
the 'Nut-brown Maid' too; I think she was crazy, - crazy Kate, - but I
can't justly remember.&quot;&quot;Oh dear, dear!&quot; said Maggie, laughing, but impatient; &quot;I think that
will be the end ofmybrown skin, if it is always to be talked about
so much.&quot;>


When Maggie was gone to sleep, Stephen, weary too with his
unaccustomed amount of rowing, and with the intense inward life of the
last twelve hours, but too restless to sleep, walked and lounged about
the deck with his cigar far on into midnight, not seeing the dark
water, hardly conscious there were stars, living only in the near and
distant future. At last fatigue conquered restlessness, and he rolled
himself up in a piece of tarpaulin on the deck near Maggie's feet.She had fallen asleep before nine, and had been sleeping for six hours
before the faintest hint of a midsummer daybreak was discernible. She
awoke from that vivid dreaming which makes the margin of our deeper
rest. She was in a boat on the wide water with Stephen, and in the
gathering darkness something like a star appeared, that grew and grew
till they saw it was the Virgin seated in St. Ogg's boat, and it came
nearer and nearer, till they saw the Virgin was Lucy and the boatman
was Philip, - no, not Philip, but her brother, who rowed past without
looking at her; and she rose to stretch out her arms and call to him,
and their own boat turned over with the movement, and they began to
sink, till with one spasm of dread she seemed to awake, and find she
was a child again in the parlor at evening twilight, and Tom was not
really angry. From the soothed sense of that false waking she passed
to the real waking, - to the plash of water against the vessel, and the
sound of a footstep on the deck, and the awful starlit sky. There was
a moment of utter bewilderment before her mind could get disentangled
from the confused web of dreams; but soon the whole terrible truth
urged itself upon her. Stephen was not by her now; she was alone with
her own memory and her own dread. The irrevocable wrong that must blot
her life had been committed; she had brought sorrow into the lives of
others, - into the lives that were knit up with hers by trust and love.
The feeling of a few short weeks had hurried her into the sins her
nature had most recoiled from, - breach of faith and cruel selfishness;
she had rent the ties that had given meaning to duty, and had made
herself an outlawed soul, with no guide but the wayward choice of her
own passion. And where would that lead her? Where had it led her now?
She had said she would rather die than fall into that temptation. She
felt it now, - now that the consequences of such a fall had come before
the outward act was completed. There was at least this fruit from all
her years of striving after the highest and best, - that her soul
though betrayed, beguiled, ensnared, could never deliberately consent
to a choice of the lower. And a choice of what? O God! not a choice of
joy, but of conscious cruelty and hardness; for could she ever cease
to see before her Lucy and Philip, with their murdered trust and
hopes? Her life with Stephen could have no sacredness; she must
forever sink and wander vaguely, driven by uncertain impulse; for she
had let go the clue of life, - that clue which once in the far-off
years her young need had clutched so strongly. She had renounced all
delights then, before she knew them, before they had come within her
reach. Philip had been right when he told her that she knew nothing of
renunciation; she had thought it was quiet ecstasy; she saw it face to
face now, - that sad, patient, loving strength which holds the clue of
life, - and saw that the thorns were forever pressing on its brow. The
yesterday, which could never be revoked, - if she could have changed it
now for any length of inward silent endurance, she would have bowed
beneath that cross with a sense of rest.Day break came and the reddening eastern light, while her past life
was grasping her in this way, with that tightening clutch which comes
in the last moments of possible rescue. She could see Stephen now
lying on the deck still fast asleep, and with the sight of him there
came a wave of anguish that found its way in a long-suppressed sob.
The worst bitterness of parting - the thought that urged the sharpest
inward cry for help - was the pain it must give tohim. But
surmounting everything was the horror at her own possible failure, the
dread lest her conscience should be benumbed again, and not rise to
energy till it was too late. Too late! it was too late already not to
have caused misery; too late for everything, perhaps, but to rush away
from the last act of baseness, - the tasting of joys that were wrung
from crushed hearts.The sun was rising now, and Maggie started up with the sense that a
day of resistance was beginning for her. Her eyelashes were still wet
with tears, as, with her shawl over her head, she sat looking at the
slowly rounding sun. Something roused Stephen too, and getting up from
his hard bed, he came to sit beside her. The sharp instinct of anxious
love saw something to give him alarm in the very first glance. He had
a hovering dread of some resistance in Maggie's nature that he would
be unable to overcome. He had the uneasy consciousness that he had
robbed her of perfect freedom yesterday; there was too much native
honor in him, for him not to feel that, if her will should recoil, his
conduct would have been odious, and she would have a right to reproach
him.But Maggie did not feel that right; she was too conscious of fatal
weakness in herself, too full of the tenderness that comes with the
foreseen need for inflicting a wound. She let him take her hand when
he came to sit down beside her, and smiled at him, only with rather a
sad glance; she could say nothing to pain him till the moment of
possible parting was nearer. And so they drank their cup of coffee
together, and walked about the deck, and heard the captain's assurance
that they should be in at Mudport by five o'clock, each with an inward
burthen; but in him it was an undefined fear, which he trusted to the
coming hours to dissipate; in her it was a definite resolve on which
she was trying silently to tighten her hold. Stephen was continually,
through the morning, expressing his anxiety at the fatigue and
discomfort she was suffering, and alluded to landing and to the change
of motion and repose she would have in a carriage, wanting to assure
himself more completely by presupposing that everything would be as he
had arranged it. For a long while Maggie contented herself with
assuring him that she had had a good night's rest, and that she didn't
mind about being on the vessel, - it was not like being on the open
sea, it was only a little less pleasant than being in a boat on the
Floss. But a suppressed resolve will betray itself in the eyes, and
Stephen became more and more uneasy as the day advanced, under the
sense that Maggie had entirely lost her passiveness. He longed, but
did not dare, to speak of their marriage, of where they would go after
it, and the steps he would take to inform his father, and the rest, of
what had happened. He longed to assure himself of a tacit assent from
her. But each time he looked at her, he gathered a stronger dread of
the new, quiet sadness with which she met his eyes. And they were more
and more silent.&quot;Here we are in sight of Mudport,&quot; he said at last. &quot;Now, dearest,&quot; he
added, turning toward her with a look that was half beseeching, &quot;the
worst part of your fatigue is over. On the land we can command
swiftness. In another hour and a half we shall be in a chaise
together, and that will seem rest to you after this.&quot;Maggie felt it was time to speak; it would only be unkind now to
assent by silence. She spoke in the lowest tone, as he had done, but
with distinct decision.&quot;We shall not be together; we shall have parted.&quot;The blood rushed to Stephen's face.&quot;We shall not,&quot; he said. &quot;I'll die first.&quot;It was as he had dreaded - there was a struggle coming. But neither of
them dared to say another word till the boat was let down, and they
were taken to the landing-place. Here there was a cluster of gazers
and passengers awaiting the departure of the steamboat to St. Ogg's.
Maggie had a dim sense, when she had landed, and Stephen was hurrying
her along on his arm, that some one had advanced toward her from that
cluster as if he were coming to speak to her. But she was hurried
along, and was indifferent to everything but the coming trial.A porter guided them to the nearest inn and posting-house, and Stephen
gave the order for the chaise as they passed through the yard. Maggie
took no notice of this, and only said, &quot;Ask them to show us into a
room where we can sit down.&quot;When they entered, Maggie did not sit down, and Stephen, whose face
had a desperate determination in it, was about to ring the bell, when
she said, in a firm voice, -&quot;I'm not going; we must part here.&quot;&quot;Maggie,&quot; he said, turning round toward her, and speaking in the tones
of a man who feels a process of torture beginning, &quot;do you mean to
kill me? What is the use of it now? The whole thing is done.&quot;&quot;No, it is not done,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;Too much is done, - more than we
can ever remove the trace of. But I will go no farther. Don't try to
prevail with me again. I couldn't choose yesterday.&quot;What was he to do? He dared not go near her; her anger might leap out,
and make a new barrier. He walked backward and forward in maddening
perplexity.&quot;Maggie,&quot; he said at last, pausing before her, and speaking in a tone
of imploring wretchedness, &quot;have some pity - hear me - forgive me for
what I did yesterday. I will obey you now; I will do nothing without
your full consent. But don't blight our lives forever by a rash
perversity that can answer no good purpose to any one, that can only
create new evils. Sit down, dearest; wait - think what you are going to
do. Don't treat me as if you couldn't trust me.&quot;He had chosen the most effective appeal; but Maggie's will was fixed
unswervingly on the coming wrench. She had made up her mind to suffer.&quot;We must not wait,&quot; she said, in a low but distinct voice; &quot;we must
part at once.&quot;&quot;Wecan'tpart, Maggie,&quot; said Stephen, more impetuously. &quot;I can't
bear it. What is the use of inflicting that misery on me? The
blow - whatever it may have been - has been struck now. Will it help any
one else that you should drive me mad?&quot;&quot;I will not begin any future, even for you,&quot; said Maggie, tremulously,
&quot;with a deliberate consent to what ought not to have been. What I told
you at Basset I feel now; I would rather have died than fall into this
temptation. It would have been better if we had parted forever then.
But we must part now.&quot;&quot;We willnotpart,&quot; Stephen burst out, instinctively placing his
back against the door, forgetting everything he had said a few moments
before; &quot;I will not endure it. You'll make me desperate; I sha'n't
know what I do.&quot;Maggie trembled. She felt that the parting could not be effected
suddenly. She must rely on a slower appeal to Stephen's better self;
she must be prepared for a harder task than that of rushing away while
resolution was fresh. She sat down. Stephen, watching her with that
look of desperation which had come over him like a lurid light,
approached slowly from the door, seated himself close beside her, and
grasped her hand. Her heart beat like the heart of a frightened bird;
but this direct opposition helped her. She felt her determination
growing stronger.&quot;Remember what you felt weeks ago,&quot; she began, with beseeching
earnestness; &quot;remember what we both felt, - that we owed ourselves to
others, and must conquer every inclination which could make us false
to that debt. We have failed to keep our resolutions; but the wrong
remains the same.&quot;&quot;No, it doesnotremain the same,&quot; said Stephen. &quot;We have proved
that it was impossible to keep our resolutions. We have proved that
the feeling which draws us toward each other is too strong to be
overcome. That natural law surmounts every other; we can't help what
it clashes with.&quot;&quot;It is not so, Stephen; I'm quite sure that is wrong. I have tried to
think it again and again; but I see, if we judged in that way, there
would be a warrant for all treachery and cruelty; we should justify
breaking the most sacred ties that can ever be formed on earth. If the
past is not to bind us, where can duty lie? We should have no law but
the inclination of the moment.&quot;&quot;But there are ties that can't be kept by mere resolution,&quot; said
Stephen, starting up and walking about again. &quot;What is outward
faithfulness? Would they have thanked us for anything so hollow as
constancy without love?&quot;Maggie did not answer immediately. She was undergoing an inward as
well as an outward contest. At last she said, with a passionate
assertion of her conviction, as much against herself as against him, -&quot;That seems right - at first; but when I look further, I'm sure it isnotright. Faithfulness and constancy mean something else besides
doing what is easiest and pleasantest to ourselves. They mean
renouncing whatever is opposed to the reliance others have in
us, - whatever would cause misery to those whom the course of our lives
has made dependent on us. If we - if I had been better, nobler, those
claims would have been so strongly present with me, - I should have
felt them pressing on my heart so continually, just as they do now in
the moments when my conscience is awake, - that the opposite feeling
would never have grown in me, as it has done; it would have been
quenched at once, I should have prayed for help so earnestly, I should
have rushed away as we rush from hideous danger. I feel no excuse for
myself, none. I should never have failed toward Lucy and Philip as I
have done, if I had not been weak, selfish, and hard, - able to think
of their pain without a pain to myself that would have destroyed all
temptation. Oh, what is Lucy feeling now? She believed in me - she
loved me - she was so good to me. Think of her -  - &quot;Maggie's voice was getting choked as she uttered these last words.&quot;Ican'tthink of her,&quot; said Stephen, stamping as if with pain. &quot;I
can think of nothing but you, Maggie. You demand of a man what is
impossible. I felt that once; but I can't go back to it now. And where
is the use ofyourthinking of it, except to torture me? You can't
save them from pain now; you can only tear yourself from me, and make
my life worthless to me. And even if we could go back, and both fulfil
our engagements, - if that were possible now, - it would be hateful,
horrible, to think of your ever being Philip's wife, - of your ever
being the wife of a man you didn't love. We have both been rescued
from a mistake.&quot;A deep flush came over Maggie's face, and she couldn't speak. Stephen
saw this. He sat down again, taking her hand in his, and looking at
her with passionate entreaty.&quot;Maggie! Dearest! If you love me, you are mine. Who can have so great
a claim on you as I have? My life is bound up in your love. There is
nothing in the past that can annul our right to each other; it is the
first time we have either of us loved with our whole heart and soul.&quot;Maggie was still silent for a little while, looking down. Stephen was
in a flutter of new hope; he was going to triumph. But she raised her
eyes and met his with a glance that was filled with the anguish of
regret, not with yielding.&quot;No, not with my whole heart and soul, Stephen,&quot; she said with timid
resolution. &quot;I have never consented to it with my whole mind. There
are memories, and affections, and longings after perfect goodness,
that have such a strong hold on me; they would never quit me for long;
they would come back and be pain to me - repentance. I couldn't live in
peace if I put the shadow of a wilful sin between myself and God. I
have caused sorrow already - I know - I feel it; but I have never
deliberately consented to it; I have never said, 'They shall suffer,
that I may have joy.' It has never been my will to marry you; if you
were to win consent from the momentary triumph of my feeling for you,
you would not have my whole soul. If I could wake back again into the
time before yesterday, I would choose to be true to my calmer
affections, and live without the joy of love.&quot;Stephen loosed her hand, and rising impatiently, walked up and down
the room in suppressed rage.&quot;Good God!&quot; he burst out at last, &quot;what a miserable thing a woman's
love is to a man's! I could commit crimes for you, - and you can
balance and choose in that way. But youdon'tlove me; if you had a
tithe of the feeling for me that I have for you, it would be
impossible to you to think for a moment of sacrificing me. But it
weighs nothing with you that you are robbing me ofmylife's
happiness.&quot;Maggie pressed her fingers together almost convulsively as she held
them clasped on her lap. A great terror was upon her, as if she were
ever and anon seeing where she stood by great flashes of lightning,
and then again stretched forth her hands in the darkness.&quot;No, I don't sacrifice you - I couldn't sacrifice you,&quot; she said, as
soon as she could speak again; &quot;but I can't believe in a good for you,
that I feel, that we both feel, is a wrong toward others. We can't
choose happiness either for ourselves or for another; we can't tell
where that will lie. We can only choose whether we will indulge
ourselves in the present moment, or whether we will renounce that, for
the sake of obeying the divine voice within us, - for the sake of being
true to all the motives that sanctify our lives. I know this belief is
hard; it has slipped away from me again and again; but I have felt
that if I let it go forever, I should have no light through the
darkness of this life.&quot;&quot;But, Maggie,&quot; said Stephen, seating himself by her again, &quot;is it
possible you don't see that what happened yesterday has altered the
whole position of things? What infatuation is it, what obstinate
prepossession, that blinds you to that? It is too late to say what we
might have done or what we ought to have done. Admitting the very
worst view of what has been done, it is a fact we must act on now; our
position is altered; the right course is no longer what it was before.
We must accept our own actions and start afresh from them. Suppose we
had been married yesterday? It is nearly the same thing. The effect on
others would not have been different. It would only have made this
difference to ourselves,&quot; Stephen added bitterly, &quot;that you might have
acknowledged then that your tie to me was stronger than to others.&quot;Again a deep flush came over Maggie's face, and she was silent.
Stephen thought again that he was beginning to prevail, - he had never
yet believed that he shouldnotprevail; there are possibilities
which our minds shrink from too completely for us to fear them.&quot;Dearest,&quot; he said, in his deepest, tenderest tone, leaning toward
her, and putting his arm round her, &quot;youaremine now, - the world
believes it; duty must spring out of that now.&quot;In a few hours you will be legally mine, and those who had claims on
us will submit, - they will see that there was a force which declared
against their claims.&quot;Maggie's eyes opened wide in one terrified look at the face that was
close to hers, and she started up, pale again.&quot;Oh, I can't do it,&quot; she said, in a voice almost of agony; &quot;Stephen,
don't ask me - don't urge me. I can't argue any longer, - I don't know
what is wise; but my heart will not let me do it. I see, - I feel their
trouble now; it is as if it were branded on my mind.Ihave
suffered, and had no one to pity me; and now I have made others
suffer. It would never leave me; it would embitter your love to me. Idocare for Philip - in a different way; I remember all we said to
each other; I know how he thought of me as the one promise of his
life. He was given to me that I might make his lot less hard; and I
have forsaken him. And Lucy - she has been deceived; she who trusted me
more than any one. I cannot marry you; I cannot take a good for myself
that has been wrung out of their misery. It is not the force that
ought to rule us, - this that we feel for each other; it would rend me
away from all that my past life has made dear and holy to me. I can't
set out on a fresh life, and forget that; I must go back to it, and
cling to it, else I shall feel as if there were nothing firm beneath
my feet.&quot;&quot;Good God, Maggie!&quot; said Stephen, rising too and grasping her arm,
&quot;you rave. How can you go back without marrying me? You don't know
what will be said, dearest. You see nothing as it really is.&quot;&quot;Yes, I do. But they will believe me. I will confess everything. Lucy
will believe me - she will forgive you, and - and - oh,somegood will
come by clinging to the right. Dear, dear Stephen, let me go! - don't
drag me into deeper remorse. My whole soul has never consented; it
does not consent now.&quot;Stephen let go her arm, and sank back on his chair, half-stunned by
despairing rage. He was silent a few moments, not looking at her;
while her eyes were turned toward him yearningly, in alarm at this
sudden change. At last he said, still without looking at her, -&quot;Go, then, - leave me; don't torture me any longer, - I can't bear it.&quot;Involuntarily she leaned toward him and put out her hand to touch his.
But he shrank from it as if it had been burning iron, and said
again, -&quot;Leave me.&quot;Maggie was not conscious of a decision as she turned away from that
gloomy averted face, and walked out of the room; it was like an
automatic action that fulfils a forgotten intention. What came after?
A sense of stairs descended as if in a dream, of flagstones, of a
chaise and horses standing, then a street, and a turning into another
street where a stage-coach was standing, taking in passengers, and the
darting thought that that coach would take her away, perhaps toward
home. But she could ask nothing yet; she only got into the coach.Home - where her mother and brother were, Philip, Lucy, the scene of
her very cares and trials - was the haven toward which her mind tended;
the sanctuary where sacred relics lay, where she would be rescued from
more falling. The thought of Stephen was like a horrible throbbing
pain, which yet, as such pains do, seemed to urge all other thoughts
into activity. But among her thoughts, what others would say and think
of her conduct was hardly present. Love and deep pity and remorseful
anguish left no room for that.The coach was taking her to York, farther away from home; but she did
not learn that until she was set down in the old city at midnight. It
was no matter; she could sleep there, and start home the next day. She
had her purse in her pocket, with all her money in it, - a bank-note
and a sovereign; she had kept it in her pocket from forgetfulness,
after going out to make purchases the day before yesterday.Did she lie down in the gloomy bedroom of the old inn that night with
her will bent unwaveringly on the path of penitent sacrifice? The
great struggles of life are not so easy as that; the great problems of
life are not so clear. In the darkness of that night she saw Stephen's
face turned toward her in passionate, reproachful misery; she lived
through again all the tremulous delights of his presence with her that
made existence an easy floating in a stream of joy, instead of a quiet
resolved endurance and effort. The love she had renounced came back
upon her with a cruel charm; she felt herself opening her arms to
receive it once more; and then it seemed to slip away and fade and
vanish, leaving only the dying sound of a deep, thrilling voice that
said, &quot;Gone, forever gone.&quot;>


The next morning was very wet, - the sort of morning on which male
neighbors who have no imperative occupation at home are likely to pay
their fair friends an illimitable visit. The rain, which has been
endurable enough for the walk or ride one way, is sure to become so
heavy, and at the same time so certain to clear up by and by, that
nothing but an open quarrel can abbreviate the visit; latent
detestation will not do at all. And if people happen to be lovers,
what can be so delightful, in England, as a rainy morning? English
sunshine is dubious; bonnets are never quite secure; and if you sit
down on the grass, it may lead to catarrhs. But the rain is to be
depended on. You gallop through it in a mackintosh, and presently find
yourself in the seat you like best, - a little above or a little below
the one on which your goddess sits (it is the same thing to the
metaphysical mind, and that is the reason why women are at once
worshipped and looked down upon), with a satisfactory confidence that
there will be no lady-callers.&quot;Stephen will come earlier this morning, I know,&quot; said Lucy; &quot;he
always does when it's rainy.&quot;Maggie made no answer. She was angry with Stephen; she began to think
she should dislike him; and if it had not been for the rain, she would
have gone to her aunt Glegg's this morning, and so have avoided him
altogether. As it was, she must find some reason for remaining out of
the room with her mother.But Stephen did not come earlier, and there was another visitor - a
nearer neighbor - who preceded him. When Philip entered the room, he
was going merely to bow to Maggie, feeling that their acquaintance was
a secret which he was bound not to betray; but when she advanced
toward him and put out her hand, he guessed at once that Lucy had been
taken into her confidence. It was a moment of some agitation to both,
though Philip had spent many hours in preparing for it; but like all
persons who have passed through life with little expectation of
sympathy, he seldom lost his self-control, and shrank with the most
sensitive pride from any noticeable betrayal of emotion. A little
extra paleness, a little tension of the nostril when he spoke, and the
voice pitched in rather a higher key, that to strangers would seem
expressive of cold indifference, were all the signs Philip usually
gave of an inward drama that was not without its fierceness. But
Maggie, who had little more power of concealing the impressions made
upon her than if she had been constructed of musical strings, felt her
eyes getting larger with tears as they took each other's hands in
silence. They were not painful tears; they had rather something of the
same origin as the tears women and children shed when they have found
some protection to cling to and look back on the threatened danger.
For Philip, who a little while ago was associated continually in
Maggie's mind with the sense that Tom might reproach her with some
justice, had now, in this short space, become a sort of outward
conscience to her, that she might fly to for rescue and strength. Her
tranquil, tender affection for Philip, with its root deep down in her
childhood, and its memories of long quiet talk confirming by distinct
successive impressions the first instinctive bias, - the fact that in
him the appeal was more strongly to her pity and womanly devotedness
than to her vanity or other egoistic excitability of her
nature, - seemed now to make a sort of sacred place, a sanctuary where
she could find refuge from an alluring influence which the best part
of herself must resist; which must bring horrible tumult within,
wretchedness without. This new sense of her relation to Philip
nullified the anxious scruples she would otherwise have felt, lest she
should overstep the limit of intercourse with him that Tom would
sanction; and she put out her hand to him, and felt the tears in her
eyes without any consciousness of an inward check. The scene was just
what Lucy expected, and her kind heart delighted in bringing Philip
and Maggie together again; though, even with allherregard for
Philip, she could not resist the impression that her cousin Tom had
some excuse for feeling shocked at the physical incongruity between
the two, - a prosaic person like cousin Tom, who didn't like poetry and
fairy tales. But she began to speak as soon as possible, to set them
at ease.&quot;This was very good and virtuous of you,&quot; she said, in her pretty
treble, like the low conversational notes of little birds, &quot;to come so
soon after your arrival. And as it is, I think I will pardon you for
running away in an inopportune manner, and giving your friends no
notice. Come and sit down here,&quot; she went on, placing the chair that
would suit him best, &quot;and you shall find yourself treated mercifully.&quot;&quot;You will never govern well, Miss Deane,&quot; said Philip, as he seated
himself, &quot;because no one will ever believe in your severity. People
will always encourage themselves in misdemeanors by the certainty that
you will be indulgent.&quot;Lucy gave some playful contradiction, but Philip did not hear what it
was, for he had naturally turned toward Maggie, and she was looking at
him with that open, affectionate scrutiny which we give to a friend
from whom we have been long separated. What a moment their parting had
been! And Philip felt as if he were only in the morrow of it. He felt
this so keenly, - with such intense, detailed remembrance, with such
passionate revival of all that had been said and looked in their last
conversation, - that with that jealousy and distrust which in diffident
natures is almost inevitably linked with a strong feeling, he thought
he read in Maggie's glance and manner the evidence of a change. The
very fact that he feared and half expected it would be sure to make
this thought rush in, in the absence of positive proof to the
contrary.&quot;I am having a great holiday, am I not?&quot; said Maggie. &quot;Lucy is like a
fairy godmother; she has turned me from a drudge into a princess in no
time. I do nothing but indulge myself all day long, and she always
finds out what I want before I know it myself.&quot;&quot;I am sure she is the happier for having you, then,&quot; said Philip. &quot;You
must be better than a whole menagerie of pets to her. And you look
well. You are benefiting by the change.&quot;Artificial conversation of this sort went on a little while, till
Lucy, determined to put an end to it, exclaimed, with a good imitation
of annoyance, that she had forgotten something, and was quickly out of
the room.In a moment Maggie and Philip leaned forward, and the hands were
clasped again, with a look of sad contentment, like that of friends
who meet in the memory of recent sorrow.&quot;I told my brother I wished to see you, Philip; I asked him to release
me from my promise, and he consented.&quot;Maggie, in her impulsiveness, wanted Philip to know at once the
position they must hold toward each other; but she checked herself.
The things that had happened since he had spoken of his love for her
were so painful that she shrank from being the first to alude to them.
It seemed almost like an injury toward Philip even to mention her
brother, - her brother, who had insulted him. But he was thinking too
entirely of her to be sensitive on any other point at that moment.&quot;Then we can at least be friends, Maggie? There is nothing to hinder
that now?&quot;&quot;Will not your father object?&quot; said Maggie, withdrawing her hand.&quot;I should not give you up on any ground but your own wish, Maggie,&quot;
said Philip, coloring. &quot;There are points on which I should always
resist my father, as I used to tell you.Thatis one.&quot;&quot;Then there is nothing to hinder our being friends, Philip, - seeing
each other and talking to each other while I am here; I shall soon go
away again. I mean to go very soon, to a new situation.&quot;&quot;Is that inevitable, Maggie?&quot;&quot;Yes; I must not stay here long. It would unfit me for the life I must
begin again at last. I can't live in dependence, - I can't live with my
brother, though he is very good to me. He would like to provide for
me; but that would be intolerable to me.&quot;Philip was silent a few moments, and then said, in that high, feeble
voice which with him indicated the resolute suppression of emotion, -&quot;Is there no other alternative, Maggie? Is that life, away from those
who love you, the only one you will allow yourself to look forward
to?&quot;&quot;Yes, Philip,&quot; she said, looking at him pleadingly, as if she
entreated him to believe that she was compelled to this course. &quot;At
least, as things are; I don't know what may be in years to come. But I
begin to think there can never come much happiness to me from loving;
I have always had so much pain mingled with it. I wish I could make
myself a world outside it, as men do.&quot;&quot;Now you are returning to your old thought in a new form, Maggie, - the
thought I used to combat,&quot; said Philip, with a slight tinge of
bitterness. &quot;You want to find out a mode of renunciation that will be
an escape from pain. I tell you again, there is no such escape
possible except by perverting or mutilating one's nature. What would
become of me, if I tried to escape from pain? Scorn and cynicism would
be my only opium; unless I could fall into some kind of conceited
madness, and fancy myself a favorite of Heaven because I am not a
favorite with men.&quot;The bitterness had taken on some impetuosity as Philip went on
speaking; the words were evidently an outlet for some immediate
feeling of his own, as well as an answer to Maggie. There was a pain
pressing on him at that moment. He shrank with proud delicacy from the
faintest allusion to the words of love, of plighted love that had
passed between them. It would have seemed to him like reminding Maggie
of a promise; it would have had for him something of the baseness of
compulsion. He could not dwell on the fact that he himself had not
changed; for that too would have had the air of an appeal. His love
for Maggie was stamped, even more than the rest of his experience,
with the exaggerated sense that he was an exception, - that she, that
every one, saw him in the light of an exception.But Maggie was conscience-stricken.&quot;Yes, Philip,&quot; she said, with her childish contrition when he used to
chide her, &quot;you are right, I know. I do always think too much of my
own feelings, and not enough of others', - not enough of yours. I had
need have you always to find fault with me and teach me; so many
things have come true that you used to tell me.&quot;Maggie was resting her elbow on the table, leaning her head on her
hand and looking at Philip with half-penitent dependent affection, as
she said this; while he was returning her gaze with an expression
that, to her consciousness, gradually became less vague, - became
charged with a specific recollection. Had his mind flown back to
something thatshenow remembered, - something about a lover of
Lucy's? It was a thought that made her shudder; it gave new
definiteness to her present position, and to the tendency of what had
happened the evening before. She moved her arm from the table, urged
to change her position by that positive physical oppression at the
heart that sometimes accompanies a sudden mental pang.&quot;What is the matter, Maggie? Has something happened?&quot; Philip said, in
inexpressible anxiety, his imagination being only too ready to weave
everything that was fatal to them both.&quot;No, nothing,&quot; said Maggie, rousing her latent will. Philip must not
have that odious thought in his mind; she would banish it from her
own. &quot;Nothing,&quot; she repeated, &quot;except in my own mind. You used to say
I should feel the effect of my starved life, as you called it; and I
do. I am too eager in my enjoyment of music and all luxuries, now they
are come to me.&quot;She took up her work and occupied herself resolutely, while Philip
watched her, really in doubt whether she had anything more than this
general allusion in her mind. It was quite in Maggie's character to be
agitated by vague self-reproach. But soon there came a violent
well-known ring at the door-bell resounding through the house.&quot;Oh, what a startling announcement!&quot; said Maggie, quite mistress of
herself, though not without some inward flutter. &quot;I wonder where Lucy
is.&quot;Lucy had not been deaf to the signal, and after an interval long
enough for a few solicitous but not hurried inquiries, she herself
ushered Stephen in.&quot;Well, old fellow,&quot; he said, going straight up to Philip and shaking
him heartily by the hand, bowing to Maggie in passing, &quot;it's glorious
to have you back again; only I wish you'd conduct yourself a little
less like a sparrow with a residence on the house-top, and not go in
and out constantly without letting the servants know. This is about
the twentieth time I've had to scamper up those countless stairs to
that painting-room of yours, all to no purpose, because your people
thought you were at home. Such incidents embitter friendship.&quot;&quot;I've so few visitors, it seems hardly worth while to leave notice of
my exit and entrances,&quot; said Philip, feeling rather oppressed just
then by Stephen's bright strong presence and strong voice.&quot;Are you quite well this morning, Miss Tulliver?&quot; said Stephen,
turning to Maggie with stiff politeness, and putting out his hand with
the air of fulfilling a social duty.Maggie gave the tips of her fingers, and said, &quot;Quite well, thank
you,&quot; in a tone of proud indifference. Philip's eyes were watching
them keenly; but Lucy was used to seeing variations in their manner to
each other, and only thought with regret that there was some natural
antipathy which every now and then surmounted their mutual good-will.
&quot;Maggie is not the sort of woman Stephen admires, and she is irritated
by something in him which she interprets as conceit,&quot; was the silent
observation that accounted for everything to guileless Lucy. Stephen
and Maggie had no sooner completed this studied greeting than each
felt hurt by the other's coldness. And Stephen, while rattling on in
questions to Philip about his recent sketching expedition, was
thinking all the more about Maggie because he was not drawing her into
the conversation as he had invariably done before. &quot;Maggie and Philip
are not looking happy,&quot; thought Lucy; &quot;this first interview has been
saddening to them.&quot;&quot;I think we people who have not been galloping,&quot; she said to Stephen,
&quot;are all a little damped by the rain. Let us have some music. We ought
to take advantage of having Philip and you together. Give us the duet
in 'Masaniello'; Maggie has not heard that, and I know it will suit
her.&quot;&quot;Come, then,&quot; said Stephen, going toward the piano, and giving a
foretaste of the tune in his deep &quot;brum-brum,&quot; very pleasant to hear.&quot;You, please, Philip, - you play the accompaniment,&quot; said Lucy, &quot;and
then I can go on with my work. Youwilllike to play, sha'n't you?&quot;
she added, with a pretty, inquiring look, anxious, as usual, lest she
should have proposed what was not pleasant to another; but with
yearnings toward her unfinished embroidery.Philip had brightened at the proposition, for there is no feeling,
perhaps, except the extremes of fear and grief, that does not find
relief in music, - that does not make a man sing or play the better;
and Philip had an abundance of pent-up feeling at this moment, as
complex as any trio or quartet that was ever meant to express love and
jealousy and resignation and fierce suspicion, all at the same time.&quot;Oh, yes,&quot; he said, seating himself at the piano, &quot;it is a way of
eking out one's imperfect life and being three people at once, - to
sing and make the piano sing, and hear them both all the while, - or
else to sing and paint.&quot;&quot;Ah, there you are an enviable fellow. I can do nothing with my
hands,&quot; said Stephen. &quot;That has generally been observed in men of
great administrative capacity, I believe, - a tendency to predominance
of the reflective powers in me! Haven't you observed that, Miss
Tulliver?&quot;Stephen had fallen by mistake into his habit of playful appeal to
Maggie, and she could not repress the answering flush and epigram.&quot;Ihaveobserved a tendency to predominance,&quot; she said, smiling; and
Philip at that moment devoutly hoped that she found the tendency
disagreeable.&quot;Come, come,&quot; said Lucy; &quot;music, music! We will discuss each other's
qualities another time.&quot;Maggie always tried in vain to go on with her work when music began.
She tried harder than ever to-day; for the thought that Stephen knew
how much she cared for his singing was one that no longer roused a
merely playful resistance; and she knew, too, that it was his habit
always to stand so that he could look at her. But it was of no use;
she soon threw her work down, and all her intentions were lost in the
vague state of emotion produced by the inspiring duet, - emotion that
seemed to make her at once strong and weak; strong for all enjoyment,
weak for all resistance. When the strain passed into the minor, she
half started from her seat with the sudden thrill of that change. Poor
Maggie! She looked very beautiful when her soul was being played on in
this way by the inexorable power of sound. You might have seen the
slightest perceptible quivering through her whole frame as she leaned
a little forward, clasping her hands as if to steady herself; while
her eyes dilated and brightened into that wide-open, childish
expression of wondering delight which always came back in her happiest
moments. Lucy, who at other times had always been at the piano when
Maggie was looking in this way, could not resist the impulse to steal
up to her and kiss her. Philip, too, caught a glimpse of her now and
then round the open book on the desk, and felt that he had never
before seen her under so strong an influence.&quot;More, more!&quot; said Lucy, when the duet had been encored. &quot;Something
spirited again. Maggie always says she likes a great rush of sound.&quot;&quot;It must be 'Let us take the road,' then,&quot; said Stephen, - &quot;so suitable
for a wet morning. But are you prepared to abandon the most sacred
duties of life, and come and sing with us?&quot;&quot;Oh, yes,&quot; said Lucy, laughing. &quot;If you will look out the 'Beggar's
Opera' from the large canterbury. It has a dingy cover.&quot;&quot;That is a great clue, considering there are about a score covers here
of rival dinginess,&quot; said Stephen, drawing out the canterbury.&quot;Oh, play something the while, Philip,&quot; said Lucy, noticing that his
fingers were wandering over the keys. &quot;What is that you are falling
into? - something delicious that I don't know.&quot;&quot;Don't you know that?&quot; said Philip, bringing out the tune more
definitely. &quot;It's from the 'Sonnambula' - 'Ah! perch&Atilde;&uml; non posso
odiarti.' I don't know the opera, but it appears the tenor is telling
the heroine that he shall always love her though she may forsake him.
You've heard me sing it to the English words, 'I love thee still.'&quot;It was not quite unintentionally that Philip had wandered into this
song, which might be an indirect expression to Maggie of what he could
not prevail on himself to say to her directly. Her ears had been open
to what he was saying, and when he began to sing, she understood the
plaintive passion of the music. That pleading tenor had no very fine
qualities as a voice, but it was not quite new to her; it had sung to
her by snatches, in a subdued way, among the grassy walks and hollows,
and underneath the leaning ash-tree in the Red Deeps. There seemed to
be some reproach in the words; did Philip mean that? She wished she
had assured him more distinctly in their conversation that she desired
not to renew the hope of love between them,onlybecause it clashed
with her inevitable circumstances. She was touched, not thrilled by
the song; it suggested distinct memories and thoughts, and brought
quiet regret in the place of excitement.&quot;That's the way with you tenors,&quot; said Stephen, who was waiting with
music in his hand while Philip finished the song. &quot;You demoralize the
fair sex by warbling your sentimental love and constancy under all
sorts of vile treatment. Nothing short of having your heads served up
in a dish like that medi&Atilde;&brvbar;val tenor or troubadour, would prevent you
from expressing your entire resignation. I must administer an
antidote, while Miss Deane prepares to tear herself away from her
bobbins.&quot;Stephen rolled out, with saucy energy, -and seemed to make all the air in the room alive with a new influence.
Lucy, always proud of what Stephen did, went toward the piano with
laughing, admiring looks at him; and Maggie, in spite of her
resistance to the spirit of the song and to the singer, was taken hold
of and shaken by the invisible influence, - was borne along by a wave
too strong for her.But, angrily resolved not to betray herself, she seized her work, and
went on making false stitches and pricking her fingers with much
perseverance, not looking up or taking notice of what was going
forward, until all the three voices united in &quot;Let us take the road.&quot;I am afraid there would have been a subtle, stealing gratification in
her mind if she had known how entirely this saucy, defiant Stephen was
occupied with her; how he was passing rapidly from a determination to
treat her with ostentatious indifference to an irritating desire for
some sign of inclination from her, - some interchange of subdued word
or look with her. It was not long before he found an opportunity, when
they had passed to the music of &quot;The Tempest.&quot; Maggie, feeling the
need of a footstool, was walking across the room to get one, when
Stephen, who was not singing just then, and was conscious of all her
movements, guessed her want, and flew to anticipate her, lifting the
footstool with an entreating look at her, which made it impossible not
to return a glance of gratitude. And then, to have the footstool
placed carefully by a too self-confident personage, - notanyself-confident personage, but one in particular, who suddenly looks
humble and anxious, and lingers, bending still, to ask if there is not
some draught in that position between the window and the fireplace,
and if he may not be allowed to move the work-table for her, - these
things will summon a little of the too ready, traitorous tenderness
into a woman's eyes, compelled as she is in her girlish time to learn
her life-lessons in very trivial language. And to Maggie such things
had not been every-day incidents, but were a new element in her life,
and found her keen appetite for homage quite fresh. That tone of
gentle solicitude obliged her to look at the face that was bent toward
her, and to say, &quot;No, thank you&quot;; and nothing could prevent that
mutual glance from being delicious to both, as it had been the evening
before.It was but an ordinary act of politeness in Stephen; it had hardly
taken two minutes; and Lucy, who was singing, scarcely noticed it. But
to Philip's mind, filled already with a vague anxiety that was likely
to find a definite ground for itself in any trivial incident, this
sudden eagerness in Stephen, and the change in Maggie's face, which
was plainly reflecting a beam from his, seemed so strong a contrast
with the previous overwrought signs of indifference, as to be charged
with painful meaning. Stephen's voice, pouring in again, jarred upon
his nervous susceptibility as if it had been the clang of sheet-iron,
and he felt inclined to make the piano shriek in utter discord. He had
really seen no communicable ground for suspecting any ususual feeling
between Stephen and Maggie; his own reason told him so, and he wanted
to go home at once that he might reflect coolly on these false images,
till he had convinced himself of their nullity. But then, again, he
wanted to stay as long as Stephen stayed, - always to be present when
Stephen was present with Maggie. It seemed to poor Philip so natural,
nay, inevitable, that any man who was near Maggie should fall in love
with her! There was no promise of happiness for her if she were
beguiled into loving Stephen Guest; and this thought emboldened Philip
to view his own love for her in the light of a less unequal offering.
He was beginning to play very falsely under this deafening inward
tumult, and Lucy was looking at him in astonishment, when Mrs.
Tulliver's entrance to summon them to lunch came as an excuse for
abruptly breaking off the music.&quot;Ah, Mr. Philip!&quot; said Mr. Deane, when they entered the dining-room,
&quot;I've not seen you for a long while. Your father's not at home, I
think, is he? I went after him to the office the other day, and they
said he was out of town.&quot;&quot;He's been to Mudport on business for several days,&quot; said Philip; &quot;but
he's come back now.&quot;&quot;As fond of his farming hobby as ever, eh?&quot;&quot;I believe so,&quot; said Philip, rather wondering at this sudden interest
in his father's pursuits.&quot;Ah!&quot; said Mr. Deane, &quot;he's got some land in his own hands on this
side the river as well as the other, I think?&quot;&quot;Yes, he has.&quot;&quot;Ah!&quot; continued Mr. Deane, as he dispensed the pigeonpie, &quot;he must
find farming a heavy item, - an expensive hobby. I never had a hobby
myself, never would give in to that. And the worst of all hobbies are
those that people think they can get money at. They shoot their money
down like corn out of a sack then.&quot;Lucy felt a little nervous under her father's apparently gratuitous
criticism of Mr. Wakem's expenditure. But it ceased there, and Mr.
Deane became unusually silent and meditative during his luncheon.
Lucy, accustomed to watch all indications in her father, and having
reasons, which had recently become strong, for an extra interest in
what referred to the Wakems, felt an unsual curiosity to know what had
prompted her father's questions. His subsequent silence made her
suspect there had been some special reason for them in his mind.With this idea in her head, she resorted to her usual plan when she
wanted to tell or ask her father anything particular: she found a
reason for her aunt Tulliver to leaving the dining-room after dinner,
and seated herself on a small stool at her father's knee. Mr. Deane,
under those circumstances, considered that he tasted some of the most
agreeable moments his merits had purchased him in life,
notwithstanding that Lucy, disliking to have her hair powdered with
snuff, usually began by mastering his snuff-box on such occasions.&quot;You don't want to go to sleep yet, papa,doyou?&quot; she said, as she
brought up her stool and opened the large fingers that clutched the
snuff-box.&quot;Not yet,&quot; said Mr. Deane, glancing at the reward of merit in the
decanter. &quot;But what doyouwant?&quot; he added, pinching the dimpled
chin fondly, - &quot;to coax some more sovereigns out of my pocket for your
bazaar? Eh?&quot;&quot;No, I have no base motives at all to-day. I only want to talk, not to
beg. I want to know what made you ask Philip Wakem about his father's
farming to-day, papa? It seemed rather odd, because you never hardly
say anything to him about his father; and why should you care about
Mr. Wakem's losing money by his hobby?&quot;&quot;Something to do with business,&quot; said Mr. Deane, waving his hands, as
if to repel intrusion into that mystery.&quot;But, papa, you always say Mr. Wakem has brought Philip up like a
girl; how came you to think you should get any business knowledge out
of him? Those abrupt questions sounded rather oddly. Philip thought
them queer.&quot;&quot;Nonsense, child!&quot; said Mr. Deane, willing to justify his social
demeanor, with which he had taken some pains in his upward progress.
&quot;There's a report that Wakem's mill and farm on the other side of the
river - Dorlcote Mill, your uncle Tulliver's, you know - isn't answering
so well as it did. I wanted to see if your friend Philip would let
anything out about his father's being tired of farming.&quot;&quot;Why? Would you buy the mill, papa, if he would part with it?&quot; said
Lucy, eagerly. &quot;Oh, tell me everything; here, you shall have your
snuff-box if you'll tell me. Because Maggie says all their hearts are
set on Tom's getting back the mill some time. It was one of the last
things her father said to Tom, that he must get back the mill.&quot;&quot;Hush, you little puss,&quot; said Mr. Deane, availing himself of the
restored snuff-box. &quot;You must not say a word about this thing; do you
hear? There's very little chance of their getting the mill or of
anybody's getting it out of Wakem's hands. And if he knew that we
wanted it with a view to the Tulliver's getting it again, he'd be the
less likely to part with it. It's natural, after what happened. He
behaved well enough to Tulliver before; but a horsewhipping is not
likely to be paid for with sugar-plums.&quot;&quot;Now, papa,&quot; said Lucy, with a little air of solemnity, &quot;will you
trust me? You must not ask me all my reasons for what I'm going to
say, but I have very strong reasons. And I'm very cautious; I am,
indeed.&quot;&quot;Well, let us hear.&quot;&quot;Why, I believe, if you will let me take Philip Wakem into our
confidence, - let me tell him all about your wish to buy, and what it's
for; that my cousins wish to have it, and why they wish to have it, - I
believe Philip would help to bring it about. I know he would desire to
do it.&quot;&quot;I don't see how that can be, child,&quot; said Mr. Deane, looking puzzled.
&quot;Why shouldhecare?&quot; - then, with a sudden penetrating look at his
daughter, &quot;You don't think the poor lad's fond of you, and so you can
make him do what you like?&quot; (Mr. Deane felt quite safe about his
daughter's affections.)&quot;No, papa; he cares very little about me, - not so much as I care about
him. But I have a reason for being quite sure of what I say. Don't you
ask me. And if you ever guess, don't tell me. Only give me leave to do
as I think fit about it.&quot;Lucy rose from her stool to seat herself on her father's knee, and
kissed him with that last request.&quot;Are you sure you won't do mischief, now?&quot; he said, looking at her
with delight.&quot;Yes, papa, quite sure. I'm very wise; I've got all your business
talents. Didn't you admire my accompt-book, now, when I showed it
you?&quot;&quot;Well, well, if this youngster will keep his counsel, there won't be
much harm done. And to tell the truth, I think there's not much chance
for us any other way. Now, let me go off to sleep.&quot;>



It is evident to you now that Maggie had arrived at a moment in her
life which must be considered by all prudent persons as a great
opportunity for a young woman. Launched into the higher society of St.
Ogg's, with a striking person, which had the advantage of being quite
unfamiliar to the majority of beholders, and with such moderate
assistance of costume as you have seen foreshadowed in Lucy's anxious
colloquy with aunt Pullet, Maggie was certainly at a new
starting-point in life. At Lucy's first evening party, young Torry
fatigued his facial muscles more than usual in order that &quot;the
dark-eyed girl there in the corner&quot; might see him in all the
additional style conferred by his eyeglass; and several young ladies
went home intending to have short sleeves with black lace, and to
plait their hair in a broad coronet at the back of their head, - &quot;That
cousin of Miss Deane's looked so very well.&quot; In fact, poor Maggie,
with all her inward consciousness of a painful past and her
presentiment of a troublous future, was on the way to become an object
of some envy, - a topic of discussion in the newly established
billiard-room, and between fair friends who had no secrets from each
other on the subject of trimmings. The Miss Guests, who associated
chiefly on terms of condescension with the families of St. Ogg's, and
were the glass of fashion there, took some exception to Maggie's
manners. She had a way of not assenting at once to the observations
current in good society, and of saying that she didn't know whether
those observations were true or not, which gave her an air of
gaucherie, and impeded the even flow of conversation; but it is a
fact capable of an amiable interpretation that ladies are not the
worst disposed toward a new acquaintance of their own sex because she
has points of inferiority. And Maggie was so entirely without those
pretty airs of coquetry which have the traditional reputation of
driving gentlemen to despair that she won some feminine pity for being
so ineffective in spite of her beauty. She had not had many
advantages, poor thing! and it must be admitted there was no
pretension about her; her abruptness and unevenness of manner were
plainly the result of her secluded and lowly circumstances. It was
only a wonder that there was no tinge of vulgarity about her,
considering what the rest of poor Lucy's relations were - an allusion
which always made the Miss Guests shudder a little. It was not
agreeable to think of any connection by marriage with such people as
the Gleggs and the Pullets; but it was of no use to contradict Stephen
when once he had set his mind on anything, and certainly there was no
possible objection to Lucy in herself, - no one could help liking her.
She would naturally desire that the Miss Guests should behave kindly
to this cousin of whom she was so fond, and Stephen would make a great
fuss if they were deficient in civility. Under these circumstances the
invitations to Park House were not wanting; and elsewhere, also, Miss
Deane was too popular and too distinguished a member of society in St.
Ogg's for any attention toward her to be neglected.Thus Maggie was introduced for the first time to the young lady's
life, and knew what it was to get up in the morning without any
imperative reason for doing one thing more than another. This new
sense of leisure and unchecked enjoyment amidst the soft-breathing
airs and garden-scents of advancing spring - amidst the new abundance
of music, and lingering strolls in the sunshine, and the delicious
dreaminess of gliding on the river - could hardly be without some
intoxicating effect on her, after her years of privation; and even in
the first week Maggie began to be less haunted by her sad memories and
anticipations. Life was certainly very pleasant just now; it was
becoming very pleasant to dress in the evening, and to feel that she
was one of the beautiful things of this spring-time. And there were
admiring eyes always awaiting her now; she was no longer an unheeded
person, liable to be chid, from whom attention was continually
claimed, and on whom no one felt bound to confer any. It was pleasant,
too, when Stephen and Lucy were gone out riding, to sit down at the
piano alone, and find that the old fitness between her fingers and the
keys remained, and revived, like a sympathetic kinship not to be worn
out by separation; to get the tunes she had heard the evening before,
and repeat them again and again until she had found out a way of
producing them so as to make them a more pregnant, passionate language
to her. The mere concord of octaves was a delight to Maggie, and she
would often take up a book of studies rather than any melody, that she
might taste more keenly by abstraction the more primitive sensation of
intervals. Not that her enjoyment of music was of the kind that
indicates a great specific talent; it was rather that her sensibility
to the supreme excitement of music was only one form of that
passionate sensibility which belonged to her whole nature, and made
her faults and virtues all merge in each other; made her affections
sometimes an impatient demand, but also prevented her vanity from
taking the form of mere feminine coquetry and device, and gave it the
poetry of ambition. But you have known Maggie a long while, and need
to be told, not her characteristics, but her history, which is a thing
hardly to be predicted even from the completest knowledge of
characteristics. For the tragedy of our lives is not created entirely
from within. &quot;Character,&quot; says Novalis, in one of his questionable
aphorisms, - &quot;character is destiny.&quot; But not the whole of our destiny.
Hamlet, Prince of Denmark, was speculative and irresolute, and we have
a great tragedy in consequence. But if his father had lived to a good
old age, and his uncle had died an early death, we can conceive
Hamlet's having married Ophelia, and got through life with a
reputation of sanity, notwithstanding many soliloquies, and some moody
sarcasms toward the fair daughter of Polonius, to say nothing of the
frankest incivility to his father-in-law.Maggie's destiny, then, is at present hidden, and we must wait for it
to reveal itself like the course of an unmapped river; we only know
that the river is full and rapid, and that for all rivers there is the
same final home. Under the charm of her new pleasures, Maggie herself
was ceasing to think, with her eager prefiguring imagination, of her
future lot; and her anxiety about her first interview with Philip was
losing its predominance; perhaps, unconsciously to herself, she was
not sorry that the interview had been deferred.For Philip had not come the evening he was expected, and Mr. Stephen
Guest brought word that he was gone to the coast, - probably, he
thought, on a sketching expedition; but it was not certain when he
would return. It was just like Philip, to go off in that way without
telling any one. It was not until the twelfth day that he returned, to
find both Lucy's notes awaiting him; he had left before he knew of
Maggie's arrival.Perhaps one had need be nineteen again to be quite convinced of the
feelings that were crowded for Maggie into those twelve days; of the
length to which they were stretched for her by the novelty of her
experience in them, and the varying attitudes of her mind. The early
days of an acquaintance almost always have this importance for us, and
fill up a larger space in our memory than longer subsequent periods,
which have been less filled with discovery and new impressions. There
were not many hours in those ten days in which Mr. Stephen Guest was
not seated by Lucy's side, or standing near her at the piano, or
accompanying her on some outdoor excursion; his attentions were
clearly becoming more assiduous, and that was what every one had
expected. Lucy was very happy, all the happier because Stephen's
society seemed to have become much more interesting and amusing since
Maggie had been there. Playful discussions - sometimes serious
ones - were going forward, in which both Stephen and Maggie revealed
themselves, to the admiration of the gentle, unobtrusive Lucy; and it
more than once crossed her mind what a charming quartet they should
have through life when Maggie married Philip. Is it an inexplicable
thing that a girl should enjoy her lover's society the more for the
presence of a third person, and be without the slightest spasm of
jealousy that the third person had the conversation habitually
directed to her? Not when that girl is as tranquil-hearted as Lucy,
thoroughly possessed with a belief that she knows the state of her
companions' affections, and not prone to the feelings which shake such
a belief in the absence of positive evidence against it. Besides, it
was Lucy by whom Stephen sat, to whom he gave his arm, to whom he
appealed as the person sure to agree with him; and every day there was
the same tender politeness toward her, the same consciousness of her
wants and care to supply them. Was there really the same? It seemed to
Lucy that there was more; and it was no wonder that the real
significance of the change escaped her. It was a subtle act of
conscience in Stephen that even he himself was not aware of. His
personal attentions to Maggie were comparatively slight, and there had
even sprung up an apparent distance between them, that prevented the
renewal of that faint resemblance to gallantry into which he had
fallen the first day in the boat. If Stephen came in when Lucy was out
of the room, if Lucy left them together, they never spoke to each
other; Stephen, perhaps, seemed to be examining books or music, and
Maggie bent her head assiduously over her work. Each was oppressively
conscious of the other's presence, even to the finger-ends. Yet each
looked and longed for the same thing to happen the next day. Neither
of them had begun to reflect on the matter, or silently to ask, &quot;To
what does all this tend?&quot; Maggie only felt that life was revealing
something quite new to her; and she was absorbed in the direct,
immediate experience, without any energy left for taking account of it
and reasoning about it. Stephen wilfully abstained from
self-questioning, and would not admit to himself that he felt an
influence which was to have any determining effect on his conduct. And
when Lucy came into the room again, they were once more unconstrained;
Maggie could contradict Stephen, and laugh at him, and he could
recommend to her consideration the example of that most charming
heroine, Miss Sophia Western, who had a great &quot;respect for the
understandings of men.&quot; Maggie could look at Stephen, which, for some
reason or other she always avoided when they were alone; and he could
even ask her to play his accompaniment for him, since Lucy's fingers
were so busy with that bazaar-work, and lecture her on hurrying the
tempo, which was certainly Maggie's weak point.One day - it was the day of Philip's return - Lucy had formed a sudden
engagement to spend the evening with Mrs. Kenn, whose delicate state
of health, threatening to become confirmed illness through an attack
of bronchitis, obliged her to resign her functions at the coming
bazaar into the hands of other ladies, of whom she wished Lucy to be
one. The engagement had been formed in Stephen's presence, and he had
heard Lucy promise to dine early and call at six o'clock for Miss
Torry, who brought Mrs. Kenn's request.&quot;Here is another of the moral results of this idiotic bazaar,&quot; Stephen
burst forth, as soon as Miss Torry had left the room, - &quot;taking young
ladies from the duties of the domestic hearth into scenes of
dissipation among urn-rugs and embroidered reticules! I should like to
know what is the proper function of women, if it is not to make
reasons for husbands to stay at home, and still stronger reasons for
bachelors to go out. If this goes on much longer, the bonds of society
will be dissolved.&quot;&quot;Well, it will not go on much longer,&quot; said Lucy, laughing, &quot;for the
bazaar is to take place on Monday week.&quot;&quot;Thank Heaven!&quot; said Stephen. &quot;Kenn himself said the other day that he
didn't like this plan of making vanity do the work of charity; but
just as the British public is not reasonable enough to bear direct
taxation, so St. Ogg's has not got force of motive enough to build and
endow schools without calling in the force of folly.&quot;&quot;Did he say so?&quot; said little Lucy, her hazel eyes opening wide with
anxiety. &quot;I never heard him say anything of that kind; I thought he
approved of what we were doing.&quot;&quot;I'm sure he approvesyou,&quot; said Stephen, smiling at her
affectionately; &quot;your conduct in going out to-night looks vicious, I
own, but I know there is benevolence at the bottom of it.&quot;&quot;Oh, you think too well of me,&quot; said Lucy, shaking her head, with a
pretty blush, and there the subject ended. But it was tacitly
understood that Stephen would not come in the evening; and on the
strength of that tacit understanding he made his morning visit the
longer, not saying good-bye until after four.Maggie was seated in the drawing-room, alone, shortly after dinner,
with Minny on her lap, having left her uncle to his wine and his nap,
and her mother to the compromise between knitting and nodding, which,
when there was no company, she always carried on in the dining-room
till tea-time. Maggie was stooping to caress the tiny silken pet, and
comforting him for his mistress's absence, when the sound of a
footstep on the gravel made her look up, and she saw Mr. Stephen Guest
walking up the garden, as if he had come straight from the river. It
was very unusual to see him so soon after dinner! He often complained
that their dinner-hour was late at Park House. Nevertheless, there he
was, in his black dress; he had evidently been home, and must have
come again by the river. Maggie felt her cheeks glowing and her heart
beating; it was natural she should be nervous, for she was not
accustomed to receive visitors alone. He had seen her look up through
the open window, and raised his hat as he walked toward it, to enter
that way instead of by the door. He blushed too, and certainly looked
as foolish as a young man of some wit and self-possession can be
expected to look, as he walked in with a roll of music in his hand,
and said, with an air of hesitating improvisation, -&quot;You are surprised to see me again, Miss Tulliver; I ought to
apologize for coming upon you by surprise, but I wanted to come into
the town, and I got our man to row me; so I thought I would bring
these things from the 'Maid of Artois' for your cousin; I forgot them
this morning. Will you give them to her?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Maggie, who had risen confusedly with Minny in her arms,
and now, not quite knowing what else to do, sat down again.Stephen laid down his hat, with the music, which rolled on the floor,
and sat down in the chair close by her. He had never done so before,
and both he and Maggie were quite aware that it was an entirely new
position.&quot;Well, you pampered minion!&quot; said Stephen, leaning to pull the long
curly ears that drooped over Maggie's arm. It was not a suggestive
remark, and as the speaker did not follow it up by further
development, it naturally left the conversation at a standstill. It
seemed to Stephen like some action in a dream that he was obliged to
do, and wonder at himself all the while, - to go on stroking Minny's
head. Yet it was very pleasant; he only wished he dared look at
Maggie, and that she would look at him, - let him have one long look
into those deep, strange eyes of hers, and then he would be satisfied
and quite reasonable after that. He thought it was becoming a sort of
monomania with him, to want that long look from Maggie; and he was
racking his invention continually to find out some means by which he
could have it without its appearing singular and entailing subsequent
embarrassment. As for Maggie, she had no distinct thought, only the
sense of a presence like that of a closely hovering broad-winged bird
in the darkness, for she was unable to look up, and saw nothing but
Minny's black wavy coat.But this must end some time, perhaps it ended very soon, and onlyseemedlong, as a minute's dream does. Stephen at last sat upright
sideways in his chair, leaning one hand and arm over the back and
looking at Maggie. What should he say?&quot;We shall have a splendid sunset, I think; sha'n't you go out and see
it?&quot;&quot;I don't know,&quot; said Maggie. Then courageously raising her eyes and
looking out of the window, &quot;if I'm not playing cribbage with my
uncle.&quot;A pause; during which Minny is stroked again, but has sufficient
insight not to be grateful for it, to growl rather.&quot;Do you like sitting alone?&quot;A rather arch look came over Maggie's face, and, just glancing at
Stephen, she said, &quot;Would it be quite civil to say've s'?&quot;&quot;Itwasrather a dangerous question for an intruder to ask,&quot; said
Stephen, delighted with that glance, and getting determined to stay
for another. &quot;But you will have more than half an hour to yourself
after I am gone,&quot; he added, taking out his watch. &quot;I know Mr. Deane
never comes in till half-past seven.&quot;Another pause, during which Maggie looked steadily out of the window,
till by a great effort she moved her head to look down at Minny's back
again, and said, -&quot;I wish Lucy had not been obliged to go out. We lose our music.&quot;&quot;We shall have a new voice to-morrow night,&quot; said Stephen. &quot;Will you
tell your cousin that our friend Philip Wakem is come back? I saw him
as I went home.&quot;Maggie gave a little start, - it seemed hardly more than a vibration
that passed from head to foot in an instant. But the new images
summoned by Philip's name dispersed half the oppressive spell she had
been under. She rose from her chair with a sudden resolution, and
laying Minny on his cushion, went to reach Lucy's large work-basket
from its corner. Stephen was vexed and disappointed; he thought
perhaps Maggie didn't like the name of Wakem to be mentioned to her in
that abrupt way, for he now recalled what Lucy had told him of the
family quarrel. It was of no use to stay any longer. Maggie was
seating herself at the table with her work, and looking chill and
proud; and he - he looked like a simpleton for having come. A
gratuitous, entirely superfluous visit of that sort was sure to make a
man disagreeable and ridiculous. Of course it was palpable to Maggie's
thinking that he had dined hastily in his own room for the sake of
setting off again and finding her alone.A boyish state of mind for an accomplished young gentleman of
five-and-twenty, not without legal knowledge! But a reference to
history, perhaps, may make it not incredible.At this moment Maggie's ball of knitting-wool rolled along the ground,
and she started up to reach it. Stephen rose too, and picking up the
ball, met her with a vexed, complaining look that gave his eyes quite
a new expression to Maggie, whose own eyes met them as he presented
the ball to her.&quot;Good-bye,&quot; said Stephen, in a tone that had the same beseeching
discontent as his eyes. He dared not put out his hand; he thrust both
hands into his tail-pockets as he spoke. Maggie thought she had
perhaps been rude.&quot;Won't you stay?&quot; she said timidly, not looking away, for that would
have seemed rude again.&quot;No, thank you,&quot; said Stephen, looking still into the half-unwilling,
half-fascinated eyes, as a thirsty man looks toward the track of the
distant brook. &quot;The boat is waiting for me. You'll tell your cousin?&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;That I brought the music, I mean?&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot;&quot;And that Philip is come back?&quot;&quot;Yes.&quot; (Maggie did not notice Philip's name this time.)&quot;Won't you come out a little way into the garden?&quot; said Stephen, in a
still gentler tone; but the next moment he was vexed that she did not
say &quot;No,&quot; for she moved away now toward the open window, and he was
obliged to take his hat and walk by her side. But he thought of
something to make him amends.&quot;Do take my arm,&quot; he said, in a low tone, as if it were a secret.There is something strangely winning to most women in that offer of
the firm arm; the help is not wanted physically at that moment, but
the sense of help, the presence of strength that is outside them and
yet theirs, meets a continual want of the imagination. Either on that
ground or some other, Maggie took the arm. And they walked together
round the grassplot and under the drooping green of the laburnums, in
the same dim, dreamy state as they had been in a quarter of an hour
before; only that Stephen had had the look he longed for, without yet
perceiving in himself the symptoms of returning reasonableness, and
Maggie had darting thoughts across the dimness, - how came he to be
there? Why had she come out? Not a word was spoken. If it had been,
each would have been less intensely conscious of the other.&quot;Take care of this step,&quot; said Stephen at last.&quot;Oh, I will go in now,&quot; said Maggie, feeling that the step had come
like a rescue. &quot;Good-evening.&quot;In an instant she had withdrawn her arm, and was running back to the
house. She did not reflect that this sudden action would only add to
the embarrassing recollections of the last half-hour. She had no
thought left for that. She only threw herself into the low arm-chair,
and burst into tears.&quot;Oh, Philip, Philip, I wish we were together again - so quietly - in the
Red Deeps.&quot;Stephen looked after her a moment, then went on to the boat, and was
soon landed at the wharf. He spent the evening in the billiard-room,
smoking one cigar after another, and losing &quot;lives&quot; at pool. But he
would not leave off. He was determined not to think, - not to admit any
more distinct remembrance than was urged upon him by the perpetual
presence of Maggie. He was looking at her, and she was on his arm.But there came the necessity of walking home in the cool starlight,
and with it the necessity of cursing his own folly, and bitterly
determining that he would never trust himself alone with Maggie again.
It was all madness; he was in love, thoroughly attached to Lucy, and
engaged, - engaged as strongly as an honorable man need be. He wished
he had never seen this Maggie Tulliver, to be thrown into a fever by
her in this way; she would make a sweet, strange, troublesome,
adorable wife to some man or other, but he would never have chosen her
himself. Did she feel as he did? He hoped she did - not. He ought not
to have gone. He would master himself in future. He would make himself
disagreeable to her, quarrel with her perhaps. Quarrel with her? Was
it possible to quarrel with a creature who had such eyes, - defying and
deprecating, contradicting and clinging, imperious and beseeching, - 
full of delicious opposites? To see such a creature subdued by love
for one would be a lot worth having - to another man.There was a muttered exclamation which ended this inward soliloquy, as
Stephen threw away the end of his last cigar, and thrusting his hands
into his pockets, stalked along at a quieter pace through the
shrubbery. It was not of a benedictory kind.>


Maggie was obliged to go to Tom's lodgings in the middle of the day,
when he would be coming in to dinner, else she would not have found
him at home. He was not lodging with entire strangers. Our friend Bob
Jakin had, with Mumps's tacit consent, taken not only a wife about
eight months ago, but also one of those queer old houses, pierced with
surprising passages, by the water-side, where, as he observed, his
wife and mother could keep themselves out of mischief by letting out
two &quot;pleasure-boats,&quot; in which he had invested some of his savings,
and by taking in a lodger for the parlor and spare bedroom. Under
these circumstances, what could be better for the interests of all
parties, sanitary considerations apart, than that the lodger should be
Mr. Tom?It was Bob's wife who opened the door to Maggie. She was a tiny woman,
with the general physiognomy of a Dutch doll, looking, in comparison
with Bob's mother, who filled up the passage in the rear, very much
like one of those human figures which the artist finds conveniently
standing near a colossal statue to show the proportions. The tiny
woman curtsied and looked up at Maggie with some awe as soon as she
had opened the door; but the words, &quot;Is my brother at home?&quot; which
Maggie uttered smilingly, made her turn round with sudden excitement,
and say, -&quot;Eh, mother, mother - tell Bob! - it's Miss Maggie! Come in, Miss, for
goodness do,&quot; she went on, opening a side door, and endeavoring to
flatten her person against the wall to make the utmost space for the
visitor.Sad recollections crowded on Maggie as she entered the small parlor,
which was now all that poor Tom had to call by the name of
&quot;home,&quot; - that name which had once, so many years ago, meant for both
of them the same sum of dear familiar objects. But everything was not
strange to her in this new room; the first thing her eyes dwelt on was
the large old Bible, and the sight was not likely to disperse the old
memories. She stood without speaking.&quot;If you please to take the privilege o' sitting down, Miss,&quot; said Mrs.
Jakin, rubbing her apron over a perfectly clean chair, and then
lifting up the corner of that garment and holding it to her face with
an air of embarrassment, as she looked wonderingly at Maggie.&quot;Bob is at home, then?&quot; said Maggie, recovering herself, and smiling
at the bashful Dutch doll.&quot;Yes, Miss; but I think he must be washing and dressing himself; I'll
go and see,&quot; said Mrs. Jakin, disappearing.But she presently came back walking with new courage a little way
behind her husband, who showed the brilliancy of his blue eyes and
regular white teeth in the doorway, bowing respectfully.&quot;How do you do, Bob?&quot; said Maggie, coming forward and putting out her
hand to him; &quot;I always meant to pay your wife a visit, and I shall
come another day on purpose for that, if she will let me. But I was
obliged to come to-day to speak to my brother.&quot;&quot;He'll be in before long, Miss. He's doin' finely, Mr. Tom is; he'll
be one o' the first men hereabouts, - you'll see that.&quot;&quot;Well, Bob, I'm sure he'll be indebted to you, whatever he becomes; he
said so himself only the other night, when he was talking of you.&quot;&quot;Eh, Miss, that's his way o' takin' it. But I think the more on't when
he says a thing, because his tongue doesn't overshoot him as mine
does. Lors! I'm no better nor a tilted bottle, I ar'n't, - I can't stop
mysen when once I begin. But you look rarely, Miss; it does me good to
see you. What do you say now, Prissy?&quot; - here Bob turned to his
wife, - &quot;Isn't it all come true as I said? Though there isn't many
sorts o' goods as I can't over-praise when I set my tongue to't.&quot;Mrs. Bob's small nose seemed to be following the example of her eyes
in turning up reverentially toward Maggie, but she was able now to
smile and curtsey, and say, &quot;I'd looked forrard like aenything to
seein' you, Miss, for my husband's tongue's been runnin' on you, like
as if he was light-headed, iver since first he come a-courtin' on me.&quot;&quot;Well, well,&quot; said Bob, looking rather silly. &quot;Go an' see after the
taters, else Mr. Tom 'ull have to wait for 'em.&quot;&quot;I hope Mumps is friendly with Mrs. Jakin, Bob,&quot; said Maggie, smiling.
&quot;I remember you used to say he wouldn't like your marrying.&quot;&quot;Eh, Miss,&quot; said Bob, &quot;he made up his mind to't when he see'd what a
little un she was. He pretends not to see her mostly, or else to think
as she isn't full-growed. But about Mr. Tom, Miss,&quot; said Bob, speaking
lower and looking serious, &quot;he's as close as a iron biler, he is; but
I'm a 'cutish chap, an' when I've left off carrying my pack, an' am at
a loose end, I've got more brains nor I know what to do wi', an' I'm
forced to busy myself wi' other folks's insides. An' it worrets me as
Mr. Tom'll sit by himself so glumpish, a-knittin' his brow, an'
a-lookin' at the fire of a night. He should be a bit livelier now, a
fine young fellow like him. My wife says, when she goes in sometimes,
an' he takes no notice of her, he sits lookin' into the fire, and
frownin' as if he was watchin' folks at work in it.&quot;&quot;He thinks so much about business,&quot; said Maggie.&quot;Ay,&quot; said Bob, speaking lower; &quot;but do you think it's nothin' else,
Miss? He's close, Mr. Tom is; but I'm a 'cute chap, I am, an' I
thought tow'rt last Christmas as I'd found out a soft place in him. It
was about a little black spaniel - a rare bit o' breed - as he made a
fuss to get. But since then summat's come over him, as he's set his
teeth again' things more nor iver, for all he's had such good luck.
An' I wanted to tellyou, Miss, 'cause I thought you might work it
out of him a bit, now you're come. He's a deal too lonely, and doesn't
go into company enough.&quot;&quot;I'm afraid I have very little power over him, Bob,&quot; said Maggie, a
good deal moved by Bob's suggestion. It was a totally new idea to her
mind that Tom could have his love troubles. Poor fellow! - and in love
with Lucy too! But it was perhaps a mere fancy of Bob's too officious
brain. The present of the dog meant nothing more than cousinship and
gratitude. But Bob had already said, &quot;Here's Mr. Tom,&quot; and the outer
door was opening.&quot;There is no time to spare, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, as soon as Bob left the
room. &quot;I must tell you at once what I came about, else I shall be
hindering you from taking your dinner.&quot;Tom stood with his back against the chimney-piece, and Maggie was
seated opposite the light. He noticed that she was tremulous, and he
had a presentiment of the subject she was going to speak about. The
presentiment made his voice colder and harder as he said, &quot;What is
it?&quot;This tone roused a spirit of resistance in Maggie, and she put her
request in quite a different form from the one she had predetermined
on. She rose from her seat, and looking straight at Tom, said, -&quot;I want you to absolve me from my promise about Philip Wakem. Or
rather, I promised you not to see him without telling you. I am come
to tell you that I wish to see him.&quot;&quot;Very well,&quot; said Tom, still more coldly.But Maggie had hardly finished speaking in that chill, defiant manner,
before she repented, and felt the dread of alienation from her
brother.&quot;Not for myself, dear Tom. Don't be angry. I shouldn't have asked it,
only that Philip, you know, is a friend of Lucy's and she wishes him
to come, has invited him to come this evening; and I told her I
couldn't see him without telling you. I shall only see him in the
presence of other people. There will never be anything secret between
us again.&quot;Tom looked away from Maggie, knitting his brow more strongly for a
little while. Then he turned to her and said, slowly and
emphatically, -&quot;You know what is my feeling on that subject, Maggie. There is no need
for my repeating anything I said a year ago. While my father was
living, I felt bound to use the utmost power over you, to prevent you
from disgracing him as well as yourself, and all of us. But now I must
leave you to your own choice. You wish to be independent; you told me
so after my father's death. My opinion is not changed. If you think of
Philip Wakem as a lover again, you must give up me.&quot;&quot;I don't wish it, dear Tom, at least as things are; I see that it
would lead to misery. But I shall soon go away to another situation,
and I should like to be friends with him again while I am here. Lucy
wishes it.&quot;The severity of Tom's face relaxed a little.&quot;I shouldn't mind your seeing him occasionally at my uncle's - I don't
want you to make a fuss on the subject. But I have no confidence in
you, Maggie. You would be led away to do anything.&quot;That was a cruel word. Maggie's lip began to tremble.&quot;Why will you say that, Tom? It is very hard of you. Have I not done
and borne everything as well as I could? And I kept my word to
you - when - when -  - My life has not been a happy one, any more than
yours.&quot;She was obliged to be childish; the tears would come. When Maggie was
not angry, she was as dependent on kind or cold words as a daisy on
the sunshine or the cloud; the need of being loved would always subdue
her, as, in old days, it subdued her in the worm-eaten attic. The
brother's goodness came uppermost at this appeal, but it could only
show itself in Tom's fashion. He put his hand gently on her arm, and
said, in the tone of a kind pedagogue, -&quot;Now listen to me, Maggie. I'll tell you what I mean. You're always in
extremes; you have no judgment and self-command; and yet you think you
know best, and will not submit to be guided. You know I didn't wish
you to take a situation. My aunt Pullet was willing to give you a good
home, and you might have lived respectably amongst your relations,
until I could have provided a home for you with my mother. And that is
what I should like to do. I wished my sister to be a lady, and I
always have taken care of you, as my father desired, until you were
well married. But your ideas and mine never accord, and you will not
give way. Yet you might have sense enough to see that a brother, who
goes out into the world and mixes with men, necessarily knows better
what is right and respectable for his sister than she can know
herself. You think I am not kind; but my kindness can only be directed
by what I believe to be good for you.&quot;&quot;Yes, I know, dear Tom,&quot; said Maggie, still half-sobbing, but trying
to control her tears. &quot;I know you would do a great deal for me; I know
how you work, and don't spare yourself. I am grateful to you. But,
indeed, you can't quite judge for me; our natures are very different.
You don't know how differently things affect me from what they do
you.&quot;&quot;Yes, Idoknow; I know it too well. I know how differently you must
feel about all that affects our family, and your own dignity as a
young woman, before you could think of receiving secret addresses from
Philip Wakem. If it was not disgusting to me in every other way, I
should object to my sister's name being associated for a moment with
that of a young man whose father must hate the very thought of us all,
and would spurn you. With any one but you, I should think it quite
certain that what you witnessed just before my father's death would
secure you from ever thinking again of Philip Wakem as a lover. But I
don't feel certain of it with you; I never feel certain about anything
withyou. At one time you take pleasure in a sort of perverse
self-denial, and at another you have not resolution to resist a thing
that you know to be wrong.&quot;There was a terrible cutting truth in Tom's words, - that hard rind of
truth which is discerned by unimaginative, unsympathetic minds. Maggie
always writhed under this judgment of Tom's; she rebelled and was
humiliated in the same moment; it seemed as if he held a glass before
her to show her her own folly and weakness, as if he were a prophetic
voice predicting her future fallings; and yet, all the while, she
judged him in return; she said inwardly that he was narrow and unjust,
that he was below feeling those mental needs which were often the
source of the wrong-doing or absurdity that made her life a planless
riddle to him.She did not answer directly; her heart was too full, and she sat down,
leaning her arm on the table. It was no use trying to make Tom feel
that she was near to him. He always repelled her. Her feeling under
his words was complicated by the allusion to the last scene between
her father and Wakem; and at length that painful, solemn memory
surmounted the immediate grievance. No! She did not think of such
things with frivolous indifference, and Tom must not accuse her of
that. She looked up at him with a grave, earnest gaze and said, -&quot;I can't make you think better of me, Tom, by anything I can say. But
I am not so shut out from all your feelings as you believe me to be. I
see as well as you do that from our position with regard to Philip's
father - not on other grounds - it would be unreasonable, it would be
wrong, for us to entertain the idea of marriage; and I have given up
thinking of him as a lover. I am telling you the truth, and you have
no right to disbelieve me; I have kept my word to you, and you have
never detected me in a falsehood. I should not only not encourage, I
should carefully avoid, any intercourse with Philip on any other
footing than of quiet friendship. You may think that I am unable to
keep my resolutions; but at least you ought not to treat me with hard
contempt on the ground of faults that I have not committed yet.&quot;&quot;Well, Maggie,&quot; said Tom, softening under this appeal, &quot;I don't want
to overstrain matters. I think, all things considered, it will be best
for you to see Philip Wakem, if Lucy wishes him to come to the house.
I believe what you say, - at least you believe it yourself, I know; I
can only warn you. I wish to be as good a brother to you as you will
let me.&quot;There was a little tremor in Tom's voice as he uttered the last words,
and Maggie's ready affection came back with as sudden a glow as when
they were children, and bit their cake together as a sacrament of
conciliation. She rose and laid her hand on Tom's shoulder.&quot;Dear Tom, I know you mean to be good. I know you have had a great
deal to bear, and have done a great deal. I should like to be a
comfort to you, not to vex you. You don't think I'm altogether
naughty, now, do you?&quot;Tom smiled at the eager face; his smiles were very pleasant to see
when they did come, for the gray eyes could be tender underneath the
frown.&quot;No, Maggie.&quot;&quot;I may turn out better than you expect.&quot;&quot;I hope you will.&quot;&quot;And may I come some day and make tea for you, and see this extremely
small wife of Bob's again?&quot;&quot;Yes; but trot away now, for I've no more time to spare,&quot; said Tom,
looking at his watch.&quot;Not to give me a kiss?&quot;Tom bent to kiss her cheek, and then said, -&quot;There! Be a good girl. I've got a great deal to think of to-day. I'm
going to have a long consultation with my uncle Deane this afternoon.&quot;&quot;You'll come to aunt Glegg's to-morrow? We're going all to dine early,
that we may go there to tea. Youmustcome; Lucy told me to say so.&quot;&quot;Oh, pooh! I've plenty else to do,&quot; said Tom, pulling his bell
violently, and bringing down the small bell-rope.&quot;I'm frightened; I shall run away,&quot; said Maggie, making a laughing
retreat; while Tom, with masculine philosophy, flung the bell-rope to
the farther end of the room; not very far either, - a touch of human
experience which I flatter myself will come home to the bosoms of not
a few substantial or distinguished men who were once at an early stage
of their rise in the world, and were cherishing very large hopes in
very small lodgings.>


The suite of rooms opening into each other at Park House looked duly
brilliant with lights and flowers and the personal splendors of
sixteen couples, with attendant parents and guardians. The focus of
brilliancy was the long drawing-room, where the dancing went forward,
under the inspiration of the grand piano; the library, into which it
opened at one end, had the more sober illumination of maturity, with
caps and cards; and at the other end the pretty sitting-room, with a
conservatory attached, was left as an occasional cool retreat. Lucy,
who had laid aside her black for the first time, and had her pretty
slimness set off by an abundant dress of white crape, was the
acknowledged queen of the occasion; for this was one of the Miss
Guests' thoroughly condescending parties, including no member of any
aristocracy higher than that of St. Ogg's, and stretching to the
extreme limits of commercial and professional gentility.Maggie at first refused to dance, saying that she had forgotten all
the figures - it was so many years since she had danced at school; and
she was glad to have that excuse, for it is ill dancing with a heavy
heart. But at length the music wrought in her young limbs, and the
longing came; even though it was the horrible young Torry, who walked
up a second time to try and persuade her. She warned him that she
could not dance anything but a country-dance; but he, of course, was
willing to wait for that high felicity, meaning only to be
complimentary when he assured her at several intervals that it was a
&quot;great bore&quot; that she couldn't waltz, he would have liked so much to
waltz with her. But at last it was the turn of the good old-fashioned
dance which has the least of vanity and the most of merriment in it,
and Maggie quite forgot her troublous life in a childlike enjoyment of
that half-rustic rhythm which seems to banish pretentious etiquette.
She felt quite charitably toward young Torry, as his hand bore her
along and held her up in the dance; her eyes and cheeks had that fire
of young joy in them which will flame out if it can find the least
breath to fan it; and her simple black dress, with its bit of black
lace, seemed like the dim setting of a jewel.Stephen had not yet asked her to dance; had not yet paid her more than
a passing civility. Since yesterday, that inward vision of her which
perpetually made part of his consciousness, had been half screened by
the image of Philip Wakem, which came across it like a blot; there was
some attachment between her and Philip; at least there was an
attachment on his side, which made her feel in some bondage. Here,
then, Stephen told himself, was another claim of honor which called on
him to resist the attraction that was continually threatening to
overpower him. He told himself so; and yet he had once or twice felt a
certain savage resistance, and at another moment a shuddering
repugnance, to this intrusion of Philip's image, which almost made it
a new incitement to rush toward Maggie and claim her for himself.
Nevertheless, he had done what he meant to do this evening, - he had
kept aloof from her; he had hardly looked at her; and he had been
gayly assiduous to Lucy. But now his eyes were devouring Maggie; he
felt inclined to kick young Torry out of the dance, and take his
place. Then he wanted the dance to end that he might get rid of his
partner. The possibility that he too should dance with Maggie, and
have her hand in his so long, was beginning to possess him like a
thirst. But even now their hands were meeting in the dance, - were
meeting still to the very end of it, though they were far off each
other.Stephen hardly knew what happened, or in what automatic way he got
through the duties of politeness in the interval, until he was free
and saw Maggie seated alone again, at the farther end of the room. He
made his way toward her round the couples that were forming for the
waltz; and when Maggie became conscious that she was the person he
sought, she felt, in spite of all the thoughts that had gone before, a
glowing gladness at heart. Her eyes and cheeks were still brightened
with her childlike enthusiasm in the dance; her whole frame was set to
joy and tenderness; even the coming pain could not seem bitter, - she
was ready to welcome it as a part of life, for life at this moment
seemed a keen, vibrating consciousness poised above pleasure or pain.
This one, this last night, she might expand unrestrainedly in the
warmth of the present, without those chill, eating thoughts of the
past and the future.&quot;They're going to waltz again,&quot; said Stephen, bending to speak to her,
with that glance and tone of subdued tenderness which young dreams
create to themselves in the summer woods when low, cooing voices fill
the air. Such glances and tones bring the breath of poetry with them
into a room that is half stifling with glaring gas and hard
flirtation.&quot;They are going to waltz again. It is rather dizzy work to look on,
and the room is very warm; shall we walk about a little?&quot;He took her hand and placed it within his arm, and they walked on into
the sitting-room, where the tables were strewn with engravings for the
accommodation of visitors who would not want to look at them. But no
visitors were here at this moment. They passed on into the
conservatory.&quot;How strange and unreal the trees and flowers look with the lights
among them!&quot; said Maggie, in a low voice. &quot;They look as if they
belonged to an enchanted land, and would never fade away; I could
fancy they were all made of jewels.&quot;She was looking at the tier of geraniums as she spoke, and Stephen
made no answer; but he was looking at her; and does not a supreme poet
blend light and sound into one, calling darkness mute, and light
eloquent? Something strangely powerful there was in the light of
Stephen's long gaze, for it made Maggie's face turn toward it and look
upward at it, slowly, like a flower at the ascending brightness. And
they walked unsteadily on, without feeling that they were walking;
without feeling anything but that long, grave, mutual gaze which has
the solemnity belonging to all deep human passion. The hovering
thought that they must and would renounce each other made this moment
of mute confession more intense in its rapture.But they had reached the end of the conservatory, and were obliged to
pause and turn. The change of movement brought a new consciousness to
Maggie; she blushed deeply, turned away her head, and drew her arm
from Stephen's, going up to some flowers to smell them. Stephen stood
motionless, and still pale.&quot;Oh, may I get this rose?&quot; said Maggie, making a great effort to say
something, and dissipate the burning sense of irretrievable
confession. &quot;I think I am quite wicked with roses; I like to gather
them and smell them till they have no scent left.&quot;Stephen was mute; he was incapable of putting a sentence together, and
Maggie bent her arm a little upward toward the large half-opened rose
that had attracted her. Who has not felt the beauty of a woman's arm?
The unspeakable suggestions of tenderness that lie in the dimpled
elbow, and all the varied gently lessening curves, down to the
delicate wrist, with its tiniest, almost imperceptible nicks in the
firm softness. A woman's arm touched the soul of a great sculptor two
thousand years ago, so that he wrought an image of it for the
Parthenon which moves us still as it clasps lovingly the timeworn
marble of a headless trunk. Maggie's was such an arm as that, and it
had the warm tints of life.A mad impulse seized on Stephen; he darted toward the arm, and
showered kisses on it, clasping the wrist.But the next moment Maggie snatched it from him, and glared at him
like a wounded war-goddess, quivering with rage and humiliation.&quot;How dare you?&quot; She spoke in a deeply shaken, half-smothered voice.
&quot;What right have I given you to insult me?&quot;She darted from him into the adjoining room, and threw herself on the
sofa, panting and trembling.A horrible punishment was come upon her for the sin of allowing a
moment's happiness that was treachery to Lucy, to Philip, to her own
better soul. That momentary happiness had been smitten with a blight,
a leprosy; Stephen thought more lightly ofherthan he did of Lucy.As for Stephen, he leaned back against the framework of the
conservatory, dizzy with the conflict of passions, - love, rage, and
confused despair; despair at his want of self-mastery, and despair
that he had offended Maggie.The last feeling surmounted every other; to be by her side again and
entreat forgiveness was the only thing that had the force of a motive
for him, and she had not been seated more than a few minutes when he
came and stood humbly before her. But Maggie's bitter rage was
unspent.&quot;Leave me to myself, if you please,&quot; she said, with impetuous
haughtiness, &quot;and for the future avoid me.&quot;Stephen turned away, and walked backward and forward at the other end
of the room. There was the dire necessity of going back into the
dancing-room again, and he was beginning to be conscious of that. They
had been absent so short a time, that when he went in again the waltz
was not ended.Maggie, too, was not long before she re-entered. All the pride of her
nature was stung into activity; the hateful weakness which had dragged
her within reach of this wound to her self-respect had at least
wrought its own cure. The thoughts and temptations of the last month
should all be flung away into an unvisited chamber of memory. There
was nothing to allure her now; duty would be easy, and all the old
calm purposes would reign peacefully once more. She re-entered the
drawing-room still with some excited brightness in her face, but with
a sense of proud self-command that defied anything to agitate her. She
refused to dance again, but she talked quite readily and calmly with
every one who addressed her. And when they got home that night, she
kissed Lucy with a free heart, almost exulting in this scorching
moment, which had delivered her from the possibility of another word
or look that would have the stamp of treachery toward that gentle,
unsuspicious sister.The next morning Maggie did not set off to Basset quite so soon as she
had expected. Her mother was to accompany her in the carriage, and
household business could not be dispatched hastily by Mrs. Tulliver.
So Maggie, who had been in a hurry to prepare herself, had to sit
waiting, equipped for the drive, in the garden. Lucy was busy in the
house wrapping up some bazaar presents for the younger ones at Basset,
and when there was a loud ring at the door-bell, Maggie felt some
alarm lest Lucy should bring out Stephen to her; it was sure to be
Stephen.But presently the visitor came out into the garden alone, and seated
himself by her on the garden-chair. It was not Stephen.&quot;We can just catch the tips of the Scotch firs, Maggie, from this
seat,&quot; said Philip.They had taken each other's hands in silence, but Maggie had looked at
him with a more complete revival of the old childlike affectionate
smile than he had seen before, and he felt encouraged.&quot;Yes,&quot; she said, &quot;I often look at them, and wish I could see the low
sunlight on the stems again. But I have never been that way but
once, - to the churchyard with my mother.&quot;&quot;I have been there, I go there, continually,&quot; said Philip. &quot;I have
nothing but the past to live upon.&quot;A keen remembrance and keen pity impelled Maggie to put her hand in
Philip's. They had so often walked hand in hand!&quot;I remember all the spots,&quot; she said, - &quot;just where you told me of
particular things, beautiful stories that I had never heard of
before.&quot;&quot;You will go there again soon, won't you, Maggie?&quot; said Philip,
getting timid. &quot;The Mill will soon be your brother's home again.&quot;&quot;Yes; but I shall not be there,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;I shall only hear of
that happiness. I am going away again; Lucy has not told you,
perhaps?&quot;&quot;Then the future will never join on to the past again, Maggie? That
book is quite closed?&quot;The gray eyes that had so often looked up at her with entreating
worship, looked up at her now, with a last struggling ray of hope in
them, and Maggie met them with her large sincere gaze.&quot;That book never will be closed, Philip,&quot; she said, with grave
sadness; &quot;I desire no future that will break the ties of the past. But
the tie to my brother is one of the strongest. I can do nothing
willingly that will divide me always from him.&quot;&quot;Is that the only reason that would keep us apart forever, Maggie?&quot;
said Philip, with a desperate determination to have a definite answer.&quot;The only reason,&quot; said Maggie, with calm decision. And she believed
it. At that moment she felt as if the enchanted cup had been dashed to
the ground. The reactionary excitement that gave her a proud
self-mastery had not subsided, and she looked at the future with a
sense of calm choice.They sat hand in hand without looking at each other or speaking for a
few minutes; in Maggie's mind the first scenes of love and parting
were more present than the actual moment, and she was looking at
Philip in the Red Deeps.Philip felt that he ought to have been thoroughly happy in that answer
of hers; she was as open and transparent as a rock-pool. Why was he
not thoroughly happy? Jealousy is never satisfied with anything short
of an omniscience that would detect the subtlest fold of the heart.>


The well-furnished drawing-room, with the open grand piano, and the
pleasant outlook down a sloping garden to a boat-house by the side of
the Floss, is Mr. Deane's. The neat little lady in mourning, whose
light-brown ringlets are falling over the colored embroidery with
which her fingers are busy, is of course Lucy Deane; and the fine
young man who is leaning down from his chair to snap the scissors in
the extremely abbreviated face of the &quot;King Charles&quot; lying on the
young lady's feet is no other than Mr. Stephen Guest, whose diamond
ring, attar of roses, and air ofnonchalantleisure, at twelve
o'clock in the day, are the graceful and odoriferous result of the
largest oil-mill and the most extensive wharf in St. Ogg's. There is
an apparent triviality in the action with the scissors, but your
discernment perceives at once that there is a design in it which makes
it eminently worthy of a large-headed, long-limbed young man; for you
see that Lucy wants the scissors, and is compelled, reluctant as she
may be, to shake her ringlets back, raise her soft hazel eyes, smile
playfully down on the face that is so very nearly on a level with her
knee, and holding out her little shell-pink palm, to say, -&quot;My scissors, please, if you can renounce the great pleasure of
persecuting my poor Minny.&quot;The foolish scissors have slipped too far over the knuckles, it seems,
and Hercules holds out his entrapped fingers hopelessly.&quot;Confound the scissors! The oval lies the wrong way. Please draw them
off for me.&quot;&quot;Draw them off with your other hand,&quot; says Miss Lucy, roguishly.&quot;Oh, but that's my left hand; I'm not left-handed.&quot;Lucy laughs, and the scissors are drawn off with gentle touches from
tiny tips, which naturally dispose Mr. Stephen for a repetition _da
capo_. Accordingly, he watches for the release of the scissors, that
he may get them into his possession again.&quot;No, no,&quot; said Lucy, sticking them in her band, &quot;you shall not have my
scissors again, - you have strained them already. Now don't set Minny
growling again. Sit up and behave properly, and then I will tell you
some news.&quot;&quot;What is that?&quot; said Stephen, throwing himself back and hanging his
right arm over the corner of his chair. He might have been sitting for
his portrait, which would have represented a rather striking young man
of five-and-twenty, with a square forehead, short dark-brown hair,
standing erect, with a slight wave at the end, like a thick crop of
corn, and a half-ardent, half-sarcastic glance from under his
well-marked horizontal eyebrows. &quot;Is it very important news?&quot;&quot;Yes, very. Guess.&quot;&quot;You are going to change Minny's diet, and give him three ratafias
soaked in a dessert-spoonful of cream daily?&quot;&quot;Quite wrong.&quot;&quot;Well, then, Dr. Kenn has been preaching against buckram, and you
ladies have all been sending him a roundrobin, saying, 'This is a hard
doctrine; who can bear it?'&quot;&quot;For shame!&quot; said Lucy, adjusting her little mouth gravely. &quot;It is
rather dull of you not to guess my news, because it is about something
I mentioned to you not very long ago.&quot;&quot;But you have mentioned many things to me not long ago. Does your
feminine tyranny require that when you say the thing you mean is one
of several things, I should know it immediately by that mark?&quot;&quot;Yes, I know you think I am silly.&quot;&quot;I think you are perfectly charming.&quot;&quot;And my silliness is part of my charm?&quot;&quot;I didn't saythat.&quot;&quot;But I know you like women to be rather insipid. Philip Wakem betrayed
you; he said so one day when you were not here.&quot;&quot;Oh, I know Phil is fierce on that point; he makes it quite a personal
matter. I think he must be love-sick for some unknown lady, - some
exalted Beatrice whom he met abroad.&quot;&quot;By the by,&quot; said Lucy, pausing in her work, &quot;it has just occurred to
me that I never found out whether my cousin Maggie will object to see
Philip, as her brother does. Tom will not enter a room where Philip
is, if he knows it; perhaps Maggie may be the same, and then we
sha'n't be able to sing our glees, shall we?&quot;&quot;What! is your cousin coming to stay with you?&quot; said Stephen, with a
look of slight annoyance.&quot;Yes; that was my news, which you have forgotten. She's going to leave
her situation, where she has been nearly two years, poor thing, - ever
since her father's death; and she will stay with me a month or
two, - many months, I hope.&quot;&quot;And am I bound to be pleased at that news?&quot;&quot;Oh no, not at all,&quot; said Lucy, with a little air of pique. &quot;Iam
pleased, but that, of course, is no reason whyyoushould be
pleased. There is no girl in the world I love so well as my cousin
Maggie.&quot;&quot;And you will be inseparable I suppose, when she comes. There will be
no possibility of at&Atilde;&ordf;te-&Atilde;&nbsp;-t&Atilde;&ordf;tewith you any more, unless you can
find an admirer for her, who will pair off with her occasionally. What
is the ground of dislike to Philip? He might have been a resource.&quot;&quot;It is a family quarrel with Philip's father. There were very painful
circumstances, I believe. I never quite understood them, or knew them
all. My uncle Tulliver was unfortunate and lost all his property, and
I think he considered Mr. Wakem was somehow the cause of it. Mr. Wakem
bought Dorlcote Mill, my uncle's old place, where he always lived. You
must remember my uncle Tulliver, don't you?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Stephen, with rather supercilious indifference. &quot;I've
always known the name, and I dare say I knew the man by sight, apart
from his name. I know half the names and faces in the neighborhood in
that detached, disjointed way.&quot;&quot;He was a very hot-tempered man. I remember, when I was a little girl
and used to go to see my cousins, he often frightened me by talking as
if he were angry. Papa told me there was a dreadful quarrel, the very
day before my uncle's death, between him and Mr. Wakem, but it was
hushed up. That was when you were in London. Papa says my uncle was
quite mistaken in many ways; his mind had become embittered. But Tom
and Maggie must naturally feel it very painful to be reminded of these
things. They have had so much, so very much trouble. Maggie was at
school with me six years ago, when she was fetched away because of her
father's misfortunes, and she has hardly had any pleasure since, I
think. She has been in a dreary situation in a school since uncle's
death, because she is determined to be independent, and not live with
aunt Pullet; and I could hardly wish her to come to me then, because
dear mamma was ill, and everything was so sad. That is why I want her
to come to me now, and have a long, long holiday.&quot;&quot;Very sweet and angelic of you,&quot; said Stephen, looking at her with an
admiring smile; &quot;and all the more so if she has the conversational
qualities of her mother.&quot;&quot;Poor aunty! You are cruel to ridicule her. She is very valuable tome, I know. She manages the house beautifully, - much better than any
stranger would, - and she was a great comfort to me in mamma's
illness.&quot;&quot;Yes, but in point of companionship one would prefer that she should
be represented by her brandy-cherries and cream-cakes. I think with a
shudder that her daughter will always be present in person, and have
no agreeable proxies of that kind, - a fat, blond girl, with round blue
eyes, who will stare at us silently.&quot;&quot;Oh yes!&quot; exclaimed Lucy, laughing wickedly, and clapping her hands,
&quot;that is just my cousin Maggie. You must have seen her!&quot;&quot;No, indeed; I'm only guessing what Mrs. Tulliver's daughter must be;
and then if she is to banish Philip, our only apology for a tenor,
that will be an additional bore.&quot;&quot;But I hope that may not be. I think I will ask you to call on Philip
and tell him Maggie is coming to-morrow. He is quite aware of Tom's
feeling, and always keeps out of his way; so he will understand, if
you tell him, that I asked you to warn him not to come until I write
to ask him.&quot;&quot;I think you had better write a pretty note for me to take; Phil is so
sensitive, you know, the least thing might frighten him off coming at
all, and we had hard work to get him. I can never induce him to come
to the park; he doesn't like my sisters, I think. It is only your
fa&Atilde;&laquo;ry touch that can lay his ruffled feathers.&quot;Stephen mastered the little hand that was straying toward the table,
and touched it lightly with his lips. Little Lucy felt very proud and
happy. She and Stephen were in that stage of courtship which makes the
most exquisite moment of youth, the freshest blossom-time of
passion, - when each is sure of the other's love, but no formal
declaration has been made, and all is mutual divination, exalting the
most trivial word, the lightest gesture, into thrills delicate and
delicious as wafted jasmine scent. The explicitness of an engagement
wears off this finest edge of susceptibility; it is jasmine gathered
and presented in a large bouquet.&quot;But it is really odd that you should have hit so exactly on Maggie's
appearance and manners,&quot; said the cunning Lucy, moving to reach her
desk, &quot;because she might have been like her brother, you know; and Tom
has not round eyes; and he is as far as possible from staring at
people.&quot;&quot;Oh, I suppose he is like the father; he seems to be as proud as
Lucifer. Not a brilliant companion, though, I should think.&quot;&quot;I like Tom. He gave me my Minny when I lost Lolo; and papa is very
fond of him: he says Tom has excellent principles. It was through him
that his father was able to pay all his debts before he died.&quot;&quot;Oh, ah; I've heard about that. I heard your father and mine talking
about it a little while ago, after dinner, in one of their
interminable discussions about business. They think of doing something
for young Tulliver; he saved them from a considerable loss by riding
home in some marvellous way, like Turpin, to bring them news about the
stoppage of a bank, or something of that sort. But I was rather drowsy
at the time.&quot;Stephen rose from his seat, and sauntered to the piano, humming in
falsetto, &quot;Graceful Consort,&quot; as he turned over the volume of &quot;The
Creation,&quot; which stood open on the desk.&quot;Come and sing this,&quot; he said, when he saw Lucy rising.&quot;What, 'Graceful Consort'? I don't think it suits your voice.&quot;&quot;Never mind; it exactly suits my feeling, which, Philip will have it,
is the grand element of good singing. I notice men with indifferent
voices are usually of that opinion.&quot;&quot;Philip burst into one of his invectives against 'The Creation' the
other day,&quot; said Lucy, seating herself at the piano. &quot;He says it has a
sort of sugared complacency and flattering make-believe in it, as if
it were written for the birthdayf&Atilde;&ordf;teof a German Grand-Duke.&quot;&quot;Oh, pooh! He is the fallen Adam with a soured temper. We are Adam and
Eve unfallen, in Paradise. Now, then, - the recitative, for the sake of
the moral. You will sing the whole duty of woman, - 'And from obedience
grows my pride and happiness.'&quot;&quot;Oh no, I shall not respect an Adam who drags thetempo, as you
will,&quot; said Lucy, beginning to play the duet.Surely the only courtship unshaken by doubts and fears must be that in
which the lovers can sing together. The sense of mutual fitness that
springs from the two deep notes fulfilling expectation just at the
right moment between the notes of the silvery soprano, from the
perfect accord of descending thirds and fifths, from the preconcerted
loving chase of a fugue, is likely enough to supersede any immediate
demand for less impassioned forms of agreement. The contralto will not
care to catechise the bass; the tenor will foresee no embarrassing
dearth of remark in evenings spent with the lovely soprano. In the
provinces, too, where music was so scarce in that remote time, how
could the musical people avoid falling in love with each other? Even
political principle must have been in danger of relaxation under such
circumstances; and the violin, faithful to rotten boroughs, must have
been tempted to fraternize in a demoralizing way with a reforming
violoncello. In that case, the linnet-throated soprano and the
full-toned bass singing, -believed what they sang all the morebecausethey sang it.&quot;Now for Raphael's great song,&quot; said Lucy, when they had finished the
duet. &quot;You do the 'heavy beasts' to perfection.&quot;&quot;That sounds complimentary,&quot; said Stephen, looking at his watch. &quot;By
Jove, it's nearly half-past one! Well, I can just sing this.&quot;Stephen delivered with admirable ease the deep notes representing the
tread of the heavy beasts; but when a singer has an audience of two,
there is room for divided sentiments. Minny's mistress was charmed;
but Minny, who had intrenched himself, trembling, in his basket as
soon as the music began, found this thunder so little to his taste
that he leaped out and scampered under the remotestchiffonnier, as
the most eligible place in which a small dog could await the crack of
doom.&quot;Adieu, 'graceful consort,'&quot; said Stephen, buttoning his coat across
when he had done singing, and smiling down from his tall height, with
the air of rather a patronizing lover, at the little lady on the
music-stool. &quot;My bliss is not incessant, for I must gallop home. I
promised to be there at lunch.&quot;&quot;You will not be able to call on Philip, then? It is of no
consequence; I have said everything in my note.&quot;&quot;You will be engaged with your cousin to-morrow, I suppose?&quot;&quot;Yes, we are going to have a little family-party. My cousin Tom will
dine with us; and poor aunty will have her two children together for
the first time. It will be very pretty; I think a great deal about
it.&quot;&quot;But I may come the next day?&quot;&quot;Oh yes! Come and be introduced to my cousin Maggie; though you can
hardly be said not to have seen her, you have described her so well.&quot;&quot;Good-bye, then.&quot; And there was that slight pressure of the hands, and
momentary meeting of the eyes, which will often leave a little lady
with a slight flush and smile on her face that do not subside
immediately when the door is closed, and with an inclination to walk
up and down the room rather than to seat herself quietly at her
embroidery, or other rational and improving occupation. At least this
was the effect on Lucy; and you will not, I hope, consider it an
indication of vanity predominating over more tender impulses, that she
just glanced in the chimney-glass as her walk brought her near it. The
desire to know that one has not looked an absolute fright during a few
hours of conversation may be construed as lying within the bounds of a
laudable benevolent consideration for others. And Lucy had so much of
this benevolence in her nature that I am inclined to think her small
egoisms were impregnated with it, just as there are people not
altogether unknown to you whose small benevolences have a predominant
and somewhat rank odor of egoism. Even now, that she is walking up and
down with a little triumphant flutter of her girlish heart at the
sense that she is loved by the person of chief consequence in her
small world, you may see in her hazel eyes an ever-present sunny
benignity, in which the momentary harmless flashes of personal vanity
are quite lost; and if she is happy in thinking of her lover, it is
because the thought of him mingles readily with all the gentle
affections and good-natured offices with which she fills her peaceful
days. Even now, her mind, with that instantaneous alternation which
makes two currents of feeling or imagination seem simultaneous, is
glancing continually from Stephen to the preparations she has only
half finished in Maggie's room. Cousin Maggie should be treated as
well as the grandest lady-visitor, - nay, better, for she should have
Lucy's best prints and drawings in her bedroom, and the very finest
bouquet of spring flowers on her table. Maggie would enjoy all that,
she was so found of pretty things! And there was poor aunt Tulliver,
that no one made any account of, she was to be surprised with the
present of a cap of superlative quality, and to have her health drunk
in a gratifying manner, for which Lucy was going to lay a plot with
her father this evening. Clearly, she had not time to indulge in long
reveries about her own happy love-affairs. With this thought she
walked toward the door, but paused there.&quot;What's the matter, then, Minny?&quot; she said, stooping in answer to some
whimpering of that small quadruped, and lifting his glossy head
against her pink cheek. &quot;Did you think I was going without you? Come,
then, let us go and see Sinbad.&quot;Sinbad was Lucy's chestnut horse, that she always fed with her own
hand when he was turned out in the paddock. She was fond of feeding
dependent creatures, and knew the private tastes of all the animals
about the house, delighting in the little rippling sounds of her
canaries when their beaks were busy with fresh seed, and in the small
nibbling pleasures of certain animals which, lest she should appear
too trivial, I will here call &quot;the more familiar rodents.&quot;Was not Stephen Guest right in his decided opinion that this slim
maiden of eighteen was quite the sort of wife a man would not be
likely to repent of marrying, - a woman who was loving and thoughtful
for other women, not giving them Judas-kisses with eyes askance on
their welcome defects, but with real care and vision for their
half-hidden pains and mortifications, with long ruminating enjoyment
of little pleasures prepared for them? Perhaps the emphasis of his
admiration did not fall precisely on this rarest quality in her;
perhaps he approved his own choice of her chiefly because she did not
strike him as a remarkable rarity. A man likes his wife to be pretty;
well, Lucy was pretty, but not to a maddening extent. A man likes his
wife to be accomplished, gentle, affectionate, and not stupid; and
Lucy had all these qualifications. Stephen was not surprised to find
himself in love with her, and was conscious of excellent judgment in
preferring her to Miss Leyburn, the daughter of the county member,
although Lucy was only the daughter of his father's subordinate
partner; besides, he had had to defy and overcome a slight
unwillingness and disappointment in his father and sisters, - a
circumstance which gives a young man an agreeable consciousness of his
own dignity. Stephen was aware that he had sense and independence
enough to choose the wife who was likely to make him happy, unbiassed
by any indirect considerations. He meant to choose Lucy; she was a
little darling, and exactly the sort of woman he had always admired.>


&quot;And now we've settled this Newcastle business, Tom,&quot; said Mr. Deane,
that same afternoon, as they were seated in the private room at the
Bank together, &quot;there's another matter I want to talk to you about.
Since you're likely to have rather a smoky, unpleasant time of it at
Newcastle for the next few weeks, you'll want a good prospect of some
sort to keep up your spirits.&quot;Tom waited less nervously than he had done on a former occasion in
this apartment, while his uncle took out his snuff-box and gratified
each nostril with deliberate impartiality.&quot;You see, Tom,&quot; said Mr. Deane at last, throwing himself backward,
&quot;the world goes on at a smarter pace now than it did when I was a
young fellow. Why, sir, forty years ago, when I was much such a
strapping youngster as you, a man expected to pull between the shafts
the best part of his life, before he got the whip in his hand. The
looms went slowish, and fashions didn't alter quite so fast; I'd a
best suit that lasted me six years. Everything was on a lower scale,
sir, - in point of expenditure, I mean. It's this steam, you see, that
has made the difference; it drives on every wheel double pace, and the
wheel of fortune along with 'em, as our Mr. Stephen Guest said at the
anniversary dinner (he hits these things off wonderfully, considering
he's seen nothing of business). I don't find fault with the change, as
some people do. Trade, sir, opens a man's eyes; and if the population
is to get thicker upon the ground, as it's doing, the world must use
its wits at inventions of one sort or other. I know I've done my share
as an ordinary man of business. Somebody has said it's a fine thing to
make two ears of corn grow where only one grew before; but, sir, it's
a fine thing, too, to further the exchange of commodities, and bring
the grains of corn to the mouths that are hungry. And that's our line
of business; and I consider it as honorable a position as a man can
hold, to be connected with it.&quot;Tom knew that the affair his uncle had to speak of was not urgent; Mr.
Deane was too shrewd and practical a man to allow either his
reminiscences or his snuff to impede the progress of trade. Indeed,
for the last month or two, there had been hints thrown out to Tom
which enabled him to guess that he was going to hear some proposition
for his own benefit. With the beginning of the last speech he had
stretched out his legs, thrust his hands in his pockets, and prepared
himself for some introductory diffuseness, tending to show that Mr.
Deane had succeeded by his own merit, and that what he had to say to
young men in general was, that if they didn't succeed too it was
because of their own demerit. He was rather surprised, then, when his
uncle put a direct question to him.&quot;Let me see, - it's going on for seven years now since you applied to
me for a situation, eh, Tom?&quot;&quot;Yes, sir; I'm three-and-twenty now,&quot; said Tom.&quot;Ah, it's as well not to say that, though; for you'd pass for a good
deal older, and age tells well in business. I remember your coming
very well; I remember I saw there was some pluck in you, and that was
what made me give you encouragement. And I'm happy to say I was right;
I'm not often deceived. I was naturally a little shy at pushing my
nephew, but I'm happy to say you've done me credit, sir; and if I'd
had a son o' my own, I shouldn't have been sorry to see him like you.&quot;Mr. Deane tapped his box and opened it again, repeating in a tone of
some feeling, &quot;No, I shouldn't have been sorry to see him like you.&quot;&quot;I'm very glad I've given you satisfaction, sir; I've done my best,&quot;
said Tom, in his proud, independent way.&quot;Yes, Tom, you've given me satisfaction. I don't speak of your conduct
as a son; though that weighs with me in my opinion of you. But what I
have to do with, as a partner in our firm, is the qualities you've
shown as a man o' business. Ours is a fine business, - a splendid
concern, sir, - and there's no reason why it shouldn't go on growing;
there's a growing capital, and growing outlets for it; but there's
another thing that's wanted for the prosperity of every concern, large
or small, and that's men to conduct it, - men of the right habits; none
o' your flashy fellows, but such as are to be depended on. Now this is
what Mr. Guest and I see clear enough. Three years ago we took Gell
into the concern; we gave him a share in the oil-mill. And why? Why,
because Gell was a fellow whose services were worth a premium. So it
will always be, sir. So it was with me. And though Gell is pretty near
ten years older than you, there are other points in your favor.&quot;Tom was getting a little nervous as Mr. Deane went on speaking; he was
conscious of something he had in his mind to say, which might not be
agreeable to his uncle, simply because it was a new suggestion rather
than an acceptance of the proposition he foresaw.&quot;It stands to reason,&quot; Mr. Deane went on, when he had finished his new
pinch, &quot;that your being my nephew weighs in your favor; but I don't
deny that if you'd been no relation of mine at all, your conduct in
that affair of Pelley's bank would have led Mr. Guest and myself to
make some acknowledgment of the service you've been to us; and, backed
by your general conduct and business ability, it has made us determine
on giving you a share in the business, - a share which we shall be glad
to increase as the years go on. We think that'll be better, on all
grounds, than raising your salary. It'll give you more importance, and
prepare you better for taking some of the anxiety off my shoulders by
and by. I'm equal to a good deal o' work at present, thank God; but
I'm getting older, - there's no denying that. I told Mr. Guest I would
open the subject to you; and when you come back from this northern
business, we can go into particulars. This is a great stride for a
young fellow of three-and-twenty, but I'm bound to say you've deserved
it.&quot;&quot;I'm very grateful to Mr. Guest and you, sir; of course I feel the
most indebted toyou, who first took me into the business, and have
taken a good deal of pains with me since.&quot;Tom spoke with a slight tremor, and paused after he had said this.&quot;Yes, yes,&quot; said Mr. Deane. &quot;I don't spare pains when I see they'll be
of any use. I gave myself some trouble with Gell, else he wouldn't
have been what he is.&quot;&quot;But there's one thing I should like to mention to you uncle. I've
never spoken to you of it before. If you remember, at the time my
father's property was sold, there was some thought of your firm buying
the Mill; I know you thought it would be a very good investment,
especially if steam were applied.&quot;&quot;To be sure, to be sure. But Wakem outbid us; he'd made up his mind to
that. He's rather fond of carrying everything over other people's
heads.&quot;&quot;Perhaps it's of no use my mentioning it at present,&quot; Tom went on,
&quot;but I wish you to know what I have in my mind about the Mill. I've a
strong feeling about it. It was my father's dying wish that I should
try and get it back again whenever I could; it was in his family for
five generations. I promised my father; and besides that, I'm attached
to the place. I shall never like any other so well. And if it should
ever suit your views to buy it for the firm, I should have a better
chance of fulfilling my father's wish. I shouldn't have liked to
mention the thing to you, only you've been kind enough to say my
services have been of some value. And I'd give up a much greater
chance in life for the sake of having the Mill again, - I mean having
it in my own hands, and gradually working off the price.&quot;Mr. Deane had listened attentively, and now looked thoughtful.&quot;I see, I see,&quot; he said, after a while; &quot;the thing would be possible
if there were any chance of Wakem's parting with the property. But
that Idon'tsee. He's put that young Jetsome in the place; and he
had his reasons when he bought it, I'll be bound.&quot;&quot;He's a loose fish, that young Jetsome,&quot; said Tom. &quot;He's taking to
drinking, and they say he's letting the business go down. Luke told me
about it, - our old miller. He says he sha'n't stay unless there's an
alteration. I was thinking, if things went on that way, Wakem might be
more willing to part with the Mill. Luke says he's getting very sour
about the way things are going on.&quot;&quot;Well, I'll turn it over, Tom. I must inquire into the matter, and go
into it with Mr. Guest. But, you see, it's rather striking out a new
branch, and putting you to that, instead of keeping you where you are,
which was what we'd wanted.&quot;&quot;I should be able to manage more than the Mill when things were once
set properly going, sir. I want to have plenty of work. There's
nothing else I care about much.&quot;There was something rather sad in that speech from a young man of
three-and-twenty, even in uncle Deane's business-loving ears.&quot;Pooh, pooh! you'll be having a wife to care about one of these days,
if you get on at this pace in the world. But as to this Mill, we
mustn't reckon on our chickens too early. However, I promise you to
bear it in mind, and when you come back we'll talk of it again. I am
going to dinner now. Come and breakfast with us to-morrow morning, and
say good-bye to your mother and sister before you start.&quot;>


Maggie had been four days at her aunt Moss's giving the early June
sunshine quite a new brightness in the care-dimmed eyes of that
affectionate woman, and making an epoch for her cousins great and
small, who were learning her words and actions by heart, as if she had
been a transient avatar of perfect wisdom and beauty.She was standing on the causeway with her aunt and a group of cousins
feeding the chickens, at that quiet moment in the life of the
farmyards before the afternoon milking-time. The great buildings round
the hollow yard were as dreary and tumbledown as ever, but over the
old garden-wall the straggling rose-bushes were beginning to toss
their summer weight, and the gray wood and old bricks of the house, on
its higher level, had a look of sleepy age in the broad afternoon
sunlight, that suited the quiescent time. Maggie, with her bonnet over
her arm, was smiling down at the hatch of small fluffy chickens, when
her aunt exclaimed, -&quot;Goodness me! who is that gentleman coming in at the gate?&quot;It was a gentleman on a tall bay horse; and the flanks and neck of the
horse were streaked black with fast riding. Maggie felt a beating at
head and heart, horrible as the sudden leaping to life of a savage
enemy who had feigned death.&quot;Who is it, my dear?&quot; said Mrs. Moss, seeing in Maggie's face the
evidence that she knew.&quot;It is Mr. Stephen Guest,&quot; said Maggie, rather faintly. &quot;My cousin
Lucy's - a gentleman who is very intimate at my cousin's.&quot;Stephen was already close to them, had jumped off his horse, and now
raised his hat as he advanced.&quot;Hold the horse, Willy,&quot; said Mrs. Moss to the twelve-year-old boy.&quot;No, thank you,&quot; said Stephen, pulling at the horse's impatiently
tossing head. &quot;I must be going again immediately. I have a message to
deliver to you, Miss Tulliver, on private business. May I take the
liberty of asking you to walk a few yards with me?&quot;He had a half-jaded, half-irritated look, such as a man gets when he
has been dogged by some care or annoyance that makes his bed and his
dinner of little use to him. He spoke almost abruptly, as if his
errand were too pressing for him to trouble himself about what would
be thought by Mrs. Moss of his visit and request. Good Mrs. Moss,
rather nervous in the presence of this apparently haughty gentleman,
was inwardly wondering whether she would be doing right or wrong to
invite him again to leave his horse and walk in, when Maggie, feeling
all the embarrassment of the situation, and unable to say anything,
put on her bonnet, and turned to walk toward the gate.Stephen turned too, and walked by her side, leading his horse.Not a word was spoken till they were out in the lane, and had walked
four or five yards, when Maggie, who had been looking straight before
her all the while, turned again to walk back, saying, with haughty
resentment, -&quot;There is no need for me to go any farther. I don't know whether you
consider it gentlemanly and delicate conduct to place me in a position
that forced me to come out with you, or whether you wished to insult
me still further by thrusting an interview upon me in this way.&quot;&quot;Of course you are angry with me for coming,&quot; said Stephen, bitterly.
&quot;Of course it is of no consequence what a man has to suffer; it is
only your woman's dignity that you care about.&quot;Maggie gave a slight start, such as might have come from the slightest
possible electric shock.&quot;As if it were not enough that I'm entangled in this way; that I'm mad
with love for you; that I resist the strongest passion a man can feel,
because I try to be true to other claims; but you must treat me as if
I were a coarse brute, who would willingly offend you. And when, if I
had my own choice, I should ask you to take my hand and my fortune and
my whole life, and do what you liked with them! I know I forgot
myself. I took an unwarrantable liberty. I hate myself for having done
it. But I repented immediately; I've been repenting ever since. You
ought not to think it unpardonable; a man who loves with his whole
soul, as I do you, is liable to be mastered by his feelings for a
moment; but you know - you must believe - that the worst pain I could
have is to have pained you; that I would give the world to recall the
error.&quot;Maggie dared not speak, dared not turn her head. The strength that had
come from resentment was all gone, and her lips were quivering
visibly. She could not trust herself to utter the full forgiveness
that rose in answer to that confession.They were come nearly in front of the gate again, and she paused,
trembling.&quot;You must not say these things; I must not hear them,&quot; she said,
looking down in misery, as Stephen came in front of her, to prevent
her from going farther toward the gate. &quot;I'm very sorry for any pain
you have to go through; but it is of no use to speak.&quot;&quot;Yes, itisof use,&quot; said Stephen, impetuously. &quot;It would be of use
if you would treat me with some sort of pity and consideration,
instead of doing me vile injustice in your mind. I could bear
everything more quietly if I knew you didn't hate me for an insolent
coxcomb. Look at me; see what a hunted devil I am; I've been riding
thirty miles every day to get away from the thought of you.&quot;Maggie did not - dared not - look. She had already seen the harassed
face. But she said gently, -&quot;I don't think any evil of you.&quot;&quot;Then, dearest, look at me,&quot; said Stephen, in deepest, tenderest tones
of entreaty. &quot;Don't go away from me yet. Give me a moment's happiness;
make me feel you've forgiven me.&quot;&quot;Yes, I do forgive you,&quot; said Maggie, shaken by those tones, and all
the more frightened at herself. &quot;But pray let me go in again. Pray go
away.&quot;A great tear fell from under her lowered eyelids.&quot;I can't go away from you; I can't leave you,&quot; said Stephen, with
still more passionate pleading. &quot;I shall come back again if you send
me away with this coldness; I can't answer for myself. But if you will
go with me only a little way I can live on that. You see plainly
enough that your anger has only made me ten times more unreasonable.&quot;Maggie turned. But Tancred, the bay horse, began to make such spirited
remonstrances against this frequent change of direction, that Stephen,
catching sight of Willy Moss peeping through the gate, called out,
&quot;Here! just come and hold my horse for five minutes.&quot;&quot;Oh, no,&quot; said Maggie, hurriedly, &quot;my aunt will think it so strange.&quot;&quot;Never mind,&quot; Stephen answered impatiently; &quot;they don't know the
people at St. Ogg's. Lead him up and down just here for five minutes,&quot;
he added to Willy, who was now close to them; and then he turned to
Maggie's side, and they walked on. It was clear that shemustgo on
now.&quot;Take my arm,&quot; said Stephen, entreatingly; and she took it, feeling
all the while as if she were sliding downward in a nightmare.&quot;There is no end to this misery,&quot; she began, struggling to repel the
influence by speech. &quot;It is wicked - base - ever allowing a word or look
that Lucy - that others might not have seen. Think of Lucy.&quot;&quot;I do think of her - bless her. If I didn't -  - &quot; Stephen had laid his
hand on Maggie's that rested on his arm, and they both felt it
difficult to speak.&quot;And I have other ties,&quot; Maggie went on, at last, with a desperate
effort, &quot;even if Lucy did not exist.&quot;&quot;You are engaged to Philip Wakem?&quot; said Stephen, hastily. &quot;Is it so?&quot;&quot;I consider myself engaged to him; I don't mean to marry any one
else.&quot;Stephen was silent again until they had turned out of the sun into a
side lane, all grassy and sheltered. Then he burst out impetuously, -&quot;It is unnatural, it is horrible. Maggie, if you loved me as I love
you, we should throw everything else to the winds for the sake of
belonging to each other. We should break all these mistaken ties that
were made in blindness, and determine to marry each other.&quot;&quot;I would rather die than fall into that temptation,&quot; said Maggie, with
deep, slow distinctness, all the gathered spiritual force of painful
years coming to her aid in this extremity. She drew her arm from his
as she spoke.&quot;Tell me, then, that you don't care for me,&quot; he said, almost
violently. &quot;Tell me that you love some one else better.&quot;It darted through Maggie's mind that here was a mode of releasing
herself from outward struggle, - to tell Stephen that her whole heart
was Philip's. But her lips would not utter that, and she was silent.&quot;If you do love me, dearest,&quot; said Stephen, gently, taking her hand
again and laying it within his arm, &quot;it is better - it is right that we
should marry each other. We can't help the pain it will give. It is
come upon us without our seeking; it is natural; it has taken hold of
me in spite of every effort I have made to resist it. God knows, I've
been trying to be faithful to tacit engagements, and I've only made
things worse; I'd better have given way at first.&quot;Maggie was silent. If it werenotwrong - if she were once convinced
of that, and need no longer beat and struggle against this current,
soft and yet strong as the summer stream!&quot;Say've s' dearest,&quot; said Stephen, leaning to look entreatingly in
her face. &quot;What could we care about in the whole world beside, if we
belonged to each other?&quot;Her breath was on his face, his lips were very near hers, but there
was a great dread dwelling in his love for her.Her lips and eyelids quivered; she opened her eyes full on his for an
instant, like a lovely wild animal timid and struggling under
caresses, and then turned sharp round toward home again.&quot;And after all,&quot; he went on, in an impatient tone, trying to defeat
his own scruples as well as hers, &quot;I am breaking no positive
engagement; if Lucy's affections had been withdrawn from me and given
to some one else, I should have felt no right to assert a claim on
her. If you are not absolutely pledged to Philip, we are neither of us
bound.&quot;&quot;You don't believe that; it is not your real feeling,&quot; said Maggie,
earnestly. &quot;You feel, as I do, that the real tie lies in the feelings
and expectations we have raised in other minds. Else all pledges might
be broken, when there was no outward penalty. There would be no such
thing as faithfulness.&quot;Stephen was silent; he could not pursue that argument; the opposite
conviction had wrought in him too strongly through his previous time
of struggle. But it soon presented itself in a new form.&quot;The pledgecan'tbe fulfilled,&quot; he said, with impetuous insistence.
&quot;It is unnatural; we can only pretend to give ourselves to any one
else. There is wrong in that too; there may be misery in it forthemas well as for us. Maggie, you must see that; you do see that.&quot;He was looking eagerly at her face for the least sign of compliance;
his large, firm, gentle grasp was on her hand. She was silent for a
few moments, with her eyes fixed on the ground; then she drew a deep
breath, and said, looking up at him with solemn sadness, -&quot;Oh, it is difficult, - life is very difficult! It seems right to me
sometimes that we should follow our strongest feeling; but then, such
feelings continually come across the ties that all our former life has
made for us, - the ties that have made others dependent on us, - and
would cut them in two. If life were quite easy and simple, as it might
have been in Paradise, and we could always see that one being first
toward whom - I mean, if life did not make duties for us before love
comes, love would be a sign that two people ought to belong to each
other. But I see - I feel it is not so now; there are things we must
renounce in life; some of us must resign love. Many things are
difficult and dark to me; but I see one thing quite clearly, - that I
must not, cannot, seek my own happiness by sacrificing others. Love is
natural; but surely pity and faithfulness and memory are natural too.
And they would live in me still, and punish me if I did not obey them.
I should be haunted by the suffering I had caused. Our love would be
poisoned. Don't urge me; help me, - help me,becauseI love you.&quot;Maggie had become more and more earnest as she went on; her face had
become flushed, and her eyes fuller and fuller of appealing love.
Stephen had the fibre of nobleness in him that vibrated to her appeal;
but in the same moment - how could it be otherwise? - that pleading
beauty gained new power over him.&quot;Dearest,&quot; he said, in scarcely more than a whisper, while his arm
stole round her, &quot;I'll do, I'll bear anything you wish. But - one
kiss - one - the last - before we part.&quot;One kiss, and then a long look, until Maggie said tremulously, &quot;Let me
go, - let me make haste back.&quot;She hurried along, and not another word was spoken. Stephen stood
still and beckoned when they came within sight of Willy and the horse,
and Maggie went on through the gate. Mrs. Moss was standing alone at
the door of the old porch; she had sent all the cousins in, with kind
thoughtfulness. It might be a joyful thing that Maggie had a rich and
handsome lover, but she would naturally feel embarrassed at coming in
again; and it mightnotbe joyful. In either case Mrs. Moss waited
anxiously to receive Maggie by herself. The speaking face told plainly
enough that, if there was joy, it was of a very agitating, dubious
sort.&quot;Sit down here a bit, my dear.&quot; She drew Maggie into the porch, and
sat down on the bench by her; there was no privacy in the house.&quot;Oh, aunt Gritty, I'm very wretched! I wish I could have died when I
was fifteen. It seemed so easy to give things up then; it is so hard
now.&quot;The poor child threw her arms round her aunt's neck, and fell into
long, deep sobs.>


The culmination of Maggie's career as an admired member of society in
St. Ogg's was certainly the day of the bazaar, when her simple noble
beauty, clad in a white muslin of some soft-floating kind, which I
suspect must have come from the stores of aunt Pullet's wardrobe,
appeared with marked distinction among the more adorned and
conventional women around her. We perhaps never detect how much of our
social demeanor is made up of artificial airs until we see a person
who is at once beautiful and simple; without the beauty, we are apt to
call simplicity awkwardness. The Miss Guests were much too well-bred
to have any of the grimaces and affected tones that belong to
pretentious vulgarity; but their stall being next to the one where
Maggie sat, it seemed newly obvious to-day that Miss Guest held her
chin too high, and that Miss Laura spoke and moved continually with a
view to effect.All well-dressed St. Ogg's and its neighborhood were there; and it
would have been worth while to come even from a distance, to see the
fine old hall, with its open roof and carved oaken rafters, and great
oaken folding-doors, and light shed down from a height on the
many-colored show beneath; a very quaint place, with broad faded
stripes painted on the walls, and here and there a show of heraldic
animals of a bristly, long-snouted character, the cherished emblems of
a noble family once the seigniors of this now civic hall. A grand
arch, cut in the upper wall at one end, surmounted an oaken orchestra,
with an open room behind it, where hothouse plants and stalls for
refreshments were disposed; an agreeable resort for gentlemen disposed
to loiter, and yet to exchange the occasional crush down below for a
more commodious point of view. In fact, the perfect fitness of this
ancient building for an admirable modern purpose, that made charity
truly elegant, and led through vanity up to the supply of a deficit,
was so striking that hardly a person entered the room without
exchanging the remark more than once. Near the great arch over the
orchestra was the stone oriel with painted glass, which was one of the
venerable inconsistencies of the old hall; and it was close by this
that Lucy had her stall, for the convenience of certain large plain
articles which she had taken charge of for Mrs. Kenn. Maggie had
begged to sit at the open end of the stall, and to have the sale of
these articles rather than of bead-mats and other elaborate products
of which she had but a dim understanding. But it soon appeared that
the gentlemen's dressing-gowns, which were among her commodities, were
objects of such general attention and inquiry, and excited so
troublesome a curiosity as to their lining and comparative merits,
together with a determination to test them by trying on, as to make
her post a very conspicuous one. The ladies who had commodities of
their own to sell, and did not want dressing-gowns, saw at once the
frivolity and bad taste of this masculine preference for goods which
any tailor could furnish; and it is possible that the emphatic notice
of various kinds which was drawn toward Miss Tulliver on this public
occasion, threw a very strong and unmistakable light on her subsequent
conduct in many minds then present. Not that anger, on account of
spurned beauty can dwell in the celestial breasts of charitable
ladies, but rather that the errors of persons who have once been much
admired necessarily take a deeper tinge from the mere force of
contrast; and also, that to-day Maggie's conspicuous position, for the
first time, made evident certain characteristics which were
subsequently felt to have an explanatory bearing. There was something
rather bold in Miss Tulliver's direct gaze, and something undefinably
coarse in the style of her beauty, which placed her, in the opinion of
all feminine judges, far below her cousin Miss Deane; for the ladies
of St. Ogg's had now completely ceded to Lucy their hypothetic claims
on the admiration of Mr. Stephen Guest.As for dear little Lucy herself, her late benevolent triumph about the
Mill, and all the affectionate projects she was cherishing for Maggie
and Philip, helped to give her the highest spirits to-day, and she
felt nothing but pleasure in the evidence of Maggie's attractiveness.
It is true, she was looking very charming herself, and Stephen was
paying her the utmost attention on this public occasion; jealously
buying up the articles he had seen under her fingers in the process of
making, and gayly helping her to cajole the male customers into the
purchase of the most effeminate futilities. He chose to lay aside his
hat and wear a scarlet fez of her embroidering; but by superficial
observers this was necessarily liable to be interpreted less as a
compliment to Lucy than as a mark of coxcombry. &quot;Guest is a great
coxcomb,&quot; young Torry observed; &quot;but then he is a privileged person in
St. Ogg's - he carries all before him; if another fellow did such
things, everybody would say he made a fool of himself.&quot;And Stephen purchased absolutely nothing from Maggie, until Lucy said,
in rather a vexed undertone, -&quot;See, now; all the things of Maggie's knitting will be gone, and you
will not have bought one. There are those deliciously soft warm things
for the wrists, - do buy them.&quot;&quot;Oh no,&quot; said Stephen, &quot;they must be intended for imaginative persons,
who can chill themselves on this warm day by thinking of the frosty
Caucasus. Stern reason is my forte, you know. You must get Philip to
buy those. By the way, why doesn't he come?&quot;&quot;He never likes going where there are many people, though I enjoined
him to come. He said he would buy up any of my goods that the rest of
the world rejected. But now, do go and buy something of Maggie.&quot;&quot;No, no; see, she has got a customer; there is old Wakem himself just
coming up.&quot;Lucy's eyes turned with anxious interest toward Maggie to see how she
went through this first interview, since a sadly memorable time, with
a man toward whom she must have so strange a mixture of feelings; but
she was pleased to notice that Wakem had tact enough to enter at once
into talk about the bazaar wares, and appear interested in purchasing,
smiling now and then kindly at Maggie, and not calling on her to speak
much, as if he observed that she was rather pale and tremulous.&quot;Why, Wakem is making himself particularly amiable to your cousin,&quot;
said Stephen, in an undertone to Lucy; &quot;is it pure magnanimity? You
talked of a family quarrel.&quot;&quot;Oh, that will soon be quite healed, I hope,&quot; said Lucy, becoming a
little indiscreet in her satisfaction, and speaking with an air of
significance. But Stephen did not appear to notice this, and as some
lady-purchasers came up, he lounged on toward Maggie's end, handling
trifles and standing aloof until Wakem, who had taken out his purse,
had finished his t transactions.&quot;My son came with me,&quot; he overheard Wakem saying, &quot;but he has vanished
into some other part of the building, and has left all these
charitable gallantries to me. I hope you'll reproach him for his
shabby conduct.&quot;She returned his smile and bow without speaking, and he turned away,
only then observing Stephen and nodding to him. Maggie, conscious that
Stephen was still there, busied herself with counting money, and
avoided looking up. She had been well pleased that he had devoted
himself to Lucy to-day, and had not come near her. They had begun the
morning with an indifferent salutation, and both had rejoiced in being
aloof from each other, like a patient who has actually done without
his opium, in spite of former failures in resolution. And during the
last few days they had even been making up their minds to failures,
looking to the outward events that must soon come to separate them, as
a reason for dispensing with self-conquest in detail.Stephen moved step by step as if he were being unwillingly dragged,
until he had got round the open end of the stall, and was half hidden
by a screen of draperies. Maggie went on counting her money till she
suddenly heard a deep gentle voice saying, &quot;Aren't you very tried? Do
let me bring you something, - some fruit or jelly, mayn't I?&quot;The unexpected tones shook her like a sudden accidental vibration of a
harp close by her.&quot;Oh no, thank you,&quot; she said faintly, and only half looking up for an
instant.&quot;You look so pale,&quot; Stephen insisted, in a more entreating tone. &quot;I'm
sure you're exhausted. I must disobey you, and bring something.&quot;&quot;No, indeed, I couldn't take it.&quot;&quot;Are you angry with me? What have I done?Dolook at me.&quot;&quot;Pray, go away,&quot; said Maggie, looking at him helplessly, her eyes
glancing immediately from him to the opposite corner of the orchestra,
which was half hidden by the folds of the old faded green curtain.
Maggie had no sooner uttered this entreaty than she was wretched at
the admission it implied; but Stephen turned away at once, and
following her upward glance, he saw Philip Wakem sealed in the
half-hidden corner, so that he could command little more than that
angle of the hall in which Maggie sat. An entirely new though occurred
to Stephen, and linking itself with what he had observed of Wakem's
manner, and with Lucy's reply to his observation, it convinced him
that there had been some former relation between Philip and Maggie
beyond that childish one of which he had heard. More than one impulse
made him immediately leave the hall and go upstairs to the
refreshment-room, where, walking up to Philip, he sat down behind him,
and put his hand on his shoulder.&quot;Are you studying for a portrait, Phil,&quot; he said, &quot;or for a sketch of
that oriel window? By George, it makes a capital bit from this dark
corner, with the curtain just marking it off.&quot;&quot;I have been studying expression,&quot; said Philip, curtly.&quot;What! Miss Tulliver's? It's rather of the savage-moody order to-day,
I think, - something of the fallen princess serving behind a counter.
Her cousin sent me to her with a civil offer to get her some
refreshment, but I have been snubbed, as usual. There's natural
antipathy between us, I suppose; I have seldom the honor to please
her.&quot;&quot;What a hypocrite you are!&quot; said Philip, flushing angrily.&quot;What! because experience must have told me that I'm universally
pleasing? I admit the law, but there's some disturbing force here.&quot;&quot;I am going,&quot; said Philip, rising abruptly.&quot;So am I - to get a breath of fresh air; this place gets oppressive. I
think I have done suit and service long enough.&quot;The two friends walked downstairs together without speaking. Philip
turned through the outer door into the court-yard; but Stephen,
saying, &quot;Oh, by the by, I must call in here,&quot; went on along the
passage to one of the rooms at the other end of the building, which
were appropriated to the town library. He had the room all to himself,
and a man requires nothing less than this when he wants to dash his
cap on the table, throw himself astride a chair, and stare at a high
brick wall with a frown which would not have been beneath the occasion
if he had been slaying &quot;the giant Python.&quot; The conduct that issues
from a moral conflict has often so close a resemblance to vice that
the distinction escapes all outward judgments founded on a mere
comparison of actions. It is clear to you, I hope, that Stephen was
not a hypocrite, - capable of deliberate doubleness for a selfish end;
and yet his fluctuations between the indulgence of a feeling and the
systematic concealment of it might have made a good case in support of
Philip's accusation.Meanwhile, Maggie sat at her stall cold and trembling, with that
painful sensation in the eyes which comes from resolutely repressed
tears. Was her life to be always like this, - always bringing some new
source of inward strife? She heard confusedly the busy, indifferent
voices around her, and wished her mind could flow into that easy
babbling current. It was at this moment that Dr. Kenn, who had quite
lately come into the hall, and was now walking down the middle with
his hands behind him, taking a general view, fixed his eyes on Maggie
for the first time, and was struck with the expression of pain on her
beautiful face. She was sitting quite still, for the stream of
customers had lessened at this late hour in the afternoon; the
gentlemen had chiefly chosen the middle of the day, and Maggie's stall
was looking rather bare. This, with her absent, pained expression,
finished the contrast between her and her companions, who were all
bright, eager, and busy. He was strongly arrested. Her face had
naturally drawn his attention as a new and striking one at church, and
he had been introduced to her during a short call on business at Mr.
Deane's, but he had never spoken more than three words to her. He
walked toward her now, and Maggie, perceiving some one approaching,
roused herself to look up and be prepared to speak. She felt a
childlike, instinctive relief from the sense of uneasiness in this
exertion, when she saw it was Dr. Kenn's face that was looking at her;
that plain, middle-aged face, with a grave, penetrating kindness in
it, seeming to tell of a human being who had reached a firm, safe
strand, but was looking with helpful pity toward the strugglers still
tossed by the waves, had an effect on Maggie at this moment which was
afterward remembered by her as if it had been a promise. The
middle-aged, who have lived through their strongest emotions, but are
yet in the time when memory is still half passionate and not merely
contemplative, should surely be a sort of natural priesthood, whom
life has disciplined and consecrated to be the refuge and rescue of
early stumblers and victims of self-despair. Most of us, at some
moment in our young lives, would have welcomed a priest of that
natural order in any sort of canonicals or uncanonicals, but had to
scramble upward into all the difficulties of nineteen entirely without
such aid, as Maggie did.&quot;You find your office rather a fatiguing one, I fear, Miss Tulliver,&quot;
said Dr. Kenn.&quot;It is, rather,&quot; said Maggie, simply, not being accustomed to simpler
amiable denials of obvious facts.&quot;But I can tell Mrs. Kenn that you have disposed of her goods very
quickly,&quot; he added; &quot;she will be very much obliged to you.&quot;&quot;Oh, I have done nothing; the gentlemen came very fast to buy the
dressing-gowns and embroidered waistcoats, but I think any of the
other ladies would have sold more; I didn't know what to say about
them.&quot;Dr. Kenn smiled. &quot;I hope I'm going to have you as a permanent
parishioner now, Miss Tulliver; am I? You have been at a distance from
us hitherto.&quot;&quot;I have been a teacher in a school, and I'm going into another
situation of the same kind very soon.&quot;&quot;Ah? I was hoping you would remain among your friends, who are all in
this neighborhood, I believe.&quot;&quot;Oh,I must go,&quot; said Maggie, earnestly, looking at Dr. Kenn with an
expression of reliance, as if she had told him her history in those
three words. It was one of those moments of implicit revelation which
will sometimes happen even between people who meet quite
transiently, - on a mile's journey, perhaps, or when resting by the
wayside. There is always this possibility of a word or look from a
stranger to keep alive the sense of human brotherhood.Dr. Kenn's ear and eye took in all the signs that this brief
confidence of Maggie's was charged with meaning.&quot;I understand,&quot; he said; &quot;you feel it right to go. But that will not
prevent our meeting again, I hope; it will not prevent my knowing you
better, if I can be of any service to you.&quot;He put out his hand and pressed hers kindly before he turned away.&quot;She has some trouble or other at heart,&quot; he thought. &quot;Poor child! she
looks as if she might turn out to be one of&quot;There's something wonderfully honest in those beautiful eyes.&quot;It may be surprising that Maggie, among whose many imperfections an
excessive delight in admiration and acknowledged supremacy were not
absent now, any more than when she was instructing the gypsies with a
view toward achieving a royal position among them, was not more elated
on a day when she had had the tribute of so many looks and smiles,
together with that satisfactory consciousness which had necessarily
come from being taken before Lucy's chevalglass, and made to look at
the full length of her tall beauty, crowned by the night of her massy
hair. Maggie had smiled at herself then, and for the moment had
forgotten everything in the sense of her own beauty. If that state of
mind could have lasted, her choice would have been to have Stephen
Guest at her feet, offering her a life filled with all luxuries, with
daily incense of adoration near and distant, and with all
possibilities of culture at her command. But there were things in her
stronger than vanity, - passion and affection, and long, deep memories
of early discipline and effort, of early claims on her love and pity;
and the stream of vanity was soon swept along and mingled
imperceptibly with that wider current which was at its highest force
today, under the double urgency of the events and inward impulses
brought by the last week.Philip had not spoken to her himself about the removal of obstacles
between them on his father's side, - he shrank from that; but he had
told everything to Lucy, with the hope that Maggie, being informed
through her, might give him some encouraging sign that their being
brought thus much nearer to each other was a happiness to her. The
rush of conflicting feelings was too great for Maggie to say much when
Lucy, with a face breathing playful joy, like one of Correggio's
cherubs, poured forth her triumphant revelation; and Lucy could hardly
be surprised that she could do little more than cry with gladness at
the thought of her father's wish being fulfilled, and of Tom's getting
the Mill again in reward for all his hard striving. The details of
preparation for the bazaar had then come to usurp Lucy's attention for
the next few days, and nothing had been said by the cousins on
subjects that were likely to rouse deeper feelings. Philip had been to
the house more than once, but Maggie had had no private conversation
with him, and thus she had been left to fight her inward battle
without interference.But when the bazaar was fairly ended, and the cousins were alone
again, resting together at home, Lucy said, -&quot;You must give up going to stay with your aunt Moss the day after
to-morrow, Maggie; write a note to her, and tell her you have put it
off at my request, and I'll send the man with it. She won't be
displeased; you'll have plenty of time to go by-and-by; and I don't
want you to go out of the way just now.&quot;&quot;Yes, indeed I must go, dear; I can't put it off. I wouldn't leave
aunt Gritty out for the world. And I shall have very little time, for
I'm going away to a new situation on the 25th of June.&quot;&quot;Maggie!&quot; said Lucy, almost white with astonishment.&quot;I didn't tell you, dear,&quot; said Maggie, making a great effort to
command herself, &quot;because you've been so busy. But some time ago I
wrote to our old governess, Miss Firniss, to ask her to let me know if
she met with any situation that I could fill, and the other day I had
a letter from her telling me that I could take three orphan pupils of
hers to the coast during the holidays, and then make trial of a
situation with her as teacher. I wrote yesterday to accept the offer.&quot;Lucy felt so hurt that for some moments she was unable to speak.&quot;Maggie,&quot; she said at last, &quot;how could you be so unkind to me - not to
tell me - to takesucha step - and now!&quot; She hesitated a little, and
then added, &quot;And Philip? I thought everything was going to be so
happy. Oh, Maggie, what is the reason? Give it up; let me write. There
is nothing now to keep you and Philip apart.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Maggie, faintly. &quot;There is Tom's feeling. He said I must
give him up if I married Philip. And I know he will not change - at
least not for a long while - unless something happened to soften him.&quot;&quot;But I will talk to him; he's coming back this week. And this good
news about the Mill will soften him. And I'll talk to him about
Philip. Tom's always very compliant to me; I don't think he's so
obstinate.&quot;&quot;But I must go,&quot; said Maggie, in a distressed voice. &quot;I must leave
some time to pack. Don't press me to stay, dear Lucy.&quot;Lucy was silent for two or three minutes, looking away and ruminating.
At length she knelt down by her cousin, and looking up in her face
with anxious seriousness, said, -&quot;Maggie, is it that you don't love Philip well enough to marry him?
Tell me - trust me.&quot;Maggie held Lucy's hands tightly in silence a little while. Her own
hands were quite cold. But when she spoke, her voice was quite clear
and distinct.&quot;Yes, Lucy, I would choose to marry him. I think it would be the best
and highest lot for me, - to make his life happy. He loved me first. No
one else could be quite what he is to me. But I can't divide myself
from my brother for life. I must go away, and wait. Pray don't speak
to me again about it.&quot;Lucy obeyed in pain and wonder. The next word she said was, -&quot;Well, dear Maggie, at least you will go to the dance at Park House
to-morrow, and have some music and brightness, before you go to pay
these dull dutiful visits. Ah! here come aunty and the tea.&quot;>


Maggie left her good aunt Gritty at the end of the week, and went to
Garum Firs to pay her visit to aunt Pullet according to agreement. In
the mean time very unexpected things had happened, and there was to be
a family party at Garum to discuss and celebrate a change in the
fortunes of the Tullivers, which was likely finally to carry away the
shadow of their demerits like the last limb of an eclipse, and cause
their hitherto obscured virtues to shine forth in full-rounded
splendor. It is pleasant to know that a new ministry just come into
office are not the only fellow-men who enjoy a period of high
appreciation and full-blown eulogy; in many respectable families
throughout this realm, relatives becoming creditable meet with a
similar cordiality of recognition, which in its fine freedom from the
coercion of any antecedents, suggests the hopeful possibility that we
may some day without any notice find ourselves in full millennium,
with cockatrices who have ceased to bite, and wolves that no longer
show their teeth with any but the blandest intentions.Lucy came so early as to have the start even of aunt Glegg; for she
longed to have some undisturbed talk with Maggie about the wonderful
news. It seemed, did it not? said Lucy, with her prettiest air of
wisdom, as if everything, even other people's misfortunes (poor
creatures!) were conspiring now to make poor dear aunt Tulliver, and
cousin Tom, and naughty Maggie too, if she were not obstinately bent
on the contrary, as happy as they deserved to be after all their
troubles. To think that the very day - thevery day- after Tom had
come back from Newcastle, that unfortunate young Jetsome, whom Mr.
Wakem had placed at the Mill, had been pitched off his horse in a
drunken fit, and was lying at St. Ogg's in a dangerous state, so that
Wakem had signified his wish that the new purchasers should enter on
the premises at once!It was very dreadful for that unhappy young man, but it did seem as if
the misfortune had happened then, rather than at any other time, in
order that cousin Tom might all the sooner have the fit reward of his
exemplary conduct, - papa thought so very highly of him. Aunt Tulliver
must certainly go to the Mill now, and keep house for Tom; that was
rather a loss to Lucy in the matter of household comfort; but then, to
think of poor aunty being in her old place again, and gradually
getting comforts about her there!On this last point Lucy had her cunning projects, and when she and
Maggie had made their dangerous way down the bright stairs into the
handsome parlor, where the very sunbeams seemed cleaner than
elsewhere, she directed her man&Aring;&#147;uvres, as any other great tactician
would have done, against the weaker side of the enemy.&quot;Aunt Pullet,&quot; she said, seating herself on the sofa, and caressingly
adjusting that lady's floating cap-string, &quot;I want you to make up your
mind what linen and things you will give Tom toward housekeeping;
because you are always so generous, - you give such nice things, you
know; and if you set the example, aunt Glegg will follow.&quot;&quot;That she never can, my dear,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, with unusual vigor,
&quot;for she hasn't got the linen to follow suit wi' mine, I can tell you.
She'd niver the taste, not if she'd spend the money. Big checks and
live things, like stags and foxes, all her table-linen is, - not a spot
nor a diamond among 'em. But it's poor work dividing one's linen
before one dies, - I niver thought to ha' done that, Bessy,&quot; Mrs.
Pullet continued, shaking her head and looking at her sister Tulliver,
&quot;when you and me chose the double diamont, the first flax iver we'd
spun, and the Lord knows where yours is gone.&quot;&quot;I'd no choice, I'm sure, sister,&quot; said poor Mrs. Tulliver, accustomed
to consider herself in the light of an accused person. &quot;I'm sure it
was no wish o' mine, iver, as I should lie awake o' nights thinking o'
my best bleached linen all over the country.&quot;&quot;Take a peppermint, Mrs. Tulliver,&quot; said uncle Pullet, feeling that he
was offering a cheap and wholesome form of comfort, which he was
recommending by example.&quot;Oh, but, aunt Pullet,&quot; said Lucy, &quot;you've so much beautiful linen.
And suppose you had had daughters! Then you must have divided it when
they were married.&quot;&quot;Well, I don't say as I won't do it,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, &quot;for now Tom's
so lucky, it's nothing but right his friends should look on him and
help him. There's the tablecloths I bought at your sale, Bessy; it was
nothing but good natur' o' me to buy 'em, for they've been lying in
the chest ever since. But I'm not going to give Maggie any more o' my
Indy muslin and things, if she's to go into service again, when she
might stay and keep me company, and do my sewing for me, if she wasn't
wanted at her brother's.&quot;&quot;Going into service&quot; was the expression by which the Dodson mind
represented to itself the position of teacher or governess; and
Maggie's return to that menial condition, now circumstances offered
her more eligible prospects, was likely to be a sore point with all
her relatives, besides Lucy. Maggie in her crude form, with her hair
down her back, and altogether in a state of dubious promise, was a
most undesirable niece; but now she was capable of being at once
ornamental and useful. The subject was revived in aunt and uncle
Glegg's presence, over the tea and muffins.&quot;Hegh, hegh!&quot; said Mr. Glegg, good-naturedly patting Maggie on the
back, &quot;nonsense, nonsense! Don't let us hear of you taking a place
again, Maggie. Why, you must ha' picked up half-a-dozen sweethearts at
the bazaar; isn't there one of'em the right sort of article? Come,
now?&quot;&quot;Mr. Glegg,&quot; said his wife, with that shade of increased politeness in
her severity which she always put on with her crisper fronts, &quot;you'll
excuse me, but you're far too light for a man of your years. It's
respect and duty to her aunts, and the rest of her kin as are so good
to her, should have kept my niece from fixing about going away again
without consulting us; not sweethearts, if I'm to use such a word,
though it was never heared inmyfamily.&quot;&quot;Why, what did they call us, when we went to see 'em, then, eh,
neighbor Pullet? They thought us sweet enough then,&quot; said Mr. Glegg,
winking pleasantly; while Mr. Pullet, at the suggestion of sweetness,
took a little more sugar.&quot;Mr. Glegg,&quot; said Mrs. G., &quot;if you're going to be undelicate, let me
know.&quot;&quot;La, Jane, your husband's only joking,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet; &quot;let him
joke while he's got health and strength. There's poor Mr. Tilt got his
mouth drawn all o' one side, and couldn't laugh if he was to try.&quot;&quot;I'll trouble you for the muffineer, then, Mr. Glegg,&quot; said Mrs. G.,
&quot;if I may be so bold to interrupt your joking. Though it's other
people must see the joke in a niece's putting a slight on her mother's
eldest sister, as is the head o' the family; and only coming in and
out on short visits, all the time she's been in the town, and then
settling to go away without my knowledge, - as I'd laid caps out on
purpose for her to make 'em up for me, - and me as have divided my
money so equal -  - &quot;&quot;Sister,&quot; Mrs. Tulliver broke in anxiously, &quot;I'm sure Maggie never
thought o' going away without staying at your house as well as the
others. Not as it's my wish she should go away at all, but quite
contrairy. I'm sure I'm innocent. I've said over and over again, 'My
dear, you've no call to go away.' But there's ten days or a fortnight
Maggie'll have before she's fixed to go; she can stay at your house
just as well, and I'll step in when I can, and so will Lucy.&quot;&quot;Bessy,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, &quot;if you'd exercise a little more thought,
you might know I should hardly think it was worth while to unpin a
bed, and go to all that trouble now, just at the end o' the time, when
our house isn't above a quarter of an hour's walk from Mr. Deane's.
She can come the first thing in the morning, and go back the last at
night, and be thankful she's got a good aunt so close to her to come
and sit with. I knowIshould, when I was her age.&quot;&quot;La, Jane,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, &quot;it 'ud do your beds good to have
somebody to sleep in 'em. There's that striped room smells dreadful
mouldy, and the glass mildewed like anything. I'm sure I thought I
should be struck with death when you took me in.&quot;&quot;Oh, there is Tom!&quot; exclaimed Lucy, clapping her hands. &quot;He's come on
Sindbad, as I told him. I was afraid he was not going to keep his
promise.&quot;Maggie jumped up to kiss Tom as he entered, with strong feeling, at
this first meeting since the prospect of returning to the Mill had
been opened to him; and she kept his hand, leading him to the chair by
her side. To have no cloud between herself and Tom was still a
perpetual yearning in her, that had its root deeper than all change.
He smiled at her very kindly this evening, and said, &quot;Well, Magsie,
how's aunt Moss?&quot;&quot;Come, come, sir,&quot; said Mr. Glegg putting out his hand. &quot;Why, you're
such a big man, you carry all before you, it, seems. You're come into
your luck a good deal earlier than us old folks did; but I wish you
joy, I wish you joy. You'll get the Mill all for your own again some
day, I'll be bound. You won't stop half-way up the hill.&quot;&quot;But I hope he'll bear in mind as it's his mother's family as he owes
it to,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg. &quot;If he hadn't had them to take after, he'd
ha' been poorly off. There was never any failures, nor lawing, nor
wastefulness in our family, nor dying without wills -  - &quot;&quot;No, nor sudden deaths,&quot; said aunt Pullet; &quot;allays the doctor called
in. But Tom had the Dodson skin; I said that from the first. And I
don't know whatyoumean to do, sister Glegg, but I mean to give him
a tablecloth of all my three biggest sizes but one, besides sheets. I
don't say what more I shall do; butthatI shall do, and if I should
die to-morrow, Mr. Pullet, you'll bear it in mind, - though you'll be
blundering with the keys, and never remember as that on the third
shelf o' the left-hand wardrobe, behind the night-caps with the broad
ties, - not the narrow-frilled uns, - is the key of the drawer in the
Blue Room, where the key o' the Blue Closet is. You'll make a mistake,
and I shall niver be worthy to know it. You've a memory for my pills
and draughts, wonderful, - I'll allays say that of you, - but you're
lost among the keys.&quot; This gloomy prospect of the confusion that would
ensue on her decease was very affecting to Mrs. Pullet.&quot;You carry it too far, Sophy, - that locking in and out,&quot; said Mrs.
Glegg, in a tone of some disgust at this folly. &quot;You go beyond your
own family. There's nobody can say I don't lock up; but I do what's
reasonable, and no more. And as for the linen, I shall look out what's
serviceable, to make a present of to my nephey; I've got cloth as has
never been whitened, better worth having than other people's fine
holland; and I hope he'll lie down in it and think of his aunt.&quot;Tom thanked Mrs. Glegg, but evaded any promise to meditate nightly on
her virtues; and Mrs. Glegg effected a diversion for him by asking
about Mr. Deane's intentions concerning steam.Lucy had had her far-sighted views in begging Tom to come on Sindbad.
It appeared, when it was time to go home, that the man-servant was to
ride the horse, and cousin Tom was to drive home his mother and Lucy.
&quot;You must sit by yourself, aunty,&quot; said that contriving young lady,
&quot;because I must sit by Tom; I've a great deal to say to him.&quot;In the eagerness of her affectionate anxiety for Maggie, Lucy could
not persuade herself to defer a conversation about her with Tom, who,
she thought, with such a cup of joy before him as this rapid
fulfilment of his wish about the Mill, must become pliant and
flexible. Her nature supplied her with no key to Tom's; and she was
puzzled as well as pained to notice the unpleasant change on his
countenance when she gave him the history of the way in which Philip
had used his influence with his father. She had counted on this
revelation as a great stroke of policy, which was to turn Tom's heart
toward Philip at once, and, besides that, prove that the elder Wakem
was ready to receive Maggie with all the honors of a daughter-in-law.
Nothing was wanted, then, but for dear Tom, who always had that
pleasant smile when he looked at cousin Lucy, to turn completely
round, say the opposite of what he had always said before, and declare
that he, for his part, was delighted that all the old grievances
should be healed, and that Maggie should have Philip with all suitable
despatch; in cousin Lucy's opinion nothing could be easier.But to minds strongly marked by the positive and negative qualities
that create severity, - strength of will, conscious rectitude of
purpose, narrowness of imagination and intellect, great power of
self-control, and a disposition to exert control over others, - prejudices
come as the natural food of tendencies which can get no sustenance
out of that complex, fragmentary, doubt-provoking knowledge which
we call truth. Let a prejudice be bequeathed, carried in the air,
adopted by hearsay, caught in through the eye, - however it may come,
these minds will give it a habitation; it is something to assert
strongly and bravely, something to fill up the void of spontaneous
ideas, something to impose on others with the authority of conscious
right; it is at once a staff and a baton. Every prejudice that will
answer these purposes is self-evident. Our good, upright Tom Tulliver's
mind was of this class; his inward criticism of his father's faults
did not prevent him from adopting his father's prejudice; it was a
prejudice against a man of lax principle and lax life, and it was a
meeting-point for all the disappointed feelings of family and personal
pride. Other feelings added their force to produce Tom's bitter
repugnance to Philip, and to Maggie's union with him; and
notwithstanding Lucy's power over her strong-willed cousin, she got
nothing but a cold refusal ever to sanction such a marriage; &quot;but of
course Maggie could do as she liked, - she had declared her
determination to be independent. For Tom's part, he held himself bound
by his duty to his father's memory, and by every manly feeling, never
to consent to any relation with the Wakems.&quot;Thus, all that Lucy had effected by her zealous mediation was to fill
Tom's mind with the expectation that Maggie's perverse resolve to go
into a situation again would presently metamorphose itself, as her
resolves were apt to do, into something equally perverse, but entirely
different, - a marriage with Philip Wakem.>


Before three days had passed after the conversation you have just
overheard between Lucy and her father she had contrived to have a
private interview with Philip during a visit of Maggie's to her aunt
Glegg. For a day and a night Philip turned over in his mind with
restless agitation all that Lucy had told him in that interview, till
he had thoroughly resolved on a course of action. He thought he saw
before him now a possibility of altering his position with respect to
Maggie, and removing at least one obstacle between them. He laid his
plan and calculated all his moves with the fervid deliberation of a
chess-player in the days of his first ardor, and was amazed himself at
his sudden genius as a tactician. His plan was as bold as it was
thoroughly calculated. Having watched for a moment when his father had
nothing more urgent on his hands than the newspaper, he went behind
him, laid a hand on his shoulder, and said, -&quot;Father, will you come up into my sanctum, and look at my new
sketches? I've arranged them now.&quot;&quot;I'm getting terrible stiff in the joints, Phil, for climbing those
stairs of yours,&quot; said Wakem, looking kindly at his son as he laid
down his paper. &quot;But come along, then.&quot;&quot;This is a nice place for you, isn't it, Phil? - a capital light that
from the roof, eh?&quot; was, as usual, the first thing he said on entering
the painting-room. He liked to remind himself and his son too that his
fatherly indulgence had provided the accommodation. He had been a good
father. Emily would have nothing to reproach him with there, if she
came back again from her grave.&quot;Come, come,&quot; he said, putting his double eye-glass over his nose, and
seating himself to take a general view while he rested, &quot;you've got a
famous show here. Upon my word, I don't see that your things aren't as
good as that London artist's - what's his name - that Leyburn gave so
much money for.&quot;Philip shook his head and smiled. He had seated himself on his
painting-stool, and had taken a lead pencil in his hand, with which he
was making strong marks to counteract the sense of tremulousness. He
watched his father get up, and walk slowly round, good-naturedly
dwelling on the pictures much longer than his amount of genuine taste
for landscape would have prompted, till he stopped before a stand on
which two pictures were placed, - one much larger than the other, the
smaller one in a leather case.&quot;Bless me! what have you here?&quot; said Wakem, startled by a sudden
transition from landscape to portrait. &quot;I thought you'd left off
figures. Who are these?&quot;&quot;They are the same person,&quot; said Philip, with calm promptness, &quot;at
different ages.&quot;&quot;And what person?&quot; said Wakem, sharply fixing his eyes with a growing
look of suspicion on the larger picture.&quot;Miss Tulliver. The small one is something like what she was when I
was at school with her brother at King's Lorton; the larger one is not
quite so good a likeness of what she was when I came from abroad.&quot;Wakem turned round fiercely, with a flushed face, letting his
eye-glass fall, and looking at his son with a savage expression for a
moment, as if he was ready to strike that daring feebleness from the
stool. But he threw himself into the armchair again, and thrust his
hands into his trouser-pockets, still looking angrily at his son,
however. Philip did not return the look, but sat quietly watching the
point of his pencil.&quot;And do you mean to say, then, that you have had any acquaintance with
her since you came from abroad?&quot; said Wakem, at last, with that vain
effort which rage always makes to throw as much punishment as it
desires to inflict into words and tones, since blows are forbidden.&quot;Yes; I saw a great deal of her for a whole year before her father's
death. We met often in that thicket - the Red Deeps - near Dorlcote
Mill. I love her dearly; I shall never love any other woman. I have
thought of her ever since she was a little girl.&quot;&quot;Go on, sir! And you have corresponded with her all this while?&quot;&quot;No. I never told her I loved her till just before we parted, and she
promised her brother not to see me again or to correspond with me. I
am not sure that she loves me or would consent to marry me. But if she
would consent, - if shedidlove me well enough, - I should marry
her.&quot;&quot;And this is the return you make me for all the indulgences I've
heaped on you?&quot; said Wakem, getting white, and beginning to tremble
under an enraged sense of impotence before Philip's calm defiance and
concentration of purpose.&quot;No, father,&quot; said Philip, looking up at him for the first time; &quot;I
don't regard it as a return. You have been an indulgent father to me;
but I have always felt that it was because you had an affectionate
wish to give me as much happiness as my unfortunate lot would admit,
not that it was a debt you expected me to pay by sacrificing all my
chances of happiness to satisfy feelings of yours which I can never
share.&quot;&quot;I think most sons would share their father's feelings in this case,&quot;
said Wakem, bitterly. &quot;The girl's father was an ignorant mad brute,
who was within an inch of murdering me. The whole town knows it. And
the brother is just as insolent, only in a cooler way. He forbade her
seeing you, you say; he'll break every bone in your body, for your
greater happiness, if you don't take care. But you seem to have made
up your mind; you have counted the consequences, I suppose. Of course
you are independent of me; you can marry this girl to-morrow, if you
like; you are a man of five-and-twenty, - you can go your way, and I
can go mine. We need have no more to do with each other.&quot;Wakem rose and walked toward the door, but something held him back,
and instead of leaving the room, he walked up and down it. Philip was
slow to reply, and when he spoke, his tone had a more incisive
quietness and clearness than ever.&quot;No; I can't marry Miss Tulliver, even if she would have me, if I have
only my own resources to maintain her with. I have been brought up to
no profession. I can't offer her poverty as well as deformity.&quot;&quot;Ah,thereis a reason for your clinging to me, doubtless,&quot; said
Wakem, still bitterly, though Philip's last words had given him a
pang; they had stirred a feeling which had been a habit for a quarter
of a century. He threw himself into the chair again.&quot;I expected all this,&quot; said Philip. &quot;I know these scenes are often
happening between father and son. If I were like other men of my age,
I might answer your angry words by still angrier; we might part; I
should marry the woman I love, and have a chance of being as happy as
the rest. But if it will be a satisfaction to you to annihilate the
very object of everything you've done for me, you have an advantage
over most fathers; you can completely deprive me of the only thing
that would make my life worth having.&quot;Philip paused, but his father was silent.&quot;You know best what satisfaction you would have, beyond that of
gratifying a ridiculous rancor worthy only of wandering savages.&quot;&quot;Ridiculous rancor!&quot; Wakem burst out. &quot;What do you mean? Damn it! is a
man to be horsewhipped by a boor and love him for it? Besides, there's
that cold, proud devil of a son, who said a word to me I shall not
forget when we had the settling. He would be as pleasant a mark for a
bullet as I know, if he were worth the expense.&quot;&quot;I don't mean your resentment toward them,&quot; said Philip, who had his
reasons for some sympathy with this view of Tom, &quot;though a feeling of
revenge is not worth much, that you should care to keep it. I mean
your extending the enmity to a helpless girl, who has too much sense
and goodness to share their narrow prejudices.Shehas never entered
into the family quarrels.&quot;&quot;What does that signify? We don't ask what a woman does; we ask whom
she belongs to. It's altogether a degrading thing to you, to think of
marrying old Tulliver's daughter.&quot;For the first time in the dialogue, Philip lost some of his
self-control, and colored with anger.&quot;Miss Tulliver,&quot; he said, with bitter incisiveness, &quot;has the only
grounds of rank that anything but vulgar folly can suppose to belong
to the middle class; she is thoroughly refined, and her friends,
whatever else they may be, are respected for irreproachable honor and
integrity. All St. Ogg's, I fancy, would pronounce her to be more than
my equal.&quot;Wakem darted a glance of fierce question at his son; but Philip was
not looking at him, and with a certain penitent consciousness went on,
in a few moments, as if in amplification of his last words, -&quot;Find a single person in St. Ogg's who will not tell you that a
beautiful creature like her would be throwing herself away on a
pitiable object like me.&quot;&quot;Not she!&quot; said Wakem, rising again, and forgetting everything else in
a burst of resentful pride, half fatherly, half personal. &quot;It would be
a deuced fine match for her. It's all stuff about an accidental
deformity, when a girl's really attached to a man.&quot;&quot;But girls are not apt to get attached under those circumstances,&quot;
said Philip.&quot;Well, then,&quot; said Wakem, rather brutally, trying to recover his
previous position, &quot;if she doesn't care for you, you might have spared
yourself the trouble of talking to me about her, and you might have
spared me the trouble of refusing my consent to what was never likely
to happen.&quot;Wakem strode to the door, and without looking round again, banged it
after him.Philip was not without confidence that his father would be ultimately
wrought upon as he had expected, by what had passed; but the scene had
jarred upon his nerves, which were as sensitive as a woman's. He
determined not to go down to dinner; he couldn't meet his father again
that day. It was Wakem's habit, when he had no company at home, to go
out in the evening, often as early as half-past seven; and as it was
far on in the afternoon now, Philip locked up his room and went out
for a long ramble, thinking he would not return until his father was
out of the house again. He got into a boat, and went down the river to
a favorite village, where he dined, and lingered till it was late
enough for him to return. He had never had any sort of quarrel with
his father before, and had a sickening fear that this contest, just
begun, might go on for weeks; and what might not happen in that time?
He would not allow himself to define what that involuntary question
meant. But if he could once be in the position of Maggie's accepted,
acknowledged lover, there would be less room for vague dread. He went
up to his painting-room again, and threw himself with a sense of
fatigue into the armchair, looking round absently at the views of
water and rock that were ranged around, till he fell into a doze, in
which he fancied Maggie was slipping down a glistening, green, slimy
channel of a waterfall, and he was looking on helpless, till he was
awakened by what seemed a sudden, awful crash.It was the opening of the door, and he could hardly have dozen more
than a few moments, for there was no perceptible change in the evening
light. It was his father who entered; and when Philip moved to vacate
the chair for him, he said, -&quot;Sit still. I'd rather walk about.&quot;He stalked up and down the room once or twice, and then, standing
opposite Philip with his hands thrust in his side pockets, he said, as
if continuing a conversation that had not been broken off, -&quot;But this girl seems to have been fond of you, Phil, else she wouldn't
have met you in that way.&quot;Philip's heart was beating rapidly, and a transient flush passed over
his face like a gleam. It was not quite easy to speak at once.&quot;She liked me at King's Lorton, when she was a little girl, because I
used to sit with her brother a great deal when he had hurt his foot.
She had kept that in her memory, and thought of me as a friend of a
long while ago. She didn't think of me as a lover when she met me.&quot;&quot;Well, but you made love to her at last. What did she say then?&quot; said
Wakem, walking about again.&quot;She said shedidlove me then.&quot;&quot;Confound it, then; what else do you want? Is she a jilt?&quot;&quot;She was very young then,&quot; said Philip, hesitatingly. &quot;I'm afraid she
hardly knew what she felt. I'm afraid our long separation, and the
idea that events must always divide us, may have made a difference.&quot;&quot;But she's in the town. I've seen her at church. Haven't you spoken to
her since you came back?&quot;&quot;Yes, at Mr. Deane's. But I couldn't renew my proposals to her on
several grounds. One obstacle would be removed if you would give your
consent, - if you would be willing to think of her as a daughter-in-law.&quot;Wakem was silent a little while, pausing before Maggie's picture.&quot;She's not the sort of woman your mother was, though, Phil,&quot; he said,
at last. &quot;I saw her at church, - she's handsomer than this, - deuced
fine eyes and fine figure, I saw; but rather dangerous and
unmanageable, eh?&quot;&quot;She's very tender and affectionate, and so simple, - without the airs
and petty contrivances other women have.&quot;&quot;Ah?&quot; said Wakem. Then looking round at his son, &quot;But your mother
looked gentler; she had that brown wavy hair and gray eyes, like
yours. You can't remember her very well. It was a thousand pities I'd
no likeness of her.&quot;&quot;Then, shouldn't you be glad for me to have the same sort of
happiness, father, to sweeten my life for me? There can never be
another tie so strong to you as that which began eight-and-twenty
years ago, when you married my mother, and you have been tightening it
ever since.&quot;&quot;Ah, Phil, you're the only fellow that knows the best of me,&quot; said
Wakem, giving his hand to his son. &quot;We must keep together if we can.
And now, what am I to do? You must come downstairs and tell me. Am I
to go and call on this dark-eyed damsel?&quot;The barrier once thrown down in this way, Philip could talk freely to
his father of their entire relation with the Tullivers, - of the desire
to get the mill and land back into the family, and of its transfer to
Guest &amp; Co. as an intermediate step. He could venture now to be
persuasive and urgent, and his father yielded with more readiness than
he had calculated on.&quot;Idon't care about the mill,&quot; he said at last, with a sort of angry
compliance. &quot;I've had an infernal deal of bother lately about the
mill. Let them pay me for my improvements, that's all. But there's one
thing you needn't ask me. I shall have no direct transactions with
young Tulliver. If you like to swallow him for his sister's sake, you
may; but I've no sauce that will make him go down.&quot;I leave you to imagine the agreeable feelings with which Philip went
to Mr. Deane the next day, to say that Mr. Wakem was ready to open the
negotiations, and Lucy's pretty triumph as she appealed to her father
whether she had not proved her great business abilities. Mr. Deane was
rather puzzled, and suspected that there had been something &quot;going on&quot;
among the young people to which he wanted a clew. But to men of Mr.
Deane's stamp, what goes on among the young people is as extraneous to
the real business of life as what goes on among the birds and
butterflies, until it can be shown to have a malign bearing on
monetary affairs. And in this case the bearing appeared to be entirely
propitious.>


In less than a week Maggie was at St. Ogg's again, - outwardly in much
the same position as when her visit there had just begun. It was easy
for her to fill her mornings apart from Lucy without any obvious
effort; for she had her promised visits to pay to her aunt Glegg, and
it was natural that she should give her mother more than usual of her
companionship in these last weeks, especially as there were
preparations to be thought of for Tom's housekeeping. But Lucy would
hear of no pretext for her remaining away in the evenings; she must
always come from aunt Glegg's before dinner, - &quot;else what shall I have
of you?&quot; said Lucy, with a tearful pout that could not be resisted.And Mr. Stephen Guest had unaccountably taken to dining at Mr. Deane's
as often as possible, instead of avoiding that, as he used to do. At
first he began his mornings with a resolution that he would not dine
there, not even go in the evening, till Maggie was away. He had even
devised a plan of starting off on a journey in this agreeable June
weather; the headaches which he had constantly been alleging as a
ground for stupidity and silence were a sufficient ostensible motive.
But the journey was not taken, and by the fourth morning no distinct
resolution was formed about the evenings; they were only foreseen as
times when Maggie would still be present for a little while, - when one
more touch, one more glance, might be snatched. For why not? There was
nothing to conceal between them; they knew, they had confessed their
love, and they had renounced each other; they were going to part.
Honor and conscience were going to divide them; Maggie, with that
appeal from her inmost soul, had decided it; but surely they might
cast a lingering look at each other across the gulf, before they
turned away never to look again till that strange light had forever
faded out of their eyes.Maggie, all this time, moved about with a quiescence and even torpor
of manner, so contrasted with her usual fitful brightness and ardor,
that Lucy would have had to seek some other cause for such a change,
if she had not been convinced that the position in which Maggie stood
between Philip and her brother, and the prospect of her self-imposed
wearisome banishment, were quite enough to account for a large amount
of depression. But under this torpor there was a fierce battle of
emotions, such as Maggie in all her life of struggle had never known
or foreboded; it seemed to her as if all the worst evil in her had
lain in ambush till now, and had suddenly started up full-armed, with
hideous, overpowering strength! There were moments in which a cruel
selfishness seemed to be getting possession of her; why should not
Lucy, why should not Philip, suffer?Shehad had to suffer through
many years of her life; and who had renounced anything for her? And
when something like that fulness of existence - love, wealth, ease,
refinement, all that her nature craved - was brought within her reach,
why was she to forego it, that another might have it, - another, who
perhaps needed it less? But amidst all this new passionate tumult
there were the old voices making themselves heard with rising power,
till, from time to time, the tumult seemed quelled.Wasthat
existence which tempted her the full existence she dreamed? Where,
then, would be all the memories of early striving; all the deep pity
for another's pain, which had been nurtured in her through years of
affection and hardship; all the divine presentiment of something
higher than mere personal enjoyment, which had made the sacredness of
life? She might as well hope to enjoy walking by maiming her feet, as
hope to enjoy an existence in which she set out by maiming the faith
and sympathy that were the best organs of her soul. And then, if pain
were so hard toher, what was it to others? &quot;Ah, God! preserve me
from inflicting - give me strength to bear it.&quot; How had she sunk into
this struggle with a temptation that she would once have thought
herself as secure from as from deliberate crime? When was that first
hateful moment in which she had been conscious of a feeling that
clashed with her truth, affection, and gratitude, and had not shaken
it from her with horror, as if it had been a loathsome thing? And yet,
since this strange, sweet, subduing influence did not, should not,
conquer her, - since it was to remain simply her own suffering, - her
mind was meeting Stephen's in that thought of his, that they might
still snatch moments of mute confession before the parting came. For
was not he suffering too? She saw it daily - saw it in the sickened
look of fatigue with which, as soon as he was not compelled to exert
himself, he relapsed into indifference toward everything but the
possibility of watching her. Could she refuse sometimes to answer that
beseeching look which she felt to be following her like a low murmur
of love and pain? She refused it less and less, till at last the
evening for them both was sometimes made of a moment's mutual gaze;
they thought of it till it came, and when it had come, they thought of
nothing else.One other thing Stephen seemed now and then to care for, and that was
to sing; it was a way of speaking to Maggie. Perhaps he was not
distinctly conscious that he was impelled to it by a secret
longing - running counter to all his self-confessed resolves - to deepen
the hold he had on her. Watch your own speech, and notice how it is
guided by your less conscious purposes, and you will understand that
contradiction in Stephen.Philip Wakem was a less frequent visitor, but he came occasionally in
the evening, and it happened that he was there when Lucy said, as they
sat out on the lawn, near sunset, -&quot;Now Maggie's tale of visits to aunt Glegg is completed, I mean that
we shall go out boating every day until she goes. She has not had half
enough boating because of these tiresome visits, and she likes it
better than anything. Don't you, Maggie?&quot;&quot;Better than any sort of locomotion, I hope you mean,&quot; said Philip,
smiling at Maggie, who was lolling backward in a low garden-chair;
&quot;else she will be selling her soul to that ghostly boatman who haunts
the Floss, only for the sake of being drifted in a boat forever.&quot;&quot;Should you like to be her boatman?&quot; said Lucy. &quot;Because, if you
would, you can come with us and take an oar. If the Floss were but a
quiet lake instead of a river, we should be independent of any
gentleman, for Maggie can row splendidly. As it is, we are reduced to
ask services of knights and squires, who do not seem to offer them
with great alacrity.&quot;She looked playful reproach at Stephen, who was sauntering up and
down, and was just singing in pianissimo falsetto, -He took no notice, but still kept aloof; he had done so frequently
during Philip's recent visits.&quot;You don't seem inclined for boating,&quot; said Lucy, when he came to sit
down by her on the bench. &quot;Doesn't rowing suit you now?&quot;&quot;Oh, I hate a large party in a boat,&quot; he said, almost irritably. &quot;I'll
come when you have no one else.&quot;Lucy colored, fearing that Philip would be hurt; it was quite a new
thing for Stephen to speak in that way; but he had certainly not been
well of late. Philip colored too, but less from a feeling of personal
offence than from a vague suspicion that Stephen's moodiness had some
relation to Maggie, who had started up from her chair as he spoke, and
had walked toward the hedge of laurels to look at the descending
sunlight on the river.&quot;As Miss Deane didn't know she was excluding others by inviting me,&quot;
said Philip, &quot;I am bound to resign.&quot;&quot;No, indeed, you shall not,&quot; said Lucy, much vexed. &quot;I particularly
wish for your company to-morrow. The tide will suit at half-past ten;
it will be a delicious time for a couple of hours to row to Luckreth
and walk back, before the sun gets too hot. And how can you object to
four people in a boat?&quot; she added, looking at Stephen.&quot;I don't object to the people, but the number,&quot; said Stephen, who had
recovered himself, and was rather ashamed of his rudeness. &quot;If I voted
for a fourth at all, of course it would be you, Phil. But we won't
divide the pleasure of escorting the ladies; we'll take it
alternately. I'll go the next day.&quot;This incident had the effect of drawing Philip's attention with
freshened solicitude toward Stephen and Maggie; but when they
re-entered the house, music was proposed, and Mrs. Tulliver and Mr.
Deane being occupied with cribbage, Maggie sat apart near the table
where the books and work were placed, doing nothing, however, but
listening abstractedly to the music. Stephen presently turned to a
duet which he insisted that Lucy and Philip should sing; he had often
done the same thing before; but this evening Philip thought he divined
some double intention in every word and look of Stephen's, and watched
him keenly, angry with himself all the while for this clinging
suspicion. For had not Maggie virtually denied any ground for his
doubts on her side? And she was truth itself; it was impossible not to
believe her word and glance when they had last spoken together in the
garden. Stephen might be strongly fascinated by her (what was more
natural?), but Philip felt himself rather base for intruding on what
must be his friend's painful secret. Still he watched. Stephen, moving
away from the piano, sauntered slowly toward the table near which
Maggie sat, and turned over the newspapers, apparently in mere
idleness. Then he seated himself with his back to the piano, dragging
a newspaper under his elbow, and thrusting his hand through his hair,
as if he had been attracted by some bit of local news in the &quot;Laceham
Courier.&quot; He was in reality looking at Maggie who had not taken the
slightest notice of his approach. She had always additional strength
of resistance when Philip was present, just as we can restrain our
speech better in a spot that we feel to be hallowed. But at last she
heard the word &quot;dearest&quot; uttered in the softest tone of pained
entreaty, like that of a patient who asks for something that ought to
have been given without asking. She had never heard that word since
the moments in the lane at Basset, when it had come from Stephen again
and again, almost as involuntarily as if it had been an inarticulate
cry. Philip could hear no word, but he had moved to the opposite side
of the piano, and could see Maggie start and blush, raise her eyes an
instant toward Stephen's face, but immediately look apprehensively
toward himself. It was not evident to her that Philip had observed
her; but a pang of shame, under the sense of this concealment, made
her move from her chair and walk to her mother's side to watch the
game at cribbage.Philip went home soon after in a state of hideous doubt mingled with
wretched certainty. It was impossible for him now to resist the
conviction that there was some mutual consciousness between Stephen
and Maggie; and for half the night his irritable, susceptible nerves
were pressed upon almost to frenzy by that one wretched fact; he could
attempt no explanation that would reconcile it with her words and
actions. When, at last, the need for belief in Maggie rose to its
habitual predominance, he was not long in imagining the truth, - she
was struggling, she was banishing herself; this was the clue to all he
had seen since his return. But athwart that belief there came other
possibilities that would not be driven out of sight. His imagination
wrought out the whole story; Stephen was madly in love with her; he
must have told her so; she had rejected him, and was hurrying away.
But would he give her up, knowing - Philip felt the fact with
heart-crushing despair - that she was made half helpless by her feeling
toward him?When the morning came, Philip was too ill to think of keeping his
engagement to go in the boat. In his present agitation he could decide
on nothing; he could only alternate between contradictory intentions.
First, he thought he must have an interview with Maggie, and entreat
her to confide in him; then, again, he distrusted his own
interference. Had he not been thrusting himself on Maggie all along?
She had uttered words long ago in her young ignorance; it was enough
to make her hate him that these should be continually present with her
as a bond. And had he any right to ask her for a revelation of
feelings which she had evidently intended to withhold from him? He
would not trust himself to see her, till he had assured himself that
he could act from pure anxiety for her, and not from egoistic
irritation. He wrote a brief note to Stephen, and sent it early by the
servant, saying that he was not well enough to fulfil his engagement
to Miss Deane. Would Stephen take his excuse, and fill his place?Lucy had arranged a charming plan, which had made her quite content
with Stephen's refusal to go in the boat. She discovered that her
father was to drive to Lindum this morning at ten; Lindum was the very
place she wanted to go to, to make purchases, - important purchases,
which must by no means be put off to another opportunity; and aunt
Tulliver must go too, because she was concerned in some of the
purchases.&quot;You will have your row in the boat just the same, you know,&quot; she said
to Maggie when they went out of the breakfast-room and upstairs
together; &quot;Philip will be here it half-past ten, and it is a delicious
morning. Now don't say a word against it, you dear dolorous thing.
What is the use of my being a fairy godmother, if you set your face
against all the wonders I work for you? Don't think of awful cousin
Tom; you may disobey him a little.&quot;Maggie did not persist in objecting. She was almost glad of the plan,
for perhaps it would bring her some strength and calmness to be alone
with Philip again; it was like revisiting the scene of a quieter life,
in which the very struggles were repose, compared with the daily
tumult of the present. She prepared herself for the boat and at
half-past ten sat waiting in the drawing-room.The ring of the door-bell was punctual, and she was thinking with
half-sad, affectionate pleasure of the surprise Philip would have in
finding that he was to be with her alone, when she distinguished a
firm, rapid step across the hall, that was certainly not Philip's; the
door opened, and Stephen Guest entered.In the first moment they were both too much agitated to speak; for
Stephen had learned from the servant that the others were gone out.
Maggie had started up and sat down again, with her heart beating
violently; and Stephen, throwing down his cap and gloves, came and sat
by her in silence. She thought Philip would be coming soon; and with
great effort - for she trembled visibly - she rose to go to a distant
chair.&quot;He is not coming,&quot; said Stephen, in a low tone. &quot;I am going in the
boat.&quot;&quot;Oh, we can't go,&quot; said Maggie, sinking into her chair again. &quot;Lucy
did not expect - she would be hurt. Why is not Philip come?&quot;&quot;He is not well; he asked me to come instead.&quot;&quot;Lucy is gone to Lindum,&quot; said Maggie, taking off her bonnet with
hurried, trembling fingers. &quot;We must not go.&quot;&quot;Very well,&quot; said Stephen, dreamily, looking at her, as he rested his
arm on the back of his chair. &quot;Then we'll stay here.&quot;He was looking into her deep, deep eyes, far off and mysterious at the
starlit blackness, and yet very near, and timidly loving. Maggie sat
perfectly still - perhaps for moments, perhaps for minutes - until the
helpless trembling had ceased, and there was a warm glow on her check.&quot;The man is waiting; he has taken the cushions,&quot; she said. &quot;Will you
go and tell him?&quot;&quot;What shall I tell him?&quot; said Stephen, almost in a whisper. He was
looking at the lips now.Maggie made no answer.&quot;Let us go,&quot; Stephen murmured entreatingly, rising, and taking her
hand to raise her too. &quot;We shall not be long together.&quot;And they went. Maggie felt that she was being led down the garden
among the roses, being helped with firm, tender care into the boat,
having the cushion and cloak arranged for her feet, and her parasol
opened for her (which she had forgotten), all by this stronger
presence that seemed to bear her along without any act of her own
will, like the added self which comes with the sudden exalting
influence of a strong tonic, and she felt nothing else. Memory was
excluded.They glided rapidly along, Stephen rowing, helped by the
backward-flowing tide, past the Tofton trees and houses; on between
the silent sunny fields and pastures, which seemed filled with a
natural joy that had no reproach for theirs. The breath of the young,
unwearied day, the delicious rhythmic dip of the oars, the fragmentary
song of a passing bird heard now and then, as if it were only the
overflowing of brimful gladness, the sweet solitude of a twofold
consciousness that was mingled into one by that grave, untiring gaze
which need not be averted, - what else could there be in their minds
for the first hour? Some low, subdued, languid exclamation of love
came from Stephen from time to time, as he went on rowing idly, half
automatically; otherwise they spoke no word; for what could words have
been but an inlet to thought? and thought did not belong to that
enchanted haze in which they were enveloped, - it belonged to the past
and the future that lay outside the haze. Maggie was only dimly
conscious of the banks, as they passed them, and dwelt with no
recognition on the villages; she knew there were several to be passed
before they reached Luckreth, where they always stopped and left the
boat. At all times she was so liable to fits of absence, that she was
likely enough to let her waymarks pass unnoticed.But at last Stephen, who had been rowing more and more idly, ceased to
row, laid down the oars, folded his arms, and looked down on the water
as if watching the pace at which the boat glided without his help.
This sudden change roused Maggie. She looked at the far-stretching
fields, at the banks close by, and felt that they were entirely
strange to her. A terrible alarm took possession of her.&quot;Oh, have we passed Luckreth, where we were to stop?&quot; she exclaimed,
looking back to see if the place were out of sight. No village was to
be seen. She turned around again, with a look of distressed
questioning at Stephen.He went on watching the water, and said, in a strange, dreamy, absent
tone, &quot;Yes, a long way.&quot;&quot;Oh, what shall I do?&quot; cried Maggie, in an agony. &quot;We shall not get
home for hours, and Lucy? O God, help me!&quot;She clasped her hands and broke into a sob, like a frightened child;
she thought of nothing but of meeting Lucy, and seeing her look of
pained surprise and doubt, perhaps of just upbraiding.Stephen moved and sat near her, and gently drew down the clasped
hands.&quot;Maggie,&quot; he said, in a deep tone of slow decision, &quot;let us never go
home again, till no one can part us, - till we are married.&quot;The unusual tone, the startling words, arrested Maggie's sob, and she
sat quite still, wondering; as if Stephen might have seen some
possibilities that would alter everything, and annul the wretched
facts.&quot;See, Maggie, how everything has come without our seeking, - in spite
of all our efforts. We never thought of being alone together again; it
has all been done by others. See how the tide is carrying us out, away
from all those unnatural bonds that we have been trying to make faster
round us, and trying in vain. It will carry us on to Torby, and we can
land there, and get some carriage, and hurry on to York and then to
Scotland, - and never pause a moment till we are bound to each other,
so that only death can part us. It is the only right thing, dearest;
it is the only way of escaping from this wretched entanglement.
Everything has concurred to point it out to us. We have contrived
nothing, we have thought of nothing ourselves.&quot;Stephen spoke with deep, earnest pleading. Maggie listened, passing
from her startled wonderment to the yearning after that belief that
the tide was doing it all, that she might glide along with the swift,
silent stream, and not struggle any more. But across that stealing
influence came the terrible shadow of past thoughts; and the sudden
horror lest now, at last, the moment of fatal intoxication was close
upon her, called up feelings of angry resistance toward Stephen.&quot;Let me go!&quot; she said, in an agitated tone, flashing an indignant look
at him, and trying to get her hands free. &quot;You have wanted to deprive
me of any choice. You knew we were come too far; you have dared to
take advantage of my thoughtlessness. It is unmanly to bring me into
such a position.&quot;Stung by this reproach, he released her hands, moved back to his
former place, and folded his arms, in a sort of desperation at the
difficulty Maggie's words had made present to him. If she would not
consent to go on, he must curse himself for the embarrassment he had
led her into. But the reproach was the unendurable thing; the one
thing worse than parting with her was, that she should feel he had
acted unworthily toward her. At last he said, in a tone of suppressed
rage, -&quot;I didn't notice that we had passed Luckreth till we had got to the
next village; and then it came into my mind that we would go on. I
can't justify it; I ought to have told you. It is enough to make you
hate me, since you don't love me well enough to make everything else
indifferent to you, as I do you. Shall I stop the boat and try to get
you out here? I'll tell Lucy that I was mad, and that you hate me; and
you shall be clear of me forever. No one can blame you, because I have
behaved unpardonably to you.&quot;Maggie was paralyzed; it was easier to resist Stephen's pleading than
this picture he had called up of himself suffering while she was
vindicated; easier even to turn away from his look of tenderness than
from this look of angry misery, that seemed to place her in selfish
isolation from him. He had called up a state of feeling in which the
reasons which had acted on her conscience seemed to be transmitted
into mere self-regard. The indignant fire in her eyes was quenched,
and she began to look at him with timid distress. She had reproached
him for being hurried into irrevocable trespass, - she, who had been so
weak herself.&quot;As if I shouldn't feel what happened to you - just the same,&quot; she
said, with reproach of another kind, - the reproach of love, asking for
more trust. This yielding to the idea of Stephen's suffering was more
fatal than the other yielding, because it was less distinguishable
from that sense of others' claims which was the moral basis of her
resistance.He felt all the relenting in her look and tone; it was heaven opening
again. He moved to her side, and took her hand, leaning his elbow on
the back of the boat, and saying nothing. He dreaded to utter another
word, he dreaded to make another movement, that might provoke another
reproach or denial from her. Life hung on her consent; everything else
was hopeless, confused, sickening misery. They glided along in this
way, both resting in that silence as in a haven, both dreading lest
their feelings should be divided again, - till they became aware that
the clouds had gathered, and that the slightest perceptible freshening
of the breeze was growing and growing, so that the whole character of
the day was altered.&quot;You will be chill, Maggie, in this thin dress. Let me raise the cloak
over your shoulders. Get up an instant, dearest.&quot;Maggie obeyed; there was an unspeakable charm in being told what to
do, and having everything decided for her. She sat down again covered
with the cloak, and Stephen took to his oars again, making haste; for
they must try to get to Torby as fast as they could. Maggie was hardly
conscious of having said or done anything decisive. All yielding is
attended with a less vivid consciousness than resistance; it is the
partial sleep of thought; it is the submergence of our own personality
by another. Every influence tended to lull her into acquiescence. That
dreamy gliding in the boat which had lasted for four hours, and had
brought some weariness and exhaustion; the recoil of her fatigued
sensations from the impracticable difficulty of getting out of the
boat at this unknown distance from home, and walking for long
miles, - all helped to bring her into more complete subjection to that
strong, mysterious charm which made a last parting from Stephen seem
the death of all joy, and made the thought of wounding him like the
first touch of the torturing iron before which resolution shrank. And
then there was the present happiness of being with him, which was
enough to absorb all her languid energy.Presently Stephen observed a vessel coming after them. Several
vessels, among them the steamer to Mudport, had passed them with the
early tide, but for the last hour they had seen none. He looked more
and more eagerly at this vessel, as if a new thought had come into his
mind along with it, and then he looked at Maggie hesitatingly.&quot;Maggie, dearest,&quot; he said at last, &quot;if this vessel should be going to
Mudport, or to any convenient place on the coast northward, it would
be our best plan to get them to take us on board. You are fatigued,
and it may soon rain; it may be a wretched business, getting to Torby
in this boat. It's only a trading vessel, but I dare say you can be
made tolerably comfortable. We'll take the cushions out of the boat.
It is really our best plan. They'll be glad enough to take us. I've
got plenty of money about me. I can pay them well.&quot;Maggie's heart began to beat with reawakened alarm at this new
proposition; but she was silent, - one course seemed as difficult as
another.Stephen hailed the vessel. It was a Dutch vessel going to Mudport, the
English mate informed him, and, if this wind held, would be there in
less than two days.&quot;We had got out too far with our boat,&quot; said Stephen. &quot;I was trying to
make for Torby. But I'm afraid of the weather; and this lady - my
wife - will be exhausted with fatigue and hunger. Take us on
board - will you? - and haul up the boat. I'll pay you well.&quot;Maggie, now really faint and trembling with fear, was t aken on board,
making an interesting object of contemplation to admiring Dutchmen.
The mate feared the lady would have a poor time of it on board, for
they had no accommodation for such entirely unlooked-for
passengers, - no private cabin larger than an old-fashioned church-pew.
But at least they had Dutch cleanliness, which makes all other
inconveniences tolerable; and the boat cushions were spread into a
couch for Maggie on the poop with all alacrity. But to pace up and
down the deck leaning on Stephen - being upheld by his strength - was
the first change that she needed; then came food, and then quiet
reclining on the cushions, with the sense that no new resolutioncouldbe taken that day. Everything must wait till to-morrow.
Stephen sat beside her with her hand in his; they could only speak to
each other in low tones; only look at each other now and then, for it
would take a long while to dull the curiosity of the five men on
board, and reduce these handsome young strangers to that minor degree
of interest which belongs, in a sailor's regard, to all objects nearer
than the horizon. But Stephen was triumphantly happy. Every other
thought or care was thrown into unmarked perspective by the certainty
that Maggie must be his. The leap had been taken now; he had been
tortured by scruples, he had fought fiercely with overmastering
inclination, he had hesitated; but repentance was impossible. He
murmured forth in fragmentary sentences his happiness, his adoration,
his tenderness, his belief that their life together must be heaven,
that her presence with him would give rapture to every common day;
that to satisfy her lightest wish was dearer to him than all other
bliss; that everything was easy for her sake, except to part with her;
and now they neverwouldpart; he would belong to her forever, and
all that was his was hers, - had no value for him except as it was
hers. Such things, uttered in low, broken tones by the one voice that
has first stirred the fibre of young passion, have only a feeble
effect - on experienced minds at a distance from them. To poor Maggie
they were very near; they were like nectar held close to thirsty lips;
there was, theremustbe, then, a life for mortals here below which
was not hard and chill, - in which affection would no longer be
self-sacrifice. Stephen's passionate words made the vision of such a
life more fully present to her than it had ever been before; and the
vision for the time excluded all realities, - all except the returning
sun-gleams which broke out on the waters as the evening approached,
and mingled with the visionary sunlight of promised happiness; all
except the hand that pressed hers, and the voice that spoke to her,
and the eyes that looked at her with grave, unspeakable love.There was to be no rain, after all; the clouds rolled off to the
horizon again, making the great purple rampart and long purple isles
of that wondrous land which reveals itself to us when the sun goes
down, - the land that the evening star watches over. Maggie was to
sleep all night on the poop; it was better than going below; and she
was covered with the warmest wrappings the ship could furnish. It was
still early, when the fatigues of the day brought on a drowsy longing
for perfect rest, and she laid down her head, looking at the faint,
dying flush in the west, where the one golden lamp was getting
brighter and brighter. Then she looked up at Stephen, who was still
seated by her, hanging over her as he leaned his arm against the
vessel's side. Behind all the delicious visions of these last hours,
which had flowed over her like a soft stream, and made her entirely
passive, there was the dim consciousness that the condition was a
transient one, and that the morrow must bring back the old life of
struggle; that there were thoughts which would presently avenge
themselves for this oblivion. But now nothing was distinct to her; she
was being lulled to sleep with that soft stream still flowing over
her, with those delicious visions melting and fading like the wondrous
aerial land of the west.>


When Maggie went up to her bedroom that night, it appeared that she
was not at all inclined to undress. She set down her candle on the
first table that presented itself, and began to walk up and down her
room, which was a large one, with a firm, regular, and rather rapid
step, which showed that the exercise was the instinctive vent of
strong excitement. Her eyes and cheeks had an almost feverish
brilliancy; her head was thrown backward, and her hands were clasped
with the palms outward, and with that tension of the arms which is apt
to accompany mental absorption.Had anything remarkable happened?Nothing that you are not likely to consider in the highest degree
unimportant. She had been hearing some fine music sung by a fine bass
voice, - but then it was sung in a provincial, amateur fashion, such as
would have left a critical ear much to desire. And she was conscious
of having been looked at a great deal, in rather a furtive manner,
from beneath a pair of well-marked horizontal eyebrows, with a glance
that seemed somehow to have caught the vibratory influence of the
voice. Such things could have had no perceptible effect on a
thoroughly well-educated young lady, with a perfectly balanced mind,
who had had all the advantages of fortune, training, and refined
society. But if Maggie had been that young lady, you would probably
have known nothing about her: her life would have had so few
vicissitudes that it could hardly have been written; for the happiest
women, like the happiest nations, have no history.In poor Maggie's highly-strung, hungry nature, - just come away from a
third-rate schoolroom, with all its jarring sounds and petty round of
tasks, - these apparently trivial causes had the effect of rousing and
exalting her imagination in a way that was mysterious to herself. It
was not that she thought distinctly of Mr. Stephen Guest, or dwelt on
the indications that he looked at her with admiration; it was rather
that she felt the half-remote presence of a world of love and beauty
and delight, made up of vague, mingled images from all the poetry and
romance she had ever read, or had ever woven in her dreamy reveries.
Her mind glanced back once or twice to the time when she had courted
privation, when she had thought all longing, all impatience was
subdued; but that condition seemed irrecoverably gone, and she
recoiled from the remembrance of it. No prayer, no striving now, would
bring back that negative peace; the battle of her life, it seemed, was
not to be decided in that short and easy way, - by perfect renunciation
at the very threshold of her youth.The music was vibrating in her still, - Purcell's music, with its wild
passion and fancy, - and she could not stay in the recollection of that
bare, lonely past. She was in her brighter aerial world again, when a
little tap came at the door; of course it was her cousin, who entered
in ample white dressing-gown.&quot;Why, Maggie, you naughty child, haven't you begun to undress?&quot; said
Lucy, in astonishment. &quot;I promised not to come and talk to you,
because I thought you must be tired. But here you are, looking as if
you were ready to dress for a ball. Come, come, get on your
dressing-gown and unplait your hair.&quot;&quot;Well,youare not very forward,&quot; retorted Maggie, hastily reaching
her own pink cotton gown, and looking at Lucy's light-brown hair
brushed back in curly disorder.&quot;Oh, I have not much to do. I shall sit down and talk to you till I
see you are really on the way to bed.&quot;While Maggie stood and unplaited her long black hair over her pink
drapery, Lucy sat down near the toilette-table, watching her with
affectionate eyes, and head a little aside, like a pretty spaniel. If
it appears to you at all incredible that young ladies should be led on
to talk confidentially in a situation of this kind, I will beg you to
remember that human life furnishes many exceptional cases.&quot;You reallyhaveenjoyed the music to-night, haven't you Maggie?&quot;&quot;Oh yes, that is what prevented me from feeling sleepy. I think I
should have no other mortal wants, if I could always have plenty of
music. It seems to infuse strength into my limbs, and ideas into my
brain. Life seems to go on without effort, when I am filled with
music. At other times one is conscious of carrying a weight.&quot;&quot;And Stephen has a splendid voice, hasn't he?&quot;&quot;Well, perhaps we are neither of us judges of that,&quot; said Maggie,
laughing, as she seated herself and tossed her long hair back. &quot;You
are not impartial, andIthink any barrel-organ splendid.&quot;&quot;But tell me what you think of him, now. Tell me exactly; good and bad
too.&quot;&quot;Oh, I think you should humiliate him a little. A lover should not be
so much at ease, and so self-confident. He ought to tremble more.&quot;&quot;Nonsense, Maggie! As if any one could tremble at me! You think he is
conceited, I see that. But you don't dislike him, do you?&quot;&quot;Dislike him! No. Am I in the habit of seeing such charming people,
that I should be very difficult to please? Besides, how could I
dislike any one that promised to make you happy, my dear thing!&quot;
Maggie pinched Lucy's dimpled chin.&quot;We shall have more music to-morrow evening,&quot; said Lucy, looking happy
already, &quot;for Stephen will bring Philip Wakem with him.&quot;&quot;Oh, Lucy, I can't see him,&quot; said Maggie, turning pale. &quot;At least, I
could not see him without Tom's leave.&quot;&quot;Is Tom such a tyrant as that?&quot; said Lucy, surprised. &quot;I'll take the
responsibility, then, - tell him it was my fault.&quot;&quot;But, dear,&quot; said Maggie, falteringly, &quot;I promised Tom very solemnly,
before my father's death, - I promised him I would not speak to Philip
without his knowledge and consent. And I have a great dread of opening
the subject with Tom, - of getting into a quarrel with him again.&quot;&quot;But I never heard of anything so strange and unreasonable. What harm
can poor Philip have done? May I speak to Tom about it?&quot;&quot;Oh no, pray don't, dear,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;I'll go to him myself
to-morrow, and tell him that you wish Philip to come. I've thought
before of asking him to absolve me from my promise, but I've not had
the courage to determine on it.&quot;They were both silent for some moments, and then Lucy said, -&quot;Maggie, you have secrets from me, and I have none from you.&quot;Maggie looked meditatively away from Lucy. Then she turned to her and
said, &quot;Ishouldlike to tell you about Philip. But, Lucy, you must
not betray that you know it to any one - least of all to Philip
himself, or to Mr. Stephen Guest.&quot;The narrative lasted long, for Maggie had never before known the
relief of such an outpouring; she had never before told Lucy anything
of her inmost life; and the sweet face bent toward her with
sympathetic interest, and the little hand pressing hers, encouraged
her to speak on. On two points only she was not expansive. She did not
betray fully what still rankled in her mind as Tom's great
offence, - the insults he had heaped on Philip. Angry as the
remembrance still made her, she could not bear that any one else
should know it at all, both for Tom's sake and Philip's. And she could
not bear to tell Lucy of the last scene between her father and Wakem,
though it was this scene which she had ever since felt to be a new
barrier between herself and Philip. She merely said, she saw now that
Tom was, no the whole, right in regarding any prospect of love and
marriage between her and Philip as put out of the question by the
relation of the two families. Of course Philip's father would never
consent.&quot;There, Lucy, you have had my story,&quot; said Maggie, smiling, with the
tears in her eyes. &quot;You see I am like Sir Andrew Aguecheek.Iwas
adored once.&quot;&quot;Ah, now I see how it is you know Shakespeare and everything, and have
learned so much since you left school; which always seemed to me
witchcraft before, - part of your general uncanniness,&quot; said Lucy.She mused a little with her eyes downward, and then added, looking at
Maggie, &quot;It is very beautiful that you should love Philip; I never
thought such a happiness would befall him. And in my opinion, you
ought not to give him up. There are obstacles now; but they may be
done away with in time.&quot;Maggie shook her head.&quot;Yes, yes,&quot; persisted Lucy; &quot;I can't help being hopeful about it.
There is something romantic in it, - out of the common way, - just what
everything that happens to you ought to be. And Philip will adore you
like a husband in a fairy tale. Oh, I shall puzzle my small brain to
contrive some plot that will bring everybody into the right mind, so
that you may marry Philip when I marry - somebody else. Wouldn't that
be a pretty ending to all my poor, poor Maggie's troubles?&quot;Maggie tried to smile, but shivered, as if she felt a sudden chill.&quot;Ah, dear, you are cold,&quot; said Lucy. &quot;You must go to bed; and so must
I. I dare not think what time it is.&quot;They kissed each other, and Lucy went away, possessed of a confidence
which had a strong influence over her subsequent impressions. Maggie
had been thoroughly sincere; her nature had never found it easy to be
otherwise. But confidences are sometimes blinding, even when they are
sincere.>


When the coach set down Tom and Maggie, it was five hours since she
had started from home, and she was thinking with some trembling that
her father had perhaps missed her, and asked for &quot;the little wench&quot; in
vain. She thought of no other change that might have happened.She hurried along the gravel-walk and entered the house before Tom;
but in the entrance she was startled by a strong smell of tobacco. The
parlor door was ajar; that was where the smell came from. It was very
strange; could any visitor be smoking at a time like this? Was her
mother there? If so, she must be told that Tom was come. Maggie, after
this pause of surprise, was only in the act of opening the door when
Tom came up, and they both looked into the parlor together.There was a coarse, dingy man, of whose face Tom had some vague
recollection, sitting in his father's chair, smoking, with a jug and
glass beside him.The truth flashed on Tom's mind in an instant. To &quot;have the bailiff in
the house,&quot; and &quot;to be sold up,&quot; were phrases which he had been used
to, even as a little boy; they were part of the disgrace and misery of
&quot;failing,&quot; of losing all one's money, and being ruined, - sinking into
the condition of poor working people. It seemed only natural this
should happen, since his father had lost all his property, and he
thought of no more special cause for this particular form of
misfortune than the loss of the lawsuit. But the immediate presence of
this disgrace was so much keener an experience to Tom than the worst
form of apprehension, that he felt at this moment as if his real
trouble had only just begin; it was a touch on the irritated nerve
compared with its spontaneous dull aching.&quot;How do you do, sir?&quot; said the man, taking the pipe out of his mouth,
with rough, embarrassed civility. The two young startled faces made
him a little uncomfortable.But Tom turned away hastily without speaking; the sight was too
hateful. Maggie had not understood the appearance of this stranger, as
Tom had. She followed him, whispering: &quot;Who can it be, Tom? What is
the matter?&quot; Then, with a sudden undefined dread lest this stranger
might have something to do with a change in her father, she rushed
upstairs, checking herself at the bedroom door to throw off her
bonnet, and enter on tiptoe. All was silent there; her father was
lying, heedless of everything around him, with his eyes closed as when
she had left him. A servant was there, but not her mother.&quot;Where's my mother?&quot; she whispered. The servant did not know.Maggie hastened out, and said to Tom; &quot;Father is lying quiet; let us
go and look for my mother. I wonder where she is.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver was not downstairs, not in any of the bedrooms. There
was but one room below the attic which Maggie had left unsearched; it
was the storeroom, where her mother kept all her linen and all the
precious &quot;best things&quot; that were only unwrapped and brought out on
special occasions.Tom, preceding Maggie, as they returned along the passage, opened the
door of this room, and immediately said, &quot;Mother!&quot;Mrs. Tulliver was seated there with all her laid-up treasures. One of
the linen chests was open; the silver teapot was unwrapped from its
many folds of paper, and the best china was laid out on the top of the
closed linen-chest; spoons and skewers and ladles were spread in rows
on the shelves; and the poor woman was shaking her head and weeping,
with a bitter tension of the mouth, over the mark, &quot;Elizabeth Dodson,&quot;
on the corner of some tablecloths she held in her lap.She dropped them, and started up as Tom spoke.&quot;Oh, my boy, my boy!&quot; she said, clasping him round the neck. &quot;To think
as I should live to see this day! We're ruined - everything's going to
be sold up - to think as your father should ha' married me to bring me
to this! We've got nothing - we shall be beggars - we must go to the
workhouse -  - &quot;She kissed him, then seated herself again, and took another tablecloth
on her lap, unfolding it a little way to look at the pattern, while
the children stood by in mute wretchedness, their minds quite filled
for the moment with the words &quot;beggars&quot; and &quot;workhouse.&quot;&quot;To think o' these cloths as I spun myself,&quot; she went on, lifting
things out and turning them over with an excitement all the more
strange and piteous because the stout blond woman was usually so
passive, - if she had been ruffled before, it was at the surface
merely, - &quot;and Job Haxey wove 'em, and brought the piece home on his
back, as I remember standing at the door and seeing him come, before I
ever thought o' marrying your father! And the pattern as I chose
myself, and bleached so beautiful, and I marked 'em so as nobody ever
saw such marking, - they must cut the cloth to get it out, for it's a
particular stitch. And they're all to be sold, and go into strange
people's houses, and perhaps be cut with the knives, and wore out
before I'm dead. You'll never have one of 'em, my boy,&quot; she said,
looking up at Tom with her eyes full of tears, &quot;and I meant 'em for
you. I wanted you to have all o' this pattern. Maggie could have had
the large check - it never shows so well when the dishes are on it.&quot;Tom was touched to the quick, but there was an angry reaction
immediately. His face flushed as he said:&quot;But will my aunts let them be sold, mother? Do they know about it?
They'll never let your linen go, will they? Haven't you sent to them?&quot;&quot;Yes, I sent Luke directly they'd put the bailies in, and your aunt
Pullet's been - and, oh dear, oh dear, she cries so and says your
father's disgraced my family and made it the talk o' the country; and
she'll buy the spotted cloths for herself, because she's never had so
many as she wanted o' that pattern, and they sha'n't go to strangers,
but she's got more checks a'ready nor she can do with.&quot; (Here Mrs.
Tulliver began to lay back the tablecloths in the chest, folding and
stroking them automatically.) &quot;And your uncle Glegg's been too, and he
says things must be bought in for us to lie down on, but he must talk
to your aunt; and they're all coming to consult. But I know they'll
none of 'em take my chany,&quot; she added, turning toward the cups and
saucers, &quot;for they all found fault with 'em when I bought 'em, 'cause
o' the small gold sprig all over 'em, between the flowers. But there's
none of 'em got better chany, not even your aunt Pullet herself; and I
bought it wi' my own money as I'd saved ever since I was turned
fifteen; and the silver teapot, too, - your father never paid for 'em.
And to think as he should ha' married me, and brought me to this.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver burst out crying afresh, and she sobbed with her
handkerchief at her eyes a few moments, but then removing it, she said
in a deprecating way, still half sobbing, as if she were called upon
to speak before she could command her voice, -&quot;And Ididsay to him times and times, 'Whativer you do, don't go to
law,' and what more could I do? I've had to sit by while my own
fortin's been spent, and what should ha' been my children's, too.
You'll have niver a penny, my boy - but it isn't your poor mother's
fault.&quot;She put out one arm toward Tom, looking up at him piteously with her
helpless, childish blue eyes. The poor lad went to her and kissed her,
and she clung to him. For the first time Tom thought of his father
with some reproach. His natural inclination to blame, hitherto kept
entirely in abeyance toward his father by the predisposition to think
him always right, simply on the ground that he was Tom Tulliver's
father, was turned into this new channel by his mother's plaints; and
with his indignation against Wakem there began to mingle some
indignation of another sort. Perhaps his father might have helped
bringing them all down in the world, and making people talk of them
with contempt, but no one should talk long of Tom Tulliver with
contempt.The natural strength and firmness of his nature was beginning to
assert itself, urged by the double stimulus of resentment against his
aunts, and the sense that he must behave like a man and take care of
his mother.&quot;Don't fret, mother,&quot; he said tenderly. &quot;I shall soon be able to get
money; I'll get a situation of some sort.&quot;&quot;Bless you, my boy!&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, a little soothed. Then,
looking round sadly, &quot;But I shouldn't ha' minded so much if we could
ha' kept the things wi' my name on 'em.&quot;Maggie had witnessed this scene with gathering anger. The implied
reproaches against her father - her father, who was lying there in a
sort of living death - neutralized all her pity for griefs about
tablecloths and china; and her anger on her father's account was
heightened by some egoistic resentment at Tom's silent concurrence
with her mother in shutting her out from the common calamity. She had
become almost indifferent to her mother's habitual depreciation of
her, but she was keenly alive to any sanction of it, however passive,
that she might suspect in Tom. Poor Maggie was by no means made up of
unalloyed devotedness, but put forth large claims for herself where
she loved strongly. She burst out at last in an agitated, almost
violent tone: &quot;Mother, how can you talk so; as if you cared only for
things withyourname on, and not for what has my father's name too;
and to care about anything but dear father himself! - when he's lying
there, and may never speak to us again. Tom, you ought to say so too;
you ought not to let any one find fault with my father.&quot;Maggie, almost choked with mingled grief and anger, left the room, and
took her old place on her father's bed. Her heart went out to him with
a stronger movement than ever, at the thought that people would blame
him. Maggie hated blame; she had been blamed all her life, and nothing
had come of it but evil tempers.Her father had always defended and excused her, and her loving
remembrance of his tenderness was a force within her that would enable
her to do or bear anything for his sake.Tom was a little shocked at Maggie's outburst, - tellinghimas well
as his mother what it was right to do! She ought to have learned
better than have those hectoring, assuming manners, by this time. But
he presently went into his father's room, and the sight there touched
him in a way that effaced the slighter impressions of the previous
hour. When Maggie saw how he was moved, she went to him and put her
arm round his neck as he sat by the bed, and the two children forgot
everything else in the sense that they had one father and one sorrow.>


The days passed, and Mr. Tulliver showed, at least to the eyes of the
medical man, stronger and stronger symptoms of a gradual return to his
normal condition; the paralytic obstruction was, little by little,
losing its tenacity, and the mind was rising from under it with fitful
struggles, like a living creature making its way from under a great
snowdrift, that slides and slides again, and shuts up the newly made
opening.Time would have seemed to creep to the watchers by the bed, if it had
only been measured by the doubtful, distant hope which kept count of
the moments within the chamber; but it was measured for them by a
fast-approaching dread which made the nights come too quickly. While
Mr. Tulliver was slowly becoming himself again, his lot was hastening
toward its moment of most palpable change. The taxing-masters had done
their work like any respectable gunsmith conscientiously preparing the
musket, that, duly pointed by a brave arm, will spoil a life or two.
Allocaturs, filing of bills in Chancery, decrees of sale, are legal
chain-shot or bomb-shells that can never hit a solitary mark, but must
fall with widespread shattering. So deeply inherent is it in this life
of ours that men have to suffer for each other's sins, so inevitably
diffusive is human suffering, that even justice makes its victims, and
we can conceive no retribution that does not spread beyond its mark in
pulsations of unmerited pain.By the beginning of the second week in January, the bills were out
advertising the sale, under a decree of Chancery, of Mr. Tulliver's
farming and other stock, to be followed by a sale of the mill and
land, held in the proper after-dinner hour at the Golden Lion. The
miller himself, unaware of the lapse of time, fancied himself still in
that first stage of his misfortunes when expedients might be thought
of; and often in his conscious hours talked in a feeble, disjointed
manner of plans he would carry out when he &quot;got well.&quot; The wife and
children were not without hope of an issue that would at least save
Mr. Tulliver from leaving the old spot, and seeking an entirely
strange life. For uncle Deane had been induced to interest himself in
this stage of the business. It would not, he acknowledged, be a bad
speculation for Guest &amp; Co. to buy Dorlcote Mill, and carry on the
business, which was a good one, and might be increased by the addition
of steam power; in which case Tulliver might be retained as manager.
Still, Mr. Deane would say nothing decided about the matter; the fact
that Wakem held the mortgage on the land might put it into his head to
bid for the whole estate, and further, to outbid the cautious firm of
Guest &amp;Co., who did not carry on business on sentimental grounds. Mr.
Deane was obliged to tell Mrs. Tulliver something to that effect, when
he rode over to the mill to inspect the books in company with Mrs.
Glegg; for she had observed that &quot;if Guest &amp;Co. would only think about
it, Mr. Tulliver's father and grandfather had been carrying on
Dorlcote Mill long before the oil-mill of that firm had been so much
as thought of.&quot;Mr. Deane, in reply, doubted whether that was precisely the relation
between the two mills which would determine their value as
investments. As for uncle Glegg, the thing lay quite beyond his
imagination; the good-natured man felt sincere pity for the Tulliver
family, but his money was all locked up in excellent mortgages, and he
could run no risk; that would be unfair to his own relatives; but he
had made up his mind that Tulliver should have some new flannel
waistcoats which he had himself renounced in favor of a more elastic
commodity, and that he would buy Mrs. Tulliver a pound of tea now and
then; it would be a journey which his benevolence delighted in
beforehand, to carry the tea and see her pleasure on being assured it
was the best black.Still, it was clear that Mr. Deane was kindly disposed toward the
Tullivers. One day he had brought Lucy, who was come home for the
Christmas holidays, and the little blond angel-head had pressed itself
against Maggie's darker cheek with many kisses and some tears. These
fair slim daughters keep up a tender spot in the heart of many a
respectable partner in a respectable firm, and perhaps Lucy's anxious,
pitying questions about her poor cousins helped to make uncle Deane
more prompt in finding Tom a temporary place in the warehouse, and in
putting him in the way of getting evening lessons in book-keeping and
calculation.That might have cheered the lad and fed his hopes a little, if there
had not come at the same time the much-dreaded blow of finding that
his father must be a bankrupt, after all; at least, the creditors must
be asked to take less than their due, which to Tom's untechnical mind
was the same thing as bankruptcy. His father must not only be said to
have &quot;lost his property,&quot; but to have &quot;failed,&quot; - the word that carried
the worst obloquy to Tom's mind. For when the defendant's claim for
costs had been satisfied, there would remain the friendly bill of Mr.
Gore, and the deficiency at the bank, as well as the other debts which
would make the assets shrink into unequivocal disproportion; &quot;not more
than ten or twelve shillings in the pound,&quot; predicted Mr. Deane, in a
decided tone, tightening his lips; and the words fell on Tom like a
scalding liquied, leaving a continual smart.He was sadly in want of something to keep up his spirits a little in
the unpleasant newness of his position, - suddenly transported from the
easy carpetedennuiof study-hours at Mr. Stelling's, and the busy
idleness of castle-building in a &quot;last half&quot; at school, to the
companionship of sacks and hides, and bawling men thundering down
heavy weights at his elbow. The first step toward getting on in the
world was a chill, dusty, noisy affair, and implied going without
one's tea in order to stay in St. Ogg's and have an evening lesson
from a one-armed elderly clerk, in a room smelling strongly of bad
tobacco. Tom's young pink-and-white face had its colors very much
deadened by the time he took off his hat at home, and sat down with
keen hunger to his supper. No wonder he was a little cross if his
mother or Maggie spoke to him.But all this while Mrs. Tulliver was brooding over a scheme by which
she, and no one else, would avert the result most to be dreaded, and
prevent Wakem from entertaining the purpose of bidding for the mill.
Imagine a truly respectable and amiable hen, by some portentous
anomaly, taking to reflection and inventing combinations by which she
might prevail on Hodge not to wring her neck, or send her and her
chicks to market; the result could hardly be other than much cackling
and fluttering. Mrs. Tulliver, seeing that everything had gone wrong,
had begun to think she had been too passive in life; and that, if she
had applied her mind to business, and taken a strong resolution now
and then, it would have been all the better for her and her family.
Nobody, it appeared, had thought of going to speak to Wakem on this
business of the mill; and yet, Mrs. Tulliver reflected, it would have
been quite the shortest method of securing the right end. It would
have been of no use, to be sure, for Mr. Tulliver to go, - even if he
had been able and willing, - for he had been &quot;going to law against
Wakem&quot; and abusing him for the last ten years; Wakem was always likely
to have a spite against him. And now that Mrs. Tulliver had come to
the conclusion that her husband was very much in the wrong to bring
her into this trouble, she was inclined to think that his opinion of
Wakem was wrong too. To be sure, Wakem had &quot;put the bailies in the
house, and sold them up&quot;; but she supposed he did that to please the
man that lent Mr. Tulliver the money, for a lawyer had more folks to
please than one, and he wasn't likely to put Mr. Tulliver, who had
gone to law with him, above everybody else in the world. The attorney
might be a very reasonable man; why not? He had married a Miss Clint,
and at the time Mrs. Tulliver had heard of that marriage, the summer
when she wore her blue satin spencer, and had not yet any thoughts of
Mr. Tulliver, she knew no harm of Wakem. And certainly toward herself,
whom he knew to have been a Miss Dodson, it was out of all possibility
that he could entertain anything but good-will, when it was once
brought home to his observation that she, for her part, had never
wanted to go to law, and indeed was at present disposed to take Mr.
Wakem's view of all subjects rather than her husband's. In fact, if
that attorney saw a respectable matron like herself disposed &quot;to give
him good words,&quot; why shouldn't he listen to her representations? For
she would put the matter clearly before him, which had never been done
yet. And he would never go and bid for the mill on purpose to spite
her, an innocent woman, who thought it likely enough that she had
danced with him in their youth at Squire Darleigh's, for at those big
dances she had often and often danced with young men whose names she
had forgotten.Mrs. Tulliver hid these reasonings in her own bosom; for when she had
thrown out a hint to Mr. Deane and Mr. Glegg that she wouldn't mind
going to speak to Wakem herself, they had said, &quot;No, no, no,&quot; and
&quot;Pooh, pooh,&quot; and &quot;Let Wakem alone,&quot; in the tone of men who were not
likely to give a candid attention to a more definite exposition of her
project; still less dared she mention the plan to Tom and Maggie, for
&quot;the children were always so against everything their mother said&quot;;
and Tom, she observed, was almost as much set against Wakem as his
father was. But this unusual concentration of thought naturally gave
Mrs. Tulliver an unusual power of device and determination: and a day
or two before the sale, to be held at the Golden Lion, when there was
no longer any time to be lost, she carried out her plan by a
stratagem. There were pickles in question, a large stock of pickles
and ketchup which Mrs. Tulliver possessed, and which Mr. Hyndmarsh,
the grocer, would certainly purchase if she could transact the
business in a personal interview, so she would walk with Tom to St.
Ogg's that morning; and when Tom urged that she might let the pickles
be at present, - he didn't like her to go about just yet, - she appeared
so hurt at this conduct in her son, contradicting her about pickles
which she had made after the family receipts inherited from his own
grandmother, who had died when his mother was a little girl, that he
gave way, and they walked together until she turned toward Danish
Street, where Mr. Hyndmarsh retailed his grocery, not far from the
offices of Mr. Wakem.That gentleman was not yet come to his office; would Mrs. Tulliver sit
down by the fire in his private room and wait for him? She had not
long to wait before the punctual attorney entered, knitting his brow
with an examining glance at the stout blond woman who rose, curtsying
deferentially, - a tallish man, with an aquiline nose and abundant
iron-gray hair. You have never seen Mr. Wakem before, and are possibly
wondering whether he was really as eminent a rascal, and as crafty,
bitter an enemy of honest humanity in general, and of Mr. Tulliver in
particular, as he is represented to be in that eidolon or portrait of
him which we have seen to exist in the miller's mind.It is clear that the irascible miller was a man to interpret any
chance-shot that grazed him as an attempt on his own life, and was
liable to entanglements in this puzzling world, which, due
consideration had to his own infallibility, required the hypothesis of
a very active diabolical agency to explain them. It is still possible
to believe that the attorney was not more guilty toward him than an
ingenious machine, which performs its work with much regularity, is
guilty toward the rash man who, venturing too near it, is caught up by
some fly-wheel or other, and suddenly converted into unexpected
mince-meat.But it is really impossible to decide this question by a glance at his
person; the lines and lights of the human countenance are like other
symbols, - not always easy to read without a key. On ana prioriview
of Wakem's aquiline nose, which offended Mr. Tulliver, there was not
more rascality than in the shape of his stiff shirt-collar, though
this too along with his nose, might have become fraught with damnatory
meaning when once the rascality was ascertained.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver, I think?&quot; said Mr. Wakem.&quot;Yes, sir; Miss Elizabeth Dodson as was.&quot;&quot;Pray be seated. You have some business with me?&quot;&quot;Well, sir, yes,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, beginning to feel alarmed at her
own courage, now she was really in presence of the formidable man, and
reflecting that she had not settled with herself how she should begin.
Mr. Wakem felt in his waistcoat pockets, and looked at her in silence.&quot;I hope, sir,&quot; she began at last, - &quot;I hope, sir, you're not a-thinking
asIbear you any ill-will because o' my husband's losing his
lawsuit, and the bailies being put in, and the linen being sold, - oh
dear! - for I wasn't brought up in that way. I'm sure you remember my
father, sir, for he was close friends with Squire Darleigh, and we
allays went to the dances there, the Miss Dodsons, - nobody could be
more looked on, - and justly, for there was four of us, and you're
quite aware as Mrs. Glegg and Mrs. Deane are my sisters. And as for
going to law and losing money, and having sales before you're dead, I
never saw anything o' that before I was married, nor for a long while
after. And I'm not to be answerable for my bad luck i' marrying out o'
my own family into one where the goings-on was different. And as for
being drawn in t' abuse you as other folks abuse you, sir,thatI
niver was, and nobody can say it of me.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver shook her head a little, and looked at the hem of her
pocket-handkerchief.&quot;I've no doubt of what you say, Mrs. Tulliver,&quot; said Mr. Wakem, with
cold politeness. &quot;But you have some question to ask me?&quot;&quot;Well, sir, yes. But that's what I've said to myself, - I've said you'd
had some nat'ral feeling; and as for my husband, as hasn't been
himself for this two months, I'm not a-defending him, in no way, for
being so hot about th' erigation, - not but what there's worse men, for
he never wronged nobody of a shilling nor a penny, not willingly; and
as for his fieriness and lawing, what could I do? And him struck as if
it was with death when he got the letter as said you'd the hold upo'
the land. But I can't believe but what you'll behave as a gentleman.&quot;&quot;What does all this mean, Mrs. Tulliver?&quot; said Mr. Wakem rather
sharply. &quot;What do you want to ask me?&quot;&quot;Why, sir, if you'll be so good,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, starting a
little, and speaking more hurriedly, - &quot;if you'll be so good not to buy
the mill an' the land, - the land wouldn't so much matter, only my
husband ull' be like mad at your having it.&quot;Something like a new thought flashed across Mr. Wakem's face as he
said, &quot;Who told you I meant to buy it?&quot;&quot;Why, sir, it's none o' my inventing, and I should never ha' thought
of it; for my husband, as ought to know about the law, he allays used
to say as lawyers had never no call to buy anything, - either lands or
houses, - for they allays got 'em into their hands other ways. An' I
should think that 'ud be the way with you, sir; and I niver said as
you'd be the man to do contrairy to that.&quot;&quot;Ah, well, who was it thatdidsay so?&quot; said Wakem, opening his
desk, and moving things about, with the accompaniment of an almost
inaudible whistle.&quot;Why, sir, it was Mr. Glegg and Mr. Deane, as have all the management;
and Mr. Deane thinks as Guest &amp;Co. 'ud buy the mill and let Mr.
Tulliver work it for 'em, if you didn't bid for it and raise the
price. And it 'ud be such a thing for my husband to stay where he is,
if he could get his living: for it was his father's before him, the
mill was, and his grandfather built it, though I wasn't fond o' the
noise of it, when first I was married, for there was no mills in our
family, - not the Dodson's, - and if I'd known as the mills had so much
to do with the law, it wouldn't have been me as 'ud have been the
first Dodson to marry one; but I went into it blindfold, that I did,
erigation and everything.&quot;&quot;What! Guest &amp;Co. would keep the mill in their own hands, I suppose,
and pay your husband wages?&quot;&quot;Oh dear, sir, it's hard to think of,&quot; said poor Mrs. Tulliver, a
little tear making its way, &quot;as my husband should take wage. But it
'ud look more like what used to be, to stay at the mill than to go
anywhere else; and if you'll only think - if you was to bid for the
mill and buy it, my husband might be struck worse than he was before,
and niver get better again as he's getting now.&quot;&quot;Well, but if I bought the mill, and allowed your husband to act as my
manager in the same way, how then?&quot; said Mr. Wakem.&quot;Oh, sir, I doubt he could niver be got to do it, not if the very mill
stood still to beg and pray of him. For your name's like poison to
him, it's so as never was; and he looks upon it as you've been the
ruin of him all along, ever since you set the law on him about the
road through the meadow, - that's eight year ago, and he's been going
on ever since - as I've allays told him he was wrong -  - &quot;&quot;He's a pig-headed, foul-mouthed fool!&quot; burst out Mr. Wakem,
forgetting himself.&quot;Oh dear, sir!&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, frightened at a result so
different from the one she had fixed her mind on; &quot;I wouldn't wish to
contradict you, but it's like enough he's changed his mind with this
illness, - he's forgot a many things he used to talk about. And you
wouldn't like to have a corpse on your mind, if he was to die; and
theydosay as it's allays unlucky when Dorlcote Mill changes hands,
and the water might all run away, andthen- not as I'm wishing you
any ill-luck, sir, for I forgot to tell you as I remember your wedding
as if it was yesterday; Mrs. Wakem was a Miss Clint, I knowthat;and my boy, as there isn't a nicer, handsomer, straighter boy nowhere,
went to school with your son -  - &quot;Mr. Wakem rose, opened the door, and called to one of his clerks.&quot;You must excuse me for interrupting you, Mrs. Tulliver; I have
business that must be attended to; and I think there is nothing more
necessary to be said.&quot;&quot;But if youwouldbear it in mind, sir,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, rising,
&quot;and not run against me and my children; and I'm not denying Mr.
Tulliver's been in the wrong, but he's been punished enough, and
there's worse men, for it's been giving to other folks has been his
fault. He's done nobody any harm but himself and his family, - the
more's the pity, - and I go and look at the bare shelves every day, and
think where all my things used to stand.&quot;&quot;Yes, yes, I'll bear it in mind,&quot; said Mr. Wakem, hastily, looking
toward the open door.&quot;And if you'd please not to say as I've been to speak to you, for my
son 'ud be very angry with me for demeaning myself, I know he would,
and I've trouble enough without being scolded by my children.&quot;Poor Mrs. Tulliver's voice trembled a little, and she could make no
answer to the attorney's &quot;good morning,&quot; but curtsied and walked out
in silence.&quot;Which day is it that Dorlcote Mill is to be sold? Where's the bill?&quot;
said Mr. Wakem to his clerk when they were alone.&quot;Next Friday is the day, - Friday at six o'clock.&quot;&quot;Oh, just run to Winship's the auctioneer, and see if he's at home. I
have some business for him; ask him to come up.&quot;Although, when Mr. Wakem entered his office that morning, he had had
no intention of purchasing Dorlcote Mill, his mind was already made
up. Mrs. Tulliver had suggested to him several determining motives,
and his mental glance was very rapid; he was one of those men who can
be prompt without being rash, because their motives run in fixed
tracks, and they have no need to reconcile conflicting aims.To suppose that Wakem had the same sort of inveterate hatred toward
Tulliver that Tulliver had toward him would be like supposing that a
pike and a roach can look at each other from a similar point of view.
The roach necessarily abhors the mode in which the pike gets his
living, and the pike is likely to think nothing further even of the
most indignant roach than that he is excellent good eating; it could
only be when the roach choked him that the pike could entertain a
strong personal animosity. If Mr. Tulliver had ever seriously injured
or thwarted the attorney, Wakem would not have refused him the
distinction of being a special object of his vindictiveness. But when
Mr. Tulliver called Wakem a rascal at the market dinner-table, the
attorneys' clients were not a whit inclined to withdraw their business
from him; and if, when Wakem himself happened to be present, some
jocose cattle-feeder, stimulated by opportunity and brandy, made a
thrust at him by alluding to old ladies' wills, he maintained perfectsang froid, and knew quite well that the majority of substantial men
then present were perfectly contented with the fact that &quot;Wakem was
Wakem&quot;; that is to say, a man who always knew the stepping-stones that
would carry him through very muddy bits of practice. A man who had
made a large fortune, had a handsome house among the trees at Tofton,
and decidedly the finest stock of port-wine in the neighborhood of St.
Ogg's, was likely to feel himself on a level with public opinion. And
I am not sure that even honest Mr. Tulliver himself, with his general
view of law as a cockpit, might not, under opposite circumstances,
have seen a fine appropriateness in the truth that &quot;Wakem was Wakem&quot;;
since I have understood from persons versed in history, that mankind
is not disposed to look narrowly into the conduct of great victors
when their victory is on the right side. Tulliver, then, could be no
obstruction to Wakem; on the contrary, he was a poor devil whom the
lawyer had defeated several times; a hot-tempered fellow, who would
always give you a handle against him. Wakem's conscience was not
uneasy because he had used a few tricks against the miller; why should
he hate that unsuccessful plaintiff, that pitiable, furious bull
entangled in the meshes of a net?Still, among the various excesses to which human nature is subject,
moralists have never numbered that of being too fond of the people who
openly revile us. The successful Yellow candidate for the borough of
Old Topping, perhaps, feels no pursuant meditative hatred toward the
Blue editor who consoles his subscribers with vituperative rhetoric
against Yellow men who sell their country, and are the demons of
private life; but he might not be sorry, if law and opportunity
favored, to kick that Blue editor to a deeper shade of his favorite
color. Prosperous men take a little vengeance now and then, as they
take a diversion, when it comes easily in their way, and is no
hindrance to business; and such small unimpassioned revenges have an
enormous effect in life, running through all degrees of pleasant
infliction, blocking the fit men out of places, and blackening
characters in unpremeditated talk. Still more, to see people who have
been only insignificantly offensive to us reduced in life and
humiliated, without any special effort of ours, is apt to have a
soothing, flattering influence. Providence or some other prince of
this world, it appears, has undertaken the task of retribution for us;
and really, by an agreeable constitution of things, our enemies
somehowdon'tprosper.Wakem was not without this parenthetic vindictiveness toward the
uncomplimentary miller; and now Mrs. Tulliver had put the notion into
his head, it presented itself to him as a pleasure to do the very
thing that would cause Mr. Tulliver the most deadly mortification, - 
and a pleasure of a complex kind, not made up of crude malice, but
mingling with it the relish of self-approbation. To see an enemy
humiliated gives a certain contentment, but this is jejune compared
with the highly blent satisfaction of seeing him humiliated by your
benevolent action or concession on his behalf. That is a sort of
revenge which falls into the scale of virtue, and Wakem was not without
an intention of keeping that scale respectably filled. He had once
had the pleasure of putting an old enemy of his into one of the St.
Ogg's alms-houses, to the rebuilding of which he had given a large
subscription; and here was an opportunity of providing for another by
making him his own servant. Such things give a completeness to
prosperity, and contribute elements of agreeable consciousness that
are not dreamed of by that short-sighted, overheated vindictiveness
which goes out its way to wreak itself in direct injury. And Tulliver,
with his rough tongue filed by a sense of obligation, would make a
better servant than any chance-fellow who was cap-in-hand for a
situation. Tulliver was known to be a man of proud honesty, and Wakem
was too acute not to believe in the existence of honesty. He was given
too observing individuals, not to judging of them according to maxims,
and no one knew better than he that all men were not like himself.
Besides, he intended to overlook the whole business of land and mill
pretty closely; he was fond of these practical rural matters. But
there were good reasons for purchasing Dorlcote Mill, quite apart from
any benevolent vengeance on the miller. It was really a capital
investment; besides, Guest &amp;Co. were going to bid for it. Mr. Guest
and Mr. Wakem were on friendly dining terms, and the attorney liked to
predominate over a ship-owner and mill-owner who was a little too loud
in the town affairs as well as in his table-talk. For Wakem was not a
mere man of business; he was considered a pleasant fellow in the upper
circles of St. Ogg's - chatted amusingly over his port-wine, did a
little amateur farming, and had certainly been an excellent husband
and father; at church, when he went there, he sat under the handsomest
of mural monuments erected to the memory of his wife. Most men would
have married again under his circumstances, but he was said to be more
tender to his deformed son than most men were to their best-shapen
offspring. Not that Mr. Wakem had not other sons beside Philip; but
toward them he held only a chiaroscuro parentage, and provided for
them in a grade of life duly beneath his own. In this fact, indeed,
there lay the clenching motive to the purchase of Dorlcote Mill. While
Mrs. Tulliver was talking, it had occurred to the rapid-minded lawyer,
among all the other circumstances of the case, that this purchase
would, in a few years to come, furnish a highly suitable position for
a certain favorite lad whom he meant to bring on in the world.These were the mental conditions on which Mrs. Tulliver had undertaken
to act persuasively, and had failed; a fact which may receive some
illustration from the remark of a great philosopher, that fly-fishers
fail in preparing their bait so as to make it alluring in the right
quarter, for want of a due acquaintance with the subjectivity of
fishes.>


In that dark time of December, the sale of the household furniture
lasted beyond the middle of the second day. Mr. Tulliver, who had
begun, in his intervals of consciousness, to manifest an irritability
which often appeared to have as a direct effect the recurrence of
spasmodic rigidity and insensibility, had lain in this living death
throughout the critical hours when the noise of the sale came nearest
to his chamber. Mr. Turnbull had decided that it would be a less risk
to let him remain where he was than to remove him to Luke's
cottage, - a plan which the good Luke had proposed to Mrs. Tulliver,
thinking it would be very bad if the master were &quot;to waken up&quot; at the
noise of the sale; and the wife and children had sat imprisoned in the
silent chamber, watching the large prostrate figure on the bed, and
trembling lest the blank face should suddenly show some response to
the sounds which fell on their own ears with such obstinate, painful
repetition.But it was over at last, that time of importunate certainty and
eye-straining suspense. The sharp sound of a voice, almost as metallic
as the rap that followed it, had ceased; the tramping of footsteps on
the gravel had died out. Mrs. Tulliver's blond face seemed aged ten
years by the last thirty hours; the poor woman's mind had been busy
divining when her favorite things were being knocked down by the
terrible hammer; her heart had been fluttering at the thought that
first one thing and then another had gone to be identified as hers in
the hateful publicity of the Golden Lion; and all the while she had to
sit and make no sign of this inward agitation. Such things bring lines
in well-rounded faces, and broaden the streaks of white among the
hairs that once looked as if they had been dipped in pure sunshine.
Already, at three o'clock, Kezia, the good-hearted, bad-tempered
housemaid, who regarded all people that came to the sale as her
personal enemies, the dirt on whose feet was of a peculiarly vile
quality, had begun to scrub and swill with an energy much assisted by
a continual low muttering against &quot;folks as came to buy up other
folk's things,&quot; and made light of &quot;scrazing&quot; the tops of mahogany
tables over which better folks than themselves had had to - suffer a
waste of tissue through evaporation. She was not scrubbing
indiscriminately, for there would be further dirt of the same
atrocious kind made by people who had still to fetch away their
purchases; but she was bent on bringing the parlor, where that
&quot;pipe-smoking pig,&quot; the bailiff, had sat, to such an appearance of
scant comfort as could be given to it by cleanliness and the few
articles of furniture bought in for the family. Her mistress and the
young folks should have their tea in it that night, Kezia was
determined.It was between five and six o'clock, near the usual teatime, when she
came upstairs and said that Master Tom was wanted. The person who
wanted him was in the kitchen, and in the first moments, by the
imperfect fire and candle light, Tom had not even an indefinite sense
of any acquaintance with the rather broad-set but active figure,
perhaps two years older than himself, that looked at him with a pair
of blue eyes set in a disc of freckles, and pulled some curly red
locks with a strong intention of respect. A low-crowned
oilskin-covered hat, and a certain shiny deposit of dirt on the rest
of the costume, as of tablets prepared for writing upon, suggested a
calling that had to do with boats; but this did not help Tom's memory.&quot;Sarvant, Master Tom,&quot; said he of the red locks, with a smile which
seemed to break through a self-imposed air of melancholy. &quot;You don't
know me again, I doubt,&quot; he went on, as Tom continued to look at him
inquiringly; &quot;but I'd like to talk to you by yourself a bit, please.&quot;&quot;There's a fire i' the parlor, Master Tom,&quot; said Kezia, who objected
to leaving the kitchen in the crisis of toasting.&quot;Come this way, then,&quot; said Tom, wondering if this young fellow
belonged to Guest &amp; Co.'s Wharf, for his imagination ran continually
toward that particular spot; and uncle Deane might any time be sending
for him to say that there was a situation at liberty.The bright fire in the parlor was the only light that showed the few
chairs, the bureau, the carpetless floor, and the one table - no, not
theonetable; there was a second table, in a corner, with a large
Bible and a few other books upon it. It was this new strange bareness
that Tom felt first, before he thought of looking again at the face
which was also lit up by the fire, and which stole a half-shy,
questioning glance at him as the entirely strange voice said:&quot;Why! you don't remember Bob, then, as you gen the pocket-knife to,
Mr. Tom?&quot;The rough-handled pocket-knife was taken out in the same moment, and
the largest blade opened by way of irresistible demonstration.&quot;What! Bob Jakin?&quot; said Tom, not with any cordial delight, for he felt
a little ashamed of that early intimacy symbolized by the
pocket-knife, and was not at all sure that Bob's motives for recalling
it were entirely admirable.&quot;Ay, ay, Bob Jakin, if Jakin it must be, 'cause there's so many Bobs
as you went arter the squerrils with, that day as I plumped right down
from the bough, and bruised my shins a good un - but I got the squerril
tight for all that, an' a scratter it was. An' this littlish blade's
broke, you see, but I wouldn't hev a new un put in, 'cause they might
be cheatin' me an' givin' me another knife instid, for there isn't
such a blade i' the country, - it's got used to my hand, like. An'
there was niver nobody else gen me nothin' but what I got by my own
sharpness, only you, Mr. Tom; if it wasn't Bill Fawks as gen me the
terrier pup istid o' drowndin't it, an' I had to jaw him a good un
afore he'd give it me.&quot;Bob spoke with a sharp and rather treble volubility, and got through
his long speech with surprising despatch, giving the blade of his
knife an affectionate rub on his sleeve when he had finished.&quot;Well, Bob,&quot; said Tom, with a slight air of patronage, the foregoing
reminscences having disposed him to be as friendly as was becoming,
though there was no part of his acquaintance with Bob that he
remembered better than the cause of their parting quarrel; &quot;is there
anything I can do for you?&quot;&quot;Why, no, Mr. Tom,&quot; answered Bob, shutting up his knife with a click
and returning it to his pocket, where he seemed to be feeling for
something else. &quot;I shouldn't ha' come back upon you now ye're i'
trouble, an' folks say as the master, as I used to frighten the birds
for, an' he flogged me a bit for fun when he catched me eatin' the
turnip, as they say he'll niver lift up his head no more, - I shouldn't
ha' come now to ax you to gi' me another knife 'cause you gen me one
afore. If a chap gives me one black eye, that's enough for me; I
sha'n't ax him for another afore I sarve him out; an' a good turn's
worth as much as a bad un, anyhow. I shall niver grow down'ards again,
Mr. Tom, an' you war the little chap as I liked the best whenIwar
a little chap, for all you leathered me, and wouldn't look at me
again. There's Dick Brumby, there, I could leather him as much as I'd
a mind; but lors! you get tired o' leatherin' a chap when you can
niver make him see what you want him to shy at. I'n seen chaps as 'ud
stand starin' at a bough till their eyes shot out, afore they'd see as
a bird's tail warn't a leaf. It's poor work goin' wi' such raff. But
you war allays a rare un at shying, Mr. Tom, an' I could trusten to
you for droppin' down wi' your stick in the nick o' time at a runnin'
rat, or a stoat, or that, when I war a-beatin' the bushes.&quot;Bob had drawn out a dirty canvas bag, and would perhaps not have
paused just then if Maggie had not entered the room and darted a look
of surprise and curiosity at him, whereupon he pulled his red locks
again with due respect. But the next moment the sense of the altered
room came upon Maggie with a force that overpowered the thought of
Bob's presence. Her eyes had immediately glanced from him to the place
where the bookcase had hung; there was nothing now but the oblong
unfaded space on the wall, and below it the small table with the Bible
and the few other books.&quot;Oh, Tom!&quot; she burst out, clasping her hands, &quot;where are the books? I
thought my uncle Glegg said he would buy them. Didn't he? Are those
all they've left us?&quot;&quot;I suppose so,&quot; said Tom, with a sort of desperate indifference. &quot;Why
should they buy many books when they bought so little furniture?&quot;&quot;Oh, but, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, her eyes filling with tears, as she
rushed up to the table to see what books had been rescued. &quot;Our dear
old Pilgrim's Progress that you colored with your little paints; and
that picture of Pilgrim with a mantle on, looking just like a
turtle - oh dear!&quot; Maggie went on, half sobbing as she turned over the
few books, &quot;I thought we should never part with that while we lived;
everything is going away from us; the end of our lives will have
nothing in it like the beginning!&quot;Maggie turned away from the table and threw herself into a chair, with
the big tears ready to roll down her cheeks, quite blinded to the
presence of Bob, who was looking at her with the pursuant gaze of an
intelligent dumb animal, with perceptions more perfect than his
comprehension.&quot;Well, Bob,&quot; said Tom, feeling that the subject of the books was
unseasonable, &quot;I suppose you just came to see me because we're in
trouble? That was very good-natured of you.&quot;&quot;I'll tell you how it is, Master Tom,&quot; said Bob, beginning to untwist
his canvas bag. &quot;You see, I'n been with a barge this two 'ear; that's
how I'n been gettin' my livin', - if it wasn't when I was tentin' the
furnace, between whiles, at Torry's mill. But a fortni't ago I'd a
rare bit o' luck, - I allays thought I was a lucky chap, for I niver
set a trap but what I catched something; but this wasn't trap, it was
a fire i' Torry's mill, an' I doused it, else it 'ud set th' oil
alight, an' the genelman gen me ten suvreigns; he gen me 'em himself
last week. An' he said first, I was a sperrited chap, - but I knowed
that afore, - but then he outs wi' the ten suvreigns, an' that war
summat new. Here they are, all but one!&quot; Here Bob emptied the canvas
bag on the table. &quot;An' when I'd got 'em, my head was all of a boil
like a kettle o' broth, thinkin' what sort o' life I should take to,
for there war a many trades I'd thought on; for as for the barge, I'm
clean tired out wi't, for it pulls the days out till they're as long
as pigs' chitterlings. An' I thought first I'd ha' ferrets an' dogs,
an' be a rat-catcher; an' then I thought as I should like a bigger way
o' life, as I didn't know so well; for I'n seen to the bottom o'
rat-catching; an' I thought, an' thought, till at last I settled I'd
be a packman, - for they're knowin' fellers, the packmen are, - an' I'd
carry the lightest things I could i' my pack; an' there'd be a use for
a feller's tongue, as is no use neither wi' rats nor barges. An' I
should go about the country far an' wide, an' come round the women wi'
my tongue, an' get my dinner hot at the public, - lors! it 'ud be a
lovely life!&quot;Bob paused, and then said, with defiant decision, as if resolutely
turning his back on that paradisaic picture:&quot;But I don't mind about it, not a chip! An' I'n changed one o' the
suvreigns to buy my mother a goose for dinner, an' I'n bought a blue
plush wescoat, an' a sealskin cap, - for if I meant to be a packman,
I'd do it respectable. But I don't mind about it, not a chip! My yead
isn't a turnip, an' I shall p'r'aps have a chance o' dousing another
fire afore long. I'm a lucky chap. So I'll thank you to take the nine
suvreigns, Mr. Tom, and set yoursen up with 'em somehow, if it's true
as the master's broke. They mayn't go fur enough, but they'll help.&quot;Tom was touched keenly enough to forget his pride and suspicion.&quot;You're a very kind fellow, Bob,&quot; he said, coloring, with that little
diffident tremor in his voice which gave a certain charm even to Tom's
pride and severity, &quot;and I sha'n't forget you again, though I didn't
know you this evening. But I can't take the nine sovereigns; I should
be taking your little fortune from you, and they wouldn't do me much
good either.&quot;&quot;Wouldn't they, Mr. Tom?&quot; said Bob, regretfully. &quot;Now don't say so
'cause you think I want 'em. I aren't a poor chap. My mother gets a
good penn'orth wi' picking feathers an' things; an' if she eats
nothin' but bread-an'-water, it runs to fat. An' I'm such a lucky
chap; an' I doubt you aren't quite so lucky, Mr. Tom, - th' old master
isn't, anyhow, - an' so you might take a slice o' my luck, an' no harm
done. Lors! I found a leg o' pork i' the river one day; it had tumbled
out o' one o' them round-sterned Dutchmen, I'll be bound. Come, think
better on it, Mr. Tom, for old 'quinetance' sake, else I shall think
you bear me a grudge.&quot;Bob pushed the sovereigns forward, but before Tom could speak Maggie,
clasping her hands, and looking penitently at Bob. said:&quot;Oh, I'm so sorry, Bob; I never thought you were so good. Why, I think
you're the kindest person in the world!&quot;Bob had not been aware of the injurious opinion for which Maggie was
performing an inward act of penitence, but he smiled with pleasure at
this handsome eulogy, - especially from a young lass who, as he
informed his mother that evening, had &quot;such uncommon eyes, they looked
somehow as they made him feel nohow.&quot;&quot;No, indeed Bob, I can't take them,&quot; said Tom; &quot;but don't think I feel
your kindness less because I say no. I don't want to take anything
from anybody, but to work my own way. And those sovereigns wouldn't
help me much - they wouldn't really - if I were to take them. Let me
shake hands with you instead.&quot;Tom put out his pink palm, and Bob was not slow to place his hard,
grimy hand within it.&quot;Let me put the sovereigns in the bag again,&quot; said Maggie; &quot;and you'll
come and see us when you've bought your pack, Bob.&quot;&quot;It's like as if I'd come out o' make believe, o' purpose to show 'em
you,&quot; said Bob, with an air of discontent, as Maggie gave him the bag
again, &quot;a-taking 'em back i' this way. Iama bit of a Do, you know;
but it isn't that sort o' Do, - it's on'y when a feller's a big rogue,
or a big flat, I like to let him in a bit, that's all.&quot;&quot;Now, don't you be up to any tricks, Bob,&quot; said Tom, &quot;else you'll get
transported some day.&quot;&quot;No, no; not me, Mr. Tom,&quot; said Bob, with an air of cheerful
confidence. &quot;There's no law again' flea-bites. If I wasn't to take a
fool in now and then, he'd niver get any wiser. But, lors! hev a
suvreign to buy you and Miss summat, on'y for a token - just to match
my pocket-knife.&quot;While Bob was speaking he laid down the sovereign, and resolutely
twisted up his bag again. Tom pushed back the gold, and said, &quot;No,
indeed, Bob; thank you heartily, but I can't take it.&quot; And Maggie,
taking it between her fingers, held it up to Bob and said, more
persuasively:&quot;Not now, but perhaps another time. If ever Tom or my father wants
help that you can give, we'll let you know; won't we, Tom? That's what
you would like, - to have us always depend on you as a friend that we
can go to, - isn't it, Bob?&quot;&quot;Yes, Miss, and thank you,&quot; said Bob, reluctantly taking the money;
&quot;that's what I'd like, anything as you like. An' I wish you good-by,
Miss, and good-luck, Mr. Tom, and thank you for shaking hands wi' me,thoughyou wouldn't take the money.&quot;Kezia's entrance, with very black looks, to inquire if she shouldn't
bring in the tea now, or whether the toast was to get hardened to a
brick, was a seasonable check on Bob's flux of words, and hastened his
parting bow.>


Mr. Tulliver, even between the fits of spasmodic rigidity which had
recurred at intervals ever since he had been found fallen from his
horse, was usually in so apathetic a condition that the exits and
entrances into his room were not felt to be of great importance. He
had lain so still, with his eyes closed, all this morning, that Maggie
told her aunt Moss she must not expect her father to take any notice
of them.They entered very quietly, and Mrs. Moss took her seat near the head
of the bed, while Maggie sat in her old place on the bed, and put her
hand on her father's without causing any change in his face.Mr. Glegg and Tom had also entered, treading softly, and were busy
selecting the key of the old oak chest from the bunch which Tom had
brought from his father's bureau. They succeeded in opening the
chest, - which stood opposite the foot of Mr. Tulliver's bed, - and
propping the lid with the iron holder, without much noise.&quot;There's a tin box,&quot; whispered Mr. Glegg; &quot;he'd most like put a small
thing like a note in there. Lift it out, Tom; but I'll just lift up
these deeds, - they're the deeds o' the house and mill, I suppose, - and
see what there is under 'em.&quot;Mr. Glegg had lifted out the parchments, and had fortunately drawn
back a little, when the iron holder gave way, and the heavy lid fell
with a loud bang that resounded over the house.Perhaps there was something in that sound more than the mere fact of
the strong vibration that produced the instantaneous effect on the
frame of the prostrate man, and for the time completely shook off the
obstruction of paralysis. The chest had belonged to his father and his
father's father, and it had always been rather a solemn business to
visit it. All long-known objects, even a mere window fastening or a
particular door-latch, have sounds which are a sort of recognized
voice to us, - a voice that will thrill and awaken, when it has been
used to touch deep-lying fibres. In the same moment, when all the eyes
in the room were turned upon him, he started up and looked at the
chest, the parchments in Mr. Glegg's hand, and Tom holding the tin
box, with a glance of perfect consciousness and recognition.&quot;What are you going to do with those deeds?&quot; he said, in his ordinary
tone of sharp questioning whenever he was irritated. &quot;Come here, Tom.
What do you do, going to my chest?&quot;Tom obeyed, with some trembling; it was the first time his father had
recognized him. But instead of saying anything more to him, his father
continued to look with a growing distinctness of suspicion at Mr.
Glegg and the deeds.&quot;What's been happening, then?&quot; he said sharply. &quot;What are you meddling
with my deeds for? Is Wakem laying hold of everything? Why don't you
tell me what you've been a-doing?&quot; he added impatiently, as Mr. Glegg
advanced to the foot of the bed before speaking.&quot;No, no, friend Tulliver,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, in a soothing tone.
&quot;Nobody's getting hold of anything as yet. We only came to look and
see what was in the chest. You've been ill, you know, and we've had to
look after things a bit. But let's hope you'll soon be well enough to
attend to everything yourself.&quot;Mr. Tulliver looked around him meditatively, at Tom, at Mr. Glegg, and
at Maggie; then suddenly appearing aware that some one was seated by
his side at the head of the bed he turned sharply round and saw his
sister.&quot;Eh, Gritty!&quot; he said, in the half-sad, affectionate tone in which he
had been wont to speak to her. &quot;What! you're there, are you? How could
you manage to leave the children?&quot;&quot;Oh, brother!&quot; said good Mrs. Moss, too impulsive to be prudent, &quot;I'm
thankful I'm come now to see you yourself again; I thought you'd never
know us any more.&quot;&quot;What! have I had a stroke?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, anxiously, looking at
Mr. Glegg.&quot;A fall from your horse - shook you a bit, - that's all, I think,&quot; said
Mr. Glegg. &quot;But you'll soon get over it, let's hope.&quot;Mr. Tulliver fixed his eyes on the bed-clothes, and remained silent
for two or three minutes. A new shadow came over his face. He looked
up at Maggie first, and said in a lower tone, &quot;You got the letter,
then, my wench?&quot;&quot;Yes, father,&quot; she said, kissing him with a full heart. She felt as if
her father were come back to her from the dead, and her yearning to
show him how she had always loved him could be fulfilled.&quot;Where's your mother?&quot; he said, so preoccupied that he received the
kiss as passively as some quiet animal might have received it.&quot;She's downstairs with my aunts, father. Shall I fetch her?&quot;&quot;Ay, ay; poor Bessy!&quot; and his eyes turned toward Tom as Maggie left
the room.&quot;You'll have to take care of 'em both if I die, you know, Tom. You'll
be badly off, I doubt. But you must see and pay everybody. And
mind, - there's fifty pound o' Luke's as I put into the business, - he
gave me a bit at a time, and he's got nothing to show for it. You must
pay him first thing.&quot;Uncle Glegg involuntarily shook his head, and looked more concerned
than ever, but Tom said firmly:&quot;Yes, father. And haven't you a note from my uncle Moss for three
hundred pounds? We came to look for that. What do you wish to be done
about it, father?&quot;&quot;Ah! I'm glad you thought o' that, my lad,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;I
allays meant to be easy about that money, because o' your aunt. You
mustn't mind losing the money, if they can't pay it, - and it's like
enough they can't. The note's in that box, mind! I allays meant to be
good to you, Gritty,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, turning to his sister; &quot;but
you know you aggravated me when you would have Moss.&quot;At this moment Maggie re-entered with her mother, who came in much
agitated by the news that her husband was quite himself again.&quot;Well, Bessy,&quot; he said, as she kissed him, &quot;you must forgive me if
you're worse off than you ever expected to be. But it's the fault o'
the law, - it's none o' mine,&quot; he added angrily. &quot;It's the fault o'
raskills. Tom, you mind this: if ever you've got the chance, you make
Wakem smart. If you don't, you're a good-for-nothing son. You might
horse-whip him, but he'd set the law on you, - the law's made to take
care o' raskills.&quot;Mr. Tulliver was getting excited, and an alarming flush was on his
face. Mr. Glegg wanted to say something soothing, but he was prevented
by Mr. Tulliver's speaking again to his wife. &quot;They'll make a shift to
pay everything, Bessy,&quot; he said, &quot;and yet leave you your furniture;
and your sisters'll do something for you - and Tom'll grow up - though
what he's to be I don't know - I've done what I could - I've given him a
eddication - and there's the little wench, she'll get married - but it's
a poor tale -  - &quot;The sanative effect of the strong vibration was exhausted, and with
the last words the poor man fell again, rigid and insensible. Though
this was only a recurrence of what had happened before, it struck all
present as if it had been death, not only from its contrast with the
completeness of the revival, but because his words had all had
reference to the possibility that his death was near. But with poor
Tulliver death was not to be a leap; it was to be a long descent under
thickening shadows.Mr. Turnbull was sent for; but when he heard what had passed, he said
this complete restoration, though only temporary, was a hopeful sign,
proving that there was no permanent lesion to prevent ultimate
recovery.Among the threads of the past which the stricken man had gathered up,
he had omitted the bill of sale; the flash of memory had only lit up
prominent ideas, and he sank into forgetfulness again with half his
humiliation unlearned.But Tom was clear upon two points, - that his uncle Moss's note must be
destroyed; and that Luke's money must be paid, if in no other way, out
of his own and Maggie's money now in the savings bank. There were
subjects, you perceive, on which Tom was much quicker than on the
niceties of classical construction, or the relations of a mathematical
demonstration.>


When Mr. Tulliver first knew the fact that the law-suit was decided
against him, and that Pivart and Wakem were triumphant, every one who
happened to observe him at the time thought that, for so confident and
hot-tempered a man, he bore the blow remarkably well. He thought so
himself; he thought he was going to show that if Wakem or anybody else
considered him crushed, they would find themselves mistaken. He could
not refuse to see that the costs of this protracted suit would take
more than he possessed to pay them; but he appeared to himself to be
full of expedients by which he could ward off any results but such as
were tolerable, and could avoid the appearance of breaking down in the
world. All the obstinacy and defiance of his nature, driven out of
their old channel, found a vent for themselves in the immediate
formation of plans by which he would meet his difficulties, and remain
Mr. Tulliver of Dorlcote Mill in spite of them. There was such a rush
of projects in his brain, that it was no wonder his face was flushed
when he came away from his talk with his attorney, Mr. Gore, and
mounted his horse to ride home from Lindum. There was Furley, who held
the mortgage on the land, - a reasonable fellow, who would see his own
interest, Mr. Tulliver was convinced, and who would be glad not only
to purchase the whole estate, including the mill and homestead, but
would accept Mr. Tulliver as tenant, and be willing to advance money
to be repaid with high interest out of the profits of the business,
which would be made over to him, Mr. Tulliver only taking enough
barely to maintain himself and his family. Who would neglect such a
profitable investment? Certainly not Furley, for Mr. Tulliver had
determined that Furley should meet his plans with the utmost alacrity;
and there are men whoses brains have not yet been dangerously heated
by the loss of a lawsuit, who are apt to see in their own interest or
desires a motive for other men's actions. There was no doubt (in the
miller's mind) that Furley would do just what was desirable; and if he
did - why, things would not be so very much worse. Mr. Tulliver and his
family must live more meagrely and humbly, but it would only be till
the profits of the business had paid off Furley's advances, and that
might be while Mr. Tulliver had still a good many years of life before
him. It was clear that the costs of the suit could be paid without his
being obliged to turn out of his old place, and look like a ruined
man. It was certainly an awkward moment in his affairs. There was that
suretyship for poor Riley, who had died suddenly last April, and left
his friend saddled with a debt of two hundred and fifty pounds, - a
fact which had helped to make Mr. Tulliver's banking book less
pleasant reading than a man might desire toward Christmas. Well! he
had never been one of those poor-spirited sneaks who would refuse to
give a helping hand to a fellow-traveller in this puzzling world. The
really vexatious business was the fact that some months ago the
creditor who had lent him the five hundred pounds to repay Mrs. Glegg
had become uneasy about his money (set on by Wakem, of course), and
Mr. Tulliver, still confident that he should gain his suit, and
finding it eminently inconvenient to raise the said sum until that
desirable issue had taken place, had rashly acceded to the demand that
he should give a bill of sale on his household furniture and some
other effects, as security in lieu of the bond. It was all one, he had
said to himself; he should soon pay off the money, and there was no
harm in giving that security any more than another. But now the
consequences of this bill of sale occurred to him in a new light, and
he remembered that the time was close at hand when it would be
enforced unless the money were repaid. Two months ago he would have
declared stoutly that he would never be beholden to his wife's
friends; but now he told himself as stoutly that it was nothing but
right and natural that Bessy should go to the Pullets and explain the
thing to them; they would hardly let Bessy's furniture be sold, and it
might be security to Pullet if he advanced the money, - there would,
after all, be no gift or favor in the matter. Mr. Tulliver would never
have asked for anything from so poor-spirited a fellow for himself,
but Bessy might do so if she liked.It is precisely the proudest and most obstinate men who are the most
liable to shift their position and contradict themselves in this
sudden manner; everything is easier to them than to face the simple
fact that they have been thoroughly defeated, and must begin life
anew. And Mr. Tulliver, you perceive, though nothing more than a
superior miller and maltster, was as proud and obstinate as if he had
been a very lofty personage, in whom such dispositions might be a
source of that conspicuous, far-echoing tragedy, which sweeps the
stage in regal robes, and makes the dullest chronicler sublime. The
pride and obstinacy of millers and other insignificant people, whom
you pass unnoticingly on the road every day, have their tragedy too;
but it is of that unwept, hidden sort that goes on from generation to
generation, and leaves no record, - such tragedy, perhaps, as lies in
the conflicts of young souls, hungry for joy, under a lot made
suddenly hard to them, under the dreariness of a home where the
morning brings no promise with it, and where the unexpectant
discontent of worn and disappointed parents weighs on the children
like a damp, thick air, in which all the functions of life are
depressed; or such tragedy as lies in the slow or sudden death that
follows on a bruised passion, though it may be a death that finds only
a parish funeral. There are certain animals to which tenacity of
position is a law of life, - they can never flourish again, after a
single wrench: and there are certain human beings to whom predominance
is a law of life, - they can only sustain humiliation so long as they
can refuse to believe in it, and, in their own conception, predominate
still.Mr. Tulliver was still predominating, in his own imagination, as he
approached St. Ogg's, through which he had to pass on his way
homeward. But what was it that suggested to him, as he saw the Laceham
coach entering the town, to follow it to the coach-office, and get the
clerk there to write a letter, requiring Maggie to come home the very
next day? Mr. Tulliver's own hand shook too much under his excitement
for him to write himself, and he wanted the letter to be given to the
coachman to deliver at Miss Firniss's school in the morning. There was
a craving which he would not account for to himself, to have Maggie
near him, without delay, - she must come back by the coach to-morrow.To Mrs. Tulliver, when he got home, he would admit no difficulties,
and scolded down her burst of grief on hearing that the lawsuit was
lost, by angry assertions that there was nothing to grieve about. He
said nothing to her that night about the bill of sale and the
application to Mrs. Pullet, for he had kept her in ignorance of the
nature of that transaction, and had explained the necessity for taking
an inventory of the goods as a matter connected with his will. The
possession of a wife conspicuously one's inferior in intellect is,
like other high privileges, attended with a few inconveniences, and,
among the rest, with the occasional necessity for using a little
deception.The next day Mr. Tulliver was again on horseback in the afternoon, on
his way to Mr. Gore's office at St. Ogg's. Gore was to have seen
Furley in the morning, and to have sounded him in relation to Mr.
Tulliver's affairs. But he had not gone half-way when he met a clerk
from Mr. Gore's office, who was bringing a letter to Mr. Tulliver. Mr.
Gore had been prevented by a sudden call of business from waiting at
his office to see Mr. Tulliver, according to appointment, but would be
at his office at eleven to-morrow morning, and meanwhile had sent some
important information by letter.&quot;Oh!&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, taking the letter, but not opening it. &quot;Then
tell Gore I'll see him to-morrow at eleven&quot;; and he turned his horse.The clerk, struck with Mr. Tulliver's glistening, excited glance,
looked after him for a few moments, and then rode away. The reading of
a letter was not the affair of an instant to Mr. Tulliver; he took in
the sense of a statement very slowly through the medium of written or
even printed characters; so he had put the letter in his pocket,
thinking he would open it in his armchair at home. But by-and-by it
occurred to him that there might be something in the letter Mrs.
Tulliver must not know about, and if so, it would be better to keep it
out of her sight altogether. He stopped his horse, took out the
letter, and read it. It was only a short letter; the substance was,
that Mr. Gore had ascertained, on secret, but sure authority, that
Furley had been lately much straitened for money, and had parted with
his securities, - among the rest, the mortgage on Mr. Tulliver's
property, which he had transferred to -  - Wakem.In half an hour after this Mr. Tulliver's own wagoner found him lying
by the roadside insensible, with an open letter near him, and his gray
horse snuffing uneasily about him.When Maggie reached home that evening, in obedience to her father's
call, he was no longer insensible. About an hour before he had become
conscious, and after vague, vacant looks around him, had muttered
something about &quot;a letter,&quot; which he presently repeated impatiently.
At the instance of Mr. Turnbull, the medical man, Gore's letter was
brought and laid on the bed, and the previous impatience seemed to be
allayed. The stricken man lay for some time with his eyes fixed on the
letter, as if he were trying to knit up his thoughts by its help. But
presently a new wave of memory seemed to have come and swept the other
away; he turned his eyes from the letter to the door, and after
looking uneasily, as if striving to see something his eyes were too
dim for, he said, &quot;The little wench.&quot;He repeated the words impatiently from time to time, appearing
entirely unconscious of everything except this one importunate want,
and giving no sign of knowing his wife or any one else; and poor Mrs.
Tulliver, her feeble faculties almost paralyzed by this sudden
accumulation of troubles, went backward and forward to the gate to see
if the Laceham coach were coming, though it was not yet time.But it came at last, and set down the poor anxious girl, no longer the
&quot;little wench,&quot; except to her father's fond memory.&quot;Oh, mother, what is the matter?&quot; Maggie said, with pale lips, as her
mother came toward her crying. She didn't think her father was ill,
because the letter had come at his dictation from the office at St.
Ogg's.But Mr. Turnbull came now to meet her; a medical man is the good angel
of the troubled house, and Maggie ran toward the kind old friend, whom
she remembered as long as she could remember anything, with a
trembling, questioning look.&quot;Don't alarm yourself too much, my dear,&quot; he said, taking her hand.
&quot;Your father has had a sudden attack, and has not quite recovered his
memory. But he has been asking for you, and it will do him good to see
you. Keep as quiet as you can; take off your things, and come upstairs
with me.&quot;Maggie obeyed, with that terrible beating of the heart which makes
existence seem simply a painful pulsation. The very quietness with
which Mr. Turnbull spoke had frightened her susceptible imagination.
Her father's eyes were still turned uneasily toward the door when she
entered and met the strange, yearning, helpless look that had been
seeking her in vain. With a sudden flash and movement, he raised
himself in the bed; she rushed toward him, and clasped him with
agonized kisses.Poor child! it was very early for her to know one of those supreme
moments in life when all we have hoped or delighted in, all we can
dread or endure, falls away from our regard as insignificant; is lost,
like a trivial memory, in that simple, primitive love which knits us
to the beings who have been nearest to us, in their times of
helplessness or of anguish.But that flash of recognition had been too great a strain on the
father's bruised, enfeebled powers. He sank back again in renewed
insensibility and rigidity, which lasted for many hours, and was only
broken by a flickering return of consciousness, in which he took
passively everything that was given to him, and seemed to have a sort
of infantine satisfaction in Maggie's near presence, - such
satisfaction as a baby has when it is returned to the nurse's lap.Mrs. Tulliver sent for her sisters, and there was much wailing and
lifting up of hands below stairs. Both uncles and aunts saw that the
ruin of Bessy and her family was as complete as they had ever
foreboded it, and there was a general family sense that a judgment had
fallen on Mr. Tulliver, which it would be an impiety to counteract by
too much kindness. But Maggie heard little of this, scarcely ever
leaving her father's bedside, where she sat opposite him with her hand
on his. Mrs. Tulliver wanted to have Tom fetched home, and seemed to
be thinking more of her boy even than of her husband; but the aunts
and uncles opposed this. Tom was better at school, since Mr. Turnbull
said there was no immediate danger, he believed. But at the end of the
second day, when Maggie had become more accustomed to her father's
fits of insensibility, and to the expectation that he would revive
from them, the thought of Tom had become urgent withhertoo; and
when her mother sate crying at night and saying, &quot;My poor lad - it's
nothing but right he should come home,&quot; Maggie said, &quot;Let me go for
him, and tell him, mother; I'll go to-morrow morning if father doesn't
know me and want me. It would be so hard for Tom to come home and not
know anything about it beforehand.&quot;And the next morning Maggie went, as we have seen. Sitting on the
coach on their way home, the brother and sister talked to each other
in sad, interrupted whispers.&quot;They say Mr. Wakem has got a mortgage or something on the land, Tom,&quot;
said Maggie. &quot;It was the letter with that news in it that made father
ill, they think.&quot;&quot;I believe that scoundrel's been planning all along to ruin my
father,&quot; said Tom, leaping from the vaguest impressions to a definite
conclusion. &quot;I'll make him feel for it when I'm a man. Mind you never
speak to Philip again.&quot;&quot;Oh, Tom!&quot; said Maggie, in a tone of sad remonstrance; but she had no
spirit to dispute anything then, still less to vex Tom by opposing
him.>


The next day, at ten o'clock, Tom was on his way to St. Ogg's, to see
his uncle Deane, who was to come home last night, his aunt had said;
and Tom had made up his mind that his uncle Deane was the right person
to ask for advice about getting some employment. He was in a great way
of business; he had not the narrow notions of uncle Glegg; and he had
risen in the world on a scale of advancement which accorded with Tom's
ambition.It was a dark, chill, misty morning, likely to end in rain, - one of
those mornings when even happy people take refuge in their hopes. And
Tom was very unhappy; he felt the humiliation as well as the
prospective hardships of his lot with all the keenness of a proud
nature; and with all his resolute dutifulness toward his father there
mingled an irrepressible indignation against him which gave misfortune
the less endurable aspect of a wrong. Since these were the
consequences of going to law, his father was really blamable, as his
aunts and uncles had always said he was; and it was a significant
indication of Tom's character, that though he thought his aunts ought
to do something more for his mother, he felt nothing like Maggie's
violent resentment against them for showing no eager tenderness and
generosity. There were no impulses in Tom that led him to expect what
did not present itself to him as a right to be demanded. Why should
people give away their money plentifully to those who had not taken
care of their own money? Tom saw some justice in severity; and all the
more, because he had confidence in himself that he should never
deserve that just severity. It was very hard upon him that he should
be put at this disadvantage in life by his father's want of prudence;
but he was not going to complain and to find fault with people because
they did not make everything easy for him. He would ask no one to help
him, more than to give him work and pay him for it. Poor Tom was not
without his hopes to take refuge in under the chill damp imprisonment
of the December fog, which seemed only like a part of his home
troubles. At sixteen, the mind that has the strongest affinity for
fact cannot escape illusion and self-flattery; and Tom, in sketching
his future, had no other guide in arranging his facts than the
suggestions of his own brave self-reliance. Both Mr. Glegg and Mr.
Deane, he knew, had been very poor once; he did not want to save money
slowly and retire on a moderate fortune like his uncle Glegg, but he
would be like his uncle Deane - get a situation in some great house of
business and rise fast. He had scarcely seen anything of his uncle
Deane for the last three years - the two families had been getting
wider apart; but for this very reason Tom was the more hopeful about
applying to him. His uncle Glegg, he felt sure, would never encourage
any spirited project, but he had a vague imposing idea of the
resources at his uncle Deane's command. He had heard his father say,
long ago, how Deane had made himself so valuable to Guest &amp; Co. that
they were glad enough to offer him a share in the business; that was
what Tom resolvedhewould do. It was intolerable to think of being
poor and looked down upon all one's life. He would provide for his
mother and sister, and make every one say that he was a man of high
character. He leaped over the years in this way, and, in the haste of
strong purpose and strong desire, did not see how they would be made
up of slow days, hours, and minutes.By the time he had crossed the stone bridge over the Floss and was
entering St. Ogg's, he was thinking that he would buy his father's
mill and land again when he was rich enough, and improve the house and
live there; he should prefer it to any smarter, newer place, and he
could keep as many horses and dogs as he liked.Walking along the street with a firm, rapid step, at this point in his
reverie he was startled by some one who had crossed without his
notice, and who said to him in a rough, familiar voice:&quot;Why, Master Tom, how's your father this morning?&quot; It was a publican
of St. Ogg's, one of his father's customers.Tom disliked being spoken to just then; but he said civilly, &quot;He's
still very ill, thank you.&quot;&quot;Ay, it's been a sore chance for you, young man, hasn't it, - this
lawsuit turning out against him?&quot; said the publican, with a confused,
beery idea of being good-natured.Tom reddened and passed on; he would have felt it like the handling of
a bruise, even if there had been the most polite and delicate
reference to his position.&quot;That's Tulliver's son,&quot; said the publican to a grocer standing on the
adjacent door-step.&quot;Ah!&quot; said the grocer, &quot;I thought I knew his features. He takes after
his mother's family; she was a Dodson. He's a fine, straight youth;
what's he been brought up to?&quot;&quot;Oh! to turn up his nose at his father's customers, and be a fine
gentleman, - not much else, I think.&quot;Tom, roused from his dream of the future to a thorough consciousness
of the present, made all the greater haste to reach the warehouse
offices of Guest &amp; Co., where he expected to find his uncle Deane. But
this was Mr. Deane's morning at the band, a clerk told him, and with
some contempt for his ignorance; Mr. Deane was not to be found in
River Street on a Thursday morning.At the bank Tom was admitted into the private room where his uncle
was, immediately after sending in his name. Mr. Deane was auditing
accounts; but he looked up as Tom entered, and putting out his hand,
said, &quot;Well, Tom, nothing fresh the matter at home, I hope? How's your
father?&quot;&quot;Much the same, thank you, uncle,&quot; said Tom, feeling nervous. &quot;But I
want to speak to you, please, when you're at liberty.&quot;&quot;Sit down, sit down,&quot; said Mr. Deane, relapsing into his accounts, in
which he and the managing-clerk remained so absorbed for the next
half-hour that Tom began to wonder whether he should have to sit in
this way till the bank closed, - there seemed so little tendency toward
a conclusion in the quiet, monotonous procedure of these sleek,
prosperous men of business. Would his uncle give him a place in the
bank? It would be very dull, prosy work, he thought, writing there
forever to the loud ticking of a timepiece. He preferred some other
way of getting rich. But at last there was a change; his uncle took a
pen and wrote something with a flourish at the end.&quot;You'll just step up to Torry's now, Mr. Spence, will you?&quot; said Mr.
Deane, and the clock suddenly became less loud and deliberate in Tom's
ears.&quot;Well, Tom,&quot; said Mr. Deane, when they were alone, turning his
substantial person a little in his chair, and taking out his
snuff-box; &quot;what's the business, my boy; what's the business?&quot; Mr.
Deane, who had heard from his wife what had passed the day before,
thought Tom was come to appeal to him for some means of averting the
sale.&quot;I hope you'll excuse me for troubling you, uncle,&quot; said Tom,
coloring, but speaking in a tone which, though, tremulous, had a
certain proud independence in it; &quot;but I thought you were the best
person to advise me what to do.&quot;&quot;Ah!&quot; said Mr. Deane, reserving his pinch of snuff, and looking at Tom
with new attention, &quot;let us hear.&quot;&quot;I want to get a situation, uncle, so that I may earn some money,&quot;
said Tom, who never fell into circumlocution.&quot;A situation?&quot; said Mr. Deane, and then took his pinch of snuff with
elaborate justice to each nostril. Tom thought snuff-taking a most
provoking habit.&quot;Why, let me see, how old are you?&quot; said Mr. Deane, as he threw
himself backward again.&quot;Sixteen; I mean, I am going in seventeen,&quot; said Tom, hoping his uncle
noticed how much beard he had.&quot;Let me see; your father had some notion of making you an engineer, I
think?&quot;&quot;But I don't think I could get any money at that for a long while,
could I?&quot;&quot;That's true; but people don't get much money at anything, my boy,
when they're only sixteen. You've had a good deal of schooling,
however; I suppose you're pretty well up in accounts, eh? You
understand book keeping?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Tom, rather falteringly. &quot;I was in Practice. But Mr.
Stelling says I write a good hand, uncle. That's my writing,&quot; added
Tom, laying on the table a copy of the list he had made yesterday.&quot;Ah! that's good, that's good. But, you see, the best hand in the
world'll not get you a better place than a copying-clerk's, if you
know nothing of book-keeping, - nothing of accounts. And a
copying-clerk's a cheap article. But what have you been learning at
school, then?&quot;Mr. Deane had not occupied himself with methods of education, and had
no precise conception of what went forward in expensive schools.&quot;We learned Latin,&quot; said Tom, pausing a little between each item, as
if he were turning over the books in his school-desk to assist his
memory, - &quot;a good deal of Latin; and the last year I did Themes, one
week in Latin and one in English; and Greek and Roman history; and
Euclid; and I began Algebra, but I left it off again; and we had one
day every week for Arithmetic. Then I used to have drawing-lessons;
and there were several other books we either read or learned out
of, - English Poetry, and Hor&Atilde;&brvbar; Paulin&Atilde;&copy; and Blair's Rhetoric, the last
half.&quot;Mr. Deane tapped his snuff-box again and screwed up his mouth; he felt
in the position of many estimable persons when they had read the New
Tariff, and found how many commodities were imported of which they
knew nothing; like a cautious man of business, he was not going to
speak rashly of a raw material in which he had had no experience. But
the presumption was, that if it had been good for anything, so
successful a man as himself would hardly have been ignorant of it.About Latin he had an opinion, and thought that in case of another
war, since people would no longer wear hair-powder, it would be well
to put a tax upon Latin, as a luxury much run upon by the higher
classes, and not telling at all on the ship-owning department. But,
for what he knew, the Hor&Atilde;&copy; Paulin&Atilde;&copy; might be something less neutral. On
the whole, this list of acquirements gave him a sort of repulsion
toward poor Tom.&quot;Well,&quot; he said at last, in rather a cold, sardonic tone, &quot;you've had
three years at these things, - you must be pretty strong in 'em. Hadn't
you better take up some line where they'll come in handy?&quot;Tom colored, and burst out, with new energy:&quot;I'd rather not have any employment of that sort, uncle. I don't like
Latin and those things. I don't know what I could do with them unless
I went as usher in a school; and I don't know them well enough for
that! besides, I would as soon carry a pair of panniers. I don't want
to be that sort of person. I should like to enter into some business
where I can get on, - a manly business, where I should have to look
after things, and get credit for what I did. And I shall want to keep
my mother and sister.&quot;&quot;Ah, young gentleman,&quot; said Mr. Deane, with that tendency to repress
youthful hopes which stout and successful men of fifty find one of
their easiest duties, &quot;that's sooner said than done, - sooner said than
done.&quot;&quot;But didn'tyouget on in that way, uncle?&quot; said Tom, a little
irritated that Mr. Deane did not enter more rapidly into his views. &quot;I
mean, didn't you rise from one place to another through your abilities
and good conduct?&quot;&quot;Ay, ay, sir,&quot; said Mr. Deane, spreading himself in his chair a
little, and entering with great readiness into a retrospect of his own
career. &quot;But I'll tell you how I got on. It wasn't by getting astride
a stick and thinking it would turn into a horse if I sat on it long
enough. I kept my eyes and ears open, sir, and I wasn't too fond of my
own back, and I made my master's interest my own. Why, with only
looking into what went on in the mill,, I found out how there was a
waste of five hundred a-year that might be hindered. Why, sir, I
hadn't more schooling to begin with than a charity boy; but I saw
pretty soon that I couldn't get on far enough without mastering
accounts, and I learned 'em between working hours, after I'd been
unlading. Look here.&quot; Mr. Deane opened a book and pointed to the page.
&quot;I write a good hand enough, and I'll match anybody at all sorts of
reckoning by the head; and I got it all by hard work, and paid for it
out of my own earnings, - often out of my own dinner and supper. And I
looked into the nature of all the things we had to do in the business,
and picked up knowledge as I went about my work, and turned it over in
my head. Why, I'm no mechanic, - I never pretended to be - but I've
thought of a thing or two that the mechanics never thought of, and
it's made a fine difference in our returns. And there isn't an article
shipped or unshipped at our wharf but I know the quality of it. If I
got places, sir, it was because I made myself fit for 'em. If you want
to slip into a round hole, you must make a ball of yourself; that's
where it is.&quot;Mr. Deane tapped his box again. He had been led on by pure enthusiasm
in his subject, and had really forgotten what bearing this
retrospective survey had on his listener. He had found occasion for
saying the same thing more than once before, and was not distinctly
aware that he had not his port-wine before him.&quot;Well, uncle,&quot; said Tom, with a slight complaint in his tone, &quot;that's
what I should like to do. Can'tIget on in the same way?&quot;&quot;In the same way?&quot; said Mr. Deane, eyeing Tom with quiet deliberation.
&quot;There go two or three questions to that, Master Tom. That depends on
what sort of material you are, to begin with, and whether you've been
put into the right mill. But I'll tell you what it is. Your poor
father went the wrong way to work in giving you an education. It
wasn't my business, and I didn't interfere; but it is as I thought it
would be. You've had a sort of learning that's all very well for a
young fellow like our Mr. Stephen Guest, who'll have nothing to do but
sign checks all his life, and may as well have Latin inside his head
as any other sort of stuffing.&quot;&quot;But, uncle,&quot; said Tom, earnestly, &quot;I don't see why the Latin need
hinder me from getting on in business. I shall soon forget it all; it
makes no difference to me. I had to do my lessons at school, but I
always thought they'd never be of any use to me afterward; I didn't
care about them.&quot;&quot;Ay, ay, that's all very well,&quot; said Mr. Deane; &quot;but it doesn't alter
what I was going to say. Your Latin and rigmarole may soon dry off
you, but you'll be but a bare stick after that. Besides, it's whitened
your hands and taken the rough work out of you. And what do you know?
Why, you know nothing about book-keeping, to begin with, and not so
much of reckoning as a common shopman. You'll have to begin at a low
round of the ladder, let me tell you, if you mean to get on in life.
It's no use forgetting the education your father's been paying for, if
you don't give yourself a new un.&quot;Tom bit his lips hard; he felt as if the tears were rising, and he
would rather die than let them.&quot;You want me to help you to a situation,&quot; Mr. Deane went on; &quot;well,
I've no fault to find with that. I'm willing to do something for you.
But you youngsters nowadays think you're to begin with living well and
working easy; you've no notion of running afoot before you get
horseback. Now, you must remember what you are, - you're a lad of
sixteen, trained to nothing particular. There's heaps of your sort,
like so many pebbles, made to fit in nowhere. Well, you might be
apprenticed to some business, - a chemist's and druggist's perhaps;
your Latin might come in a bit there -  - &quot;Tom was going to speak, but Mr. Deane put up his hand and said:&quot;Stop! hear what I've got to say. You don't want to be a 'prentice, - I
know, I know, - you want to make more haste, and you don't want to
stand behind a counter. But if you're a copying-clerk, you'll have to
stand behind a desk, and stare at your ink and paper all day; there
isn't much out-look there, and you won't be much wiser at the end of
the year than at the beginning. The world isn't made of pen, ink, and
paper, and if you're to get on in the world, young man, you must know
what the world's made of. Now the best chance for you 'ud be to have a
place on a wharf, or in a warehouse, where you'd learn the smell of
things, but you wouldn't like that, I'll be bound; you'd have to stand
cold and wet, and be shouldered about by rough fellows. You're too
fine a gentleman for that.&quot;Mr. Deane paused and looked hard at Tom, who certainly felt some
inward struggle before he could reply.&quot;I would rather do what will be best for me in the end, sir; I would
put up with what was disagreeable.&quot;&quot;That's well, if you can carry it out. But you must remember it isn't
only laying hold of a rope, you must go on pulling. It's the mistake
you lads make that have got nothing either in your brains or your
pocket, to think you've got a better start in the world if you stick
yourselves in a place where you can keep your coats clean, and have
the shopwenches take you for fine gentlemen. That wasn't the wayIstarted, young man; when I was sixteen, my jacket smelt of tar, and I
wasn't afraid of handling cheeses. That's the reason I can wear good
broadcloth now, and have my legs under the same table with the head
of the best firms in St. Ogg's.&quot;Uncle Deane tapped his box, and seemed to expand a little under his
waistcoat and gold chain, as he squared his shoulders in the chair.&quot;Is there any place at liberty that you know of now, uncle, that I
should do for? I should like to set to work at once,&quot; said Tom, with a
slight tremor in his voice.&quot;Stop a bit, stop a bit; we mustn't be in too great a hurry. You must
bear in mind, if I put you in a place you're a bit young for, because
you happen to be my nephew, I shall be responsible for you. And
there's no better reason, you know, than your being my nephew; because
it remains to be seen whether you're good for anything.&quot;&quot;I hope I shall never do you any discredit, uncle,&quot; said Tom, hurt, as
all boys are at the statement of the unpleasant truth that people feel
no ground for trusting them. &quot;I care about my own credit too much for
that.&quot;&quot;Well done, Tom, well done! That's the right spirit, and I never
refuse to help anybody if they've a mind to do themselves justice.
There's a young man of two-and-twenty I've got my eye on now. I shall
do what I can for that young man; he's got some pith in him. But then,
you see, he's made good use of his time, - a first-rate calculator, - 
can tell you the cubic contents of anything in no time, and put me up
the other day to a new market for Swedish bark; he's uncommonly
knowing in manufactures, that young fellow.&quot;&quot;I'd better set about learning book-keeping, hadn't I, uncle?&quot; said
Tom, anxious to prove his readiness to exert himself.&quot;Yes, yes, you can't do amiss there. But - Ah, Spence, you're back
again. Well Tom, there's nothing more to be said just now, I think,
and I must go to business again. Good-by. Remember me to your mother.&quot;Mr. Deane put out his hand, with an air of friendly dismissal, and Tom
had not courage to ask another question, especially in the presence of
Mr. Spence. So he went out again into the cold damp air. He had to
call at his uncle Glegg's about the money in the Savings Bank, and by
the time he set out again the mist had thickened, and he could not see
very far before him; but going along River Street again, he was
startled, when he was within two yards of the projecting side of a
shop-window, by the words &quot;Dorlcote Mill&quot; in large letters on a
hand-bill, placed as if on purpose to stare at him. It was the
catalogue of the sale to take place the next week; it was a reason for
hurrying faster out of the town.Poor Tom formed no visions of the distant future as he made his way
homeward; he only felt that the present was very hard. It seemed a
wrong toward him that his uncle Deane had no confidence in him, - did
not see at once that he should acquit himself well, which Tom himself
was as certain of as of the daylight. Apparently he, Tom Tulliver, was
likely to be held of small account in the world; and for the first
time he felt a sinking of heart under the sense that he really was
very ignorant, and could do very little. Who was that enviable young
man that could tell the cubic contents of things in no time, and make
suggestions about Swedish bark! Tom had been used to be so entirely
satisfied with himself, in spite of his breaking down in a
demonstration, and construingnunc illas promite viresas &quot;now
promise those men&quot;; but now he suddenly felt at a disadvantage,
because he knew less than some one else knew. There must be a world of
things connected with that Swedish bark, which, if he only knew them,
might have helped him to get on. It would have been much easier to
make a figure with a spirited horse and a new saddle.Two hours ago, as Tom was walking to St. Ogg's, he saw the distant
future before him as he might have seen a tempting stretch of smooth
sandy beach beyond a belt of flinty shingles; he was on the grassy
bank then, and thought the shingles might soon be passed. But now his
feet were on the sharp stones; the belt of shingles had widened, and
the stretch of sand had dwindled into narrowness.&quot;What did my Uncle Deane say, Tom?&quot; said Maggie, putting her arm
through Tom's as he was warming himself rather drearily by the kitchen
fire. &quot;Did he say he would give you a situation?&quot;&quot;No, he didn't say that. He didn't quite promise me anything; he
seemed to think I couldn't have a very good situation. I'm too young.&quot;&quot;But didn't he speak kindly, Tom?&quot;&quot;Kindly? Pooh! what's the use of talking about that? I wouldn't care
about his speaking kindly, if I could get a situation. But it's such a
nuisance and bother; I've been at school all this while learning Latin
and things, - not a bit of good to me, - and now my uncle says I must
set about learning book-keeping and calculation, and those things. He
seems to make out I'm good for nothing.&quot;Tom's mouth twitched with a bitter expression as he looked at the
fire.&quot;Oh, what a pity we haven't got Dominie Sampson!&quot; said Maggie, who
couldn't help mingling some gayety with their sadness. &quot;If he had
taught me book-keeping by double entry and after the Italian method,
as he did Lucy Bertram, I could teach you, Tom.&quot;&quot;Youteach! Yes, I dare say. That's always the tone you take,&quot; said
Tom.&quot;Dear Tom, I was only joking,&quot; said Maggie, putting her cheek against
his coat-sleeve.&quot;But it's always the same, Maggie,&quot; said Tom, with the little frown he
put on when he was about to be justifiably severe. &quot;You're always
setting yourself up above me and every one else, and I've wanted to
tell you about it several times. You ought not to have spoken as you
did to my uncles and aunts; you should leave it to me to take care of
my mother and you, and not put yourself forward. You think you know
better than any one, but you're almost always wrong. I can judge much
better than you can.&quot;Poor Tom! he had just come from being lectured and made to feel his
inferiority; the reaction of his strong, self-asserting nature must
take place somehow; and here was a case in which he could justly show
himself dominant. Maggie's cheek flushed and her lip quivered with
conflicting resentment and affection, and a certain awe as well as
admiration of Tom's firmer and more effective character. She did not
answer immediately; very angry words rose to her lips, but they were
driven back again, and she said at last:&quot;You often think I'm conceited, Tom, when I don't mean what I say at
all in that way. I don't mean to put myself above you; I know you
behaved better than I did yesterday. But you are always so harsh to
me, Tom.&quot;With the last words the resentment was rising again.&quot;No, I'm not harsh,&quot; said Tom, with severe decision. &quot;I'm always kind
to you, and so I shall be; I shall always take care of you. But you
must mind what I say.&quot;Their mother came in now, and Maggie rushed away, that her burst of
tears, which she felt must come, might not happen till she was safe
upstairs. They were very bitter tears; everybody in the world seemed
so hard and unkind to Maggie; there was no indulgence, no fondness,
such as she imagined when she fashioned the world afresh in her own
thoughts. In books there were people who were always agreeable or
tender, and delighted to do things that made one happy, and who did
not show their kindness by finding fault. The world outside the books
was not a happy one, Maggie felt; it seemed to be a world where people
behaved the best to those they did not pretend to love, and that did
not belong to them. And if life had no love in it, what else was there
for Maggie? Nothing but poverty and the companionship of her mother's
narrow griefs, perhaps of her father's heart-cutting childish
dependence. There is no hopelessness so sad as that of early youth,
when the soul is made up of wants, and has no long memories, no
superadded life in the life of others; though we who looked on think
lightly of such premature despair, as if our vision of the future
lightened the blind sufferer's present.Maggie, in her brown frock, with her eyes reddened and her heavy hair
pushed back, looking from the bed where her father lay to the dull
walls of this sad chamber which was the centre of her world, was a
creature full of eager, passionate longings for all that was beautiful
and glad; thirsty for all knowledge; with an ear straining after
dreamy music that died away and would not come near to her; with a
blind, unconscious yearning for something that would link together the
wonderful impressions of this mysterious life, and give her soul a
sense of home in it.No wonder, when there is this contrast between the outward and the
inward, that painful collisions come of it.>


That first moment of renunciation and submission was followed by days
of violent struggle in the miller's mind, as the gradual access of
bodily strength brought with it increasing ability to embrace in one
view all the conflicting conditions under which he found himself.
Feeble limbs easily resign themselves to be tethered, and when we are
subdued by sickness it seems possible to us to fulfil pledges which
the old vigor comes back and breaks. There were times when poor
Tulliver thought the fulfilment of his promise to Bessy was something
quite too hard for human nature; he had promised her without knowing
what she was going to say, - she might as well have asked him to carry
a ton weight on his back. But again, there were many feelings arguing
on her side, besides the sense that life had been made hard to her by
having married him. He saw a possibility, by much pinching, of saving
money out of his salary toward paying a second dividend to his
creditors, and it would not be easy elsewhere to get a situation such
as he could fill.He had led an easy life, ordering much and working little, and had no
aptitude for any new business. He must perhaps take to day-labor, and
his wife must have help from her sisters, - a prospect doubly bitter to
him, now they had let all Bessy's precious things be sold, probably
because they liked to set her against him, by making her feel that he
had brought her to that pass. He listened to their admonitory talk,
when they came to urge on him what he was bound to do for poor Bessy's
sake, with averted eyes, that every now and then flashed on them
furtively when their backs were turned. Nothing but the dread of
needing their help could have made it an easier alternative to take
their advice.But the strongest influence of all was the love of the old premises
where he had run about when he was a boy, just as Tom had done after
him. The Tullivers had lived on this spot for generations, and he had
sat listening on a low stool on winter evenings while his father
talked of the old half-timbered mill that had been there before the
last great floods which damaged it so that his grandfather pulled it
down and built the new one. It was when he got able to walk about and
look at all the old objects that he felt the strain of his clinging
affection for the old home as part of his life, part of himself. He
couldn't bear to think of himself living on any other spot than this,
where he knew the sound of every gate door, and felt that the shape
and color of every roof and weather-stain and broken hillock was good,
because his growing senses had been fed on them. Our instructed
vagrancy, which was hardly time to linger by the hedgerows, but runs
away early to the tropics, and is at home with palms and
banyans, - which is nourished on books of travel and stretches the
theatre of its imagination to the Zambesi, - can hardly get a dim
notion of what an old-fashioned man like Tulliver felt for this spot,
where all his memories centred, and where life seemed like a familiar
smooth-handled tool that the fingers clutch with loving ease. And just
now he was living in that freshened memory of the far-off time which
comes to us in the passive hours of recovery from sickness.&quot;Ay, Luke,&quot; he said one afternoon, as he stood looking over the
orchard gate, &quot;I remember the day they planted those apple-trees. My
father was a huge man for planting, - it was like a merry-making to him
to get a cart full o' young trees; and I used to stand i' the cold
with him, and follow him about like a dog.&quot;Then he turned round, and leaning against the gate-post, looked at the
opposite buildings.&quot;The old mill 'ud miss me, I think, Luke. There's a story as when the
mill changes hands, the river's angry; I've heard my father say it
many a time. There's no telling whether there mayn't be summatinthe story, for this is a puzzling world, and Old Harry's got a finger
in it - it's been too many for me, I know.&quot;&quot;Ay, sir,&quot; said Luke, with soothing sympathy, &quot;what wi' the rust on
the wheat, an' the firin' o' the ricks an' that, as I've seen i' my
time, - things often looks comical; there's the bacon fat wi' our last
pig run away like butter, - it leaves nought but a scratchin'.&quot;&quot;It's just as if it was yesterday, now,&quot; Mr. Tulliver went on, &quot;when
my father began the malting. I remember, the day they finished the
malt-house, I thought summat great was to come of it; for we'd a
plum-pudding that day and a bit of a feast, and I said to my
mother, - she was a fine dark-eyed woman, my mother was, - the little
wench 'ull be as like her as two peas.&quot; Here Mr. Tulliver put his
stick between his legs, and took out his snuff-box, for the greater
enjoyment of this anecdote, which dropped from him in fragments, as if
he every other moment lost narration in vision. &quot;I was a little chap
no higher much than my mother's knee, - she was sore fond of us
children, Gritty and me, - and so I said to her, 'Mother,' I said,
'shall we have plum-puddingeveryday because o' the malt-house? She
used to tell me o' that till her dying day. She was but a young woman
when she died, my mother was. But it's forty good year since they
finished the malt-house, and it isn't many days out of 'em all as I
haven't looked out into the yard there, the first thing in the
morning, - all weathers, from year's end to year's end. I should go off
my head in a new place. I should be like as if I'd lost my way. It's
all hard, whichever way I look at it, - the harness 'ull gall me, but
it 'ud be summat to draw along the old road, instead of a new un.&quot;&quot;Ay, sir,&quot; said Luke, &quot;you'd be a deal better here nor in some new
place. I can't abide new places mysen: things is allays
awk'ard, - narrow-wheeled waggins, belike, and the stiles all another
sort, an' oat-cake i' some places, tow'rt th' head o' the Floss,
there. It's poor work, changing your country-side.&quot;&quot;But I doubt, Luke, they'll be for getting rid o' Ben, and making you
do with a lad; and I must help a bit wi' the mill. You'll have a worse
place.&quot;&quot;Ne'er mind, sir,&quot; said Luke, &quot;I sha'n't plague mysen. I'n been wi'
you twenty year, an' you can't get twenty year wi' whistlin' for 'em,
no more nor you can make the trees grow: you mun wait till God
A'mighty sends 'em. I can't abide new victual nor new faces,Ican't, - you niver know but what they'll gripe you.&quot;The walk was finished in silence after this, for Luke had disburthened
himself of thoughts to an extent that left his conversational
resources quite barren, and Mr. Tulliver had relapsed from his
recollections into a painful meditation on the choice of hardships
before him. Maggie noticed that he was unusually absent that evening
at tea; and afterward he sat leaning forward in his chair, looking at
the ground, moving his lips, and shaking his head from time to time.
Then he looked hard at Mrs. Tulliver, who was knitting opposite him,
then at Maggie, who, as she bent over her sewing, was intensely
conscious of some drama going forward in her father's mind. Suddenly
he took up the poker and broke the large coal fiercely.&quot;Dear heart, Mr. Tulliver, what can you be thinking of?&quot; said his
wife, looking up in alarm; &quot;it's very wasteful, breaking the coal, and
we've got hardly any large coal left, and I don't know where the rest
is to come from.&quot;&quot;I don't think you're quite so well to-night, are you, father?&quot; said
Maggie; &quot;you seem uneasy.&quot;&quot;Why, how is it Tom doesn't come?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, impatiently.&quot;Dear heart, is it time? I must go and get his supper,&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver, laying down her knitting, and leaving the room.&quot;It's nigh upon half-past eight,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;He'll be here
soon. Go, go and get the big Bible, and open it at the beginning,
where everything's set down. And get the pen and ink.&quot;Maggie obeyed, wondering; but her father gave no further orders, and
only sat listening for Tom's footfall on the gravel, apparently
irritated by the wind, which had risen, and was roaring so as to drown
all other sounds. There was a strange light in his eyes that rather
frightened Maggie;shebegan to wish that Tom would come, too.&quot;There he is, then,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, in an excited way, when the
knock came at last. Maggie went to open the door, but her mother came
out of the kitchen hurriedly, saying, &quot;Stop a bit, Maggie; I'll open
it.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver had begun to be a little frightened at her boy, but she
was jealous of every office others did for him.&quot;Your supper's ready by the kitchen-fire, my boy,&quot; she said, as he
took off his hat and coat. &quot;You shall have it by yourself, just as you
like, and I won't speak to you.&quot;&quot;I think my father wants Tom, mother,&quot; said Maggie; &quot;he must come into
the parlor first.&quot;Tom entered with his usual saddened evening face, but his eyes fell
immediately on the open Bible and the inkstand, and he glanced with a
look of anxious surprise at his father, who was saying, -&quot;Come, come, you're late; I want you.&quot;&quot;Is there anything the matter, father?&quot; said Tom.&quot;You sit down, all of you,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, peremptorily.&quot;And, Tom, sit down here; I've got something for you to write i' the
Bible.&quot;They all three sat down, looking at him. He began to speak slowly,
looking first at his wife.&quot;I've made up my mind, Bessy, and I'll be as good as my word to you.
There'll be the same grave made for us to lie down in, and we mustn't
be bearing one another ill-will. I'll stop in the old place, and I'll
serve under Wakem, and I'll serve him like an honest man; there's no
Tulliver but what's honest, mind that, Tom,&quot; - here his voice
rose, - &quot;they'll have it to throw up against me as I paid a dividend,
but it wasn't my fault; it was because there's raskills in the world.
They've been too many for me, and I must give in. I'll put my neck in
harness, - for you've a right to say as I've brought you into trouble,
Bessy, - and I'll serve him as honest as if he was no raskill; I'm an
honest man, though I shall never hold my head up no more. I'm a tree
as is broke - a tree as is broke.&quot;He paused and looked on the ground. Then suddenly raising his head, he
said, in a louder yet deeper tone:&quot;But I won't forgive him! I know what they say, he never meant me any
harm. That's the way Old Harry props up the rascals. He's been at the
bottom of everything; but he's a fine gentleman, - I know, I know. I
shouldn't ha' gone to law, they say. But who made it so as there was
no arbitratin', and no justice to be got? It signifies nothing to him,
I know that; he's one o' them fine gentlemen as get money by doing
business for poorer folks, and when he's made beggars of 'em he'll
give 'em charity. I won't forgive him! I wish he might be punished
with shame till his own son 'ud like to forget him. I wish he may do
summat as they'd make him work at the treadmill! But he won't, - he's
too big a raskill to let the law lay hold on him. And you mind this,
Tom, - you never forgive him neither, if you mean to be my son.
There'll maybe come a time when you may make him feel; it'll never
come to me; I'n got my head under the yoke. Now write - write it i' the
Bible.&quot;&quot;Oh, father, what?&quot; said Maggie, sinking down by his knee, pale and
trembling. &quot;It's wicked to curse and bear malice.&quot;&quot;It isn't wicked, I tell you,&quot; said her father, fiercely. &quot;It's wicked
as the raskills should prosper; it's the Devil's doing. Do as I tell
you, Tom. Write.&quot;&quot;What am I to write?&quot; said Tom, with gloomy submission.&quot;Write as your father, Edward Tulliver, took service under John Wakem,
the man as had helped to ruin him, because I'd promised my wife to
make her what amends I could for her trouble, and because I wanted to
die in th' old place where I was born and my father was born. Put that
i' the right words - you know how - and then write, as I don't forgive
Wakem for all that; and for all I'll serve him honest, I wish evil may
befall him. Write that.&quot;There was a dead silence as Tom's pen moved along the paper; Mrs.
Tulliver looked scared, and Maggie trembled like a leaf.&quot;Now let me hear what you've wrote,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, Tom read aloud
slowly.&quot;Now write - write as you'll remember what Wakem's done to your father,
and you'll make him and his feel it, if ever the day comes. And sign
your name Thomas Tulliver.&quot;&quot;Oh no, father, dear father!&quot; said Maggie, almost choked with fear.
&quot;You shouldn't make Tom write that.&quot;&quot;Be quiet, Maggie!&quot; said Tom. &quot;Ishallwrite it.&quot;>


It was a clear frosty January day on which Mr. Tulliver first came
downstairs. The bright sun on the chestnut boughs and the roofs
opposite his window had made him impatiently declare that he would be
caged up no longer; he thought everywhere would be more cheery under
this sunshine than his bedroom; for he knew nothing of the bareness
below, which made the flood of sunshine importunate, as if it had an
unfeeling pleasure in showing the empty places, and the marks where
well-known objects once had been. The impression on his mind that it
was but yesterday when he received the letter from Mr. Gore was so
continually implied in his talk, and the attempts to convey to him the
idea that many weeks had passed and much had happened since then had
been so soon swept away by recurrent forgetfulness, that even Mr.
Turnbull had begun to despair of preparing him to meet the facts by
previous knowledge. The full sense of the present could only be
imparted gradually by new experience, - not by mere words, which must
remain weaker than the impressions left by theoldexperience. This
resolution to come downstairs was heard with trembling by the wife and
children. Mrs. Tulliver said Tom must not go to St. Ogg's at the usual
hour, he must wait and see his father downstairs; and Tom complied,
though with an intense inward shrinking from the painful scene. The
hearts of all three had been more deeply dejected than ever during the
last few days. For Guest &amp; Co. had not bought the mill; both mill and
land had been knocked down to Wakem, who had been over the premises,
and had laid before Mr. Deane and Mr. Glegg, in Mrs. Tulliver's
presence, his willingness to employ Mr. Tulliver, in case of his
recovery, as a manager of the business. This proposition had
occasioned much family debating. Uncles and aunts were almost
unanimously of opinion that such an offer ought not to be rejected
when there was nothing in the way but a feeling in Mr. Tulliver's
mind, which, as neither aunts nor uncles shared it, was regarded as
entirely unreasonable and childish, - indeed, as a transferring toward
Wakem of that indignation and hatred which Mr. Tulliver ought properly
to have directed against himself for his general quarrelsomeness, and
his special exhibition of it in going to law. Here was an opportunity
for Mr. Tulliver to provide for his wife and daughter without any
assistance from his wife's relations, and without that too evident
descent into pauperism which makes it annoying to respectable people
to meet the degraded member of the family by the wayside. Mr.
Tulliver, Mrs. Glegg considered, must be made to feel, when he came to
his right mind, that he could never humble himself enough; forthathad come which she had always foreseen would come of his insolence in
time past &quot;to them as were the best friends he'd got to look to.&quot; Mr
Glegg and Mr. Deane were less stern in their views, but they both of
them thought Tulliver had done enough harm by his hot-tempered
crotchets and ought to put them out of the question when a livelihood
was offered him; Wakem showed a right feeling about the matter, -hehad no grudge against Tulliver.Tom had protested against entertaining the proposition. He shouldn't
like his father to be under Wakem; he thought it would look
mean-spirited; but his mother's main distress was the utter
impossibility of ever &quot;turning Mr. Tulliver round about Wakem,&quot; or
getting him to hear reason; no, they would all have to go and live in
a pigsty on purpose to spite Wakem, who spoke &quot;so as nobody could be
fairer.&quot; Indeed, Mrs. Tulliver's mind was reduced to such confusion by
living in this strange medium of unaccountable sorrow, against which
she continually appealed by asking, &quot;Oh dear, whathaveI done to
deserve worse than other women?&quot; that Maggie began to suspect her poor
mother's wits were quite going.&quot;Tom,&quot; she said, when they were out of their father's room together,
&quot;wemusttry to make father understand a little of what has happened
before he goes downstairs. But we must get my mother away. She will
say something that will do harm. Ask Kezia to fetch her down, and keep
her engaged with something in the kitchen.&quot;Kezia was equal to the task. Having declared her intention of staying
till the master could get about again, &quot;wage or no wage,&quot; she had
found a certain recompense in keeping a strong hand over her mistress,
scolding her for &quot;moithering&quot; herself, and going about all day without
changing her cap, and looking as if she was &quot;mushed.&quot; Altogether, this
time of trouble was rather a Saturnalian time to Kezia; she could
scold her betters with unreproved freedom. On this particular occasion
there were drying clothes to be fetched in; she wished to know if one
pair of hands could do everything in-doors and out, and observed thatsheshould have thought it would be good for Mrs. Tulliver to put on
her bonnet, and get a breath of fresh air by doing that needful piece
of work. Poor Mrs. Tulliver went submissively downstairs; to be
ordered about by a servant was the last remnant of her household
dignities, - she would soon have no servant to scold her. Mr. Tulliver
was resting in his chair a little after the fatigue of dressing, and
Maggie and Tom were seated near him, when Luke entered to ask if he
should help master downstairs.&quot;Ay, ay, Luke; stop a bit, sit down,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver pointing his
stick toward a chair, and looking at him with that pursuant gaze which
convalescent persons often have for those who have tended them,
reminding one of an infant gazing about after its nurse. For Luke had
been a constant night-watcher by his master's bed.&quot;How's the water now, eh, Luke?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;Dix hasn't been
choking you up again, eh?&quot;&quot;No, sir, it's all right.&quot;&quot;Ay, I thought not; he won't be in a hurry at that again, now Riley's
been to settle him. That was what I said to Riley yesterday - I
said -  - &quot;Mr. Tulliver leaned forward, resting his elbows on the armchair, and
looking on the ground as if in search of something, striving after
vanishing images like a man struggling against a doze. Maggie looked
at Tom in mute distress, their father's mind was so far off the
present, which would by-and-by thrust itself on his wandering
consciousness! Tom was almost ready to rush away, with that impatience
of painful emotion which makes one of the differences between youth
and maiden, man and woman.&quot;Father,&quot; said Maggie, laying her hand on his, &quot;don't you remember
that Mr. Riley is dead?&quot;&quot;Dead?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, sharply, looking in her face with a
strange, examining glance.&quot;Yes, he died of apoplexy nearly a year ago. I remember hearing you
say you had to pay money for him; and he left his daughters badly off;
one of them is under-teacher at Miss Firniss's, where I've been to
school, you know.&quot;&quot;Ah?&quot; said her father, doubtfully, still looking in her face. But as
soon as Tom began to speak he turned to look athimwith the same
inquiring glances, as if he were rather surprised at the presence of
these two young people. Whenever his mind was wandering in the far
past, he fell into this oblivion of their actual faces; they were not
those of the lad and the little wench who belonged to that past.&quot;It's a long while since you had the dispute with Dix, father,&quot; said
Tom. &quot;I remember your talking about it three years ago, before I went
to school at Mr. Stelling's. I've been at school there three years;
don't you remember?&quot;Mr. Tulliver threw himself backward again, losing the childlike
outward glance under a rush of new ideas, which diverted him from
external impressions.&quot;Ay, ay,&quot; he said, after a minute or two, &quot;I've paid a deal o'
money - I was determined my son should have a good eddication; I'd none
myself, and I've felt the miss of it. And he'll want no other fortin,
that's what I say - if Wakem was to get the better of me again -  - &quot;The thought of Wakem roused new vibrations, and after a moment's pause
he began to look at the coat he had on, and to feel in his
side-pocket. Then he turned to Tom, and said in his old sharp way,
&quot;Where have they put Gore's letter?&quot;It was close at hand in a drawer, for he had often asked for it
before.&quot;You know what there is in the letter, father?&quot; said Tom, as he gave
it to him.&quot;To be sure I do,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, rather angrily. &quot;What o' that?
If Furley can't take to the property, somebody else can; there's
plenty o' people in the world besides Furley. But it's hindering - my
not being well - go and tell 'em to get the horse in the gig, Luke; I
can get down to St. Ogg's well enough - Gore's expecting me.&quot;&quot;No, dear father!&quot; Maggie burst out entreatingly; &quot;it's a very long
while since all that; you've been ill a great many weeks, - more than
two months; everything is changed.&quot;Mr. Tulliver looked at them all three alternately with a startled
gaze; the idea that much had happened of which he knew nothing had
often transiently arrested him before, but it came upon him now with
entire novelty.&quot;Yes, father,&quot; said Tom, in answer to the gaze. &quot;You needn't trouble
your mind about business until you are quite well; everything is
settled about that for the present, - about the mill and the land and
the debts.&quot;&quot;What's settled, then?&quot; said his father, angrily.&quot;Don't you take on too much bout it, sir,&quot; said Luke. &quot;You'd ha' paid
iverybody if you could, - that's what I said to Master Tom, - I said
you'd ha' paid iverybody if you could.&quot;Good Luke felt, after the manner of contented hard-working men whose
lives have been spent in servitude, that sense of natural fitness in
rank which made his master's downfall a tragedy to him. He was urged,
in his slow way, to say something that would express his share in the
family sorrow; and these words, which he had used over and over again
to Tom when he wanted to decline the full payment of his fifty pounds
out of the children's money, were the most ready to his tongue. They
were just the words to lay the most painful hold on his master's
bewildered mind.&quot;Paid everybody?&quot; he said, with vehement agitation, his face flushing,
and his eye lighting up. &quot;Why - what - have they made me abankrupt?&quot;&quot;Oh, father, dear father!&quot; said Maggie, who thought that terrible word
really represented the fact; &quot;bear it well, because we love you; your
children will always love you. Tom will pay them all; he says he will,
when he's a man.&quot;She felt her father beginning to tremble; his voice trembled too, as
he said, after a few moments:&quot;Ay, my little wench, but I shall never live twice o'er.&quot;&quot;But perhaps you will live to see me pay everybody, father,&quot; said Tom,
speaking with a great effort.&quot;Ah, my lad,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, shaking his head slowly, &quot;but what's
broke can never be whole again; it 'ud be your doing, not mine.&quot; Then
looking up at him, &quot;You're only sixteen; it's an up-hill fight for
you, but you mustn't throw it at your father; the raskills have been
too many for him. I've given you a good eddication, - that'll start
you.&quot;Something in his throat half choked the last words; the flush, which
had alarmed his children because it had so often preceded a recurrence
of paralysis, had subsided, and his face looked pale and tremulous.
Tom said nothing; he was still struggling against his inclination to
rush away. His father remained quiet a minute or two, but his mind did
not seem to be wandering again.&quot;Have they sold me up, then?&quot; he said more clamly, as if he were
possessed simply by the desire to know what had happened.&quot;Everything is sold, father; but we don't know all about the mill and
the land yet,&quot; said Tom, anxious to ward off any question leading to
the fact that Wakem was the purchaser.&quot;You must not be surprised to see the room look very bare downstairs,
father,&quot; said Maggie; &quot;but there's your chair and the bureau;they'renot gone.&quot;&quot;Let us go; help me down, Luke, - I'll go and see everything,&quot; said Mr.
Tulliver, leaning on his stick, and stretching out his other hand
toward Luke.&quot;Ay, sir,&quot; said Luke, as he gave his arm to his master, &quot;you'll make
up your mind to't a bit better when you've seen iverything; you'll get
used to't. That's what my mother says about her shortness o'
breath, - she says she's made friends wi't now, though she fought
again' it sore when it just come on.&quot;Maggie ran on before to see that all was right in the dreary parlor,
where the fire, dulled by the frosty sunshine, seemed part of the
general shabbiness. She turned her father's chair, and pushed aside
the table to make an easy way for him, and then stood with a beating
heart to see him enter and look round for the first time. Tom advanced
before him, carrying the leg-rest, and stood beside Maggie on the
hearth. Of those two young hearts Tom's suffered the most unmixed
pain, for Maggie, with all her keen susceptibility, yet felt as if the
sorrow made larger room for her love to flow in, and gave
breathing-space to her passionate nature. No true boy feels that; he
would rather go and slay the Nemean lion, or perform any round of
heroic labors, than endure perpetual appeals to his pity, for evils
over which he can make no conquest.Mr. Tulliver paused just inside the door, resting on Luke, and looking
round him at all the bare places, which for him were filled with the
shadows of departed objects, - the daily companions of his life. His
faculties seemed to be renewing their strength from getting a footing
on this demonstration of the senses.&quot;Ah!&quot; he said slowly, moving toward his chair, &quot;they've sold me
up - they've sold me up.&quot;Then seating himself, and laying down his stick, while Luke left the
room, he looked round again.&quot;They've left the big Bible,&quot; he said. &quot;It's got everything in, - when
I was born and married; bring it me, Tom.&quot;The quarto Bible was laid open before him at the fly-leaf, and while
he was reading with slowly travelling eyes Mrs. Tulliver entered the
room, but stood in mute surprise to find her husband down already, and
with the great Bible before him.&quot;Ah,&quot; he said, looking at a spot where his finger rested, &quot;my mother
was Margaret Beaton; she died when she was forty-seven, - hers wasn't a
long-lived family; we're our mother's children, Gritty and me are, - we
shall go to our last bed before long.&quot;He seemed to be pausing over the record of his sister's birth and
marriage, as if it were suggesting new thoughts to him; then he
suddenly looked up at Tom, and said, in a sharp tone of alarm:&quot;They haven't come upo' Moss for the money as I lent him, have they?&quot;&quot;No, father,&quot; said Tom; &quot;the note was burnt.&quot;Mr. Tulliver turned his eyes on the page again, and presently said:&quot;Ah - Elizabeth Dodson - it's eighteen year since I married her -  - &quot;&quot;Come next Ladyday,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, going up to his side and
looking at the page.Her husband fixed his eyes earnestly on her face.&quot;Poor Bessy,&quot; he said, &quot;you was a pretty lass then, - everybody said
so, - and I used to think you kept your good looks rarely. But you're
sorely aged; don't you bear me ill-will - I meant to do well by you - we
promised one another for better or for worse -  - &quot;&quot;But I never thought it 'ud be so for worse as this,&quot; said poor Mrs.
Tulliver, with the strange, scared look that had come over her of
late; &quot;and my poor father gave me away - and to come on so all at
once -  - &quot;&quot;Oh, mother!&quot; said Maggie, &quot;don't talk in that way.&quot;&quot;No, I know you won't let your poor mother speak - that's been the way
all my life - your father never minded what I said - it 'ud have been o'
no use for me to beg and pray - and it 'ud be no use now, not if I was
to go down o' my hands and knees -  - &quot;&quot;Don't say so, Bessy,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, whose pride, in these first
moments of humiliation, was in abeyance to the sense of some justice
in his wife's reproach. &quot;It there's anything left as I could do to
make you amends, I wouldn't say you nay.&quot;&quot;Then we might stay here and get a living, and I might keep among my
own sisters, - and me been such a good wife to you, and never crossed
you from week's end to week's end - and they all say so - they say it
'ud be nothing but right, only you're so turned against Wakem.&quot;&quot;Mother,&quot; said Tom, severely, &quot;this is not the time to talk about
that.&quot;&quot;Let her be,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;Say what you mean, Bessy.&quot;&quot;Why, now the mill and the land's all Wakem's, and he's got everything
in his hands, what's the use o' setting your face against him, when he
says you may stay here, and speaks as fair as can be, and says you may
manage the business, and have thirty shillings a-week, and a horse to
ride about to market? And where have we got to put our heads? We must
go into one o' the cottages in the village, - and me and my children
brought down to that, - and all because you must set your mind against
folks till there's no turning you.&quot;Mr. Tulliver had sunk back in his chair trembling.&quot;You may do as you like wi' me, Bessy,&quot; he said, in a low voice; &quot;I've
been the bringing of you to poverty - this world's too many for me - I'm
nought but a bankrupt; it's no use standing up for anything now.&quot;&quot;Father,&quot; said Tom, &quot;I don't agree with my mother or my uncles, and I
don't think you ought to submit to be under Wakem. I get a pound
a-week now, and you can find something else to do when you get well.&quot;&quot;Say no more, Tom, say no more; I've had enough for this day. Give me
a kiss, Bessy, and let us bear one another no ill-will; we shall never
be young again - this world's been too many for me.&quot;>


It was at eleven o'clock the next morning that the aunts and uncles
came to hold their consultation. The fire was lighted in the large
parlor, and poor Mrs. Tulliver, with a confused impression that it was
a great occasion, like a funeral, unbagged the bell-rope tassels, and
unpinned the curtains, adjusting them in proper folds, looking round
and shaking her head sadly at the polished tops and legs of the
tables, which sister Pullet herself could not accuse of insufficient
brightness.Mr. Deane was not coming, he was away on business; but Mrs. Deane
appeared punctually in that handsome new gig with the head to it, and
the livery-servant driving it, which had thrown so clear a light on
several traits in her character to some of her female friends in St.
Ogg's. Mr. Deane had been advancing in the world as rapidly as Mr.
Tulliver had been going down in it; and in Mrs. Deane's house the
Dodson linen and plate were beginning to hold quite a subordinate
position, as a mere supplement to the handsomer articles of the same
kind, purchased in recent years, - a change which had caused an
occasional coolness in the sisterly intercourse between her and Mrs.
Glegg, who felt that Susan was getting &quot;like the rest,&quot; and there
would soon be little of the true Dodson spirit surviving except in
herself, and, it might be hoped, in those nephews who supported the
Dodson name on the family land, far away in the Wolds.People who live at a distance are naturally less faulty than those
immediately under our own eyes; and it seems superfluous, when we
consider the remote geographical position of the Ethiopians, and how
very little the Greeks had to do with them, to inquire further why
Homer calls them &quot;blameless.&quot;Mrs. Deane was the first to arrive; and when she had taken her seat in
the large parlor, Mrs. Tulliver came down to her with her comely face
a little distorted, nearly as it would have been if she had been
crying. She was not a woman who could shed abundant tears, except in
moments when the prospect of losing her furniture became unusually
vivid, but she felt how unfitting it was to be quite calm under
present circumstances.&quot;Oh, sister, what a world this is!&quot; she exclaimed as she entered;
&quot;what trouble, oh dear!&quot;Mrs. Deane was a thin-lipped woman, who made small well-considered
speeches on peculiar occasions, repeating them afterward to her
husband, and asking him if she had not spoken very properly.&quot;Yes, sister,&quot; she said deliberately, &quot;this is a changing world, and
we don't know to-day what may happen tomorrow. But it's right to be
prepared for all things, and if trouble's sent, to remember as it
isn't sent without a cause. I'm very sorry for you as a sister, and if
the doctor orders jelly for Mr. Tulliver, I hope you'll let me know.
I'll send it willingly; for it is but right he should have proper
attendance while he's ill.&quot;&quot;Thank you, Susan,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, rather faintly, withdrawing
her fat hand from her sister's thin one. &quot;But there's been no talk o'
jelly yet.&quot; Then after a moment's pause she added, &quot;There's a dozen o'
cut jelly-glasses upstairs - I shall never put jelly into 'em no more.&quot;Her voice was rather agitated as she uttered the last words, but the
sound of wheels diverted her thoughts. Mr. and Mrs. Glegg were come,
and were almost immediately followed by Mr. and Mrs. Pullet.Mrs. Pullet entered crying, as a compendious mode, at all times, of
expressing what were her views of life in general, and what, in brief,
were the opinions she held concerning the particular case before her.Mrs. Glegg had on her fuzziest front, and garments which appeared to
have had a recent resurrection from rather a creasy form of burial; a
costume selected with the high moral purpose of instilling perfect
humility into Bessy and her children.&quot;Mrs. G., won't you come nearer the fire?&quot; said her husband, unwilling
to take the more comfortable seat without offering it to her.&quot;You see I've seated myself here, Mr. Glegg,&quot; returned this superior
woman; &quot;youcan roast yourself, if you like.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, seating himself good-humoredly, &quot;and how's the
poor man upstairs?&quot;&quot;Dr. Turnbull thought him a deal better this morning,&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver; &quot;he took more notice, and spoke to me; but he's never known
Tom yet, - looks at the poor lad as if he was a stranger, though he
said something once about Tom and the pony. The doctor says his
memory's gone a long way back, and he doesn't know Tom because he's
thinking of him when he was little. Eh dear, eh dear!&quot;&quot;I doubt it's the water got on his brain,&quot; said aunt Pullet, turning
round from adjusting her cap in a melancholy way at the pier-glass.
&quot;It's much if he ever gets up again; and if he does, he'll most like
be childish, as Mr. Carr was, poor man! They fed him with a spoon as
if he'd been a babby for three year. He'd quite lost the use of his
limbs; but then he'd got a Bath chair, and somebody to draw him; and
that's what you won't have, I doubt, Bessy.&quot;&quot;Sister Pullet,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, severely, &quot;if I understand right,
we've come together this morning to advise and consult about what's to
be done in this disgrace as has fallen upon the family, and not to
talk o' people as don't belong to us. Mr. Carr was none of our blood,
nor noways connected with us, as I've ever heared.&quot;&quot;Sister Glegg,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, in a pleading tone, drawing on her
gloves again, and stroking the fingers in an agitated manner, &quot;if
you've got anything disrespectful to say o' Mr. Carr, I do beg of you
as you won't say it to me.Iknow what he was,&quot; she added, with a
sigh; &quot;his breath was short to that degree as you could hear him two
rooms off.&quot;&quot;Sophy!&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, with indignant disgust, &quot;youdotalk o'
people's complaints till it's quite undecent. But I say again, as I
said before, I didn't come away from home to talk about acquaintances,
whether they'd short breath or long. If we aren't come together for
one to hear what the other 'ull do to save a sister and her children
from the parish,Ishall go back.Onecan't act without the other,
I suppose; it isn't to be expected asIshould do everything.&quot;&quot;Well, Jane,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, &quot;I don't see as you've been so very
forrard at doing. So far as I know, this is the first time as here
you've been, since it's been known as the bailiff's in the house; and
I was here yesterday, and looked at all Bessy's linen and things, and
I told her I'd buy in the spotted tablecloths. I couldn't speak
fairer; for as for the teapot as she doesn't want to go out o' the
family, it stands to sense I can't do with two silver teapots, not if
ithadn'ta straight spout, but the spotted damask I was allays fond
on.&quot;&quot;I wish it could be managed so as my teapot and chany and the best
castors needn't be put up for sale,&quot; said poor Mrs. Tulliver,
beseechingly, &quot;and the sugar-tongs the first things ever I bought.&quot;&quot;But that can't be helped, you know,&quot; said Mr. Glegg. &quot;If one o' the
family chooses to buy 'em in, they can, but one thing must be bid for
as well as another.&quot;&quot;And it isn't to be looked for,&quot; said uncle Pullet, with unwonted
independence of idea, &quot;as your own family should pay more for things
nor they'll fetch. They may go for an old song by auction.&quot;&quot;Oh dear, oh dear,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, &quot;to think o' my chany being
sold i' that way, and I bought it when I was married, just as you did
yours, Jane and Sophy; and I know you didn't like mine, because o' the
sprig, but I was fond of it; and there's never been a bit broke, for
I've washed it myself; and there's the tulips on the cups, and the
roses, as anybody might go and look at 'em for pleasure. You wouldn't
likeyourchany to go for an old song and be broke to pieces, though
yours has got no color in it, Jane, - it's all white and fluted, and
didn't cost so much as mine. And there's the castors, sister Deane, I
can't think but you'd like to have the castors, for I've heard you say
they're pretty.&quot;&quot;Well, I've no objection to buy some of the best things,&quot; said Mrs.
Deane, rather loftily; &quot;we can do with extra things in our house.&quot;&quot;Best things!&quot; exclaimed Mrs. Glegg, with severity, which had gathered
intensity from her long silence. &quot;It drives me past patience to hear
you all talking o' best things, and buying in this, that, and the
other, such as silver and chany. You must bring your mind to your
circumstances, Bessy, and not be thinking o' silver and chany; but
whether you shall get so much as a flock-bed to lie on, and a blanket
to cover you, and a stool to sit on. You must remember, if you get
'em, it'll be because your friends have bought 'em for you, for you're
dependent uponthemfor everything; for your husband lies there
helpless, and hasn't got a penny i' the world to call his own. And
it's for your own good I say this, for it's right you should feel what
your state is, and what disgrace your husband's brought on your own
family, as you've got to look to for everything, and be humble in your
mind.&quot;Mrs. Glegg paused, for speaking with much energy for the good of
others is naturally exhausting.Mrs. Tulliver, always borne down by the family predominance of sister
Jane, who had made her wear the yoke of a younger sister in very
tender years, said pleadingly:&quot;I'm sure, sister, I've never asked anybody to do anything, only buy
things as it 'ud be a pleasure to 'em to have, so as they mightn't go
and be spoiled i' strange houses. I never asked anybody to buy the
things in for me and my children; though there's the linen I spun, and
I thought when Tom was born, - I thought one o' the first things when
he was lying i' the cradle, as all the things I'd bought wi' my own
money, and been so careful of, 'ud go to him. But I've said nothing as
I wanted my sisters to pay their money for me. What my husband has
done forhissister's unknown, and we should ha' been better off
this day if it hadn't been as he's lent money and never asked for it
again.&quot;&quot;Come, come,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, kindly, &quot;don't let us make things too
dark. What's done can't be undone. We shall make a shift among us to
buy what's sufficient for you; though, as Mrs. G. says, they must be
useful, plain things. We mustn't be thinking o' what's unnecessary. A
table, and a chair or two, and kitchen things, and a good bed, and
such-like. Why, I've seen the day when I shouldn't ha' known myself if
I'd lain on sacking i'stead o' the floor. We get a deal o' useless
things about us, only because we've got the money to spend.&quot;&quot;Mr. Glegg,&quot; said Mrs. G., &quot;if you'll be kind enough to let me speak,
i'stead o' taking the words out o' my mouth, - I was going to say,
Bessy, as it's fine talking for you to say as you've never asked us to
buy anything for you; let me tell you, yououghtto have asked us.
Pray, how are you to be purvided for, if your own family don't help
you? You must go to the parish, if they didn't. And you ought to know
that, and keep it in mind, and ask us humble to do what we can for
you, i'stead o' saying, and making a boast, as you've never asked us
for anything.&quot;&quot;You talked o' the Mosses, and what Mr. Tulliver's done for 'em,&quot; said
uncle Pullet, who became unusually suggestive where advances of money
were concerned. &quot;Haven'ttheybeen anear you? They ought to do
something as well as other folks; and if he's lent 'em money, they
ought to be made to pay it back.&quot;&quot;Yes, to be sure,&quot; said Mrs. Deane; &quot;I've been thinking so. How is it
Mr. and Mrs. Moss aren't here to meet us? It is but right they should
do their share.&quot;&quot;Oh, dear!&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, &quot;I never sent 'em word about Mr.
Tulliver, and they live so back'ard among the lanes at Basset, they
niver hear anything only when Mr. Moss comes to market. But I niver
gave 'em a thought. I wonder Maggie didn't, though, for she was allays
so fond of her aunt Moss.&quot;&quot;Why don't your children come in, Bessy?&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, at the
mention of Maggie. &quot;They should hear what their aunts and uncles have
got to say; and Maggie, - when it's me as have paid for half her
schooling, she ought to think more of her aunt Pullet than of aunt
Moss. I may go off sudden when I get home to-day; there's no telling.&quot;&quot;If I'd hadmyway,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, &quot;the children 'ud ha' been in
the room from the first. It's time they knew who they've to look to,
and it's right assomebodyshould talk to 'em, and let 'em know
their condition i' life, and what they're come down to, and make 'em
feel as they've got to suffer for their father's faults.&quot;&quot;Well, I'll go and fetch 'em, sister,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, resignedly.
She was quite crushed now, and thought of the treasures in the
storeroom with no other feeling than blank despair.She went upstairs to fetch Tom and Maggie, who were both in their
father's room, and was on her way down again, when the sight of the
storeroom door suggested a new thought to her. She went toward it, and
left the children to go down by themselves.The aunts and uncles appeared to have been in warm discussion when the
brother and sister entered, - both with shrinking reluctance; for
though Tom, with a practical sagacity which had been roused into
activity by the strong stimulus of the new emotions he had undergone
since yesterday, had been turning over in his mind a plan which he
meant to propose to one of his aunts or uncles, he felt by no means
amicably toward them, and dreaded meeting them all at once as he would
have dreaded a large dose of concentrated physic, which was but just
endurable in small draughts. As for Maggie, she was peculiarly
depressed this morning; she had been called up, after brief rest, at
three o'clock, and had that strange dreamy weariness which comes from
watching in a sick-room through the chill hours of early twilight and
breaking day, - in which the outside day-light life seems to have no
importance, and to be a mere margin to the hours in the darkened
chamber. Their entrance interrupted the conversation. The shaking of
hands was a melancholy and silent ceremony, till uncle Pullet
observed, as Tom approached him:&quot;Well, young sir, we've been talking as we should want your pen and
ink; you can write rarely now, after all your schooling, I should
think.&quot;&quot;Ay, ay,&quot; said uncle Glegg, with admonition which he meant to be kind,
&quot;we must look to see the good of all this schooling, as your father's
sunk so much money in, now, -Now's the time, Tom, to let us see the good o' your learning. Let us
see whether you can do better than I can, as have made my fortin
without it. But I began wi' doing with little, you see; I could live
on a basin o' porridge and a crust o' bread-and-cheese. But I doubt
high living and high learning 'ull make it harder for you, young man,
nor it was for me.&quot;&quot;But he must do it,&quot; interposed aunt Glegg, energetically, &quot;whether
it's hard or no. He hasn't got to consider what's hard; he must
consider as he isn't to trusten to his friends to keep him in idleness
and luxury; he's got to bear the fruits of his father's misconduct,
and bring his mind to fare hard and to work hard. And he must be
humble and grateful to his aunts and uncles for what they're doing for
his mother and father, as must be turned out into the streets and go
to the workhouse if they didn't help 'em. And his sister, too,&quot;
continued Mrs. Glegg, looking severely at Maggie, who had sat down on
the sofa by her aunt Deane, drawn to her by the sense that she was
Lucy's mother, &quot;she must make up her mind to be humble and work; for
there'll be no servants to wait on her any more, - she must remember
that. She must do the work o' the house, and she must respect and love
her aunts as have done so much for her, and saved their money to leave
to their nepheys and nieces.&quot;Tom was still standing before the table in the centre of the group.
There was a heightened color in his face, and he was very far from
looking humbled, but he was preparing to say, in a respectful tone,
something he had previously meditated, when the door opened and his
mother re-entered.Poor Mrs. Tulliver had in her hands a small tray, on which she had
placed her silver teapot, a specimen teacup and saucer, the castors,
and sugar-tongs.&quot;See here, sister,&quot; she said, looking at Mrs. Deane, as she set the
tray on the table, &quot;I thought, perhaps, if you looked at the teapot
again, - it's a good while since you saw it, - you might like the
pattern better; it makes beautiful tea, and there's a stand and
everything; you might use it for every day, or else lay it by for Lucy
when she goes to housekeeping. I should be so loath for 'em to buy it
at the Golden Lion,&quot; said the poor woman, her heart swelling, and the
tears coming, - &quot;my teapot as I bought when I was married, and to think
of its being scratched, and set before the travellers and folks, and
my letters on it, - see here, E. D., - and everybody to see 'em.&quot;&quot;Ah, dear, dear!&quot; said aunt Pullet, shaking her head with deep
sadness, &quot;it's very bad, - to think o' the family initials going about
everywhere - it niver was so before; you're a very unlucky sister,
Bessy. But what's the use o' buying the teapot, when there's the linen
and spoons and everything to go, and some of 'em with your full
name, - and when it's got that straight spout, too.&quot;&quot;As to disgrace o' the family,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, &quot;that can't be helped
wi' buying teapots. The disgrace is, for one o' the family to ha'
married a man as has brought her to beggary. The disgrace is, as
they're to be sold up. We can't hinder the country from knowing that.&quot;Maggie had started up from the sofa at the allusion to her father, but
Tom saw her action and flushed face in time to prevent her from
speaking. &quot;Be quiet, Maggie,&quot; he said authoritatively, pushing her
aside. It was a remarkable manifestation of self-command and practical
judgment in a lad of fifteen, that when his aunt Glegg ceased, he
began to speak in a quiet and respectful manner, though with a good
deal of trembling in his voice; for his mother's words had cut him to
the quick.&quot;Then, aunt,&quot; he said, looking straight at Mrs. Glegg, &quot;if you think
it's a disgrace to the family that we should be sold up, wouldn't it
be better to prevent it altogether? And if you and aunt Pullet,&quot; he
continued, looking at the latter, &quot;think of leaving any money to me
and Maggie, wouldn't it be better to give it now, and pay the debt
we're going to be sold up for, and save my mother from parting with
her furniture?&quot;There was silence for a few moments, for every one, including Maggie,
was astonished at Tom's sudden manliness of tone. Uncle Glegg was the
first to speak.&quot;Ay, ay, young man, come now! You show some notion o' things. But
there's the interest, you must remember; your aunts get five per cent
on their money, and they'd lose that if they advanced it; you haven't
thought o' that.&quot;&quot;I could work and pay that every year,&quot; said Tom, promptly. &quot;I'd do
anything to save my mother from parting with her things.&quot;&quot;Well done!&quot; said uncle Glegg, admiringly. He had been drawing Tom
out, rather than reflecting on the practicability of his proposal. But
he had produced the unfortunate result of irritating his wife.&quot;&quot;Yes, Mr. Glegg!&quot; said that lady, with angry sarcasm. &quot;It's pleasant
work for you to be giving my money away, as you've pretended to leave
at my own disposal. And my money, as was my own father's gift, and not
yours, Mr. Glegg; and I've saved it, and added to it myself, and had
more to put out almost every year, and it's to go and be sunk in other
folks' furniture, and encourage 'em in luxury and extravagance as
they've no means of supporting; and I'm to alter my will, or have a
codicil made, and leave two or three hundred less behind me when I
die, - me as have allays done right and been careful, and the eldest o'
the family; and my money's to go and be squandered on them as have had
the same chance as me, only they've been wicked and wasteful. Sister
Pullet,youmay do as you like, and you may let your husband rob you
back again o' the money he's given you, but that isn'tmysperrit.&quot;&quot;La, Jane, how fiery you are!&quot; said Mrs. Pullet. &quot;I'm sure you'll have
the blood in your head, and have to be cupped. I'm sorry for Bessy and
her children, - I'm sure I think of 'em o' nights dreadful, for I sleep
very bad wi' this new medicine, - but it's no use for me to think o'
doing anything, if you won't meet me half-way.&quot;&quot;Why, there's this to be considered,&quot; said Mr. Glegg. &quot;It's no use to
pay off this debt and save the furniture, when there's all the law
debts behind, as 'ud take every shilling, and more than could be made
out o' land and stock, for I've made that out from Lawyer Gore. We'd
need save our money to keep the poor man with, instead o' spending it
on furniture as he can neither eat nor drink. Youwillbe so hasty,
Jane, as if I didn't know what was reasonable.&quot;&quot;Then speak accordingly, Mr. Glegg!&quot; said his wife, with slow, loud
emphasis, bending her head toward him significantly.Tom's countenance had fallen during this conversation, and his lip
quivered; but he was determined not to give way. He would behave like
a man. Maggie, on the contrary, after her momentary delight in Tom's
speech, had relapsed into her state of trembling indignation. Her
mother had been standing close by Tom's side, and had been clinging to
his arm ever since he had last spoken; Maggie suddenly started up and
stood in front of them, her eyes flashing like the eyes of a young
lioness.&quot;Why do you come, then,&quot; she burst out, &quot;talking and interfering with
us and scolding us, if you don't mean to do anything to help my poor
mother - your own sister, - if you've no feeling for her when she's in
trouble, and won't part with anything, though you would never miss it,
to save her from pain? Keep away from us then, and don't come to find
fault with my father, - he was better than any of you; he was kind, - he
would have helpedyou, if you had been in trouble. Tom and I don't
ever want to have any of your money, if you won't help my mother. We'd
rather not have it! We'll do without you.&quot;Maggie, having hurled her defiance at aunts and uncles in this way,
stood still, with her large dark eyes glaring at them, as if she were
ready to await all consequences.Mrs. Tulliver was frightened; there was something portentous in this
mad outbreak; she did not see how life could go on after it. Tom was
vexed; it was nouseto talk so. The aunts were silent with surprise
for some moments. At length, in a case of aberration such as this,
comment presented itself as more expedient than any answer.&quot;You haven't seen the end o' your trouble wi' that child, Bessy,&quot; said
Mrs. Pullet; &quot;she's beyond everything for boldness and unthankfulness.
It's dreadful. I might ha' let alone paying for her schooling, for
she's worse nor ever.&quot;&quot;It's no more than what I've allays said,&quot; followed Mrs. Glegg. &quot;Other
folks may be surprised, but I'm not. I've said over and over
again, - years ago I've said, - 'Mark my words; that child 'ull come to
no good; there isn't a bit of our family in her.' And as for her
having so much schooling, I never thought well o' that. I'd my reasons
when I saidIwouldn't pay anything toward it.&quot;&quot;Come, come,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, &quot;let's waste no more time in
talking, - let's go to business. Tom, now, get the pen and ink -  - &quot;While Mr. Glegg was speaking, a tall dark figure was seen hurrying
past the window.&quot;Why, there's Mrs. Moss,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver. &quot;The bad news must ha'
reached her, then&quot;; and she went out to open the door, Maggie eagerly
following her.&quot;That's fortunate,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg. &quot;She can agree to the list o'
things to be bought in. It's but right she should do her share when
it's her own brother.&quot;Mrs. Moss was in too much agitation to resist Mrs. Tulliver's
movement, as she drew her into the parlor automatically, without
reflecting that it was hardly kind to take her among so many persons
in the first painful moment of arrival. The tall, worn, dark-haired
woman was a strong contrast to the Dodson sisters as she entered in
her shabby dress, with her shawl and bonnet looking as if they had
been hastily huddled on, and with that entire absence of
self-consciousness which belongs to keenly felt trouble. Maggie was
clinging to her arm; and Mrs. Moss seemed to notice no one else except
Tom, whom she went straight up to and took by the hand.&quot;Oh, my dear children,&quot; she burst out, &quot;you've no call to think well
o' me; I'm a poor aunt to you, for I'm one o' them as take all and
give nothing. How's my poor brother?&quot;&quot;Mr. Turnbull thinks he'll get better,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;Sit down, aunt
Gritty. Don't fret.&quot;&quot;Oh, my sweet child, I feel torn i' two,&quot; said Mrs. Moss, allowing
Maggie to lead her to the sofa, but still not seeming to notice the
presence of the rest. &quot;We've three hundred pounds o' my brother's
money, and now he wants it, and you all want it, poor things! - and yet
we must be sold up to pay it, and there's my poor children, - eight of
'em, and the little un of all can't speak plain. And I feel as if I
was a robber. But I'm sure I'd no thought as my brother -  - &quot;The poor woman was interrupted by a rising sob.&quot;Three hundred pounds! oh dear, dear,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, who, when
she had said that her husband had done &quot;unknown&quot; things for his
sister, had not had any particular sum in her mind, and felt a wife's
irritation at having been kept in the dark.&quot;What madness, to be sure!&quot; said Mrs. Glegg. &quot;A man with a family!
He'd no right to lend his money i' that way; and without security,
I'll be bound, if the truth was known.&quot;Mrs. Glegg's voice had arrested Mrs. Moss's attention, and looking up,
she said:&quot;Yes, therewassecurity; my husband gave a note for it. We're not
that sort o' people, neither of us, as 'ud rob my brother's children;
and we looked to paying back the money, when the times got a bit
better.&quot;&quot;Well, but now,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, gently, &quot;hasn't your husband no way
o' raising this money? Because it 'ud be a little fortin, like, for
these folks, if we can do without Tulliver's being made a bankrupt.
Your husband's got stock; it is but right he should raise the money,
as it seems to me, - not but what I'm sorry for you, Mrs. Moss.&quot;&quot;Oh, sir, you don't know what bad luck my husband's had with his
stock. The farm's suffering so as never was for want o' stock; and
we've sold all the wheat, and we're behind with our rent, - not but
what we'd like to do what's right, and I'd sit up and work half the
night, if it 'ud be any good; but there's them poor children, - four of
'em such little uns -  - &quot;&quot;Don't cry so, aunt; don't fret,&quot; whispered Maggie, who had kept hold
of Mrs. Moss's hand.&quot;Did Mr. Tulliver let you have the money all at once?&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver, still lost in the conception of things which had been &quot;going
on&quot; without her knowledge.&quot;No; at twice,&quot; said Mrs. Moss, rubbing her eyes and making an effort
to restrain her tears. &quot;The last was after my bad illness four years
ago, as everything went wrong, and there was a new note made then.
What with illness and bad luck, I've been nothing but cumber all my
life.&quot;&quot;Yes, Mrs. Moss,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, with decision, &quot;yours is a very
unlucky family; the more's the pity formysister.&quot;&quot;I set off in the cart as soon as ever I heard o' what had happened,&quot;
said Mrs. Moss, looking at Mrs. Tulliver. &quot;I should never ha' stayed
away all this while, if you'd thought well to let me know. And it
isn't as I'm thinking all about ourselves, and nothing about my
brother, only the money was so on my mind, I couldn't help speaking
about it. And my husband and me desire to do the right thing, sir,&quot;
she added, looking at Mr. Glegg, &quot;and we'll make shift and pay the
money, come what will, if that's all my brother's got to trust to.
We've been used to trouble, and don't look for much else. It's only
the thought o' my poor children pulls me i' two.&quot;&quot;Why, there's this to be thought on, Mrs. Moss,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, &quot;and
it's right to warn you, - if Tulliver's made a bankrupt, and he's got a
note-of-hand of your husband's for three hundred pounds, you'll be
obliged to pay it; th' assignees 'ull come on you for it.&quot;&quot;Oh dear, oh dear!&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, thinking of the bankruptcy,
and not of Mrs. Moss's concern in it. Poor Mrs. Moss herself listened
in trembling submission, while Maggie looked with bewildered distress
at Tom to see ifheshowed any signs of understanding this trouble,
and caring about poor aunt Moss. Tom was only looking thoughtful, with
his eyes on the tablecloth.&quot;And if he isn't made bankrupt,&quot; continued Mr. Glegg, &quot;as I said
before, three hundred pounds 'ud be a little fortin for him, poor man.
We don't know but what he may be partly helpless, if he ever gets up
again. I'm very sorry if it goes hard with you, Mrs. Moss, but my
opinion is, looking at it one way, it'll be right for you to raise the
money; and looking at it th' other way, you'll be obliged to pay it.
You won't think ill o' me for speaking the truth.&quot;&quot;Uncle,&quot; said Tom, looking up suddenly from his meditative view of the
tablecloth, &quot;I don't think it would be right for my aunt Moss to pay
the money if it would be against my father's will for her to pay it;
would it?&quot;Mr. Glegg looked surprised for a moment or two before he said: &quot;Why,
no, perhaps not, Tom; but then he'd ha' destroyed the note, you know.
We must look for the note. What makes you think it 'ud be against his
will?&quot;&quot;Why,&quot; said Tom, coloring, but trying to speak firmly, in spite of a
boyish tremor, &quot;I remember quite well, before I went to school to Mr.
Stelling, my father said to me one night, when we were sitting by the
fire together, and no one else was in the room -  - &quot;Tom hesitated a little, and then went on.&quot;He said something to me about Maggie, and then he said: 'I've always
been good to my sister, though she married against my will, and I've
lent Moss money; but I shall never think of distressing him to pay it;
I'd rather lose it. My children must not mind being the poorer for
that.' And now my father's ill, and not able to speak for himself, I
shouldn't like anything to be done contrary to what he said to me.&quot;&quot;Well, but then, my boy,&quot; said Uncle Glegg, whose good feeling led him
to enter into Tom's wish, but who could not at once shake off his
habitual abhorrence of such recklessness as destroying securities, or
alienating anything important enough to make an appreciable difference
in a man's property, &quot;we should have to make away wi' the note, you
know, if we're to guard against what may happen, supposing your
father's made bankrupt -  - &quot;&quot;Mr. Glegg,&quot; interrupted his wife, severely, &quot;mind what you're saying.
You're putting yourself very forrard in other folks's business. If you
speak rash, don't say it was my fault.&quot;&quot;That's such a thing as I never heared of before,&quot; said uncle Pullet,
who had been making haste with his lozenge in order to express his
amazement, - &quot;making away with a note! I should think anybody could set
the constable on you for it.&quot;&quot;Well, but,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, &quot;if the note's worth all that money,
why can't we pay it away, and save my things from going away? We've no
call to meddle with your uncle and aunt Moss, Tom, if you think your
father 'ud be angry when he gets well.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver had not studied the question of exchange, and was
straining her mind after original ideas on the subject.&quot;Pooh, pooh, pooh! you women don't understand these things,&quot; said
uncle Glegg. &quot;There's no way o' making it safe for Mr. and Mrs. Moss
but destroying the note.&quot;&quot;Then I hope you'll help me do it, uncle,&quot; said Tom, earnestly. &quot;If my
father shouldn't get well, I should be very unhappy to think anything
had been done against his will that I could hinder. And I'm sure he
meant me to remember what he said that evening. I ought to obey my
father's wish about his property.&quot;Even Mrs. Glegg could not withhold her approval from Tom's words; she
felt that the Dodson blood was certainly speaking in him, though, if
his father had been a Dodson, there would never have been this wicked
alienation of money. Maggie would hardly have restrained herself from
leaping on Tom's neck, if her aunt Moss had not prevented her by
herself rising and taking Tom's hand, while she said, with rather a
choked voice:&quot;You'll never be the poorer for this, my dear boy, if there's a God
above; and if the money's wanted for your father, Moss and me 'ull pay
it, the same as if there was ever such security. We'll do as we'd be
done by; for if my children have got no other luck, they've got an
honest father and mother.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, who had been meditating after Tom's words, &quot;we
shouldn't be doing any wrong by the creditors, supposing your fatherwasbankrupt. I've been thinking o' that, for I've been a creditor
myself, and seen no end o' cheating. If he meant to give your aunt the
money before ever he got into this sad work o' lawing, it's the same
as if he'd made away with the note himself; for he'd made up his mind
to be that much poorer. But there's a deal o' things to be considered,
young man,&quot; Mr. Glegg added, looking admonishingly at Tom, &quot;when you
come to money business, and you may be taking one man's dinner away to
make another man's breakfast. You don't understand that, I doubt?&quot;&quot;Yes, I do,&quot; said Tom, decidedly. &quot;I know if I owe money to one man,
I've no right to give it to another. But if my father had made up his
mind to give my aunt the money before he was in debt, he had a right
to do it.&quot;&quot;Well done, young man! I didn't think you'd been so sharp,&quot; said uncle
Glegg, with much candor. &quot;But perhaps your fatherdidmake away with
the note. Let us go and see if we can find it in the chest.&quot;&quot;It's in my father's room. Let us go too, aunt Gritty,&quot; whispered
Maggie.>


It was soon known throughout St. Ogg's that Miss Tulliver was come
back; she had not, then, eloped in order to be married to Mr. Stephen
Guest, - at all events, Mr. Stephen Guest had not married her; which
came to the same thing, so far as her culpability was concerned. We
judge others according to results; how else? - not knowing the process
by which results are arrived at. If Miss Tulliver, after a few months
of well-chosen travel, had returned as Mrs. Stephen Guest, with a
post-maritaltrousseau, and all the advantages possessed even by the
most unwelcome wife of an only son, public opinion, which at St.
Ogg's, as else where, always knew what to think, would have judged in
strict consistency with those results. Public opinion, in these cases,
is always of the feminine gender, - not the world, but the world's
wife; and she would have seen that two handsome young people - the
gentleman of quite the first family in St. Ogg's - having found
themselves in a false position, had been led into a course which, to
say the least of it, was highly injudicious, and productive of sad
pain and disappointment, especially to that sweet young thing, Miss
Deane. Mr. Stephen Guest had certainly not behaved well; but then,
young men were liable to those sudden infatuated attachments; and bad
as it might seem in Mrs. Stephen Guest to admit the faintest advances
from her cousin's lover (indeed ithadbeen said that she was
actually engaged to young Wakem, - old Wakem himself had mentioned it),
still, she was very young, - &quot;and a deformed young man, you know! - and
young Guest so very fascinating; and, they say, he positively worships
her (to be sure, that can't last!), and he ran away with her in the
boat quite against her will, and what could she do? She couldn't come
back then; no one would have spoken to her; and how very well that
maize-colored satinette becomes her complexion! It seems as if the
folds in front were quite come in; several of her dresses are made
so, - they say he thinks nothing too handsome to buy for her. Poor Miss
Deane! She is very pitiable; but then there was no positive
engagement; and the air at the coast will do her good. After all, if
young Guest felt no more for her thanthatit was better for her not
to marry him. What a wonderful marriage for a girl like Miss
Tulliver, - quite romantic? Why, young Guest will put up for the
borough at the next election. Nothing like commerce nowadays! That
young Wakem nearly went out of his mind; he alwayswasrather queer;
but he's gone abroad again to be out of the way, - quite the best thing
for a deformed young man. Miss Unit declares she will never visit Mr.
and Mrs. Stephen Guest, - such nonsense! pretending to be better than
other people. Society couldn't be carried on if we inquired into
private conduct in that way, - and Christianity tells us to think no
evil, - and my belief is, that Miss Unit had no cards sent her.&quot;But the results, we know, were not of a kind to warrant this
extenuation of the past. Maggie had returned without atrousseau,
without a husband, - in that degraded and outcast condition to which
error is well known to lead; and the world's wife, with that fine
instinct which is given her for the preservation of Society, saw at
once that Miss Tulliver's conduct had been of the most aggravated
kind. Could anything be more detestable? A girl so much indebted to
her friends - whose mother as well as herself had received so much
kindness from the Deanes - to lay the design of winning a young man's
affections away from her own cousin, who had behaved like a sister to
her! Winning his affections? That was not the phrase for such a girl
as Miss Tulliver; it would have been more correct to say that she had
been actuated by mere unwomanly boldness and unbridled passion. There
was always something questionable about her. That connection with
young Wakem, which, they said, had been carried on for years, looked
very ill, - disgusting, in fact! But with a girl of that disposition!
To the world's wife there had always been something in Miss Tulliver's
veryphysiquethat a refined instinct felt to be prophetic of harm.
As for poor Mr. Stephen Guest, he was rather pitiable than otherwise;
a young man of five-and-twenty is not to be too severely judged in
these cases, - he is really very much at the mercy of a designing, bold
girl. And it was clear that he had given way in spite of himself: he
had shaken her off as soon as he could; indeed, their having parted so
soon looked very black indeed -for her. To be sure, he had written a
letter, laying all the blame on himself, and telling the story in a
romantic fashion so as to try and make her appear quite innocent; of
course he would do that! But the refined instinct of the world's wife
was not to be deceived; providentially! - else what would become of
Society? Why, her own brother had turned her from his door; he had
seen enough, you might be sure, before he would do that. A truly
respectable young man, Mr. Tom Tulliver; quite likely to rise in the
world! His sister's disgrace was naturally a heavy blow to him. It was
to be hoped that she would go out of the neighborhood, - to America, or
anywhere, - so as to purify the air of St. Ogg's from the stain of her
presence, extremely dangerous to daughters there! No good could happen
to her; it was only to be hoped she would repent, and that God would
have mercy on her: He had not the care of society on His hands, as the
world's wife had.It required nearly a fortnight for fine instinct to assure itself of
these inspirations; indeed, it was a whole week before Stephen's
letter came, telling his father the facts, and adding that he was gone
across to Holland, - had drawn upon the agent at Mudport for
money, - was incapable of any resolution at present.Maggie, all this while, was too entirely filled with a more agonizing
anxiety to spend any thought on the view that was being taken of her
conduct by the world of St. Ogg's; anxiety about Stephen, Lucy,
Philip, beat on her poor heart in a hard, driving, ceaseless storm of
mingled love, remorse, and pity. If she had thought of rejection and
injustice at all, it would have seemed to her that they had done their
worst; that she could hardly feel any stroke from them intolerable
since the words she had heard from her brother's lips. Across all her
anxiety for the loved and the injured, those words shot again and
again, like a horrible pang that would have brought misery and dread
even into a heaven of delights. The idea of ever recovering happiness
never glimmered in her mind for a moment; it seemed as if every
sensitive fibre in her were too entirely preoccupied by pain ever to
vibrate again to another influence. Life stretched before her as one
act of penitence; and all she craved, as she dwelt on her future lot,
was something to guarantee her from more falling; her own weakness
haunted her like a vision of hideous possibilities, that made no peace
conceivable except such as lay in the sense of a sure refuge.But she was not without practical intentions; the love of independence
was too strong an inheritance and a habit for her not to remember that
she must get her bread; and when other projects looked vague, she fell
back on that of returning to her plain sewing, and so getting enough
to pay for her lodging at Bob's. She meant to persuade her mother to
return to the Mill by and by, and live with Tom again; and somehow or
other she would maintain herself at St. Ogg's. Dr. Kenn would perhaps
help her and advise her. She remembered his parting words at the
bazaar. She remembered the momentary feeling of reliance that had
sprung in her when he was talking with her, and she waited with
yearning expectation for the opportunity of confiding everything to
him. Her mother called every day at Mr. Deane's to learn how Lucy was;
the report was always sad, - nothing had yet roused her from the feeble
passivity which had come on with the first shock. But of Philip, Mrs.
Tulliver had learned nothing; naturally, no one whom she met would
speak to her about what related to her daughter. But at last she
summoned courage to go and see sister Glegg, who of course would know
everything, and had been even to see Tom at the Mill in Mrs.
Tulliver's absence, though he had said nothing of what had passed on
the occasion.As soon as her mother was gone, Maggie put on her bonnet. She had
resolved on walking to the Rectory and asking to see Dr. Kenn; he was
in deep grief, but the grief of another does not jar upon us in such
circumstances. It was the first time she had been beyond the door
since her return; nevertheless her mind was so bent on the purpose of
her walk, that the unpleasantness of meeting people on the way, and
being stared at, did not occur to her. But she had no sooner passed
beyond the narrower streets which she had to thread from Bob's
dwelling, than she became aware of unusual glances cast at her; and
this consciousness made her hurry along nervously, afraid to look to
right or left. Presently, however, she came full on Mrs. and Miss
Turnbull, old acquaintances of her family; they both looked at her
strangely, and turned a little aside without speaking. All hard looks
were pain to Maggie, but her self-reproach was too strong for
resentment. No wonder they will not speak to me, she thought; they are
very fond of Lucy. But now she knew that she was about to pass a group
of gentlemen, who were standing at the door of the billiard-rooms, and
she could not help seeing young Torry step out a little with his glass
at his eye, and bow to her with that air ofnonchalancewhich he
might have bestowed on a friendly barmaid.Maggie's pride was too intense for her not to feel that sting, even in
the midst of her sorrow; and for the first time the thought took
strong hold of her that she would have other obloquy cast on her
besides that which was felt to be due to her breach of faith toward
Lucy. But she was at the Rectory now; there, perhaps, she would find
something else than retribution. Retribution may come from any voice;
the hardest, cruelest, most imbruted urchin at the street-corner can
inflict it; surely help and pity are rarer things, more needful for
the righteous to bestow.She was shown up at once, after being announced, into Dr. Kenn's
study, where he sat amongst piled-up books, for which he had little
appetite, leaning his cheek against the head of his youngest child, a
girl of three. The child was sent away with the servant, and when the
door was closed, Dr. Kenn said, placing a chair for Maggie, -&quot;I was coming to see you, Miss Tulliver; you have anticipated me; I am
glad you did.&quot;Maggie looked at him with her childlike directness as she had done at
the bazaar, and said, &quot;I want to tell you everything.&quot; But her eyes
filled fast with tears as she said it, and all the pent-up excitement
of her humiliating walk would have its vent before she could say more.&quot;Do tell me everything,&quot; Dr. Kenn said, with quiet kindness in his
grave, firm voice. &quot;Think of me as one to whom a long experience has
been granted, which may enable him to help you.&quot;In rather broken sentences, and with some effort at first, but soon
with the greater ease that came from a sense of relief in the
confidence, Maggie told the brief story of a struggle that must be the
beginning of a long sorrow. Only the day before, Dr. Kenn had been
made acquainted with the contents of Stephen's letter, and he had
believed them at once, without the confirmation of Maggie's statement.
That involuntary plaint of hers, &quot;Oh, I must go,&quot; had remained with
him as the sign that she was undergoing some inward conflict.Maggie dwelt the longest on the feeling which had made her come back
to her mother and brother, which made her cling to all the memories of
the past. When she had ended, Dr. Kenn was silent for some minutes;
there was a difficulty on his mind. He rose, and walked up and down
the hearth with his hands behind him. At last he seated himself again,
and said, looking at Maggie, -&quot;Your prompting to go to your nearest friends, - to remain where all
the ties of your life have been formed, - is a true prompting, to which
the Church in its original constitution and discipline responds,
opening its arms to the penitent, watching over its children to the
last; never abandoning them until they are hopelessly reprobate. And
the Church ought to represent the feeling of the community, so that
every parish should be a family knit together by Christian brotherhood
under a spiritual father. But the ideas of discipline and Christian
fraternity are entirely relaxed, - they can hardly be said to exist in
the public mind; they hardly survive except in the partial,
contradictory form they have taken in the narrow communities of
schismatics; and if I were not supported by the firm faith that the
Church must ultimately recover the full force of that constitution
which is alone fitted to human needs, I should often lose heart at
observing the want of fellowship and sense of mutual responsibility
among my own flock. At present everything seems tending toward the
relaxation of ties, - toward the substitution of wayward choice for the
adherence to obligation, which has its roots in the past. Your
conscience and your heart have given you true light on this point,
Miss Tulliver; and I have said all this that you may know what my wish
about you - what my advice to you - would be, if they sprang from my own
feeling and opinion unmodified by counteracting circumstances.&quot;Dr. Kenn paused a little while. There was an entire absence of
effusive benevolence in his manner; there was something almost cold in
the gravity of his look and voice. If Maggie had not known that his
benevolence was persevering in proportion to its reserve, she might
have been chilled and frightened. As it was, she listened expectantly,
quite sure that there would be some effective help in his words. He
went on.&quot;Your inexperience of the world, Miss Tulliver, prevents you from
anticipating fully the very unjust conceptions that will probably be
formed concerning your conduct, - conceptions which will have a baneful
effect, even in spite of known evidence to disprove them.&quot;&quot;Oh, I do, - I begin to see,&quot; said Maggie, unable to repress this
utterance of her recent pain. &quot;I know I shall be insulted. I shall be
thought worse than I am.&quot;&quot;You perhaps do not yet know,&quot; said Dr. Kenn, with a touch of more
personal pity, &quot;that a letter is come which ought to satisfy every one
who has known anything of you, that you chose the steep and difficult
path of a return to the right, at the moment when that return was most
of all difficult.&quot;&quot;Oh, where is he?&quot; said poor Maggie, with a flush and tremor that no
presence could have hindered.&quot;He is gone abroad; he has written of all that passed to his father.
He has vindicated you to the utmost; and I hope the communication of
that letter to your cousin will have a beneficial effect on her.&quot;Dr. Kenn waited for her to get calm again before he went on.&quot;That letter, as I said, ought to suffice to prevent false impressions
concerning you. But I am bound to tell you, Miss Tulliver, that not
only the experience of my whole life, but my observation within the
last three days, makes me fear that there is hardly any evidence which
will save you from the painful effect of false imputations. The
persons who are the most incapable of a conscientious struggle such as
yours are precisely those who will be likely to shrink from you,
because they will not believe in your struggle. I fear your life here
will be attended not only with much pain, but with many obstructions.
For this reason - and for this only - I ask you to consider whether it
will not perhaps be better for you to take a situation at a distance,
according to your former intention. I will exert myself at once to
obtain one for you.&quot;&quot;Oh, if I could but stop here!&quot; said Maggie. &quot;I have no heart to begin
a strange life again. I should have no stay. I should feel like a
lonely wanderer, cut off from the past. I have written to the lady who
offered me a situation to excuse myself. If I remained here, I could
perhaps atone in some way to Lucy - to others; I could convince them
that I'm sorry. And,&quot; she added, with some of the old proud fire
flashing out, &quot;I will not go away because people say false things of
me. They shall learn to retract them. If I must go away at last,
because - because others wish it, I will not go now.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Dr. Kenn, after some consideration, &quot;if you determine on
that, Miss Tulliver, you may rely on all the influence my position
gives me. I am bound to aid and countenance you by the very duties of
my office as a parish priest. I will add, that personally I have a
deep interest in your peace of mind and welfare.&quot;&quot;The only thing I want is some occupation that will enable me to get
my bread and be independent,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;I shall not want much. I
can go on lodging where I am.&quot;&quot;I must think over the subject maturely,&quot; said Dr. Kenn, &quot;and in a few
days I shall be better able to ascertain the general feeling. I shall
come to see you; I shall bear you constantly in mind.&quot;When Maggie had left him, Dr. Kenn stood ruminating with his hands
behind him, and his eyes fixed on the carpet, under a painful sense of
doubt and difficulty. The tone of Stephen's letter, which he had read,
and the actual relations of all the persons concerned, forced upon him
powerfully the idea of an ultimate marriage between Stephen and Maggie
as the least evil; and the impossibility of their proximity in St.
Ogg's on any other supposition, until after years of separation, threw
an insurmountable prospective difficulty over Maggie's stay there. On
the other hand, he entered with all the comprehension of a man who had
known spiritual conflict, and lived through years of devoted service
to his fellow-men, into that state of Maggie's heart and conscience
which made the consent to the marriage a desecration to her; her
conscience must not be tampered with; the principle on which she had
acted was a safer guide than any balancing of consequences. His
experience told him that intervention was too dubious a responsibility
to be lightly incurred; the possible issue either of an endeavor to
restore the former relations with Lucy and Philip, or of counselling
submission to this irruption of a new feeling, was hidden in a
darkness all the more impenetrable because each immediate step was
clogged with evil.The great problem of the shifting relation between passion and duty is
clear to no man who is capable of apprehending it; the question
whether the moment has come in which a man has fallen below the
possibility of a renunciation that will carry any efficacy, and must
accept the sway of a passion against which he had struggled as a
trespass, is one for which we have no master-key that will fit all
cases. The casuists have become a byword of reproach; but their
perverted spirit of minute discrimination was the shadow of a truth to
which eyes and hearts are too often fatally sealed, - the truth, that
moral judgments must remain false and hollow, unless they are checked
and enlightened by a perpetual reference to the special circumstances
that mark the individual lot.All people of broad, strong sense have an instinctive repugnance to
the men of maxims; because such people early discern that the
mysterious complexity of our life is not to be embraced by maxims, and
that to lace ourselves up in formulas of that sort is to repress all
the divine promptings and inspirations that spring from growing
insight and sympathy. And the man of maxims is the popular
representative of the minds that are guided in their moral judgment
solely by general rules, thinking that these will lead them to justice
by a ready-made patent method, without the trouble of exerting
patience, discrimination, impartiality, - without any care to assure
themselves whether they have the insight that comes from a hardly
earned estimate of temptation, or from a life vivid and intense enough
to have created a wide fellow-feeling with all that is human.>


By the end of the week Dr. Kenn had made up his mind that there was
only one way in which he could secure to Maggie a suitable living at
St. Ogg's. Even with his twenty years' experience as a parish priest,
he was aghast at the obstinate continuance of imputations against her
in the face of evidence. Hitherto he had been rather more adored and
appealed to than was quite agreeable to him; but now, in attempting to
open the ears of women to reason, and their consciences to justice, on
behalf of Maggie Tulliver, he suddenly found himself as powerless as
he was aware he would have been if he had attempted to influence the
shape of bonnets. Dr. Kenn could not be contradicted; he was listened
to in silence; but when he left the room, a comparison of opinions
among his hearers yielded much the same result as before. Miss
Tulliver had undeniably acted in a blamable manner, even Dr. Kenn did
not deny that; how, then, could he think so lightly of her as to put
that favorable interpretation on everything she had done? Even on the
supposition that required the utmost stretch of belief, - namely, that
none of the things said about Miss Tulliver were true, - still, since
theyhadbeen said about her, they had cast an odor round her which
must cause her to be shrunk from by every woman who had to take care
of her own reputation - and of Society. To have taken Maggie by the
hand and said, &quot;I will not believe unproved evil of you; my lips shall
not utter it; my ears shall be closed against it; I, too, am an erring
mortal, liable to stumble, apt to come short of my most earnest
efforts; your lot has been harder than mine, your temptation greater;
let us help each other to stand and walk without more falling,&quot; - to
have done this would have demanded courage, deep pity, self-knowledge,
generous trust; would have demanded a mind that tasted no piquancy in
evil-speaking, that felt no self-exaltation in condemning, that
cheated itself with no large words into the belief that life can have
any moral end, any high religion, which excludes the striving after
perfect truth, justice, and love toward the individual men and women
who come across our own path. The ladies of St. Ogg's were not
beguiled by any wide speculative conceptions; but they had their
favorite abstraction, called Society, which served to make their
consciences perfectly easy in doing what satisfied their own
egoism, - thinking and speaking the worst of Maggie Tulliver, and
turning their backs upon her. It was naturally disappointing to Dr.
Kenn, after two years of superfluous incense from his feminine
parishioners, to find them suddenly maintaining their views in
opposition to his; but then they maintained them in opposition to a
higher Authority, which they had venerated longer. That Authority had
furnished a very explicit answer to persons who might inquire where
their social duties began, and might be inclined to take wide views as
to the starting-point. The answer had not turned on the ultimate good
of Society, but on &quot;a certain man&quot; who was found in trouble by the
wayside.Not that St. Ogg's was empty of women with some tenderness of heart
and conscience; probably it had as fair a proportion of human goodness
in it as any other small trading town of that day. But until every
good man is brave, we must expect to find many good women timid, - too
timid even to believe in the correctness of their own best promptings,
when these would place them in a minority. And the men at St. Ogg's
were not all brave, by any means; some of them were even fond of
scandal, and to an extent that might have given their conversation an
effeminate character, if it had not been distinguished by masculine
jokes, and by an occasional shrug of the shoulders at the mutual
hatred of women. It was the general feeling of the masculine mind at
St. Ogg's that women were not to be interfered with in their treatment
of each other.And thus every direction in which Dr. Kenn had turned, in the hope of
procuring some kind recognition and some employment for Maggie, proved
a disappointment to him. Mrs. James Torry could not think of taking
Maggie as a nursery governess, even temporarily, - a young woman about
whom &quot;such things had been said,&quot; and about whom &quot;gentlemen joked&quot;;
and Miss Kirke, who had a spinal complaint, and wanted a reader and
companion, felt quite sure that Maggie's mind must be of a quality
with which she, for her part, could not riskanycontact. Why did
not Miss Tulliver accept the shelter offered her by her aunt Glegg? It
did not become a girl like her to refuse it. Or else, why did she not
go out of the neighborhood, and get a situation where she was not
known? (It was not, apparently, of so much importance that she should
carry her dangerous tendencies into strange families unknown at St.
Ogg's.) She must be very bold and hardened to wish to stay in a parish
where she was so much stared at and whispered about.Dr. Kenn, having great natural firmness, began, in the presence of
this opposition, as every firm man would have done, to contract a
certain strength of determination over and above what would have been
called forth by the end in view. He himself wanted a daily governess
for his younger children; and though he had hesitated in the first
instance to offer this position to Maggie, the resolution to protest
with the utmost force of his personal and priestly character against
her being crushed and driven away by slander, was now decisive. Maggie
gratefully accepted an employment that gave her duties as well as a
support; her days would be filled now, and solitary evenings would be
a welcome rest. She no longer needed the sacrifice her mother made in
staying with her, and Mrs. Tulliver was persuaded to go back to the
Mill.But now it began to be discovered that Dr. Kenn, exemplary as he had
hitherto appeared, had his crotchets, possibly his weaknesses. The
masculine mind of St. Ogg's smiled pleasantly, and did not wonder that
Kenn liked to see a fine pair of eyes daily, or that he was inclined
to take so lenient a view of the past; the feminine mind, regarded at
that period as less powerful, took a more melancholy view of the case.
If Dr. Kenn should be beguiled into marrying that Miss Tulliver! It
was not safe to be too confident, even about the best of men; an
apostle had fallen, and wept bitterly afterwards; and though Peter's
denial was not a close precedent, his repentance was likely to be.Maggie had not taken her daily walks to the Rectory for many weeks,
before the dreadful possibility of her some time or other becoming the
Rector's wife had been talked of so often in confidence, that ladies
were beginning to discuss how they should behave to her in that
position. For Dr. Kenn, it had been understood, had sat in the
schoolroom half an hour one morning, when Miss Tulliver was giving her
lessons, - nay, he had sat there every morning; he had once walked home
with her, - he almostalwayswalked home with her, - and if not, he
went to see her in the evening. What an artful creature she was! What
amotherfor those children! It was enough to make poor Mrs. Kenn
turn in her grave, that they should be put under the care of this girl
only a few weeks after her death. Would he be so lost to propriety as
to marry her before the year was out? The masculine mind was
sarcastic, and thoughtnot.The Miss Guests saw an alleviation to the sorrow of witnessing a folly
in their Rector; at least their brother would be safe; and their
knowledge of Stephen's tenacity was a constant ground of alarm to
them, lest he should come back and marry Maggie. They were not among
those who disbelieved their brother's letter; but they had no
confidence in Maggie's adherence to her renunciation of him; they
suspected that she had shrunk rather from the elopement than from the
marriage, and that she lingered in St. Ogg's, relying on his return to
her. They had always thought her disagreeable; they now thought her
artful and proud; having quite as good grounds for that judgment as
you and I probably have for many strong opinions of the same kind.
Formerly they had not altogether delighted in the contemplated match
with Lucy, but now their dread of a marriage between Stephen and
Maggie added its momentum to their genuine pity and indignation on
behalf of the gentle forsaken girl, in making them desire that he
should return to her. As soon as Lucy was able to leave home, she was
to seek relief from the oppressive heat of this August by going to the
coast with the Miss Guests; and it was in their plans that Stephen
should be induced to join them. On the very first hint of gossip
concerning Maggie and Dr. Kenn, the report was conveyed in Miss
Guest's letter to her brother.Maggie had frequent tidings through her mother, or aunt Glegg, or Dr.
Kenn, of Lucy's gradual progress toward recovery, and her thoughts
tended continually toward her uncle Deane's house; she hungered for an
interview with Lucy, if it were only for five minutes, to utter a word
of penitence, to be assured by Lucy's own eyes and lips that she did
not believe in the willing treachery of those whom she had loved and
trusted. But she knew that even if her uncle's indignation had not
closed his house against her, the agitation of such an interview would
have been forbidden to Lucy. Only to have seen her without speaking
would have been some relief; for Maggie was haunted by a face cruel in
its very gentleness; a face that had been turned on hers with glad,
sweet looks of trust and love from the twilight time of memory;
changed now to a sad and weary face by a first heart-stroke. And as
the days passed on, that pale image became more and more distinct; the
picture grew and grew into more speaking definiteness under the
avenging hand of remorse; the soft hazel eyes, in their look of pain,
were bent forever on Maggie, and pierced her the more because she
could see no anger in them. But Lucy was not yet able to go to church,
or any place where Maggie could see her; and even the hope of that
departed, when the news was told her by aunt Glegg, that Lucy was
really going away in a few days to Scarborough with the Miss Guests,
who had been heard to say that they expected their brother to meet
them there.Only those who have known what hardest inward conflict is, can know
what Maggie felt as she sat in her loneliness the evening after
hearing that news from Mrs. Glegg, - only those who have known what it
is to dread their own selfish desires as the watching mother would
dread the sleeping-potion that was to still her own pain.She sat without candle in the twilight, with the window wide open
toward the river; the sense of oppressive heat adding itself
undistinguishably to the burthen of her lot. Seated on a chair against
the window, with her arm on the windowsill she was looking blankly at
the flowing river, swift with the backward-rushing tide, struggling to
see still the sweet face in its unreproaching sadness, that seemed now
from moment to moment to sink away and be hidden behind a form that
thrust itself between, and made darkness. Hearing the door open, she
thought Mrs. Jakin was coming in with her supper, as usual; and with
that repugnance to trivial speech which comes with languor and
wretchedness, she shrank from turning round and saying she wanted
nothing; good little Mrs. Jakin would be sure to make some well-meant
remarks. But the next moment, without her having discerned the sound
of a footstep, she felt a light hand on her shoulder, and heard a
voice close to her saying, &quot;Maggie!&quot;The face was there, - changed, but all the sweeter; the hazel eyes were
there, with their heart-piercing tenderness.&quot;Maggie!&quot; the soft voice said. &quot;Lucy!&quot; answered a voice with a sharp
ring of anguish in it; and Lucy threw her arms round Maggie's neck,
and leaned her pale cheek against the burning brow.&quot;I stole out,&quot; said Lucy, almost in a whisper, while she sat down
close to Maggie and held her hand, &quot;when papa and the rest were away.
Alice is come with me. I asked her to help me. But I must only stay a
little while, because it is so late.&quot;It was easier to say that at first than to say anything else. They sat
looking at each other. It seemed as if the interview must end without
more speech, for speech was very difficult. Each felt that there would
be something scorching in the words that would recall the
irretrievable wrong. But soon, as Maggie looked, every distinct
thought began to be overflowed by a wave of loving penitence, and
words burst forth with a sob.&quot;God bless you for coming, Lucy.&quot;The sobs came thick on each other after that.&quot;Maggie, dear, be comforted,&quot; said Lucy now, putting her cheek against
Maggie's again. &quot;Don't grieve.&quot; And she sat still, hoping to soothe
Maggie with that gentle caress.&quot;I didn't mean to deceive you, Lucy,&quot; said Maggie, as soon as she
could speak. &quot;It always made me wretched that I felt what I didn't
like you to know. It was because I thought it would all be conquered,
and you might never see anything to wound you.&quot;&quot;I know, dear,&quot; said Lucy. &quot;I know you never meant to make me unhappy.
It is a trouble that has come on us all; you have more to bear than I
have - and you gave him up, when - you did what it must have been very
hard to do.&quot;They were silent again a little while, sitting with clasped hands, and
cheeks leaned together.&quot;Lucy,&quot; Maggie began again, &quot;hestruggled too. He wanted to be true
to you. He will come back to you. Forgive him - he will be happy
then -  - &quot;These words were wrung forth from Maggie's deepest soul, with an
effort like the convulsed clutch of a drowning man. Lucy trembled and
was silent.A gentle knock came at the door. It was Alice, the maid, who entered
and said, -&quot;I daren't stay any longer, Miss Deane. They'll find it out, and
there'll be such anger at your coming out so late.&quot;Lucy rose and said, &quot;Very well, Alice, - in a minute.&quot;&quot;I'm to go away on Friday, Maggie,&quot; she added, when Alice had closed
the door again. &quot;When I come back, and am strong, they will let me do
as I like. I shall come to you when I please then.&quot;&quot;Lucy,&quot; said Maggie, with another great effort, &quot;I pray to God
continually that I may never be the cause of sorrow to you any more.&quot;She pressed the little hand that she held between hers, and looked up
into the face that was bent over hers. Lucy never forgot that look.&quot;Maggie,&quot; she said, in a low voice, that had the solemnity of
confession in it, &quot;you are better than I am. I can't -  - &quot;She broke off there, and said no more. But they clasped each other
again in a last embrace.>


Between four and five o'clock on the afternoon of the fifth day from
that on which Stephen and Maggie had left St. Ogg's, Tom Tulliver was
standing on the gravel walk outside the old house at Dorlcote Mill. He
was master there now; he had half fulfilled his father's dying wish,
and by years of steady self-government and energetic work he had
brought himself near to the attainment of more than the old
respectability which had been the proud inheritance of the Dodsons and
Tullivers.But Tom's face, as he stood in the hot, still sunshine of that summer
afternoon, had no gladness, no triumph in it. His mouth wore its
bitterest expression, his severe brow its hardest and deepest fold, as
he drew down his hat farther over his eyes to shelter them from the
sun, and thrusting his hands deep into his pockets, began to walk up
and down the gravel. No news of his sister had been heard since Bob
Jakin had come back in the steamer from Mudport, and put an end to all
improbable suppositions of an accident on the water by stating that he
had seen her land from a vessel with Mr. Stephen Guest. Would the next
news be that she was married, - or what? Probably that she was not
married; Tom's mind was set to the expectation of the worst that could
happen, - not death, but disgrace.As he was walking with his back toward the entrance gate, and his face
toward the rushing mill-stream, a tall, dark-eyed figure, that we know
well, approached the gate, and paused to look at him with a
fast-beating heart. Her brother was the human being of whom she had
been most afraid from her childhood upward; afraid with that fear
which springs in us when we love one who is inexorable, unbending,
unmodifiable, with a mind that we can never mould ourselves upon, and
yet that we cannot endure to alienate from us.That deep-rooted fear was shaking Maggie now; but her mind was
unswervingly bent on returning to her brother, as the natural refuge
that had been given her. In her deep humiliation under the retrospect
of her own weakness, - in her anguish at the injury she had
inflicted, - she almost desired to endure the severity of Tom's
reproof, to submit in patient silence to that harsh, disapproving
judgment against which she had so often rebelled; it seemed no more
than just to her now, - who was weaker than she was? She craved that
outward help to her better purpose which would come from complete,
submissive confession; from being in the presence of those whose looks
and words would be a reflection of her own conscience.Maggie had been kept on her bed at York for a day with that
prostrating headache which was likely to follow on the terrible strain
of the previous day and night. There was an expression of physical
pain still about her brow and eyes, and her whole appearance, with her
dress so long unchanged, was worn and distressed. She lifted the latch
of the gate and walked in slowly. Tom did not hear the gate; he was
just then close upon the roaring dam; but he presently turned, and
lifting up his eyes, saw the figure whose worn look and loneliness
seemed to him a confirmation of his worst conjectures. He paused,
trembling and white with disgust and indignation.Maggie paused too, three yards before him. She felt the hatred in his
face, felt it rushing through her fibres; but she must speak.&quot;Tom,&quot; she began faintly, &quot;I am come back to you, - I am come back
home - for refuge - to tell you everything.&quot;&quot;You will find no home with me,&quot; he answered, with tremulous rage.
&quot;You have disgraced us all. You have disgraced my father's name. You
have been a curse to your best friends. You have been base, deceitful;
no motives are strong enough to restrain you. I wash my hands of you
forever. You don't belong to me.&quot;Their mother had come to the door now. She stood paralyzed by the
double shock of seeing Maggie and hearing Tom's words.&quot;Tom,&quot; said Maggie, with more courage, &quot;I am perhaps not so guilty as
you believe me to be. I never meant to give way to my feelings. I
struggled against them. I was carried too far in the boat to come back
on Tuesday. I came back as soon as I could.&quot;&quot;I can't believe in you any more,&quot; said Tom, gradually passing from
the tremulous excitement of the first moment to cold inflexibility.
&quot;You have been carrying on a clandestine relation with Stephen
Guest, - as you did before with another. He went to see you at my aunt
Moss's; you walked alone with him in the lanes; you must have behaved
as no modest girl would have done to her cousin's lover, else that
could never have happened. The people at Luckreth saw you pass; you
passed all the other places; you knew what you were doing. You have
been using Philip Wakem as a screen to deceive Lucy, - the kindest
friend you ever had. Go and see the return you have made her. She's
ill; unable to speak. My mother can't go near her, lest she should
remind her of you.&quot;Maggie was half stunned, - too heavily pressed upon by her anguish even
to discern any difference between her actual guilt and her brother's
accusations, still less to vindicate herself.&quot;Tom,&quot; she said, crushing her hands together under her cloak, in the
effort to speak again, &quot;whatever I have done, I repent it bitterly. I
want to make amends. I will endure anything. I want to be kept from
doing wrong again.&quot;&quot;Whatwillkeep you?&quot; said Tom, with cruel bitterness. &quot;Not
religion; not your natural feelings of gratitude and honor. And he - he
would deserve to be shot, if it were not -  - But you are ten times
worse than he is. I loathe your character and your conduct. You
struggled with your feelings, you say. Yes!Ihave had feelings to
struggle with; but I conquered them. I have had a harder life than you
have had; but I have foundmycomfort in doing my duty. But I will
sanction no such character as yours; the world shall know thatIfeel the difference between right and wrong. If you are in want, I
will provide for you; let my mother know. But you shall not come under
my roof. It is enough that I have to bear the thought of your
disgrace; the sight of you is hateful to me.&quot;Slowly Maggie was turning away with despair in her heart. But the poor
frightened mother's love leaped out now, stronger than all dread.&quot;My child! I'll go with you. You've got a mother.&quot;Oh, the sweet rest of that embrace to the heart-stricken Maggie! More
helpful than all wisdom is one draught of simple human pity that will
not forsake us.Tom turned and walked into the house.&quot;Come in, my child,&quot; Mrs. Tulliver whispered. &quot;He'll let you stay and
sleep in my bed. He won't deny that if I ask him.&quot;&quot;No, mother,&quot; said Maggie, in a low tone, like a moan. &quot;I will never
go in.&quot;&quot;Then wait for me outside. I'll get ready and come with you.&quot;When his mother appeared with her bonnet on, Tom came out to her in
the passage, and put money into her hands.&quot;My house is yours, mother, always,&quot; he said. &quot;You will come and let
me know everything you want; you will come back to me.&quot;Poor Mrs. Tulliver took the money, too frightened to say anything. The
only thing clear to her was the mother's instinct that she would go
with her unhappy child.Maggie was waiting outside the gate; she took her mother's hand and
they walked a little way in silence.&quot;Mother,&quot; said Maggie, at last, &quot;we will go to Luke's cottage. Luke
will take me in. He was very good to me when I was a little girl.&quot;&quot;He's got no room for us, my dear, now; his wife's got so many
children. I don't know where to go, if it isn't to one o' your aunts;
and I hardly durst,&quot; said poor Mrs. Tulliver, quite destitute of
mental resources in this extremity.Maggie was silent a little while, and then said, -&quot;Let us go to Bob Jakin's, mother; his wife will have room for us, if
they have no other lodger.&quot;So they went on their way to St. Ogg's, to the old house by the
river-side.Bob himself was at home, with a heaviness at heart which resisted even
the new joy and pride of possessing a two-months'-old baby, quite the
liveliest of its age that had ever been born to prince or packman. He
would perhaps not so thoroughly have understood all the dubiousness of
Maggie's appearance with Mr. Stephen Guest on the quay at Mudport if
he had not witnessed the effect it produced on Tom when he went to
report it; and since then, the circumstances which in any case gave a
disastrous character to her elopement had passed beyond the more
polite circles of St. Ogg's, and had become matter of common talk,
accessible to the grooms and errand-boys. So that when he opened the
door and saw Maggie standing before him in her sorrow and weariness,
he had no questions to ask except one which he dared only ask
himself, - where was Mr. Stephen Guest? Bob, for his part, hoped he
might be in the warmest department of an asylum understood to exist in
the other world for gentlemen who are likely to be in fallen
circumstances there.The lodgings were vacant, and both Mrs. Jakin the larger and Mrs.
Jakin the less were commanded to make all things comfortable for &quot;the
old Missis and the young Miss&quot;; alas that she was still &quot;Miss!&quot; The
ingenious Bob was sorely perplexed as to how this result could have
come about; how Mr. Stephen Guest could have gone away from her, or
could have let her go away from him, when he had the chance of keeping
her with him. But he was silent, and would not allow his wife to ask
him a question; would not present himself in the room, lest it should
appear like intrusion and a wish to pry; having the same chivalry
toward dark-eyed Maggie as in the days when he had bought her the
memorable present of books.But after a day or two Mrs. Tulliver was gone to the Mill again for a
few hours to see to Tom's household matters. Maggie had wished this;
after the first violent outburst of feeling which came as soon as she
had no longer any active purpose to fulfil, she was less in need of
her mother's presence; she even desired to be alone with her grief.
But she had been solitary only a little while in the old sitting-room
that looked on the river, when there came a tap at the door, and
turning round her sad face as she said &quot;Come in,&quot; she saw Bob enter,
with the baby in his arms and Mumps at his heels.&quot;We'll go back, if it disturbs you, Miss,&quot; said Bob.&quot;No,&quot; said Maggie, in a low voice, wishing she could smile.Bob, closing the door behind him, came and stood before her.&quot;You see, we've got a little un, Miss, and I want'd you to look at it,
and take it in your arms, if you'd be so good. For we made free to
name it after you, and it 'ud be better for your takin' a bit o'
notice on it.&quot;Maggie could not speak, but she put out her arms to receive the tiny
baby, while Mumps snuffed at it anxiously, to ascertain that this
transference was all right. Maggie's heart had swelled at this action
and speech of Bob's; she knew well enough that it was a way he had
chosen to show his sympathy and respect.&quot;Sit down, Bob,&quot; she said presently, and he sat down in silence,
finding his tongue unmanageable in quite a new fashion, refusing to
say what he wanted it to say.&quot;Bob,&quot; she said, after a few moments, looking down at the baby, and
holding it anxiously, as if she feared it might slip from her mind and
her fingers, &quot;I have a favor to ask of you.&quot;&quot;Don't you speak so, Miss,&quot; said Bob, grasping the skin of Mumps's
neck; &quot;if there's anything I can do for you, I should look upon it as
a day's earnings.&quot;&quot;I want you to go to Dr. Kenn's, and ask to speak to him, and tell him
that I am here, and should be very grateful if he would come to me
while my mother is away. She will not come back till evening.&quot;&quot;Eh, Miss, I'd do it in a minute, - it is but a step, - but Dr. Kenn's
wife lies dead; she's to be buried to-morrow; died the day I come from
Mudport. It's all the more pity she should ha' died just now, if you
want him. I hardly like to go a-nigh him yet.&quot;&quot;Oh no, Bob,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;we must let it be, - till after a few days,
perhaps, when you hear that he is going about again. But perhaps he
may be going out of town - to a distance,&quot; she added, with a new sense
of despondency at this idea.&quot;Not he, Miss,&quot; said Bob. &quot;He'llnone go away. He isn't one o' them
gentlefolks as go to cry at waterin'-places when their wives die; he's
got summat else to do. He looks fine and sharp after the parish, he
does. He christened the little un; an' he wasatme to know what I
did of a Sunday, as I didn't come to church. But I told him I was upo'
the travel three parts o' the Sundays, - an' then I'm so used to bein'
on my legs, I can't sit so long on end, - 'an' lors, sir,' says I, 'a
packman can do wi' a small 'lowance o' church; it tastes strong,' says
I; 'there's no call to lay it on thick.' Eh, Miss, how good the little
un is wi' you! It's like as if it knowed you; it partly does, I'll be
bound, - like the birds know the mornin'.&quot;Bob's tongue was now evidently loosed from its unwonted bondage, and
might even be in danger of doing more work than was required of it.
But the subjects on which he longed to be informed were so steep and
difficult of approach, that his tongue was likely to run on along the
level rather than to carry him on that unbeaten road. He felt this,
and was silent again for a little while, ruminating much on the
possible forms in which he might put a question. At last he said, in a
more timid voice than usual, -&quot;Will you give me leave to ask you only one thing, Miss?&quot;Maggie was rather startled, but she answered, &quot;Yes, Bob, if it is
about myself - not about any one else.&quot;&quot;Well, Miss, it's this.Doyou owe anybody a grudge?&quot;&quot;No, not any one,&quot; said Maggie, looking up at him inquiringly. &quot;Why?&quot;&quot;Oh, lors, Miss,&quot; said Bob, pinching Mumps's neck harder than ever. &quot;I
wish you did, an' tell me; I'd leather him till I couldn't see - I
would - an' the Justice might do what he liked to me arter.&quot;&quot;Oh, Bob,&quot; said Maggie, smiling faintly, &quot;you're a very good friend to
me. But I shouldn't like to punish any one, even if they'd done me
wrong; I've done wrong myself too often.&quot;This view of things was puzzling to Bob, and threw more obscurity than
ever over what could possibly have happened between Stephen and
Maggie. But further questions would have been too intrusive, even if
he could have framed them suitably, and he was obliged to carry baby
away again to an expectant mother.&quot;Happen you'd like Mumps for company, Miss,&quot; he said when he had taken
the baby again. &quot;He's rare company, Mumps is; he knows iverything, an'
makes no bother about it. If I tell him, he'll lie before you an'
watch you, as still, - just as he watches my pack. You'd better let me
leave him a bit; he'll get fond on you. Lors, it's a fine thing to hev
a dumb brute fond on you; it'll stick to you, an' make no jaw.&quot;&quot;Yes, do leave him, please,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;I think I should like to
have Mumps for a friend.&quot;&quot;Mumps, lie down there,&quot; said Bob, pointing to a place in front of
Maggie, &quot;and niver do you stir till you're spoke to.&quot;Mumps lay down at once, and made no sign of restlessness when his
master left the room.>


In the second week of September, Maggie was again sitting in her
lonely room, battling with the old shadowy enemies that were forever
slain and rising again. It was past midnight, and the rain was beating
heavily against the window, driven with fitful force by the rushing,
loud-moaning wind. For the day after Lucy's visit there had been a
sudden change in the weather; the heat and drought had given way to
cold variable winds, and heavy falls of rain at intervals; and she had
been forbidden to risk the contemplated journey until the weather
should become more settled. In the counties higher up the Floss the
rains had been continuous, and the completion of the harvest had been
arrested. And now, for the last two days, the rains on this lower
course of the river had been incessant, so that the old men had shaken
their heads and talked of sixty years ago, when the same sort of
weather, happening about the equinox, brought on the great floods,
which swept the bridge away, and reduced the town to great misery. But
the younger generation, who had seen several small floods, thought
lightly of these sombre recollections and forebodings; and Bob Jakin,
naturally prone to take a hopeful view of his own luck, laughed at his
mother when she regretted their having taken a house by the riverside,
observing that but for that they would have had no boats, which were
the most lucky of possessions in case of a flood that obliged them to
go to a distance for food.But the careless and the fearful were alike sleeping in their beds
now. There was hope that the rain would abate by the morrow;
threatenings of a worse kind, from sudden thaws after falls of snow,
had often passed off, in the experience of the younger ones; and at
the very worst, the banks would be sure to break lower down the river
when the tide came in with violence, and so the waters would be
carried off, without causing more than temporary inconvenience, and
losses that would be felt only by the poorer sort, whom charity would
relieve.All were in their beds now, for it was past midnight; all except some
solitary watchers such as Maggie. She was seated in her little parlor
toward the river, with one candle, that left everything dim in the
room except a letter which lay before her on the table. That letter,
which had come to her to-day, was one of the causes that had kept her
up far on into the night, unconscious how the hours were going,
careless of seeking rest, with no image of rest coming across her
mind, except of that far, far off rest from which there would be no
more waking for her into this struggling earthly life.Two days before Maggie received that letter, she had been to the
Rectory for the last time. The heavy rain would have prevented her
from going since; but there was another reason. Dr. Kenn, at first
enlightened only by a few hints as to the new turn which gossip and
slander had taken in relation to Maggie, had recently been made more
fully aware of it by an earnest remonstrance from one of his male
parishioners against the indiscretion of persisting in the attempt to
overcome the prevalent feeling in the parish by a course of
resistance. Dr. Kenn, having a conscience void of offence in the
matter, was still inclined to persevere, - was still averse to give way
before a public sentiment that was odious and contemptible; but he was
finally wrought upon by the consideration of the peculiar
responsibility attached to his office, of avoiding the appearance of
evil, - an &quot;appearance&quot; that is always dependent on the average quality
of surrounding minds. Where these minds are low and gross, the area of
that &quot;appearance&quot; is proportionately widened. Perhaps he was in danger
of acting from obstinacy; perhaps it was his duty to succumb.
Conscientious people are apt to see their duty in that which is the
most painful course; and to recede was always painful to Dr. Kenn. He
made up his mind that he must advise Maggie to go away from St. Ogg's
for a time; and he performed that difficult task with as much delicacy
as he could, only stating in vague terms that he found his attempt to
countenance her stay was a source of discord between himself and his
parishioners, that was likely to obstruct his usefulness as a
clergyman. He begged her to allow him to write to a clerical friend of
his, who might possibly take her into his own family as governess;
and, if not, would probably know of some other available position for
a young woman in whose welfare Dr. Kenn felt a strong interest.Poor Maggie listened with a trembling lip; she could say nothing but a
faint &quot;Thank you, I shall be grateful&quot;; and she walked back to her
lodgings, through the driving rain, with a new sense of desolation.
She must be a lonely wanderer; she must go out among fresh faces, that
would look at her wonderingly, because the days did not seem joyful to
her; she must begin a new life, in which she would have to rouse
herself to receive new impressions; and she was so unspeakably,
sickeningly weary! There was no home, no help for the erring; even
those who pitied were constrained to hardness. But ought she to
complain? Ought she to shrink in this way from the long penance of
life, which was all the possibility she had of lightening the load to
some other sufferers, and so changing that passionate error into a new
force of unselfish human love? All the next day she sat in her lonely
room, with a window darkened by the cloud and the driving rain,
thinking of that future, and wrestling for patience; for what repose
could poor Maggie ever win except by wrestling?And on the third day - this day of which she had just sat out the
close - the letter had come which was lying on the table before her.The letter was from Stephen. He was come back from Holland; he was at
Mudport again, unknown to any of his friends, and had written to her
from that place, enclosing the letter to a person whom he trusted in
St. Ogg's. From beginning to end it was a passionate cry of reproach;
an appeal against her useless sacrifice of him, of herself, against
that perverted notion of right which led her to crush all his hopes,
for the sake of a mere idea, and not any substantial good, -hishopes, whom she loved, and who loved her with that single overpowering
passion, that worship, which a man never gives to a woman more than
once in his life.&quot;They have written to me that you are to marry Kenn. As if I should
believe that! Perhaps they have told you some such fables about me.
Perhaps they tell you I've been 'travelling.' My body has been dragged
about somewhere; butIhave never travelled from the hideous place
where you left me; where I started up from the stupor of helpless rage
to find you gone.&quot;Maggie! whose pain can have been like mine? Whose injury is like
mine? Who besides me has met that long look of love that has burnt
itself into my soul, so that no other image can come there? Maggie,
call me back to you! Call me back to life and goodness! I am banished
from both now. I have no motives; I am indifferent to everything. Two
months have only deepened the certainty that I can never care for life
without you. Write me one word; say 'Come!' In two days I should be
with you. Maggie, have you forgotten what it was to be together, - to
be within reach of a look, to be within hearing of each other's
voice?&quot;When Maggie first read this letter she felt as if her real temptation
had only just begun. At the entrance of the chill dark cavern, we turn
with unworn courage from the warm light; but how, when we have trodden
far in the damp darkness, and have begun to be faint and weary; how,
if there is a sudden opening above us, and we are invited back again
to the life-nourishing day? The leap of natural longing from under the
pressure of pain is so strong, that all less immediate motives are
likely to be forgotten - till the pain has been escaped from.For hours Maggie felt as if her struggle had been in vain. For hours
every other thought that she strove to summon was thrust aside by the
image of Stephen waiting for the single word that would bring him to
her. She did notreadthe letter: she heard him uttering it, and the
voice shook her with its old strange power. All the day before she had
been filled with the vision of a lonely future through which she must
carry the burthen of regret, upheld only by clinging faith. And here,
close within her reach, urging itself upon her even as a claim, was
another future, in which hard endurance and effort were to be
exchanged for easy, delicious leaning on another's loving strength!
And yet that promise of joy in the place of sadness did not make the
dire force of the temptation to Maggie.It was Stephen's tone of misery, it was the doubt in the justice of
her own resolve, that made the balance tremble, and made her once
start from her seat to reach the pen and paper, and write &quot;Come!&quot;But close upon that decisive act, her mind recoiled; and the sense of
contradiction with her past self in her moments of strength and
clearness came upon her like a pang of conscious degradation. No, she
must wait; she must pray; the light that had forsaken her would come
again; she should feel again what she had felt when she had fled away,
under an inspiration strong enough to conquer agony, - to conquer love;
she should feel again what she had felt when Lucy stood by her, when
Philip's letter had stirred all the fibres that bound her to the
calmer past.She sat quite still, far on into the night, with no impulse to change
her attitude, without active force enough even for the mental act of
prayer; only waiting for the light that would surely come again. It
came with the memories that no passion could long quench; the long
past came back to her, and with it the fountains of self-renouncing
pity and affection, of faithfulness and resolve. The words that were
marked by the quiet hand in the little old book that she had long ago
learned by heart, rushed even to her lips, and found a vent for
themselves in a low murmur that was quite lost in the loud driving of
the rain against the window and the loud moan and roar of the wind. &quot;I
have received the Cross, I have received it from Thy hand; I will bear
it, and bear it till death, as Thou hast laid it upon me.&quot;But soon other words rose that could find no utterance but in a
sob, - &quot;Forgive me, Stephen! It will pass away. You will come back to
her.&quot;She took up the letter, held it to the candle, and let it burn slowly
on the hearth. To-morrow she would write to him the last word of
parting.&quot;I will bear it, and bear it till death. But how long it will be
before death comes! I am so young, so healthy. How shall I have
patience and strength? Am I to struggle and fall and repent again? Has
life other trials as hard for me still?&quot;With that cry of self-despair, Maggie fell on her knees against the
table, and buried her sorrow-stricken face. Her soul went out to the
Unseen Pity that would be with her to the end. Surely there was
something being taught her by this experience of great need; and she
must be learning a secret of human tenderness and long-suffering, that
the less erring could hardly know? &quot;O God, if my life is to be long,
let me live to bless and comfort -  - &quot;At that moment Maggie felt a startling sensation of sudden cold about
her knees and feet; it was water flowing under her. She started up;
the stream was flowing under the door that led into the passage. She
was not bewildered for an instant; she knew it was the flood!The tumult of emotion she had been enduring for the last twelve hours
seemed to have left a great calm in her; without screaming, she
hurried with the candle upstairs to Bob Jakin's bedroom. The door was
ajar; she went in and shook him by the shoulder.&quot;Bob, the flood is come! it is in the house; let us see if we can make
the boats safe.&quot;She lighted his candle, while the poor wife, snatching up her baby,
burst into screams; and then she hurried down again to see if the
waters were rising fast. There was a step down into the room at the
door leading from the staircase; she saw that the water was already on
a level with the step. While she was looking, something came with a
tremendous crash against the window, and sent the leaded panes and the
old wooden framework inward in shivers, the water pouring in after it.&quot;It is the boat!&quot; cried Maggie. &quot;Bob, come down to get the boats!&quot;And without a moment's shudder of fear, she plunged through the water,
which was rising fast to her knees, and by the glimmering light of the
candle she had left on the stairs, she mounted on to the window-sill,
and crept into the boat, which was left with the prow lodging and
protruding through the window. Bob was not long after her, hurrying
without shoes or stockings, but with the lanthorn in his hand.&quot;Why, they're both here, - both the boats,&quot; said Bob, as he got into
the one where Maggie was. &quot;It's wonderful this fastening isn't broke
too, as well as the mooring.&quot;In the excitement of getting into the other boat, unfastening it, and
mastering an oar, Bob was not struck with the danger Maggie incurred.
We are not apt to fear for the fearless, when we are companions in
their danger, and Bob's mind was absorbed in possible expedients for
the safety of the helpless indoors. The fact that Maggie had been up,
had waked him, and had taken the lead in activity, gave Bob a vague
impression of her as one who would help to protect, not need to be
protected. She too had got possession of an oar, and had pushed off,
so as to release the boat from the overhanging window-frame.&quot;The water's rising so fast,&quot; said Bob, &quot;I doubt it'll be in at the
chambers before long, - th' house is so low. I've more mind to get
Prissy and the child and the mother into the boat, if I could, and
trusten to the water, - for th' old house is none so safe. And if I let
go the boat - butyou,&quot; he exclaimed, suddenly lifting the light of
his lanthorn on Maggie, as she stood in the rain with the oar in her
hand and her black hair streaming.Maggie had no time to answer, for a new tidal current swept along the
line of the houses, and drove both the boats out on to the wide water,
with a force that carried them far past the meeting current of the
river.In the first moments Maggie felt nothing, thought of nothing, but that
she had suddenly passed away from that life which she had been
dreading; it was the transition of death, without its agony, - and she
was alone in the darkness with God.The whole thing had been so rapid, so dreamlike, that the threads of
ordinary association were broken; she sank down on the seat clutching
the oar mechanically, and for a long while had no distinct conception
of her position. The first thing that waked her to fuller
consciousness was the cessation of the rain, and a perception that the
darkness was divided by the faintest light, which parted the
overhanging gloom from the immeasurable watery level below. She was
driven out upon the flood, - that awful visitation of God which her
father used to talk of; which had made the nightmare of her childish
dreams. And with that thought there rushed in the vision of the old
home, and Tom, and her mother, - they had all listened together.&quot;O God, where am I? Which is the way home?&quot; she cried out, in the dim
loneliness.What was happening to them at the Mill? The flood had once nearly
destroyed it. They might be in danger, in distress, - her mother and
her brother, alone there, beyond reach of help! Her whole soul was
strained now on that thought; and she saw the long-loved faces looking
for help into the darkness, and finding none.She was floating in smooth water now, - perhaps far on the overflooded
fields. There was no sense of present danger to check the outgoing of
her mind to the old home; and she strained her eyes against the
curtain of gloom that she might seize the first sight of her
whereabout, - that she might catch some faint suggestion of the spot
toward which all her anxieties tended.Oh, how welcome, the widening of that dismal watery level, the gradual
uplifting of the cloudy firmament, the slowly defining blackness of
objects above the glassy dark! Yes, she must be out on the fields;
those were the tops of hedgerow trees. Which way did the river lie?
Looking behind her, she saw the lines of black trees; looking before
her, there were none; then the river lay before her. She seized an oar
and began to paddle the boat forward with the energy of wakening hope;
the dawning seemed to advance more swiftly, now she was in action; and
she could soon see the poor dumb beasts crowding piteously on a mound
where they had taken refuge. Onward she paddled and rowed by turns in
the growing twilight; her wet clothes clung round her, and her
streaming hair was dashed about by the wind, but she was hardly
conscious of any bodily sensations, - except a sensation of strength,
inspired by mighty emotion. Along with the sense of danger and
possible rescue for those long-remembered beings at the old home,
there was an undefined sense of reconcilement with her brother; what
quarrel, what harshness, what unbelief in each other can subsist in
the presence of a great calamity, when all the artificial vesture of
our life is gone, and we are all one with each other in primitive
mortal needs? Vaguely Maggie felt this, in the strong resurgent love
toward her brother that swept away all the later impressions of hard,
cruel offence and misunderstanding, and left only the deep,
underlying, unshakable memories of early union.But now there was a large dark mass in the distance, and near to her
Maggie could discern the current of the river. The dark mass must
be - yes, it was - St. Ogg's. Ah, now she knew which way to look for the
first glimpse of the well-known trees - the gray willows, the now
yellowing chestnuts - and above them the old roof! But there was no
color, no shape yet; all was faint and dim. More and more strongly the
energies seemed to come and put themselves forth, as if her life were
a stored-up force that was being spent in this hour, unneeded for any
future.She must get her boat into the current of the Floss, else she would
never be able to pass the Ripple and approach the house; this was the
thought that occurred to her, as she imagined with more and more
vividness the state of things round the old home. But then she might
be carried very far down, and be unable to guide her boat out of the
current again. For the first time distinct ideas of danger began to
press upon her; but there was no choice of courses, no room for
hesitation, and she floated into the current. Swiftly she went now
without effort; more and more clearly in the lessening distance and
the growing light she began to discern the objects that she knew must
be the well-known trees and roofs; nay, she was not far off a rushing,
muddy current that must be the strangely altered Ripple.Great God! there were floating masses in it, that might dash against
her boat as she passed, and cause her to perish too soon. What were
those masses?For the first time Maggie's heart began to beat in an agony of dread.
She sat helpless, dimly conscious that she was being floated along,
more intensely conscious of the anticipated clash. But the horror was
transient; it passed away before the oncoming warehouses of St. Ogg's.
She had passed the mouth of the Ripple, then;now, she must use all
her skill and power to manage the boat and get it if possible out of
the current. She could see now that the bridge was broken down; she
could see the masts of a stranded vessel far out over the watery
field. But no boats were to be seen moving on the river, - such as had
been laid hands on were employed in the flooded streets.With new resolution, Maggie seized her oar, and stood up again to
paddle; but the now ebbing tide added to the swiftness of the river,
and she was carried along beyond the bridge. She could hear shouts
from the windows overlooking the river, as if the people there were
calling to her. It was not till she had passed on nearly to Tofton
that she could get the boat clear of the current. Then with one
yearning look toward her uncle Deane's house that lay farther down the
river, she took to both her oars and rowed with all her might across
the watery fields, back toward the Mill. Color was beginning to awake
now, and as she approached the Dorlcote fields, she could discern the
tints of the trees, could see the old Scotch firs far to the right,
and the home chestnuts, - oh, how deep they lay in the water, - deeper
than the trees on this side the hill! And the roof of the Mill - where
was it? Those heavy fragments hurrying down the Ripple, - what had they
meant? But it was not the house, - the house stood firm; drowned up to
the first story, but still firm, - or was it broken in at the end
toward the Mill?With panting joy that she was there at last, - joy that overcame all
distress, - Maggie neared the front of the house. At first she heard no
sound; she saw no object moving. Her boat was on a level with the
upstairs window. She called out in a loud, piercing voice, -&quot;Tom, where are you? Mother, where are you? Here is Maggie!&quot;Soon, from the window of the attic in the central gable, she heard
Tom's voice, -&quot;Who is it? Have you brought a boat?&quot;&quot;It is I, Tom, - Maggie. Where is mother?&quot;&quot;She is not here; she went to Garum the day before yesterday. I'll
come down to the lower window.&quot;&quot;Alone, Maggie?&quot; said Tom, in a voice of deep astonishment, as he
opened the middle window, on a level with the boat.&quot;Yes, Tom; God has taken care of me, to bring me to you. Get in
quickly. Is there no one else?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Tom, stepping into the boat; &quot;I fear the man is drowned; he
was carried down the Ripple, I think, when part of the Mill fell with
the crash of trees and stones against it; I've shouted again and
again, and there has been no answer. Give me the oars, Maggie.&quot;It was not till Tom had pushed off and they were on the wide
water, - he face to face with Maggie, - that the full meaning of what
had happened rushed upon his mind. It came with so overpowering a
force, - it was such a new revelation to his spirit, of the depths in
life that had lain beyond his vision, which he had fancied so keen and
clear, - that he was unable to ask a question. They sat mutely gazing
at each other, - Maggie with eyes of intense life looking out from a
weary, beaten face; Tom pale, with a certain awe and humiliation.
Thought was busy though the lips were silent; and though he could ask
no question, he guessed a story of almost miraculous, divinely
protected effort. But at last a mist gathered over the blue-gray eyes,
and the lips found a word they could utter, - the old childish
&quot;Magsie!&quot;Maggie could make no answer but a long, deep sob of that mysterious,
wondrous happiness that is one with pain.As soon as she could speak, she said, &quot;We will go to Lucy, Tom; we'll
go and see if she is safe, and then we can help the rest.&quot;Tom rowed with untired vigor, and with a different speed from poor
Maggie's. The boat was soon in the current of the river again, and
soon they would be at Tofton.&quot;Park House stands high up out of the flood,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;Perhaps
they have got Lucy there.&quot;Nothing else was said; a new danger was being carried toward them by
the river. Some wooden machinery had just given way on one of the
wharves, and huge fragments were being floated along. The sun was
rising now, and the wide area of watery desolation was spread out in
dreadful clearness around them; in dreadful clearness floated onward
the hurrying, threatening masses. A large company in a boat that was
working its way along under the Tofton houses observed their danger,
and shouted, &quot;Get out of the current!&quot;But that could not be done at once; and Tom, looking before him, saw
death rushing on them. Huge fragments, clinging together in fatal
fellowship, made one wide mass across the stream.&quot;It is coming, Maggie!&quot; Tom said, in a deep, hoarse voice, loosing the
oars, and clasping her.The next instant the boat was no longer seen upon the water, and the
huge mass was hurrying on in hideous triumph.But soon the keel of the boat reappeared, a black speck on the golden
water.The boat reappeared, but brother and sister had gone down in an
embrace never to be parted; living through again in one supreme moment
the days when they had clasped their little hands in love, and roamed
the daisied fields together.ConclusionNature repairs her ravages, - repairs them with her sunshine, and with
human labor. The desolation wrought by that flood had left little
visible trace on the face of the earth, five years after. The fifth
autumn was rich in golden cornstacks, rising in thick clusters among
the distant hedgerows; the wharves and warehouses on the Floss were
busy again, with echoes of eager voices, with hopeful lading and
unlading.And every man and woman mentioned in this history was still living,
except those whose end we know.Nature repairs her ravages, but not all. The uptorn trees are not
rooted again; the parted hills are left scarred; if there is a new
growth, the trees are not the same as the old, and the hills
underneath their green vesture bear the marks of the past rending. To
the eyes that have dwelt on the past, there is no thorough repair.Dorlcote Mill was rebuilt. And Dorlcote churchyard - where the brick
grave that held a father whom we know, was found with the stone laid
prostrate upon it after the flood - had recovered all its grassy order
and decent quiet.Near that brick grave there was a tomb erected, very soon after the
flood, for two bodies that were found in close embrace; and it was
visited at different moments by two men who both felt that their
keenest joy and keenest sorrow were forever buried there.One of them visited the tomb again with a sweet face beside him; but
that was years after.The other was always solitary. His great companionship was among the
trees of the Red Deeps, where the buried joy seemed still to hover,
like a revisiting spirit.The tomb bore the names of Tom and Maggie Tulliver, and below the
names it was written, ->


When Maggie was at home again, her mother brought her news of an
unexpected line of conduct in aunt Glegg. As long as Maggie had not
been heard of, Mrs. Glegg had half closed her shutters and drawn down
her blinds. She felt assured that Maggie was drowned; that was far
more probable than that her niece and legatee should have done
anything to wound the family honor in the tenderest point. When at
last she learned from Tom that Maggie had come home, and gathered from
him what was her explanation of her absence, she burst forth in severe
reproof of Tom for admitting the worst of his sister until he was
compelled. If you were not to stand by your &quot;kin&quot; as long as there was
a shred of honor attributable to them, pray what were you to stand by?
Lightly to admit conduct in one of your own family that would force
you to alter your will, had never been the way of the Dodsons; and
though Mrs. Glegg had always augured ill of Maggie's future at a time
when other people were perhaps less clear-sighted, yet fair play was a
jewel, and it was not for her own friends to help to rob the girl of
her fair fame, and to cast her out from family shelter to the scorn of
the outer world, until she had become unequivocally a family disgrace.
The circumstances were unprecedented in Mrs. Glegg's experience;
nothing of that kind had happened among the Dodsons before; but it was
a case in which her hereditary rectitude and personal strength of
character found a common channel along with her fundamental ideas of
clanship, as they did in her lifelong regard to equity in money
matters. She quarrelled with Mr. Glegg, whose kindness, flowing
entirely into compassion for Lucy, made him as hard in his judgment of
Maggie as Mr. Deane himself was; and fuming against her sister
Tulliver because she did not at once come to her for advice and help,
shut herself up in her own room with Baxter's &quot;Saints' Rest&quot; from
morning till night, denying herself to all visitors, till Mr. Glegg
brought from Mr. Deane the news of Stephen's letter. Then Mrs. Glegg
felt that she had adequate fighting-ground; then she laid aside
Baxter, and was ready to meet all comers. While Mrs. Pullet could do
nothing but shake her head and cry, and wish that cousin Abbot had
died, or any number of funerals had happened rather than this, which
had never happened before, so that there was no knowing how to act,
and Mrs. Pullet could never enter St. Ogg's again, because
&quot;acquaintances&quot; knew of it all, Mrs. Glegg only hoped that Mrs. Wooll,
or any one else, would come to her with their false tales about her
own niece, and she would know what to say to that ill-advised person!Again she had a scene of remonstrance with Tom, all the more severe in
proportion to the greater strength of her present position. But Tom,
like other immovable things, seemed only the more rigidly fixed under
that attempt to shake him. Poor Tom! he judged by what he had been
able to see; and the judgment was painful enough to himself. He
thought he had the demonstration of facts observed through years by
his own eyes, which gave no warning of their imperfection, that
Maggie's nature was utterly untrustworthy, and too strongly marked
with evil tendencies to be safely treated with leniency. He would act
on that demonstration at any cost; but the thought of it made his days
bitter to him. Tom, like every one of us, was imprisoned within the
limits of his own nature, and his education had simply glided over
him, leaving a slight deposit of polish; if you are inclined to be
severe on his severity, remember that the responsibility of tolerance
lies with those who have the wider vision. There had arisen in Tom a
repulsion toward Maggie that derived its very intensity from their
early childish love in the time when they had clasped tiny fingers
together, and their later sense of nearness in a common duty and a
common sorrow; the sight of her, as he had told her, was hateful to
him. In this branch of the Dodson family aunt Glegg found a stronger
nature than her own; a nature in which family feeling had lost the
character of clanship by taking on a doubly deep dye of personal
pride.Mrs. Glegg allowed that Maggie ought to be punished, - she was not a
woman to deny that; she knew what conduct was, - but punished in
proportion to the misdeeds proved against her, not to those which were
cast upon her by people outside her own family who might wish to show
that their own kin were better.&quot;Your aunt Glegg scolded me so as niver was, my dear,&quot; said poor Mrs.
Tulliver, when she came back to Maggie, &quot;as I didn't go to her before;
she said it wasn't for her to come to me first. But she spoke like a
sister, too;havingshe allays was, and hard to please, - oh
dear! - but she's said the kindest word as has ever been spoke by you
yet, my child. For she says, for all she's been so set again' having
one extry in the house, and making extry spoons and things, and
putting her about in her ways, you shall have a shelter in her house,
if you'll go to her dutiful, and she'll uphold you against folks as
say harm of you when they've no call. And I told her I thought you
couldn't bear to see anybody but me, you were so beat down with
trouble; but she said, 'Iwon't throw ill words at her; there's them
out o' th' family 'ull be ready enough to do that. But I'll give her
good advice; an' she must be humble.' It's wonderful o' Jane; for I'm
sure she used to throw everything I did wrong at me, - if it was the
raisin-wine as turned out bad, or the pies too hot, or whativer it
was.&quot;&quot;Oh, mother,&quot; said poor Maggie, shrinking from the thought of all the
contact her bruised mind would have to bear, &quot;tell her I'm very
grateful; I'll go to see her as soon as I can; but I can't see any one
just yet, except Dr. Kenn. I've been to him, - he will advise me, and
help me to get some occupation. I can't live with any one, or be
dependent on them, tell aunt Glegg; I must get my own bread. But did
you hear nothing of Philip - Philip Wakem? Have you never seen any one
that has mentioned him?&quot;&quot;No, my dear; but I've been to Lucy's, and I saw your uncle, and he
says they got her to listen to the letter, and she took notice o' Miss
Guest, and asked questions, and the doctor thinks she's on the turn to
be better. What a world this is, - what trouble, oh dear! The law was
the first beginning, and it's gone from bad to worse, all of a sudden,
just when the luck seemed on the turn?&quot; This was the first lamentation
that Mrs. Tulliver had let slip to Maggie, but old habit had been
revived by the interview with sister Glegg.&quot;My poor, poor mother!&quot; Maggie burst out, cut to the heart with pity
and compunction, and throwing her arms round her mother's neck; &quot;I was
always naughty and troublesome to you. And now you might have been
happy if it hadn't been for me.&quot;&quot;Eh, my dear,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, leaning toward the warm young
cheek; &quot;I must put up wi' my children, - I shall never have no more;
and if they bring me bad luck, I must be fond on it. There's nothing
else much to be fond on, for my furnitur' went long ago. And you'd got
to be very good once; I can't think how it's turned out the wrong way
so!&quot;Still two or three more days passed, and Maggie heard nothing of
Philip; anxiety about him was becoming her predominant trouble, and
she summoned courage at last to inquire about him of Dr. Kenn, on his
next visit to her. He did not even know if Philip was at home. The
elder Wakem was made moody by an accumulation of annoyance; the
disappointment in this young Jetsome, to whom, apparently, he was a
good deal attached, had been followed close by the catastrophe to his
son's hopes after he had done violence to his own strong feeling by
conceding to them, and had incautiously mentioned this concession in
St. Ogg's; and he was almost fierce in his brusqueness when any one
asked him a question about his son.But Philip could hardly have been ill, or it would have been known
through the calling in of the medical man; it was probable that he was
gone out of the town for a little while. Maggie sickened under this
suspense, and her imagination began to live more and more persistently
in what Philip was enduring. What did he believe about her?At last Bob brought her a letter, without a postmark, directed in a
hand which she knew familiarly in the letters of her own name, - a hand
in which her name had been written long ago, in a pocket Shakespeare
which she possessed. Her mother was in the room, and Maggie, in
violent agitation, hurried upstairs that she might read the letter in
solitude. She read it with a throbbing brow.As Maggie knelt by the bed sobbing, with that letter pressed under
her, her feelings again and again gathered themselves in a whispered
cry, always in the same words, -&quot;O God, is there any happiness in love that could make me forgettheirpain?&quot;>


&quot;What I want, you know,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, - &quot;what I want is to give
Tom a good eddication; an eddication as'll be a bread to him. That was
what I was thinking of when I gave notice for him to leave the academy
at Lady-day. I mean to put him to a downright good school at
Midsummer. The two years at th' academy 'ud ha' done well enough, if
I'd meant to make a miller and farmer of him, for he's had a fine
sight more schoolin' norIever got. All the learnin'myfather
ever paid for was a bit o' birch at one end and the alphabet at th'
other. But I should like Tom to be a bit of a scholard, so as he might
be up to the tricks o' these fellows as talk fine and write with a
flourish. It 'ud be a help to me wi' these lawsuits, and arbitrations,
and things. I wouldn't make a downright lawyer o' the lad, - I should
be sorry for him to be a raskill, - but a sort o' engineer, or a
surveyor, or an auctioneer and vallyer, like Riley, or one o' them
smartish businesses as are all profits and no outlay, only for a big
watch-chain and a high stool. They're pretty nigh all one, and they're
not far off being even wi' the law,Ibelieve; for Riley looks
Lawyer Wakem i' the face as hard as one cat looks another.He'snone
frightened at him.&quot;Mr. Tulliver was speaking to his wife, a blond comely woman in a
fan-shaped cap (I am afraid to think how long it is since fan-shaped
caps were worn, they must be so near coming in again. At that time,
when Mrs. Tulliver was nearly forty, they were new at St. Ogg's, and
considered sweet things).&quot;Well, Mr. Tulliver, you know best:I'veno objections. But hadn't I
better kill a couple o' fowl, and have th' aunts and uncles to dinner
next week, so as you may hear what sister Glegg and sister Pullet have
got to say about it? There's a couple o' fowlwantskilling!&quot;&quot;You may kill every fowl i' the yard if you like, Bessy; but I shall
ask neither aunt nor uncle what I'm to do wi' my own lad,&quot; said Mr.
Tulliver, defiantly.&quot;Dear heart!&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, shocked at this sanguinary rhetoric,
&quot;how can you talk so, Mr. Tulliver? But it's your way to speak
disrespectful o' my family; and sister Glegg throws all the blame
upo'me, though I'm sure I'm as innocent as the babe unborn. For
nobody's ever heard me say as it wasn't lucky for my children to have
aunts and uncles as can live independent. Howiver, if Tom's to go to a
new school, I should like him to go where I can wash him and mend him;
else he might as well have calico as linen, for they'd be one as
yallow as th' other before they'd been washed half-a-dozen times. And
then, when the box is goin' back'ard and forrard, I could send the lad
a cake, or a pork-pie, or an apple; for he can do with an extry bit,
bless him! whether they stint him at the meals or no. My children can
eat as much victuals as most, thank God!&quot;&quot;Well, well, we won't send him out o' reach o' the carrier's cart, if
other things fit in,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;But you mustn't put a spoke
i' the wheel about the washin,' if we can't get a school near enough.
That's the fault I have to find wi' you, Bessy; if you see a stick i'
the road, you're allays thinkin' you can't step over it. You'd want me
not to hire a good wagoner, 'cause he'd got a mole on his face.&quot;&quot;Dear heart!&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, in mild surprise, &quot;when did I iver
make objections to a man because he'd got a mole on his face? I'm sure
I'm rether fond o' the moles; for my brother, as is dead an' gone, had
a mole on his brow. But I can't remember your iver offering to hire a
wagoner with a mole, Mr. Tulliver. There was John Gibbs hadn't a mole
on his face no more nor you have, an' I was all for having you hirehim; an' so you did hire him, an' if he hadn't died o' th'
inflammation, as we paid Dr. Turnbull for attending him, he'd very
like ha' been drivin' the wagon now. He might have a mole somewhere
out o' sight, but how was I to know that, Mr. Tulliver?&quot;&quot;No, no, Bessy; I didn't mean justly the mole; I meant it to stand for
summat else; but niver mind - it's puzzling work, talking is. What I'm
thinking on, is how to find the right sort o' school to send Tom to,
for I might be ta'en in again, as I've been wi' th' academy. I'll have
nothing to do wi' a 'cademy again: whativer school I send Tom to, it
sha'n't be a 'cademy; it shall be a place where the lads spend their
time i' summat else besides blacking the family's shoes, and getting
up the potatoes. It's an uncommon puzzling thing to know what school
to pick.&quot;Mr. Tulliver paused a minute or two, and dived with both hands into
his breeches pockets as if he hoped to find some suggestion there.
Apparently he was not disappointed, for he presently said, &quot;I know
what I'll do: I'll talk it over wi' Riley; he's coming to-morrow, t'
arbitrate about the dam.&quot;&quot;Well, Mr. Tulliver, I've put the sheets out for the best bed, and
Kezia's got 'em hanging at the fire. They aren't the best sheets, but
they're good enough for anybody to sleep in, be he who he will; for as
for them best Holland sheets, I should repent buying 'em, only they'll
do to lay us out in. An' if you was to die to-morrow, Mr. Tulliver,
they're mangled beautiful, an' all ready, an' smell o' lavender as it
'ud be a pleasure to lay 'em out; an' they lie at the left-hand corner
o' the big oak linen-chest at the back: not as I should trust anybody
to look 'em out but myself.&quot;As Mrs. Tulliver uttered the last sentence, she drew a bright bunch of
keys from her pocket, and singled out one, rubbing her thumb and
finger up and down it with a placid smile while she looked at the
clear fire. If Mr. Tulliver had been a susceptible man in his conjugal
relation, he might have supposed that she drew out the key to aid her
imagination in anticipating the moment when he would be in a state to
justify the production of the best Holland sheets. Happily he was not
so; he was only susceptible in respect of his right to water-power;
moreover, he had the marital habit of not listening very closely, and
since his mention of Mr. Riley, had been apparently occupied in a
tactile examination of his woollen stockings.&quot;I think I've hit it, Bessy,&quot; was his first remark after a short
silence. &quot;Riley's as likely a man as any to know o' some school; he's
had schooling himself, an' goes about to all sorts o' places,
arbitratin' and vallyin' and that. And we shall have time to talk it
over to-morrow night when the business is done. I want Tom to be such
a sort o' man as Riley, you know, - as can talk pretty nigh as well as
if it was all wrote out for him, and knows a good lot o' words as
don't mean much, so as you can't lay hold of 'em i' law; and a good
solid knowledge o' business too.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, &quot;so far as talking proper, and knowing
everything, and walking with a bend in his back, and setting his hair
up, I shouldn't mind the lad being brought up to that. But them
fine-talking men from the big towns mostly wear the false
shirt-fronts; they wear a frill till it's all a mess, and then hide it
with a bib; I know Riley does. And then, if Tom's to go and live at
Mudport, like Riley, he'll have a house with a kitchen hardly big
enough to turn in, an' niver get a fresh egg for his breakfast, an'
sleep up three pair o' stairs, - or four, for what I know, - and be
burnt to death before he can get down.&quot;&quot;No, no,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, &quot;I've no thoughts of his going to
Mudport: I mean him to set up his office at St. Ogg's, close by us,
an' live at home. But,&quot; continued Mr. Tulliver after a pause, &quot;what
I'm a bit afraid on is, as Tom hasn't got the right sort o' brains for
a smart fellow. I doubt he's a bit slowish. He takes after your
family, Bessy.&quot;&quot;Yes, that he does,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, accepting the last
proposition entirely on its own merits; &quot;he's wonderful for liking a
deal o' salt in his broth. That was my brother's way, and my father's
before him.&quot;&quot;It seems a bit a pity, though,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, &quot;as the lad should
take after the mother's side instead o' the little wench. That's the
worst on't wi' crossing o' breeds: you can never justly calkilate
what'll come on't. The little un takes after my side, now: she's twice
as 'cute as Tom. Too 'cute for a woman, I'm afraid,&quot; continued Mr.
Tulliver, turning his head dubiously first on one side and then on the
other. &quot;It's no mischief much while she's a little un; but an
over-'cute woman's no better nor a long-tailed sheep, - she'll fetch
none the bigger price for that.&quot;&quot;Yes, itisa mischief while she's a little un, Mr. Tulliver, for it
runs to naughtiness. How to keep her in a clean pinafore two hours
together passes my cunning. An' now you put me i' mind,&quot; continued
Mrs. Tulliver, rising and going to the window, &quot;I don't know where she
is now, an' it's pretty nigh tea-time. Ah, I thought so, - wanderin' up
an' down by the water, like a wild thing: She'll tumble in some day.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver rapped the window sharply, beckoned, and shook her
head, - a process which she repeated more than once before she returned
to her chair.&quot;You talk o' 'cuteness, Mr. Tulliver,&quot; she observed as she sat down,
&quot;but I'm sure the child's half an idiot i' some things; for if I send
her upstairs to fetch anything, she forgets what she's gone for, an'
perhaps 'ull sit down on the floor i' the sunshine an' plait her hair
an' sing to herself like a Bedlam creatur', all the while I'm waiting
for her downstairs. That niver run i' my family, thank God! no more
nor a brown skin as makes her look like a mulatter. I don't like to
fly i' the face o' Providence, but it seems hard as I should have but
one gell, an' her so comical.&quot;&quot;Pooh, nonsense!&quot; said Mr. Tulliver; &quot;she's a straight, black-eyed
wench as anybody need wish to see. I don't know i' what she's behind
other folks's children; and she can read almost as well as the
parson.&quot;&quot;But her hair won't curl all I can do with it, and she's so franzy
about having it put i' paper, and I've such work as never was to make
her stand and have it pinched with th' irons.&quot;&quot;Cut it off - cut it off short,&quot; said the father, rashly.&quot;How can you talk so, Mr. Tulliver? She's too big a gell - gone nine,
and tall of her age - to have her hair cut short; an' there's her
cousin Lucy's got a row o' curls round her head, an' not a hair out o'
place. It seems hard as my sister Deane should have that pretty child;
I'm sure Lucy takes more after me nor my own child does. Maggie,
Maggie,&quot; continued the mother, in a tone of half-coaxing fretfulness,
as this small mistake of nature entered the room, &quot;where's the use o'
my telling you to keep away from the water? You'll tumble in and be
drownded some day, an' then you'll be sorry you didn't do as mother
told you.&quot;Maggie's hair, as she threw off her bonnet, painfully confirmed her
mother's accusation. Mrs. Tulliver, desiring her daughter to have a
curled crop, &quot;like other folks's children,&quot; had had it cut too short
in front to be pushed behind the ears; and as it was usually straight
an hour after it had been taken out of paper, Maggie was incessantly
tossing her head to keep the dark, heavy locks out of her gleaming
black eyes, - an action which gave her very much the air of a small
Shetland pony.&quot;Oh, dear, oh, dear, Maggie, what are you thinkin'of, to throw your
bonnet down there? Take it upstairs, there's a good gell, an' let your
hair be brushed, an' put your other pinafore on, an' change your
shoes, do, for shame; an' come an' go on with your patchwork, like a
little lady.&quot;&quot;Oh, mother,&quot; said Maggie, in a vehemently cross tone, &quot;I don'twantto do my patchwork.&quot;&quot;What! not your pretty patchwork, to make a counterpane for your aunt
Glegg?&quot;&quot;It's foolish work,&quot; said Maggie, with a toss of her mane, - &quot;tearing
things to pieces to sew 'em together again. And I don't want to do
anything for my aunt Glegg. I don't like her.&quot;Exit Maggie, dragging her bonnet by the string, while Mr. Tulliver
laughs audibly.&quot;I wonder at you, as you'll laugh at her, Mr. Tulliver,&quot; said the
mother, with feeble fretfulness in her tone. &quot;You encourage her i'
naughtiness. An' her aunts will have it as it's me spoils her.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver was what is called a good-tempered person, - never cried,
when she was a baby, on any slighter ground than hunger and pins; and
from the cradle upward had been healthy, fair, plump, and dull-witted;
in short, the flower of her family for beauty and amiability. But milk
and mildness are not the best things for keeping, and when they turn
only a little sour, they may disagree with young stomachs seriously. I
have often wondered whether those early Madonnas of Raphael, with the
blond faces and somewhat stupid expression, kept their placidity
undisturbed when their strong-limbed, strong-willed boys got a little
too old to do without clothing. I think they must have been given to
feeble remonstrance, getting more and more peevish as it became more
and more ineffectual.>


The Dodsons were certainly a handsome family, and Mrs. Glegg was not
the least handsome of the sisters. As she sat in Mrs. Tulliver's
arm-chair, no impartial observer could have denied that for a woman of
fifty she had a very comely face and figure, though Tom and Maggie
considered their aunt Glegg as the type of ugliness. It is true she
despised the advantages of costume, for though, as she often observed,
no woman had better clothes, it was not her way to wear her new things
out before her old ones. Other women, if they liked, might have their
best thread-lace in every wash; but when Mrs. Glegg died, it would be
found that she had better lace laid by in the right-hand drawer of her
wardrobe in the Spotted Chamber than ever Mrs. Wooll of St. Ogg's had
bought in her life, although Mrs. Wooll wore her lace before it was
paid for. So of her curled fronts: Mrs. Glegg had doubtless the
glossiest and crispest brown curls in her drawers, as well as curls in
various degrees of fuzzy laxness; but to look out on the week-day
world from under a crisp and glossy front would be to introduce a most
dreamlike and unpleasant confusion between the sacred and the secular.
Occasionally, indeed, Mrs. Glegg wore one of her third-best fronts on
a week-day visit, but not at a sister's house; especially not at Mrs.
Tulliver's, who, since her marriage, had hurt her sister's feelings
greatly by wearing her own hair, though, as Mrs. Glegg observed to
Mrs. Deane, a mother of a family, like Bessy, with a husband always
going to law, might have been expected to know better. But Bessy was
always weak!So if Mrs. Glegg's front to-day was more fuzzy and lax than usual, she
had a design under it: she intended the most pointed and cutting
allusion to Mrs. Tulliver's bunches of blond curls, separated from
each other by a due wave of smoothness on each side of the parting.
Mrs. Tulliver had shed tears several times at sister Glegg's
unkindness on the subject of these unmatronly curls, but the
consciousness of looking the handsomer for them naturally administered
support. Mrs. Glegg chose to wear her bonnet in the house
to-day, - united and tilted slightly, of course - a frequent practice of
hers when she was on a visit, and happened to be in a severe humor:
she didn't know what draughts there might be in strange houses. For
the same reason she wore a small sable tippet, which reached just to
her shoulders, and was very far from meeting across her well-formed
chest, while her long neck was protected by achevaux-de-friseof
miscellaneous frilling. One would need to be learned in the fashions
of those times to know how far in the rear of them Mrs. Glegg's
slate-colored silk gown must have been; but from certain
constellations of small yellow spots upon it, and a mouldy odor about
it suggestive of a damp clothes-chest, it was probable that it
belonged to a stratum of garments just old enough to have come
recently into wear.Mrs. Glegg held her large gold watch in her hand with the many-doubled
chain round her fingers, and observed to Mrs. Tulliver, who had just
returned from a visit to the kitchen, that whatever it might be by
other people's clocks and watches, it was gone half-past twelve by
hers.&quot;I don't know what ails sister Pullet,&quot; she continued. &quot;It used to be
the way in our family for one to be as early as another, - I'm sure it
was so in my poor father's time, - and not for one sister to sit half
an hour before the others came. But if the ways o' the family are
altered, it sha'n't bemyfault;I'llnever be the one to come
into a house when all the rest are going away. I wonderatsister
Deane, - she used to be more like me. But if you'll take my advice,
Bessy, you'll put the dinner forrard a bit, sooner than put it back,
because folks are late as ought to ha' known better.&quot;&quot;Oh dear, there's no fear but what they'll be all here in time,
sister,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, in her mild-peevish tone. &quot;The dinner
won't be ready till half-past one. But if it's long for you to wait,
let me fetch you a cheesecake and a glass o' wine.&quot;&quot;Well, Bessy!&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, with a bitter smile and a scarcely
perceptible toss of her head, &quot;I should ha' thought you'd known your
own sister better. I neverdideat between meals, and I'm not going
to begin. Not but what I hate that nonsense of having your dinner at
half-past one, when you might have it at one. You was never brought up
in that way, Bessy.&quot;&quot;Why, Jane, what can I do? Mr. Tulliver doesn't like his dinner before
two o'clock, but I put it half an hour earlier because o' you.&quot;&quot;Yes, yes, I know how it is with husbands, - they're for putting
everything off; they'll put the dinner off till after tea, if they've
got wives as are weak enough to give in to such work; but it's a pity
for you, Bessy, as you haven't got more strength o' mind. It'll be
well if your children don't suffer for it. And I hope you've not gone
and got a great dinner for us, - going to expense for your sisters, as
'ud sooner eat a crust o' dry bread nor help to ruin you with
extravagance. I wonder you don't take pattern by your sister Deane;
she's far more sensible. And here you've got two children to provide
for, and your husband's spent your fortin i' going to law, and's
likely to spend his own too. A boiled joint, as you could make broth
of for the kitchen,&quot; Mrs. Glegg added, in a tone of emphatic protest,
&quot;and a plain pudding, with a spoonful o' sugar, and no spice, 'ud be
far more becoming.&quot;With sister Glegg in this humor, there was a cheerful prospect for the
day. Mrs. Tulliver never went the length of quarrelling with her, any
more than a water-fowl that puts out its leg in a deprecating manner
can be said to quarrel with a boy who throws stones. But this point of
the dinner was a tender one, and not at all new, so that Mrs. Tulliver
could make the same answer she had often made before.&quot;Mr. Tulliver says he alwayswillhave a good dinner for his friends
while he can pay for it,&quot; she said; &quot;and he's a right to do as he
likes in his own house, sister.&quot;&quot;Well, Bessy,Ican't leave your children enough out o' my savings
to keep 'em from ruin. And you mustn't look to having any o' Mr.
Glegg's money, for it's well if I don't go first, - he comes of a
long-lived family; and if he was to die and leave me well for my life,
he'd tie all the money up to go back to his own kin.&quot;The sound of wheels while Mrs. Glegg was speaking was an interruption
highly welcome to Mrs. Tulliver, who hastened out to receive sister
Pullet; it must be sister Pullet, because the sound was that of a
four-wheel.Mrs. Glegg tossed her head and looked rather sour about the mouth at
the thought of the &quot;four-wheel.&quot; She had a strong opinion on that
subject.Sister Pullet was in tears when the one-horse chaise stopped before
Mrs. Tulliver's door, and it was apparently requisite that she should
shed a few more before getting out; for though her husband and Mrs.
Tulliver stood ready to support her, she sat still and shook her head
sadly, as she looked through her tears at the vague distance.&quot;Why, whativer is the matter, sister?&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver. She was not
an imaginative woman, but it occurred to her that the large
toilet-glass in sister Pullet's best bedroom was possibly broken for
the second time.There was no reply but a further shake of the head, as Mrs. Pullet
slowly rose and got down from the chaise, not without casting a glance
at Mr. Pullet to see that he was guarding her handsome silk dress from
injury. Mr. Pullet was a small man, with a high nose, small twinkling
eyes, and thin lips, in a fresh-looking suit of black and a white
cravat, that seemed to have been tied very tight on some higher
principle than that of mere personal ease. He bore about the same
relation to his tall, good-looking wife, with her balloon sleeves,
abundant mantle, and a large befeathered and beribboned bonnet, as a
small fishing-smack bears to a brig with all its sails spread.It is a pathetic sight and a striking example of the complexity
introduced into the emotions by a high state of civilization, the
sight of a fashionably dressed female in grief. From the sorrow of a
Hottentot to that of a woman in large buckram sleeves, with several
bracelets on each arm, an architectural bonnet, and delicate ribbon
strings, what a long series of gradations! In the enlightened child of
civilization the abandonment characteristic of grief is checked and
varied in the subtlest manner, so as to present an interesting problem
to the analytic mind. If, with a crushed heart and eyes half blinded
by the mist of tears, she were to walk with a too-devious step through
a door-place, she might crush her buckram sleeves too, and the deep
consciousness of this possibility produces a composition of forces by
which she takes a line that just clears the door-post. Perceiving that
the tears are hurrying fast, she unpins her strings and throws them
languidly backward, a touching gesture, indicative, even in the
deepest gloom, of the hope in future dry moments when cap-strings will
once more have a charm. As the tears subside a little, and with her
head leaning backward at the angle that will not injure her bonnet,
she endures that terrible moment when grief, which has made all things
else a weariness, has itself become weary; she looks down pensively at
her bracelets, and adjusts their clasps with that pretty studied
fortuity which would be gratifying to her mind if it were once more in
a calm and healthy state.Mrs. Pullet brushed each door-post with great nicety, about the
latitude of her shoulders (at that period a woman was truly ridiculous
to an instructed eye if she did not measure a yard and a half across
the shoulders), and having done that sent the muscles of her face in
quest of fresh tears as she advanced into the parlor where Mrs. Glegg
was seated.&quot;Well, sister, you're late; what's the matter?&quot; said Mrs. Glegg,
rather sharply, as they shook hands.Mrs. Pullet sat down, lifting up her mantle carefully behind, before
she answered, -&quot;She's gone,&quot; unconsciously using an impressive figure of rhetoric.&quot;It isn't the glass this time, then,&quot; thought Mrs. Tulliver.&quot;Died the day before yesterday,&quot; continued Mrs. Pullet; &quot;an' her legs
was as thick as my body,&quot;' she added, with deep sadness, after a
pause. &quot;They'd tapped her no end o' times, and the water - they say you
might ha' swum in it, if you'd liked.&quot;&quot;Well, Sophy, it's a mercy she's gone, then, whoever she may be,&quot; said
Mrs. Glegg, with the promptitude and emphasis of a mind naturally
clear and decided; &quot;but I can't think who you're talking of, for my
part.&quot;&quot;ButIknow,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, sighing and shaking her head; &quot;and
there isn't another such a dropsy in the parish.Iknow as it's old
Mrs. Sutton o' the Twentylands.&quot;&quot;Well, she's no kin o' yours, nor much acquaintance as I've ever
heared of,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, who always cried just as much as was
proper when anything happened to her own &quot;kin,&quot; but not on other
occasions.&quot;She's so much acquaintance as I've seen her legs when they was like
bladders. And an old lady as had doubled her money over and over
again, and kept it all in her own management to the last, and had her
pocket with her keys in under her pillow constant. There isn't many
old _par_ish'ners like her, I doubt.&quot;&quot;And they say she'd took as much physic as 'ud fill a wagon,&quot; observed
Mr. Pullet.&quot;Ah!&quot; sighed Mrs. Pullet, &quot;she'd another complaint ever so many years
before she had the dropsy, and the doctors couldn't make out what it
was. And she said to me, when I went to see her last Christmas, she
said, 'Mrs. Pullet, if ever you have the dropsy, you'll think o' me.'
Shedidsay so,&quot; added Mrs. Pullet, beginning to cry bitterly again;
&quot;those were her very words. And she's to be buried o' Saturday, and
Pullet's bid to the funeral.&quot;&quot;Sophy,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, unable any longer to contain her spirit of
rational remonstrance, - &quot;Sophy, I wonderatyou, fretting and
injuring your health about people as don't belong to you. Your poor
father never did so, nor your aunt Frances neither, nor any o' the
family as I ever heard of. You couldn't fret no more than this, if
we'd heared as our cousin Abbott had died sudden without making his
will.&quot;Mrs. Pullet was silent, having to finish her crying, and rather
flattered than indignant at being upbraided for crying too much. It
was not everybody who could afford to cry so much about their
neighbors who had left them nothing; but Mrs. Pullet had married a
gentleman farmer, and had leisure and money to carry her crying and
everything else to the highest pitch of respectability.&quot;Mrs. Sutton didn't die without making her will, though,&quot; said Mr.
Pullet, with a confused sense that he was saying something to sanction
his wife's tears; &quot;ours is a rich parish, but they say there's nobody
else to leave as many thousands behind 'em as Mrs. Sutton. And she's
left no leggicies to speak on, - left it all in a lump to her husband's
nevvy.&quot;&quot;There wasn't much good i' being so rich, then,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, &quot;if
she'd got none but husband's kin to leave it to. It's poor work when
that's all you've got to pinch yourself for. Not as I'm one o' those
as 'ud like to die without leaving more money out at interest than
other folks had reckoned; but it's a poor tale when it must go out o'
your own family.&quot;&quot;I'm sure, sister,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, who had recovered sufficiently
to take off her veil and fold it carefully, &quot;it's a nice sort o' man
as Mrs. Sutton has left her money to, for he's troubled with the
asthmy, and goes to bed every night at eight o'clock. He told me about
it himself - as free as could be - one Sunday when he came to our
church. He wears a hareskin on his chest, and has a trembling in his
talk, - quite a gentleman sort o' man. I told him there wasn't many
months in the year as I wasn't under the doctor's hands. And he said,
'Mrs. Pullet, I can feel for you.' That was what he said, - the very
words. Ah!&quot; sighed Mrs. Pullet, shaking her head at the idea that
there were but few who could enter fully into her experiences in pink
mixture and white mixture, strong stuff in small bottles, and weak
stuff in large bottles, damp boluses at a shilling, and draughts at
eighteenpence. &quot;Sister, I may as well go and take my bonnet off now.
Did you see as the cap-box was put out?&quot; she added, turning to her
husband.Mr. Pullet, by an unaccountable lapse of memory, had forgotten it, and
hastened out, with a stricken conscience, to remedy the omission.&quot;They'll bring it upstairs, sister,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, wishing to go
at once, lest Mrs. Glegg should begin to explain her feelings about
Sophy's being the first Dodson who ever ruined her constitution with
doctor's stuff.Mrs. Tulliver was fond of going upstairs with her sister Pullet, and
looking thoroughly at her cap before she put it on her head, and
discussing millinery in general. This was part of Bessy's weakness
that stirred Mrs. Glegg's sisterly compassion: Bessy went far too well
dressed, considering; and she was too proud to dress her child in the
good clothing her sister Glegg gave her from the primeval strata of
her wardrobe; it was a sin and a shame to buy anything to dress that
child, if it wasn't a pair of shoes. In this particular, however, Mrs.
Glegg did her sister Bessy some injustice, for Mrs. Tulliver had
really made great efforts to induce Maggie to wear a leghorn bonnet
and a dyed silk frock made out of her aunt Glegg's, but the results
had been such that Mrs. Tulliver was obliged to bury them in her
maternal bosom; for Maggie, declaring that the frock smelt of nasty
dye, had taken an opportunity of basting it together with the roast
beef the first Sunday she wore it, and finding this scheme answer, she
had subsequently pumped on the bonnet with its green ribbons, so as to
give it a general resemblance to a sage cheese garnished with withered
lettuces. I must urge in excuse for Maggie, that Tom had laughed at
her in the bonnet, and said she looked like an old Judy. Aunt Pullet,
too, made presents of clothes, but these were always pretty enough to
please Maggie as well as her mother. Of all her sisters, Mrs. Tulliver
certainly preferred her sister Pullet, not without a return of
preference; but Mrs. Pullet was sorry Bessy had those naughty, awkward
children; she would do the best she could by them, but it was a pity
they weren't as good and as pretty as sister Deane's child. Maggie and
Tom, on their part, thought their aunt Pullet tolerable, chiefly
because she was not their aunt Glegg. Tom always declined to go more
than once during his holidays to see either of them. Both his uncles
tipped him that once, of course; but at his aunt Pullet's there were a
great many toads to pelt in the cellar-area, so that he preferred the
visit to her. Maggie shuddered at the toads, and dreamed of them
horribly, but she liked her uncle Pullet's musical snuff-box. Still,
it was agreed by the sisters, in Mrs. Tulliver's absence, that the
Tulliver blood did not mix well with the Dodson blood; that, in fact,
poor Bessy's children were Tullivers, and that Tom, notwithstanding he
had the Dodson complexion, was likely to be as &quot;contrairy&quot; as his
father. As for Maggie, she was the picture of her aunt Moss, Mr.
Tulliver's sister, - a large-boned woman, who had married as poorly as
could be; had no china, and had a husband who had much ado to pay his
rent. But when Mrs. Pullet was alone with Mrs. Tulliver upstairs, the
remarks were naturally to the disadvantage of Mrs. Glegg, and they
agreed, in confidence, that there was no knowing what sort of fright
sister Jane would come out next. But theirt&Atilde;&ordf;te-&Atilde;&nbsp;-t&Atilde;&ordf;tewas curtailed
by the appearance of Mrs. Deane with little Lucy; and Mrs. Tulliver
had to look on with a silent pang while Lucy's blond curls were
adjusted. It was quite unaccountable that Mrs. Deane, the thinnest and
sallowest of all the Miss Dodsons, should have had this child, who
might have been taken for Mrs. Tulliver's any day. And Maggie always
looked twice as dark as usual when she was by the side of Lucy.She did to-day, when she and Tom came in from the garden with their
father and their uncle Glegg. Maggie had thrown her bonnet off very
carelessly, and coming in with her hair rough as well as out of curl,
rushed at once to Lucy, who was standing by her mother's knee.
Certainly the contrast between the cousins was conspicuous, and to
superficial eyes was very much to the disadvantage of Maggie though a
connoisseur might have seen &quot;points&quot; in her which had a higher promise
for maturity than Lucy's natty completeness. It was like the contrast
between a rough, dark, overgrown puppy and a white kitten. Lucy put up
the neatest little rosebud mouth to be kissed; everything about her
was neat, - her little round neck, with the row of coral beads; her
little straight nose, not at all snubby; her little clear eyebrows,
rather darker than her curls, to match hazel eyes, which looked up
with shy pleasure at Maggie, taller by the head, though scarcely a
year older. Maggie always looked at Lucy with delight.She was fond of fancying a world where the people never got any larger
than children of their own age, and she made the queen of it just like
Lucy, with a little crown on her head, and a little sceptre in her
hand - only the queen was Maggie herself in Lucy's form.&quot;Oh, Lucy,&quot; she burst out, after kissing her, &quot;you'll stay with Tom
and me, won't you? Oh, kiss her, Tom.&quot;Tom, too, had come up to Lucy, but he was not going to kiss her - no;
he came up to her with Maggie, because it seemed easier, on the whole,
than saying, &quot;How do you do?&quot; to all those aunts and uncles. He stood
looking at nothing in particular, with the blushing, awkward air and
semi-smile which are common to shy boys when in company, - very much as
if they had come into the world by mistake, and found it in a degree
of undress that was quite embarrassing.&quot;Heyday!&quot; said aunt Glegg, with loud emphasis. &quot;Do little boys and
gells come into a room without taking notice of their uncles and
aunts? That wasn't the way whenIwas a little gell.&quot;&quot;Go and speak to your aunts and uncles, my dears,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver,
looking anxious and melancholy. She wanted to whisper to Maggie a
command to go and have her hair brushed.&quot;Well, and how do you do? And I hope you're good children, are you?&quot;
said Aunt Glegg, in the same loud, emphatic way, as she took their
hands, hurting them with her large rings, and kissing their cheeks
much against their desire. &quot;Look up, Tom, look up. Boys as go to
boarding-schools should hold their heads up. Look at me now.&quot; Tom
declined that pleasure apparently, for he tried to draw his hand away.
&quot;Put your hair behind your ears, Maggie, and keep your frock on your
shoulder.&quot;Aunt Glegg always spoke to them in this loud, emphatic way, as if she
considered them deaf, or perhaps rather idiotic; it was a means, she
thought, of making them feel that they were accountable creatures, and
might be a salutary check on naughty tendencies. Bessy's children were
so spoiled - they'd need have somebody to make them feel their duty.&quot;Well, my dears,&quot; said aunt Pullet, in a compassionate voice, &quot;you
grow wonderful fast. I doubt they'll outgrow their strength,&quot; she
added, looking over their heads, with a melancholy expression, at
their mother. &quot;I think the gell has too much hair. I'd have it thinned
and cut shorter, sister, if I was you; it isn't good for her health.
It's that as makes her skin so brown, I shouldn't wonder. Don't you
think so, sister Deane?&quot;&quot;I can't say, I'm sure, sister,&quot; said Mrs. Deane, shutting her lips
close again, and looking at Maggie with a critical eye.&quot;No, no,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, &quot;the child's healthy enough; there's
nothing ails her. There's red wheat as well as white, for that matter,
and some like the dark grain best. But it 'ud be as well if Bessy 'ud
have the child's hair cut, so as it 'ud lie smooth.&quot;A dreadful resolve was gathering in Maggie's breast, but it was
arrested by the desire to know from her aunt Deane whether she would
leave Lucy behind. Aunt Deane would hardly ever let Lucy come to see
them. After various reasons for refusal, Mrs. Deane appealed to Lucy
herself.&quot;You wouldn't like to stay behind without mother, should you, Lucy?&quot;&quot;Yes, please, mother,&quot; said Lucy, timidly, blushing very pink all over
her little neck.&quot;Well done, Lucy! Let her stay, Mrs. Deane, let her stay,&quot; said Mr.
Deane, a large but alert-looking man, with a type ofphysiqueto be
seen in all ranks of English society, - bald crown, red whiskers, full
forehead, and general solidity without heaviness. You may see noblemen
like Mr. Deane, and you may see grocers or day-laborers like him; but
the keenness of his brown eyes was less common than his contour.He held a silver snuff-box very tightly in his hand, and now and then
exchanged a pinch with Mr. Tulliver, whose box was only
silver-mounted, so that it was naturally a joke between them that Mr.
Tulliver wanted to exchange snuff-boxes also. Mr. Deane's box had been
given him by the superior partners in the firm to which he belonged,
at the same time that they gave him a share in the business, in
acknowledgment of his valuable services as manager. No man was thought
more highly of in St. Ogg's than Mr. Deane; and some persons were even
of opinion that Miss Susan Dodson, who was once held to have made the
worst match of all the Dodson sisters, might one day ride in a better
carriage, and live in a better house, even than her sister Pullet.
There was no knowing where a man would stop, who had got his foot into
a great mill-owning, shipowning business like that of Guest &amp; Co.,
with a banking concern attached. And Mrs. Deane, as her intimate
female friends observed, was proud and &quot;having&quot; enough;shewouldn't
let her husband stand still in the world for want of spurring.&quot;Maggie,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, beckoning Maggie to her, and whispering
in her ear, as soon as this point of Lucy's staying was settled, &quot;go
and get your hair brushed, do, for shame. I told you not to come in
without going to Martha first, you know I did.&quot;&quot;Tom come out with me,&quot; whispered Maggie, pulling his sleeve as she
passed him; and Tom followed willingly enough.&quot;Come upstairs with me, Tom,&quot; she whispered, when they were outside
the door. &quot;There's something I want to do before dinner.&quot;&quot;There's no time to play at anything before dinner,&quot; said Tom, whose
imagination was impatient of any intermediate prospect.&quot;Oh yes, there is time for this;docome, Tom.&quot;Tom followed Maggie upstairs into her mother's room, and saw her go at
once to a drawer, from which she took out a large pair of scissors.&quot;What are they for, Maggie?&quot; said Tom, feeling his curiosity awakened.Maggie answered by seizing her front locks and cutting them straight
across the middle of her forehead.&quot;Oh, my buttons! Maggie, you'll catch it!&quot; exclaimed Tom; &quot;you'd
better not cut any more off.&quot;Snip! went the great scissors again while Tom was speaking, and he
couldn't help feeling it was rather good fun; Maggie would look so
queer.&quot;Here, Tom, cut it behind for me,&quot; said Maggie, excited by her own
daring, and anxious to finish the deed.&quot;You'll catch it, you know,&quot; said Tom, nodding his head in an
admonitory manner, and hesitating a little as he took the scissors.&quot;Never mind, make haste!&quot; said Maggie, giving a little stamp with her
foot. Her cheeks were quite flushed.The black locks were so thick, nothing could be more tempting to a lad
who had already tasted the forbidden pleasure of cutting the pony's
mane. I speak to those who know the satisfaction of making a pair of
scissors meet through a duly resisting mass of hair. One delicious
grinding snip, and then another and another, and the hinder-locks fell
heavily on the floor, and Maggie stood cropped in a jagged, uneven
manner, but with a sense of clearness and freedom, as if she had
emerged from a wood into the open plain.&quot;Oh, Maggie,&quot; said Tom, jumping round her, and slapping his knees as
he laughed, &quot;Oh, my buttons! what a queer thing you look! Look at
yourself in the glass; you look like the idiot we throw out nutshells
to at school.&quot;Maggie felt an unexpected pang. She had thought beforehand chiefly at
her own deliverance from her teasing hair and teasing remarks about
it, and something also of the triumph she should have over her mother
and her aunts by this very decided course of action; she didn't want
her hair to look pretty, - that was out of the question, - she only
wanted people to think her a clever little girl, and not to find fault
with her. But now, when Tom began to laugh at her, and say she was
like an idiot, the affair had quite a new aspect. She looked in the
glass, and still Tom laughed and clapped his hands, and Maggie's
cheeks began to pale, and her lips to tremble a little.&quot;Oh, Maggie, you'll have to go down to dinner directly,&quot; said Tom.
&quot;Oh, my!&quot;&quot;Don't laugh at me, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, in a passionate tone, with an
outburst of angry tears, stamping, and giving him a push.&quot;Now, then, spitfire!&quot; said Tom. &quot;What did you cut it off for, then? I
shall go down: I can smell the dinner going in.&quot;He hurried downstairs and left poor Maggie to that bitter sense of the
irrevocable which was almost an every-day experience of her small
soul. She could see clearly enough, now the thing was done, that it
was very foolish, and that she should have to hear and think more
about her hair than ever; for Maggie rushed to her deeds with
passionate impulse, and then saw not only their consequences, but what
would have happened if they had not been done, with all the detail and
exaggerated circumstance of an active imagination. Tom never did the
same sort of foolish things as Maggie, having a wonderful instinctive
discernment of what would turn to his advantage or disadvantage; and
so it happened, that though he was much more wilful and inflexible
than Maggie, his mother hardly ever called him naughty. But if Tom did
make a mistake of that sort, he espoused it, and stood by it: he
&quot;didn't mind.&quot; If he broke the lash of his father's gigwhip by lashing
the gate, he couldn't help it, - the whip shouldn't have got caught in
the hinge. If Tom Tulliver whipped a gate, he was convinced, not that
the whipping of gates by all boys was a justifiable act, but that he,
Tom Tulliver, was justifiable in whipping that particular gate, and he
wasn't going to be sorry. But Maggie, as she stood crying before the
glass, felt it impossible that she should go down to dinner and endure
the severe eyes and severe words of her aunts, while Tom and Lucy, and
Martha, who waited at table, and perhaps her father and her uncles,
would laugh at her; for if Tom had laughed at her, of course every one
else would; and if she had only let her hair alone, she could have sat
with Tom and Lucy, and had the apricot pudding and the custard! What
could she do but sob? She sat as helpless and despairing among her
black locks as Ajax among the slaughtered sheep. Very trivial,
perhaps, this anguish seems to weather-worn mortals who have to think
of Christmas bills, dead loves, and broken friendships; but it was not
less bitter to Maggie - perhaps it was even more bitter - than what we
are fond of calling antithetically the real troubles of mature life.
&quot;Ah, my child, you will have real troubles to fret about by and by,&quot;
is the consolation we have almost all of us had administered to us in
our childhood, and have repeated to other children since we have been
grown up. We have all of us sobbed so piteously, standing with tiny
bare legs above our little socks, when we lost sight of our mother or
nurse in some strange place; but we can no longer recall the poignancy
of that moment and weep over it, as we do over the remembered
sufferings of five or ten years ago. Every one of those keen moments
has left its trace, and lives in us still, but such traces have blent
themselves irrecoverably with the firmer texture of our youth and
manhood; and so it comes that we can look on at the troubles of our
children with a smiling disbelief in the reality of their pain. Is
there any one who can recover the experience of his childhood, not
merely with a memoryofwhat he did and what happened to him, of
what he liked and disliked when he was in frock and trousers, but with
an intimate penetration, a revived consciousness of what he felt then,
when it was so long from one Midsummer to another; what he felt when
his school fellows shut him out of their game because he would pitch
the ball wrong out of mere wilfulness; or on a rainy day in the
holidays, when he didn't know how to amuse himself, and fell from
idleness into mischief, from mischief into defiance, and from defiance
into sulkiness; or when his mother absolutely refused to let him have
a tailed coat that &quot;half,&quot; although every other boy of his age had
gone into tails already? Surely if we could recall that early
bitterness, and the dim guesses, the strangely perspectiveless
conception of life, that gave the bitterness its intensity, we should
not pooh-pooh the griefs of our children.&quot;Miss Maggie, you're to come down this minute,&quot; said Kezia, entering
the room hurriedly. &quot;Lawks! what have you been a-doing? I neverseesuch a fright!&quot;&quot;Don't, Kezia,&quot; said Maggie, angrily. &quot;Go away!&quot;&quot;But I tell you you're to come down, Miss, this minute; your mother
says so,&quot; said Kezia, going up to Maggie and taking her by the hand to
raise her from the floor.&quot;Get away, Kezia; I don't want any dinner,&quot; said Maggie, resisting
Kezia's arm. &quot;I sha'n't come.&quot;&quot;Oh, well, I can't stay. I've got to wait at dinner,&quot; said Kezia,
going out again.&quot;Maggie, you little silly,&quot; said Tom, peeping into the room ten
minutes after, &quot;why don't you come and have your dinner? There's lots
o' goodies, and mother says you're to come. What are you crying for,
you little spooney?&quot;Oh, it was dreadful! Tom was so hard and unconcerned; ifhehad been
crying on the floor, Maggie would have cried too. And there was the
dinner, so nice; and she wassohungry. It was very bitter.But Tom was not altogether hard. He was not inclined to cry, and did
not feel that Maggie's grief spoiled his prospect of the sweets; but
he went and put his head near her, and said in a lower, comforting
tone, -&quot;Won't you come, then, Magsie? Shall I bring you a bit o' pudding when
I've had mine, and a custard and things?&quot;&quot;Ye-e-es,&quot; said Maggie, beginning to feel life a little more
tolerable.&quot;Very well,&quot; said Tom, going away. But he turned again at the door and
said, &quot;But you'd better come, you know. There's the dessert, - nuts,
you know, and cowslip wine.&quot;Maggie's tears had ceased, and she looked reflective as Tom left her.
His good nature had taken off the keenest edge of her suffering, and
nuts with cowslip wine began to assert their legitimate influence.Slowly she rose from amongst her scattered locks, and slowly she made
her way downstairs. Then she stood leaning with one shoulder against
the frame of the dining-parlour door, peeping in when it was ajar. She
saw Tom and Lucy with an empty chair between them, and there were the
custards on a side-table; it was too much. She slipped in and went
toward the empty chair. But she had no sooner sat down than she
repented and wished herself back again.Mrs. Tulliver gave a little scream as she saw her, and felt such a
&quot;turn&quot; that she dropped the large gravy-spoon into the dish, with the
most serious results to the table-cloth. For Kezia had not betrayed
the reason of Maggie's refusal to come down, not liking to give her
mistress a shock in the moment of carving, and Mrs. Tulliver thought
there was nothing worse in question than a fit of perverseness, which
was inflicting its own punishment by depriving Maggie of half her
dinner.Mrs. Tulliver's scream made all eyes turn towards the same point as
her own, and Maggie's cheeks and ears began to burn, while uncle
Glegg, a kind-looking, white-haired old gentleman, said, -&quot;Heyday! what little gell's this? Why, I don't know her. Is it some
little gell you've picked up in the road, Kezia?&quot;&quot;Why, she's gone and cut her hair herself,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver in an
undertone to Mr. Deane, laughing with much enjoyment. Did you ever
know such a little hussy as it is?&quot;&quot;Why, little miss, you've made yourself look very funny,&quot; said Uncle
Pullet, and perhaps he never in his life made an observation which was
felt to be so lacerating.&quot;Fie, for shame!&quot; said aunt Glegg, in her loudest, severest tone of
reproof. &quot;Little gells as cut their own hair should be whipped and fed
on bread and water, - not come and sit down with their aunts and
uncles.&quot;&quot;Ay, ay,&quot; said uncle Glegg, meaning to give a playful turn to this
denunciation, &quot;she must be sent to jail, I think, and they'll cut the
rest of her hair off there, and make it all even.&quot;&quot;She's more like a gypsy nor ever,&quot; said aunt Pullet, in a pitying
tone; &quot;it's very bad luck, sister, as the gell should be so brown; the
boy's fair enough. I doubt it'll stand in her way i' life to be so
brown.&quot;&quot;She's a naughty child, as'll break her mother's heart,&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver, with the tears in her eyes.Maggie seemed to be listening to a chorus of reproach and derision.
Her first flush came from anger, which gave her a transient power of
defiance, and Tom thought she was braving it out, supported by the
recent appearance of the pudding and custard. Under this impression,
he whispered, &quot;Oh, my! Maggie, I told you you'd catch it.&quot; He meant to
be friendly, but Maggie felt convinced that Tom was rejoicing in her
ignominy. Her feeble power of defiance left her in an instant, her
heart swelled, and getting up from her chair, she ran to her father,
hid her face on his shoulder, and burst out into loud sobbing.&quot;Come, come, my wench,&quot; said her father, soothingly, putting his arm
round her, &quot;never mind; you was i' the right to cut it off if it
plagued you; give over crying; father'll take your part.&quot;Delicious words of tenderness! Maggie never forgot any of these
moments when her father &quot;took her part&quot;; she kept them in her heart,
and thought of them long years after, when every one else said that
her father had done very ill by his children.&quot;How your husband does spoil that child, Bessy!&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, in a
loud &quot;aside,&quot; to Mrs. Tulliver. &quot;It'll be the ruin of her, if you
don't take care.Myfather never brought his children up so, else we
should ha' been a different sort o' family to what we are.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver's domestic sorrows seemed at this moment to have reached
the point at which insensibility begins. She took no notice of her
sister's remark, but threw back her capstrings and dispensed the
pudding, in mute resignation.With the dessert there came entire deliverance for Maggie, for the
children were told they might have their nuts and wine in the
summer-house, since the day was so mild; and they scampered out among
the budding bushes of the garden with the alacrity of small animals
getting from under a burning glass.Mrs. Tulliver had her special reason for this permission: now the
dinner was despatched, and every one's mind disengaged, it was the
right moment to communicate Mr. Tulliver's intention concerning Tom,
and it would be as well for Tom himself to be absent. The children
were used to hear themselves talked of as freely as if they were
birds, and could understand nothing, however they might stretch their
necks and listen; but on this occasion Mrs. Tulliver manifested an
unusual discretion, because she had recently had evidence that the
going to school to a clergyman was a sore point with Tom, who looked
at it as very much on a par with going to school to a constable. Mrs.
Tulliver had a sighing sense that her husband would do as he liked,
whatever sister Glegg said, or sister Pullet either; but at least they
would not be able to say, if the thing turned out ill, that Bessy had
fallen in with her husband's folly without letting her own friends
know a word about it.&quot;Mr. Tulliver,&quot; she said, interrupting her husband in his talk with
Mr. Deane, &quot;it's time now to tell the children's aunts and uncles what
you're thinking of doing with Tom, isn't it?&quot;&quot;Very well,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, rather sharply, &quot;I've no objections to
tell anybody what I mean to do with him. I've settled,&quot; he added,
looking toward Mr. Glegg and Mr. Deane, - &quot;I've settled to send him to
a Mr. Stelling, a parson, down at King's Lorton, there, - an uncommon
clever fellow, I understand, as'll put him up to most things.&quot;There was a rustling demonstration of surprise in the company, such as
you may have observed in a country congregation when they hear an
allusion to their week-day affairs from the pulpit. It was equally
astonishing to the aunts and uncles to find a parson introduced into
Mr. Tulliver's family arrangements. As for uncle Pullet, he could
hardly have been more thoroughly obfuscated if Mr. Tulliver had said
that he was going to send Tom to the Lord Chancellor; for uncle Pullet
belonged to that extinct class of British yeoman who, dressed in good
broadcloth, paid high rates and taxes, went to church, and ate a
particularly good dinner on Sunday, without dreaming that the British
constitution in Church and State had a traceable origin any more than
the solar system and the fixed stars.It is melancholy, but true, that Mr. Pullet had the most confused idea
of a bishop as a sort of a baronet, who might or might not be a
clergyman; and as the rector of his own parish was a man of high
family and fortune, the idea that a clergyman could be a schoolmaster
was too remote from Mr. Pullet's experience to be readily conceivable.
I know it is difficult for people in these instructed times to believe
in uncle Pullet's ignorance; but let them reflect on the remarkable
results of a great natural faculty under favoring circumstances. And
uncle Pullet had a great natural faculty for ignorance. He was the
first to give utterance to his astonishment.&quot;Why, what can you be going to send him to a parson for?&quot; he said,
with an amazed twinkling in his eyes, looking at Mr. Glegg and Mr.
Deane, to see if they showed any signs of comprehension.&quot;Why, because the parsons are the best schoolmasters, by what I can
make out,&quot; said poor Mr. Tulliver, who, in the maze of this puzzling
world, laid hold of any clue with great readiness and tenacity.
&quot;Jacobs at th' academy's no parson, and he's done very bad by the boy;
and I made up my mind, if I send him to school again, it should be to
somebody different to Jacobs. And this Mr. Stelling, by what I can
make out, is the sort o' man I want. And I mean my boy to go to him at
Midsummer,&quot; he concluded, in a tone of decision, tapping his snuff-box
and taking a pinch.&quot;You'll have to pay a swinging half-yearly bill, then, eh, Tulliver?
The clergymen have highish notions, in general,&quot; said Mr. Deane,
taking snuff vigorously, as he always did when wishing to maintain a
neutral position.&quot;What! do you think the parson'll teach him to know a good sample o'
wheat when he sees it, neighbor Tulliver?&quot; said Mr. Glegg, who was
fond of his jest, and having retired from business, felt that it was
not only allowable but becoming in him to take a playful view of
things.&quot;Why, you see, I've got a plan i' my head about Tom,&quot; said Mr.
Tulliver, pausing after that statement and lifting up his glass.&quot;Well, if I may be allowed to speak, and it's seldom as I am,&quot; said
Mrs. Glegg, with a tone of bitter meaning, &quot;I should like to know what
good is to come to the boy by bringin' him up above his fortin.&quot;&quot;Why,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, not looking at Mrs. Glegg, but at the male
part of his audience, &quot;you see, I've made up my mind not to bring Tom
up to my own business. I've had my thoughts about it all along, and I
made up my mind by what I saw with Garnett andhisson. I mean to
put him to some business as he can go into without capital, and I want
to give him an eddication as he'll be even wi' the lawyers and folks,
and put me up to a notion now an' then.&quot;Mrs. Glegg emitted a long sort of guttural sound with closed lips,
that smiled in mingled pity and scorn.&quot;It 'ud be a fine deal better for some people,&quot; she said, after that
introductory note, &quot;if they'd let the lawyers alone.&quot;&quot;Is he at the head of a grammar school, then, this clergyman, such as
that at Market Bewley?&quot; said Mr. Deane.&quot;No, nothing of that,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;He won't take more than two
or three pupils, and so he'll have the more time to attend to 'em, you
know.&quot;&quot;Ah, and get his eddication done the sooner; they can't learn much at
a time when there's so many of 'em,&quot; said uncle Pullet, feeling that
he was getting quite an insight into this difficult matter.&quot;But he'll want the more pay, I doubt,&quot; said Mr. Glegg.&quot;Ay, ay, a cool hundred a year, that's all,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, with
some pride at his own spirited course. &quot;But then, you know, it's an
investment; Tom's eddication 'ull be so much capital to him.&quot;&quot;Ay, there's something in that,&quot; said Mr. Glegg. &quot;Well well, neighbor
Tulliver, you may be right, you may be right:&quot;I remember seeing those two lines wrote on a window at Buxton. But us
that have got no learning had better keep our money, eh, neighbor
Pullet?&quot; Mr. Glegg rubbed his knees, and looked very pleasant.&quot;Mr. Glegg, I wonderatyou,&quot; said his wife. &quot;It's very unbecoming
in a man o' your age and belongings.&quot;&quot;What's unbecoming, Mrs. G.?&quot; said Mr. Glegg, winking pleasantly at
the company. &quot;My new blue coat as I've got on?&quot;&quot;I pity your weakness, Mr. Glegg. I say it's unbecoming to be making a
joke when you see your own kin going headlongs to ruin.&quot;&quot;If you mean me by that,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, considerably nettled,
&quot;you needn't trouble yourself to fret about me. I can manage my own
affairs without troubling other folks.&quot;&quot;Bless me!&quot; said Mr. Deane, judiciously introducing a new idea, &quot;why,
now I come to think of it, somebody said Wakem was going to sendhisson - the deformed lad - to a clergyman, didn't they, Susan?&quot; (appealing
to his wife).&quot;I can give no account of it, I'm sure,&quot; said Mrs. Deane, closing her
lips very tightly again. Mrs. Deane was not a woman to take part in a
scene where missiles were flying.&quot;Well,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, speaking all the more cheerfully, that Mrs.
Glegg might see he didn't mind her, &quot;if Wakem thinks o' sending his
son to a clergyman, depend on it I shall make no mistake i' sending
Tom to one. Wakem's as big a scoundrel as Old Harry ever made, but he
knows the length of every man's foot he's got to deal with. Ay, ay,
tell me who's Wakem's butcher, and I'll tell you where to get your
meat.&quot;&quot;But lawyer Wakem's son's got a hump-back,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, who felt
as if the whole business had a funereal aspect; &quot;it's more nat'ral to
sendhimto a clergyman.&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, interpreting Mrs. Pullet's observation with
erroneous plausibility, &quot;you must consider that, neighbor Tulliver;
Wakem's son isn't likely to follow any business. Wakem 'ull make a
gentleman of him, poor fellow.&quot;&quot;Mr. Glegg,&quot; said Mrs. G., in a tone which implied that her
indignation would fizz and ooze a little, though she was determined to
keep it corked up, &quot;you'd far better hold your tongue. Mr. Tulliver
doesn't want to know your opinion nor mine either. There's folks in
the world as know better than everybody else.&quot;&quot;Why, I should think that's you, if we're to trust your own tale,&quot;
said Mr. Tulliver, beginning to boil up again.&quot;Oh,Isay nothing,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, sarcastically. &quot;My advice has
never been asked, and I don't give it.&quot;&quot;It'll be the first time, then,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;It's the only
thing you're over-ready at giving.&quot;&quot;I've been over-ready at lending, then, if I haven't been over-ready
at giving,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg. &quot;There's folks I've lent money to, as
perhaps I shall repent o' lending money to kin.&quot;&quot;Come, come, come,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, soothingly. But Mr. Tulliver was
not to be hindered of his retort.&quot;You've got a bond for it, I reckon,&quot; he said; &quot;and you've had your
five per cent, kin or no kin.&quot;&quot;Sister,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, pleadingly, &quot;drink your wine, and let me
give you some almonds and raisins.&quot;&quot;Bessy, I'm sorry for you,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, very much with the
feeling of a cur that seizes the opportunity of diverting his bark
toward the man who carries no stick. &quot;It's poor work talking o'
almonds and raisins.&quot;&quot;Lors, sister Glegg, don't be so quarrelsome,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet,
beginning to cry a little. &quot;You may be struck with a fit, getting so
red in the face after dinner, and we are but just out o' mourning, all
of us, - and all wi' gowns craped alike and just put by; it's very bad
among sisters.&quot;&quot;I should think itisbad,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg. &quot;Things are come to a
fine pass when one sister invites the other to her house o' purpose to
quarrel with her and abuse her.&quot;&quot;Softly, softly, Jane; be reasonable, be reasonable,&quot; said Mr. Glegg.But while he was speaking, Mr. Tulliver, who had by no means said
enough to satisfy his anger, burst out again.&quot;Who wants to quarrel with you?&quot; he said. &quot;It's you as can't let
people alone, but must be gnawing at 'em forever.Ishould never
want to quarrel with any woman if she kept her place.&quot;&quot;My place, indeed!&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, getting rather more shrill.
&quot;There's your betters, Mr. Tulliver, as are dead and in their grave,
treated me with a different sort o' respect to what you do;thoughI've got a husband as'll sit by and see me abused by them as 'ud never
ha' had the chance if there hadn't been them in our family as married
worse than they might ha' done.&quot;&quot;If you talk o' that,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, &quot;my family's as good as
yours, and better, for it hasn't got a damned ill-tempered woman in
it!&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, rising from her chair, &quot;I don't know whether
you think it's a fine thing to sit by and hear me swore at, Mr. Glegg;
but I'm not going to stay a minute longer in this house. You can stay
behind, and come home with the gig, and I'll walk home.&quot;&quot;Dear heart, dear heart!&quot; said Mr. Glegg in a melancholy tone, as he
followed his wife out of the room.&quot;Mr. Tulliver, how could you talk so?&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, with the
tears in her eyes.&quot;Let her go,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, too hot to be damped by any amount of
tears. &quot;Let her go, and the sooner the better; she won't be trying to
domineer overmeagain in a hurry.&quot;&quot;Sister Pullet,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, helplessly, &quot;do you think it 'ud
be any use for you to go after her and try to pacify her?&quot;&quot;Better not, better not,&quot; said Mr. Deane. &quot;You'll make it up another
day.&quot;&quot;Then, sisters, shall we go and look at the children?&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver, drying her eyes.No proposition could have been more seasonable. Mr. Tulliver felt very
much as if the air had been cleared of obtrusive flies now the women
were out of the room. There were few things he liked better than a
chat with Mr. Deane, whose close application to business allowed the
pleasure very rarely. Mr. Deane, he considered, was the &quot;knowingest&quot;
man of his acquaintance, and he had besides a ready causticity of
tongue that made an agreeable supplement to Mr. Tulliver's own
tendency that way, which had remained in rather an inarticulate
condition. And now the women were gone, they could carry on their
serious talk without frivolous interruption. They could exchange their
views concerning the Duke of Wellington, whose conduct in the Catholic
Question had thrown such an entirely new light on his character; and
speak slightingly of his conduct at the battle of Waterloo, which he
would never have won if there hadn't been a great many Englishmen at
his back, not to speak of Blucher and the Prussians, who, as Mr.
Tulliver had heard from a person of particular knowledge in that
matter, had come up in the very nick of time; though here there was a
slight dissidence, Mr. Deane remarking that he was not disposed to
give much credit to the Prussians, - the build of their vessels,
together with the unsatisfactory character of transactions in Dantzic
beer, inclining him to form rather a low view of Prussian pluck
generally. Rather beaten on this ground, Mr. Tulliver proceeded to
express his fears that the country could never again be what it used
to be; but Mr. Deane, attached to a firm of which the returns were on
the increase, naturally took a more lively view of the present, and
had some details to give concerning the state of the imports,
especially in hides and spelter, which soothed Mr. Tulliver's
imagination by throwing into more distant perspective the period when
the country would become utterly the prey of Papists and Radicals, and
there would be no more chance for honest men.Uncle Pullet sat by and listened with twinkling eyes to these high
matters. He didn't understand politics himself, - thought they were a
natural gift, - but by what he could make out, this Duke of Wellington
was no better than he should be.>


It was Easter week, and Mrs. Tulliver's cheesecakes were more
exquisitely light than usual. &quot;A puff o' wind 'ud make 'em blow about
like feathers,&quot; Kezia the housemaid said, feeling proud to live under
a mistress who could make such pastry; so that no season or
circumstances could have been more propitious for a family party, even
if it had not been advisable to consult sister Glegg and sister Pullet
about Tom's going to school.&quot;I'd as lief not invite sister Deane this time,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver,
&quot;for she's as jealous and having as can be, and's allays trying to
make the worst o' my poor children to their aunts and uncles.&quot;&quot;Yes, yes,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, &quot;ask her to come. I never hardly get a
bit o' talk with Deane now; we haven't had him this six months. What's
it matter what she says? My children need be beholding to nobody.&quot;&quot;That's what you allays say, Mr. Tulliver; but I'm sure there's nobody
o' your side, neither aunt nor uncle, to leave 'em so much as a
five-pound note for a leggicy. And there's sister Glegg, and sister
Pullet too, saving money unknown, for they put by all their own
interest and butter-money too; their husbands buy 'em everything.&quot;
Mrs. Tulliver was a mild woman, but even a sheep will face about a
little when she has lambs.&quot;Tchuh!&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;It takes a big loaf when there's many to
breakfast. What signifies your sisters' bits o' money when they've got
half-a-dozen nevvies and nieces to divide it among? And your sister
Deane won't get 'em to leave all to one, I reckon, and make the
country cry shame on 'em when they are dead?&quot;&quot;I don't know what she won't get 'em to do,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, &quot;for
my children are so awk'ard wi' their aunts and uncles. Maggie's ten
times naughtier when they come than she is other days, and Tom doesn't
like 'em, bless him! - though it's more nat'ral in a boy than a gell.
And there's Lucy Dean's such a good child, - you may set her on a
stool, and there she'llsit for an hour together, and never offer to
get off. I can't help loving the child as if she was my own; and I'm
sure she's more likemychild than sister Deane's, for she'd allays
a very poor color for one of our family, sister Deane had.&quot;&quot;Well, well, if you're fond o' the child, ask her father and mother to
bring her with 'em. And won't you ask their aunt and uncle Moss too,
and some o'theirchildren?&quot;&quot;Oh, dear, Mr. Tulliver, why, there'd be eight people besides the
children, and I must put two more leaves i' the table, besides
reaching down more o' the dinner-service; and you know as well as I do
asmysisters andyoursister don't suit well together.&quot;&quot;Well, well, do as you like, Bessy,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, taking up his
hat and walking out to the mill. Few wives were more submissive than
Mrs. Tulliver on all points unconnected with her family relations; but
she had been a Miss Dodson, and the Dodsons were a very respectable
family indeed, - as much looked up to as any in their own parish, or
the next to it. The Miss Dodsons had always been thought to hold up
their heads very high, and no one was surprised the two eldest had
married so well, - not at an early age, for that was not the practice
of the Dodson family. There were particular ways of doing everything
in that family: particular ways of bleaching the linen, of making the
cowslip wine, curing the hams, and keeping the bottled gooseberries;
so that no daughter of that house could be indifferent to the
privilege of having been born a Dodson, rather than a Gibson or a
Watson. Funerals were always conducted with peculiar propriety in the
Dodson family: the hat-bands were never of a blue shade, the gloves
never split at the thumb, everybody was a mourner who ought to be, and
there were always scarfs for the bearers. When one of the family was
in trouble or sickness, all the rest went to visit the unfortunate
member, usually at the same time, and did not shrink from uttering the
most disagreeable truths that correct family feeling dictated; if the
illness or trouble was the sufferer's own fault, it was not in the
practice of the Dodson family to shrink from saying so. In short,
there was in this family a peculiar tradition as to what was the right
thing in household management and social demeanor, and the only bitter
circumstance attending this superiority was a painful inability to
approve the condiments or the conduct of families ungoverned by the
Dodson tradition. A female Dodson, when in &quot;strange houses,&quot; always
ate dry bread with her tea, and declined any sort of preserves, having
no confidence in the butter, and thinking that the preserves had
probably begun to ferment from want of due sugar and boiling. There
were some Dodsons less like the family than others, that was admitted;
but in so far as they were &quot;kin,&quot; they were of necessity better than
those who were &quot;no kin.&quot; And it is remarkable that while no individual
Dodson was satisfied with any other individual Dodson, each was
satisfied, not only with him or her self, but with the Dodsons
collectively. The feeblest member of a family - the one who has the
least character - is often the merest epitome of the family habits and
traditions; and Mrs. Tulliver was a thorough Dodson, though a mild
one, as small-beer, so long as it is anything, is only describable as
very weak ale: and though she had groaned a little in her youth under
the yoke of her elder sisters, and still shed occasional tears at
their sisterly reproaches, it was not in Mrs. Tulliver to be an
innovator on the family ideas. She was thankful to have been a Dodson,
and to have one child who took after her own family, at least in his
features and complexion, in liking salt and in eating beans, which a
Tulliver never did.In other respects the true Dodson was partly latent in Tom, and he was
as far from appreciating his &quot;kin&quot; on the mother's side as Maggie
herself, generally absconding for the day with a large supply of the
most portable food, when he received timely warning that his aunts and
uncles were coming, - a moral symptom from which his aunt Glegg deduced
the gloomiest views of his future. It was rather hard on Maggie that
Tom always absconded without letting her into the secret, but the
weaker sex are acknowledged to be seriousimpedimentain cases of
flight.On Wednesday, the day before the aunts and uncles were coming, there
were such various and suggestive scents, as of plumcakes in the oven
and jellies in the hot state, mingled with the aroma of gravy, that it
was impossible to feel altogether gloomy: there was hope in the air.
Tom and Maggie made several inroads into the kitchen, and, like other
marauders, were induced to keep aloof for a time only by being allowed
to carry away a sufficient load of booty.&quot;Tom,&quot; said Maggie, as they sat on the boughs of the elder-tree,
eating their jam-puffs, &quot;shall you run away to-morrow?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Tom, slowly, when he had finished his puff, and was eying
the third, which was to be divided between them, - &quot;no, I sha'n't.&quot;&quot;Why, Tom? Because Lucy's coming?&quot;&quot;No,&quot; said Tom, opening his pocket-knife and holding it over the puff,
with his head on one side in a dubitative manner. (It was a difficult
problem to divide that very irregular polygon into two equal parts.)
&quot;What doIcare about Lucy? She's only a girl, -shecan't play at
bandy.&quot;&quot;Is it the tipsy-cake, then?&quot; said Maggie, exerting her hypothetic
powers, while she leaned forward toward Tom with her eyes fixed on the
hovering knife.&quot;No, you silly, that'll be good the day after. It's the pudden. I know
what the pudden's to be, - apricot roll-up - O my buttons!&quot;With this interjection, the knife descended on the puff, and it was in
two, but the result was not satisfactory to Tom, for he still eyed the
halves doubtfully. At last he said, -&quot;Shut your eyes, Maggie.&quot;&quot;What for?&quot;&quot;You never mind what for. Shut 'em when I tell you.&quot;Maggie obeyed.&quot;Now, which'll you have, Maggie, - right hand or left?&quot;&quot;I'll have that with the jam run out,&quot; said Maggie, keeping her eyes
shut to please Tom.&quot;Why, you don't like that, you silly. You may have it if it comes to
you fair, but I sha'n't give it you without. Right or left, - you
choose, now. Ha-a-a!&quot; said Tom, in a tone of exasperation, as Maggie
peeped. &quot;You keep your eyes shut, now, else you sha'n't have any.&quot;Maggie's power of sacrifice did not extend so far; indeed, I fear she
cared less that Tom should enjoy the utmost possible amount of puff,
than that he should be pleased with her for giving him the best bit.
So she shut her eyes quite close, till Tom told her to &quot;say which,&quot;
and then she said, &quot;Left hand.&quot;&quot;You've got it,&quot; said Tom, in rather a bitter tone.&quot;What! the bit with the jam run out?&quot;&quot;No; here, take it,&quot; said Tom, firmly, handing, decidedly the best
piece to Maggie.&quot;Oh, please, Tom, have it; I don't mind - I like the other; please take
this.&quot;&quot;No, I sha'n't,&quot; said Tom, almost crossly, beginning on his own
inferior piece.Maggie, thinking it was no use to contend further, began too, and ate
up her half puff with considerable relish as well as rapidity. But Tom
had finished first, and had to look on while Maggie ate her last
morsel or two, feeling in himself a capacity for more. Maggie didn't
know Tom was looking at her; she was seesawing on the elder-bough,
lost to almost everything but a vague sense of jam and idleness.&quot;Oh, you greedy thing!&quot; said Tom, when she had swallowed the last
morsel. He was conscious of having acted very fairly, and thought she
ought to have considered this, and made up to him for it. He would
have refused a bit of hers beforehand, but one is naturally at a
different point of view before and after one's own share of puff is
swallowed.Maggie turned quite pale. &quot;Oh, Tom, why didn't you ask me?&quot;&quot;I wasn't going to ask you for a bit, you greedy. You might have
thought of it without, when you knew I gave you the best bit.&quot;&quot;But I wanted you to have it; you know I did,&quot; said Maggie, in an
injured tone.&quot;Yes, but I wasn't going to do what wasn't fair, like Spouncer. He
always takes the best bit, if you don't punch him for it; and if you
choose the best with your eyes shut, he changes his hands. But if I go
halves, I'll go 'em fair; only I wouldn't be a greedy.&quot;With this cutting innuendo, Tom jumped down from his bough, and threw
a stone with a &quot;hoigh!&quot; as a friendly attention to Yap, who had also
been looking on while the eatables vanished, with an agitation of his
ears and feelings which could hardly have been without bitterness. Yet
the excellent dog accepted Tom's attention with as much alacrity as if
he had been treated quite generously.But Maggie, gifted with that superior power of misery which
distinguishes the human being, and places him at a proud distance from
the most melancholy chimpanzee, sat still on her bough, and gave
herself up to the keen sense of unmerited reproach. She would have
given the world not to have eaten all her puff, and to have saved some
of it for Tom. Not but that the puff was very nice, for Maggie's
palate was not at all obtuse, but she would have gone without it many
times over, sooner than Tom should call her greedy and be cross with
her. And he had said he wouldn't have it, and she ate it without
thinking; how could she help it? The tears flowed so plentifully that
Maggie saw nothing around her for the next ten minutes; but by that
time resentment began to give way to the desire of reconciliation, and
she jumped from her bough to look for Tom. He was no longer in the
paddock behind the rickyard; where was he likely to be gone, and Yap
with him? Maggie ran to the high bank against the great holly-tree,
where she could see far away toward the Floss. There was Tom; but her
heart sank again as she saw how far off he was on his way to the great
river, and that he had another companion besides Yap, - naughty Bob
Jakin, whose official, if not natural, function of frightening the
birds was just now at a standstill. Maggie felt sure that Bob was
wicked, without very distinctly knowing why; unless it was because
Bob's mother was a dreadfully large fat woman, who lived at a queer
round house down the river; and once, when Maggie and Tom had wandered
thither, there rushed out a brindled dog that wouldn't stop barking;
and when Bob's mother came out after it, and screamed above the
barking to tell them not to be frightened, Maggie thought she was
scolding them fiercely, and her heart beat with terror. Maggie thought
it very likely that the round house had snakes on the floor, and bats
in the bedroom; for she had seen Bob take off his cap to show Tom a
little snake that was inside it, and another time he had a handful of
young bats: altogether, he was an irregular character, perhaps even
slightly diabolical, judging from his intimacy with snakes and bats;
and to crown all, when Tom had Bob for a companion, he didn't mind
about Maggie, and would never let her go with him.It must be owned that Tom was fond of Bob's company. How could it be
otherwise? Bob knew, directly he saw a bird's egg, whether it was a
swallow's, or a tomtit's, or a yellow-hammer's; he found out all the
wasps' nests, and could set all sort of traps; he could climb the
trees like a squirrel, and had quite a magical power of detecting
hedgehogs and stoats; and he had courage to do things that were rather
naughty, such as making gaps in the hedgerows, throwing stones after
the sheep, and killing a cat that was wanderingincognito.Such qualities in an inferior, who could always be treated with
authority in spite of his superior knowingness, had necessarily a
fatal fascination for Tom; and every holiday-time Maggie was sure to
have days of grief because he had gone off with Bob.Well! there was no hope for it; he was gone now, and Maggie could
think of no comfort but to sit down by the hollow, or wander by the
hedgerow, and fancy it was all different, refashioning her little
world into just what she should like it to be.Maggie's was a troublous life, and this was the form in which she took
her opium.Meanwhile Tom, forgetting all about Maggie and the sting of reproach
which he had left in her heart, was hurrying along with Bob, whom he
had met accidentally, to the scene of a great rat-catching in a
neighboring barn. Bob knew all about this particular affair, and spoke
of the sport with an enthusiasm which no one who is not either
divested of all manly feeling, or pitiably ignorant of rat-catching,
can fail to imagine. For a person suspected of preternatural
wickedness, Bob was really not so very villanous-looking; there was
even something agreeable in his snub-nosed face, with its close-curled
border of red hair. But then his trousers were always rolled up at the
knee, for the convenience of wading on the slightest notice; and his
virtue, supposing it to exist, was undeniably &quot;virtue in rags,&quot; which,
on the authority even of bilious philosophers, who think all
well-dressed merit overpaid, is notoriously likely to remain
unrecognized (perhaps because it is seen so seldom).&quot;I know the chap as owns the ferrets,&quot; said Bob, in a hoarse treble
voice, as he shuffled along, keeping his blue eyes fixed on the river,
like an amphibious animal who foresaw occasion for darting in. &quot;He
lives up the Kennel Yard at Sut Ogg's, he does. He's the biggest
rot-catcher anywhere, he is. I'd sooner, be a rot-catcher nor
anything, I would. The moles is nothing to the rots. But Lors! you mun
ha' ferrets. Dogs is no good. Why, there's that dog, now!&quot; Bob
continued, pointing with an air of disgust toward Yap, &quot;he's no more
good wi' a rot nor nothin'. I see it myself, I did, at the
rot-catchin' i' your feyther's barn.&quot;Yap, feeling the withering influence of this scorn, tucked his tail in
and shrank close to Tom's leg, who felt a little hurt for him, but had
not the superhuman courage to seem behindhand with Bob in contempt for
a dog who made so poor a figure.&quot;No, no,&quot; he said, &quot;Yap's no good at sport. I'll have regular good
dogs for rats and everything, when I've done school.&quot;&quot;Hev ferrets, Measter Tom,&quot; said Bob, eagerly, - &quot;them white ferrets
wi' pink eyes; Lors, you might catch your own rots, an' you might put
a rot in a cage wi' a ferret, an' see 'em fight, you might. That's
what I'd do, I know, an' it 'ud be better fun a'most nor seein' two
chaps fight, - if it wasn't them chaps as sold cakes an' oranges at the
Fair, as the things flew out o' their baskets, an' some o' the cakes
was smashed - But they tasted just as good,&quot; added Bob, by way of note
or addendum, after a moment's pause.&quot;But, I say, Bob,&quot; said Tom, in a tone of deliberation, &quot;ferrets are
nasty biting things, - they'll bite a fellow without being set on.&quot;&quot;Lors! why that's the beauty on 'em. If a chap lays hold o' your
ferret, he won't be long before he hollows out a good un,hewon't.&quot;At this moment a striking incident made the boys pause suddenly in
their walk. It was the plunging of some small body in the water from
among the neighboring bulrushes; if it was not a water-rat, Bob
intimated that he was ready to undergo the most unpleasant
consequences.&quot;Hoigh! Yap, - hoigh! there he is,&quot; said Tom, clapping his hands, as
the little black snout made its arrowy course to the opposite bank.
&quot;Seize him, lad! seize him!&quot;Yap agitated his ears and wrinkled his brows, but declined to plunge,
trying whether barking would not answer the purpose just as well.&quot;Ugh! you coward!&quot; said Tom, and kicked him over, feeling humiliated
as a sportsman to possess so poor-spirited an animal. Bob abstained
from remark and passed on, choosing, however, to walk in the shallow
edge of the overflowing river by way of change.&quot;He's none so full now, the Floss isn't,&quot; said Bob, as he kicked the
water up before him, with an agreeable sense of being insolent to it.
&quot;Why, last 'ear, the meadows was all one sheet o' water, they was.&quot;&quot;Ay, but,&quot; said Tom, whose mind was prone to see an opposition between
statements that were really accordant, - &quot;but there was a big flood
once, when the Round Pool was made.Iknow there was, 'cause father
says so. And the sheep and cows all drowned, and the boats went all
over the fields ever such a way.&quot;&quot;Idon't care about a flood comin',&quot; said Bob; &quot;I don't mind the
water, no more nor the land. I'd swim,Iwould.&quot;&quot;Ah, but if you got nothing to eat for ever so long?&quot; said Tom, his
imagination becoming quite active under the stimulus of that dread.
&quot;When I'm a man, I shall make a boat with a wooden house on the top of
it, like Noah's ark, and keep plenty to eat in it, - rabbits and
things, - all ready. And then if the flood came, you know, Bob, I
shouldn't mind. And I'd take you in, if I saw you swimming,&quot; he added,
in the tone of a benevolent patron.&quot;I aren't frighted,&quot; said Bob, to whom hunger did not appear so
appalling. &quot;But I'd get in an' knock the rabbits on th' head when you
wanted to eat 'em.&quot;&quot;Ah, and I should have halfpence, and we'd play at heads-and-tails,&quot;
said Tom, not contemplating the possibility that this recreation might
have fewer charms for his mature age. &quot;I'd divide fair to begin with,
and then we'd see who'd win.&quot;&quot;I've got a halfpenny o' my own,&quot; said Bob, proudly, coming out of the
water and tossing his halfpenny in the air. &quot;Yeads or tails?&quot;&quot;Tails,&quot; said Tom, instantly fired with the desire to win.&quot;It's yeads,&quot; said Bob, hastily, snatching up the halfpenny as it
fell.&quot;It wasn't,&quot; said Tom, loudly and peremptorily. &quot;You give me the
halfpenny; I've won it fair.&quot;&quot;I sha'n't,&quot; said Bob, holding it tight in his pocket.&quot;Then I'll make you; see if I don't,&quot; said Tom.&quot;Yes, I can.&quot;&quot;You can't make me do nothing, you can't,&quot; said Bob.&quot;No, you can't.&quot;&quot;I'm master.&quot;&quot;I don't care for you.&quot;&quot;But I'll make you care, you cheat,&quot; said Tom, collaring Bob and
shaking him.&quot;You get out wi' you,&quot; said Bob, giving Tom a kick.Tom's blood was thoroughly up: he went at Bob with a lunge and threw
him down, but Bob seized hold and kept it like a cat, and pulled Tom
down after him. They struggled fiercely on the ground for a moment or
two, till Tom, pinning Bob down by the shoulders, thought he had the
mastery.&quot;You, say you'll give me the halfpenny now,&quot; he said, with
difficulty, while he exerted himself to keep the command of Bob's
arms.But at this moment Yap, who had been running on before, returned
barking to the scene of action, and saw a favorable opportunity for
biting Bob's bare leg not only with inpunity but with honor. The pain
from Yap's teeth, instead of surprising Bob into a relaxation of his
hold, gave it a fiercer tenacity, and with a new exertion of his force
he pushed Tom backward and got uppermost. But now Yap, who could get
no sufficient purchase before, set his teeth in a new place, so that
Bob, harassed in this way, let go his hold of Tom, and, almost
throttling Yap, flung him into the river. By this time Tom was up
again, and before Bob had quite recovered his balance after the act of
swinging Yap, Tom fell upon him, threw him down, and got his knees
firmly on Bob's chest.&quot;You give me the halfpenny now,&quot; said Tom.&quot;Take it,&quot; said Bob, sulkily.&quot;No, I sha'n't take it; you give it me.&quot;Bob took the halfpenny out of his pocket, and threw it away from him
on the ground.Tom loosed his hold, and left Bob to rise.&quot;There the halfpenny lies,&quot; he said. &quot;I don't want your halfpenny; I
wouldn't have kept it. But you wanted to cheat; I hate a cheat. I
sha'n't go along with you any more,&quot; he added, turning round homeward,
not without casting a regret toward the rat-catching and other
pleasures which he must relinquish along with Bob's society.&quot;You may let it alone, then,&quot; Bob called out after him. &quot;I shall cheat
if I like; there's no fun i' playing else; and I know where there's a
goldfinch's nest, but I'll take careyoudon't. An' you're a nasty
fightin' turkey-cock, you are -  - &quot;Tom walked on without looking around, and Yap followed his example,
the cold bath having moderated his passions.&quot;Go along wi' you, then, wi' your drowned dog; I wouldn't own such a
dog -Iwouldn't,&quot; said Bob, getting louder, in a last effort to
sustain his defiance. But Tom was not to be provoked into turning
round, and Bob's voice began to falter a little as he said, -&quot;An' I'n gi'en you everything, an' showed you everything, an' niver
wanted nothin' from you. An' there's your horn-handed knife, then as
you gi'en me.&quot; Here Bob flung the knife as far as he could after Tom's
retreating footsteps. But it produced no effect, except the sense in
Bob's mind that there was a terrible void in his lot, now that knife
was gone.He stood still till Tom had passed through the gate and disappeared
behind the hedge. The knife would do not good on the ground there; it
wouldn't vex Tom; and pride or resentment was a feeble passion in
Bob's mind compared with the love of a pocket-knife. His very fingers
sent entreating thrills that he would go and clutch that familiar
rough buck's-horn handle, which they had so often grasped for mere
affection, as it lay idle in his pocket. And there were two blades,
and they had just been sharpened! What is life without a pocket-knife
to him who has once tasted a higher existence? No; to throw the handle
after the hatchet is a comprehensible act of desperation, but to throw
one's pocket-knife after an implacable friend is clearly in every
sense a hyperbole, or throwing beyond the mark. So Bob shuffled back
to the spot where the beloved knife lay in the dirt, and felt quite a
new pleasure in clutching it again after the temporary separation, in
opening one blade after the other, and feeling their edge with his
well-hardened thumb. Poor Bob! he was not sensitive on the point of
honor, not a chivalrous character. That fine moral aroma would not
have been thought much of by the public opinion of Kennel Yard, which
was the very focus or heart of Bob's world, even if it could have made
itself perceptible there; yet, for all that, he was not utterly a
sneak and a thief as our friend Tom had hastily decided.But Tom, you perceive, was rather a Rhadamanthine personage, having
more than the usual share of boy's justice in him, - the justice that
desires to hurt culprits as much as they deserve to be hurt, and is
troubled with no doubts concerning the exact amount of their deserts.
Maggie saw a cloud on his brow when he came home, which checked her
joy at his coming so much sooner than she had expected, and she dared
hardly speak to him as he stood silently throwing the small
gravel-stones into the mill-dam. It is not pleasant to give up a
rat-catching when you have set your mind on it. But if Tom had told
his strongest feeling at that moment, he would have said, &quot;I'd do just
the same again.&quot; That was his usual mode of viewing his past actions;
whereas Maggie was always wishing she had done something different.>


It was a heavy disappointment to Maggie that she was not allowed to go
with her father in the gig when he went to fetch Tom home from the
academy; but the morning was too wet, Mrs. Tulliver said, for a little
girl to go out in her best bonnet. Maggie took the opposite view very
strongly, and it was a direct consequence of this difference of
opinion that when her mother was in the act of brushing out the
reluctant black crop Maggie suddenly rushed from under her hands and
dipped her head in a basin of water standing near, in the vindictive
determination that there should be no more chance of curls that day.&quot;Maggie, Maggie!&quot; exclaimed Mrs. Tulliver, sitting stout and helpless
with the brushes on her lap, &quot;what is to become of you if you're so
naughty? I'll tell your aunt Glegg and your aunt Pullet when they come
next week, and they'll never love you any more. Oh dear, oh dear! look
at your clean pinafore, wet from top to bottom. Folks 'ull think it's
a judgment on me as I've got such a child, - they'll think I've done
summat wicked.&quot;Before this remonstrance was finished, Maggie was already out of
hearing, making her way toward the great attic that run under the old
high-pitched roof, shaking the water from her black locks as she ran,
like a Skye terrier escaped from his bath. This attic was Maggie's
favorite retreat on a wet day, when the weather was not too cold; here
she fretted out all her ill humors, and talked aloud to the worm-eaten
floors and the worm-eaten shelves, and the dark rafters festooned with
cobwebs; and here she kept a Fetish which she punished for all her
misfortunes. This was the trunk of a large wooden doll, which once
stared with the roundest of eyes above the reddest of cheeks; but was
now entirely defaced by a long career of vicarious suffering. Three
nails driven into the head commemorated as many crises in Maggie's
nine years of earthly struggle; that luxury of vengeance having been
suggested to her by the picture of Jael destroying Sisera in the old
Bible. The last nail had been driven in with a fiercer stroke than
usual, for the Fetish on that occasion represented aunt Glegg. But
immediately afterward Maggie had reflected that if she drove many
nails in she would not be so well able to fancy that the head was hurt
when she knocked it against the wall, nor to comfort it, and make
believe to poultice it, when her fury was abated; for even aunt Glegg
would be pitiable when she had been hurt very much, and thoroughly
humiliated, so as to beg her niece's pardon. Since then she had driven
no more nails in, but had soothed herself by alternately grinding and
beating the wooden head against the rough brick of the great chimneys
that made two square pillars supporting the roof. That was what she
did this morning on reaching the attic, sobbing all the while with a
passion that expelled every other form of consciousness, - even the
memory of the grievance that had caused it. As at last the sobs were
getting quieter, and the grinding less fierce, a sudden beam of
sunshine, falling through the wire lattice across the worm-eaten
shelves, made her throw away the Fetish and run to the window. The sun
was really breaking out; the sound of the mill seemed cheerful again;
the granary doors were open; and there was Yap, the queer
white-and-brown terrier, with one ear turned back, trotting about and
sniffing vaguely, as if he were in search of a companion. It was
irresistible. Maggie tossed her hair back and ran downstairs, seized
her bonnet without putting it on, peeped, and then dashed along the
passage lest she should encounter her mother, and was quickly out in
the yard, whirling round like a Pythoness, and singing as she whirled,
&quot;Yap, Yap, Tom's coming home!&quot; while Yap danced and barked round her,
as much as to say, if there was any noise wanted he was the dog for
it.&quot;Hegh, hegh, Miss! you'll make yourself giddy, an' tumble down i' the
dirt,&quot; said Luke, the head miller, a tall, broad-shouldered man of
forty, black-eyed and black-haired, subdued by a general mealiness,
like an auricula.Maggie paused in her whirling and said, staggering a little, &quot;Oh no,
it doesn't make me giddy, Luke; may I go into the mill with you?&quot;Maggie loved to linger in the great spaces of the mill, and often came
out with her black hair powdered to a soft whiteness that made her
dark eyes flash out with new fire. The resolute din, the unresting
motion of the great stones, giving her a dim, delicious awe as at the
presence of an uncontrollable force; the meal forever pouring,
pouring; the fine white powder softening all surfaces, and making the
very spidernets look like a faery lace-work; the sweet, pure scent of
the meal, - all helped to make Maggie feel that the mill was a little
world apart from her outside every-day life. The spiders were
especially a subject of speculation with her. She wondered if they had
any relatives outside the mill, for in that case there must be a
painful difficulty in their family intercourse, - a fat and floury
spider, accustomed to take his fly well dusted with meal, must suffer
a little at a cousin's table where the fly wasau naturel, and the
lady spiders must be mutually shocked at each other's appearance. But
the part of the mill she liked best was the topmost story, - the
corn-hutch, where there were the great heaps of grain, which she could
sit on and slide down continually. She was in the habit of taking this
recreation as she conversed with Luke, to whom she was very
communicative, wishing him to think well of her understanding, as her
father did.Perhaps she felt it necessary to recover her position with him on the
present occasion for, as she sat sliding on the heap of grain near
which he was busying himself, she said, at that shrill pitch which was
requisite in mill-society, -&quot;I think you never read any book but the Bible, did you, Luke?&quot;&quot;Nay, Miss, an' not much o' that,&quot; said Luke, with great frankness.
&quot;I'm no reader, I aren't.&quot;&quot;But if I lent you one of my books, Luke? I've not got anyverypretty books that would be easy for you to read; but there's 'Pug's
Tour of Europe,' - that would tell you all about the different sorts of
people in the world, and if you didn't understand the reading, the
pictures would help you; they show the looks and ways of the people,
and what they do. There are the Dutchmen, very fat, and smoking, you
know, and one sitting on a barrel.&quot;&quot;Nay, Miss, I'n no opinion o' Dutchmen. There ben't much good i'
knowin' aboutthem.&quot;&quot;But they're our fellow-creatures, Luke; we ought to know about our
fellow-creatures.&quot;&quot;Not much o' fellow-creaturs, I think, Miss; all I know - my old
master, as war a knowin' man, used to say, says he, 'If e'er I sow my
wheat wi'out brinin', I'm a Dutchman,' says he; an' that war as much
as to say as a Dutchman war a fool, or next door. Nay, nay, I aren't
goin' to bother mysen about Dutchmen. There's fools enoo, an' rogues
enoo, wi'out lookin' i' books for 'em.&quot;&quot;Oh, well,&quot; said Maggie, rather foiled by Luke's unexpectedly decided
views about Dutchmen, &quot;perhaps you would like 'Animated Nature'
better; that's not Dutchmen, you know, but elephants and kangaroos,
and the civet-cat, and the sunfish, and a bird sitting on its tail, - I
forget its name. There are countries full of those creatures, instead
of horses and cows, you know. Shouldn't you like to know about them,
Luke?&quot;&quot;Nay, Miss, I'n got to keep count o' the flour an' corn; I can't do
wi' knowin' so many things besides my work. That's what brings folks
to the gallows, - knowin' everything but what they'n got to get their
bread by. An' they're mostly lies, I think, what's printed i' the
books: them printed sheets are, anyhow, as the men cry i' the
streets.&quot;&quot;Why, you're like my brother Tom, Luke,&quot; said Maggie, wishing to turn
the conversation agreeably; &quot;Tom's not fond of reading. I love Tom so
dearly, Luke, - better than anybody else in the world. When he grows up
I shall keep his house, and we shall always live together. I can tell
him everything he doesn't know. But I think Tom's clever, for all he
doesn't like books; he makes beautiful whipcord and rabbit-pens.&quot;&quot;Ah,&quot; said Luke, &quot;but he'll be fine an' vexed, as the rabbits are all
dead.&quot;&quot;Dead!&quot; screamed Maggie, jumping up from her sliding seat on the corn.
&quot;Oh dear, Luke! What! the lop-eared one, and the spotted doe that Tom
spent all his money to buy?&quot;&quot;As dead as moles,&quot; said Luke, fetching his comparison from the
unmistakable corpses nailed to the stable wall.&quot;Oh dear, Luke,&quot; said Maggie, in a piteous tone, while the big tears
rolled down her cheek; &quot;Tom told me to take care of 'em, and I forgot.
WhatshallI do?&quot;&quot;Well, you see, Miss, they were in that far tool-house, an' it was
nobody's business to see to 'em. I reckon Master Tom told Harry to
feed 'em, but there's no countin' on Harry;he'san offal creatur as
iver come about the primises, he is. He remembers nothing but his own
inside - an' I wish it'ud gripe him.&quot;&quot;Oh, Luke, Tom told me to be sure and remember the rabbits every day;
but how could I, when they didn't come into my head, you know? Oh, he
will be so angry with me, I know he will, and so sorry about his
rabbits, and so am I sorry. Oh, whatshallI do?&quot;&quot;Don't you fret, Miss,&quot; said Luke, soothingly; &quot;they're nash things,
them lop-eared rabbits; they'd happen ha' died, if they'd been fed.
Things out o' natur niver thrive: God A'mighty doesn't like 'em. He
made the rabbits' ears to lie back, an' it's nothin' but contrairiness
to make 'em hing down like a mastiff dog's. Master Tom 'ull know
better nor buy such things another time. Don't you fret, Miss. Will
you come along home wi' me, and see my wife? I'm a-goin' this minute.&quot;The invitation offered an agreeable distraction to Maggie's grief, and
her tears gradually subsided as she trotted along by Luke's side to
his pleasant cottage, which stood with its apple and pear trees, and
with the added dignity of a lean-to pigsty, at the other end of the
Mill fields. Mrs. Moggs, Luke's wife, was a decidely agreeable
acquaintance. She exhibited her hospitality in bread and treacle, and
possessed various works of art. Maggie actually forgot that she had
any special cause of sadness this morning, as she stood on a chair to
look at a remarkable series of pictures representing the Prodigal Son
in the costume of Sir Charles Grandison, except that, as might have
been expected from his defective moral character, he had not, like
that accomplished hero, the taste and strength of mind to dispense
with a wig. But the indefinable weight the dead rabbits had left on
her mind caused her to feel more than usual pity for the career of
this weak young man, particularly when she looked at the picture where
he leaned against a tree with a flaccid appearance, his knee-breeches
unbuttoned and his wig awry, while the swine apparently of some
foreign breed, seemed to insult him by their good spirits over their
feast of husks.&quot;I'm very glad his father took him back again, aren't you, Luke?&quot; she
said. &quot;For he was very sorry, you know, and wouldn't do wrong again.&quot;&quot;Eh, Miss,&quot; said Luke, &quot;he'd be no great shakes, I doubt, let's
feyther do what he would for him.&quot;That was a painful thought to Maggie, and she wished much that the
subsequent history of the young man had not been left a blank.>


The startling object which thus made an epoch for uncle Pullet was no
other than little Lucy, with one side of her person, from her small
foot to her bonnet-crown, wet and discolored with mud, holding out two
tiny blackened hands, and making a very piteous face. To account for
this unprecedented apparition in aunt Pullet's parlor, we must return
to the moment when the three children went to play out of doors, and
the small demons who had taken possession of Maggie's soul at an early
period of the day had returned in all the greater force after a
temporary absence. All the disagreeable recollections of the morning
were thick upon her, when Tom, whose displeasure toward her had been
considerably refreshed by her foolish trick of causing him to upset
his cowslip wine, said, &quot;Here, Lucy, you come along with me,&quot; and
walked off to the area where the toads were, as if there were no
Maggie in existence. Seeing this, Maggie lingered at a distance
looking like a small Medusa with her snakes cropped. Lucy was
naturally pleased that cousin Tom was so good to her, and it was very
amusing to see him tickling a fat toad with a piece of string when the
toad was safe down the area, with an iron grating over him. Still Lucy
wished Maggie to enjoy the spectacle also, especially as she would
doubtless find a name for the toad, and say what had been his past
history; for Lucy had a delighted semibelief in Maggie's stories about
the live things they came upon by accident, - how Mrs. Earwig had a
wash at home, and one of her children had fallen into the hot copper,
for which reason she was running so fast to fetch the doctor. Tom had
a profound contempt for this nonsense of Maggie's, smashing the earwig
at once as a superfluous yet easy means of proving the entire
unreality of such a story; but Lucy, for the life of her, could not
help fancying there was something in it, and at all events thought it
was very pretty make-believe. So now the desire to know the history of
a very portly toad, added to her habitual affectionateness, made her
run back to Maggie and say, &quot;Oh, there is such a big, funny toad,
Maggie! Do come and see!&quot;Maggie said nothing, but turned away from her with a deeper frown. As
long as Tom seemed to prefer Lucy to her, Lucy made part of his
unkindness. Maggie would have thought a little while ago that she
could never be cross with pretty little Lucy, any more than she could
be cruel to a little white mouse; but then, Tom had always been quite
indifferent to Lucy before, and it had been left to Maggie to pet and
make much of her. As it was, she was actually beginning to think that
she should like to make Lucy cry by slapping or pinching her,
especially as it might vex Tom, whom it was of no use to slap, even if
she dared, because he didn't mind it. And if Lucy hadn't been there,
Maggie was sure he would have got friends with her sooner.Tickling a fat toad who is not highly sensitive is an amusement that
it is possible to exhaust, and Tom by and by began to look round for
some other mode of passing the time. But in so prim a garden, where
they were not to go off the paved walks, there was not a great choice
of sport. The only great pleasure such a restriction suggested was the
pleasure of breaking it, and Tom began to meditate an insurrectionary
visit to the pond, about a field's length beyond the garden.&quot;I say, Lucy,&quot; he began, nodding his head up and down with great
significance, as he coiled up his string again, &quot;what do you think I
mean to do?&quot;&quot;What, Tom?&quot; said Lucy, with curiosity.&quot;I mean to go to the pond and look at the pike. You may go with me if
you like,&quot; said the young sultan.&quot;Oh, Tom,dareyou?&quot; said Lucy. &quot;Aunt said we mustn't go out of the
garden.&quot;&quot;Oh, I shall go out at the other end of the garden,&quot; said Tom. &quot;Nobody
'ull see us. Besides, I don't care if they do, - I'll run off home.&quot;&quot;ButIcouldn't run,&quot; said Lucy, who had never before been exposed
to such severe temptation.&quot;Oh, never mind; they won't be cross withyou,&quot; said Tom. &quot;You say I
took you.&quot;Tom walked along, and Lucy trotted by his side, timidly enjoying the
rare treat of doing something naughty, - excited also by the mention of
that celebrity, the pike, about which she was quite uncertain whether
it was a fish or a fowl.Maggie saw them leaving the garden, and could not resist the impulse
to follow. Anger and jealousy can no more bear to lose sight of their
objects than love, and that Tom and Lucy should do or see anything of
which she was ignorant would have been an intolerable idea to Maggie.
So she kept a few yards behind them, unobserved by Tom, who was
presently absorbed in watching for the pike, - a highly interesting
monster; he was said to be so very old, so very large, and to have
such a remarkable appetite. The pike, like other celebrities, did not
show when he was watched for, but Tom caught sight of something in
rapid movement in the water, which attracted him to another spot on
the brink of the pond.&quot;Here, Lucy!&quot; he said in a loud whisper, &quot;come here! take care! keep
on the grass! - don't step where the cows have been!&quot; he added,
pointing to a peninsula of dry grass, with trodden mud on each side of
it; for Tom's contemptuous conception of a girl included the attribute
of being unfit to walk in dirty places.Lucy came carefully as she was bidden, and bent down to look at what
seemed a golden arrow-head darting through the water. It was a
water-snake, Tom told her; and Lucy at last could see the serpentine
wave of its body, very much wondering that a snake could swim. Maggie
had drawn nearer and nearer; shemustsee it too, though it was
bitter to her, like everything else, since Tom did not care about her
seeing it. At last she was close by Lucy; and Tom, who had been aware
of her approach, but would not notice it till he was obliged, turned
round and said, -&quot;Now, get away, Maggie; there's no room for you on the grass here.
Nobody askedyouto come.&quot;There were passions at war in Maggie at that moment to have made a
tragedy, if tragedies were made by passion only; but the essential
[Greek text] which was present in the passion was wanting to the action;
the utmost Maggie could do, with a fierce thrust of her small brown arm,
was to push poor little pink-and-white Lucy into the cow-trodden mud.Then Tom could not restrain himself, and gave Maggie two smart slaps
on the arm as he ran to pick up Lucy, who lay crying helplessly.
Maggie retreated to the roots of a tree a few yards off, and looked on
impenitently. Usually her repentance came quickly after one rash deed,
but now Tom and Lucy had made her so miserable, she was glad to spoil
their happiness, - glad to make everybody uncomfortable. Why should she
be sorry? Tom was very slow to forgiveher, however sorry she might
have been.&quot;I shall tell mother, you know, Miss Mag,&quot; said Tom, loudly and
emphatically, as soon as Lucy was up and ready to walk away. It was
not Tom's practice to &quot;tell,&quot; but here justice clearly demanded that
Maggie should be visited with the utmost punishment; not that Tom had
learned to put his views in that abstract form; he never mentioned
&quot;justice,&quot; and had no idea that his desire to punish might be called
by that fine name. Lucy was too entirely absorbed by the evil that had
befallen her, - the spoiling of her pretty best clothes, and the
discomfort of being wet and dirty, - to think much of the cause, which
was entirely mysterious to her. She could never have guessed what she
had done to make Maggie angry with her; but she felt that Maggie was
very unkind and disagreeable, and made no magnanimous entreaties to
Tom that he would not &quot;tell,&quot; only running along by his side and
crying piteously, while Maggie sat on the roots of the tree and looked
after them with her small Medusa face.&quot;Sally,&quot; said Tom, when they reached the kitchen door, and Sally
looked at them in speechless amaze, with a piece of bread-and-butter
in her mouth and a toasting-fork in her hand, - &quot;Sally, tell mother it
was Maggie pushed Lucy into the mud.&quot;&quot;But Lors ha' massy, how did you get near such mud as that?&quot; said
Sally, making a wry face, as she stooped down and examined the _corpus
delicti_.Tom's imagination had not been rapid and capacious enough to include
this question among the foreseen consequences, but it was no sooner
put than he foresaw whither it tended, and that Maggie would not be
considered the only culprit in the case. He walked quietly away from
the kitchen door, leaving Sally to that pleasure of guessing which
active minds notoriously prefer to ready-made knowledge.Sally, as you are aware, lost no time in presenting Lucy at the parlor
door, for to have so dirty an object introduced into the house at
Garum Firs was too great a weight to be sustained by a single mind.&quot;Goodness gracious!&quot; aunt Pullet exclaimed, after preluding by an
inarticulate scream; &quot;keep her at the door, Sally! Don't bring her off
the oil-cloth, whatever you do.&quot;&quot;Why, she's tumbled into some nasty mud,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, going up
to Lucy to examine into the amount of damage to clothes for which she
felt herself responsible to her sister Deane.&quot;If you please, 'um, it was Miss Maggie as pushed her in,&quot; said Sally;
&quot;Master Tom's been and said so, and they must ha' been to the pond,
for it's only there they could ha' got into such dirt.&quot;&quot;There it is, Bessy; it's what I've been telling you,&quot; said Mrs.
Pullet, in a tone of prophetic sadness; &quot;it's your children, - there's
no knowing what they'll come to.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver was mute, feeling herself a truly wretched mother. As
usual, the thought pressed upon her that people would think she had
done something wicked to deserve her maternal troubles, while Mrs.
Pullet began to give elaborate directions to Sally how to guard the
premises from serious injury in the course of removing the dirt.
Meantime tea was to be brought in by the cook, and the two naughty
children were to have theirs in an ignominious manner in the kitchen.
Mrs. Tulliver went out to speak to these naughty children, supposing
them to be close at hand; but it was not until after some search that
she found Tom leaning with rather a hardened, careless air against the
white paling of the poultry-yard, and lowering his piece of string on
the other side as a means of exasperating the turkey-cock.&quot;Tom, you naughty boy, where's your sister?&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, in a
distressed voice.&quot;I don't know,&quot; said Tom; his eagerness for justice on Maggie had
diminished since he had seen clearly that it could hardly be brought
about without the injustice of some blame on his own conduct.&quot;Why, where did you leave her?&quot; said the mother, looking round.&quot;Sitting under the tree, against the pond,&quot; said Tom, apparently
indifferent to everything but the string and the turkey-cock.&quot;Then go and fetch her in this minute, you naughty boy. And how could
you think o' going to the pond, and taking your sister where there was
dirt? You know she'll do mischief if there's mischief to be done.&quot;It was Mrs. Tulliver's way, if she blamed Tom, to refer his
misdemeanor, somehow or other, to Maggie.The idea of Maggie sitting alone by the pond roused an habitual fear
in Mrs. Tulliver's mind, and she mounted the horse-block to satisfy
herself by a sight of that fatal child, while Tom walked - not very
quickly - on his way toward her.&quot;They're such children for the water, mine are,&quot; she said aloud,
without reflecting that there was no one to hear her; &quot;they'll be
brought in dead and drownded some day. I wish that river was far
enough.&quot;But when she not only failed to discern Maggie, but presently saw Tom
returning from the pool alone, this hovering fear entered and took
complete possession of her, and she hurried to meet him.&quot;Maggie's nowhere about the pond, mother,&quot; said Tom; &quot;she's gone
away.&quot;You may conceive the terrified search for Maggie, and the difficulty
of convincing her mother that she was not in the pond. Mrs. Pullet
observed that the child might come to a worse end if she lived, there
was no knowing; and Mr. Pullet, confused and overwhelmed by this
revolutionary aspect of things, - the tea deferred and the poultry
alarmed by the unusual running to and fro, - took up his spud as an
instrument of search, and reached down a key to unlock the goose-pen,
as a likely place for Maggie to lie concealed in.Tom, after a while, started the idea that Maggie was gone home
(without thinking it necessary to state that it was what he should
have done himself under the circumstances), and the suggestion was
seized as a comfort by his mother.&quot;Sister, for goodness' sake let 'em put the horse in the carriage and
take me home; we shall perhaps find her on the road. Lucy can't walk
in her dirty clothes,&quot; she said, looking at that innocent victim, who
was wrapped up in a shawl, and sitting with naked feet on the sofa.Aunt Pullet was quite willing to take the shortest means of restoring
her premises to order and quiet, and it was not long before Mrs.
Tulliver was in the chaise, looking anxiously at the most distant
point before her. What the father would say if Maggie was lost, was a
question that predominated over every other.>


A wide plain, where the broadening Floss hurries on between its green
banks to the sea, and the loving tide, rushing to meet it, checks its
passage with an impetuous embrace. On this mighty tide the black
ships - laden with the fresh-scented fir-planks, with rounded sacks of
oil-bearing seed, or with the dark glitter of coal - are borne along to
the town of St. Ogg's, which shows its aged, fluted red roofs and the
broad gables of its wharves between the low wooded hill and the
river-brink, tingeing the water with a soft purple hue under the
transient glance of this February sun. Far away on each hand stretch
the rich pastures, and the patches of dark earth made ready for the
seed of broad-leaved green crops, or touched already with the tint of
the tender-bladed autumn-sown corn. There is a remnant still of last
year's golden clusters of beehive-ricks rising at intervals beyond the
hedgerows; and everywhere the hedgerows are studded with trees; the
distant ships seem to be lifting their masts and stretching their
red-brown sails close among the branches of the spreading ash. Just by
the red-roofed town the tributary Ripple flows with a lively current
into the Floss. How lovely the little river is, with its dark changing
wavelets! It seems to me like a living companion while I wander along
the bank, and listen to its low, placid voice, as to the voice of one
who is deaf and loving. I remember those large dipping willows. I
remember the stone bridge.And this is Dorlcote Mill. I must stand a minute or two here on the
bridge and look at it, though the clouds are threatening, and it is
far on in the afternoon. Even in this leafless time of departing
February it is pleasant to look at, - perhaps the chill, damp season
adds a charm to the trimly kept, comfortable dwelling-house, as old as
the elms and chestnuts that shelter it from the northern blast. The
stream is brimful now, and lies high in this little withy plantation,
and half drowns the grassy fringe of the croft in front of the house.
As I look at the full stream, the vivid grass, the delicate
bright-green powder softening the outline of the great trunks and
branches that gleam from under the bare purple boughs, I am in love
with moistness, and envy the white ducks that are dipping their heads
far into the water here among the withes, unmindful of the awkward
appearance they make in the drier world above.The rush of the water and the booming of the mill bring a dreamy
deafness, which seems to heighten the peacefulness of the scene. They
are like a great curtain of sound, shutting one out from the world
beyond. And now there is the thunder of the huge covered wagon coming
home with sacks of grain. That honest wagoner is thinking of his
dinner, getting sadly dry in the oven at this late hour; but he will
not touch it till he has fed his horses, - the strong, submissive,
meek-eyed beasts, who, I fancy, are looking mild reproach at him from
between their blinkers, that he should crack his whip at them in that
awful manner as if they needed that hint! See how they stretch their
shoulders up the slope toward the bridge, with all the more energy
because they are so near home. Look at their grand shaggy feet that
seem to grasp the firm earth, at the patient strength of their necks,
bowed under the heavy collar, at the mighty muscles of their
struggling haunches! I should like well to hear them neigh over their
hardly earned feed of corn, and see them, with their moist necks freed
from the harness, dipping their eager nostrils into the muddy pond.
Now they are on the bridge, and down they go again at a swifter pace,
and the arch of the covered wagon disappears at the turning behind the
trees.Now I can turn my eyes toward the mill again, and watch the unresting
wheel sending out its diamond jets of water. That little girl is
watching it too; she has been standing on just the same spot at the
edge of the water ever since I paused on the bridge. And that queer
white cur with the brown ear seems to be leaping and barking in
ineffectual remonstrance with the wheel; perhaps he is jealous because
his playfellow in the beaver bonnet is so rapt in its movement. It is
time the little playfellow went in, I think; and there is a very
bright fire to tempt her: the red light shines out under the deepening
gray of the sky. It is time, too, for me to leave off resting my arms
on the cold stone of this bridge....Ah, my arms are really benumbed. I have been pressing my elbows on the
arms of my chair, and dreaming that I was standing on the bridge in
front of Dorlcote Mill, as it looked one February afternoon many years
ago. Before I dozed off, I was going to tell you what Mr. and Mrs.
Tulliver were talking about, as they sat by the bright fire in the
left-hand parlor, on that very afternoon I have been dreaming of.>


Tom was to arrive early in the afternoon, and there was another
fluttering heart besides Maggie's when it was late enough for the
sound of the gig-wheels to be expected; for if Mrs. Tulliver had a
strong feeling, it was fondness for her boy. At last the sound
came, - that quick light bowling of the gig-wheels, - and in spite of
the wind, which was blowing the clouds about, and was not likely to
respect Mrs. Tulliver's curls and cap-strings, she came outside the
door, and even held her hand on Maggie's offending head, forgetting
all the griefs of the morning.&quot;There he is, my sweet lad! But, Lord ha' mercy! he's got never a
collar on; it's been lost on the road, I'll be bound, and spoilt the
set.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver stood with her arms open; Maggie jumped first on one leg
and then on the other; while Tom descended from the gig, and said,
with masculine reticence as to the tender emotions, &quot;Hallo! Yap - what!
are you there?&quot;Nevertheless he submitted to be kissed willingly enough, though Maggie
hung on his neck in rather a strangling fashion, while his blue-gray
eyes wandered toward the croft and the lambs and the river, where he
promised himself that he would begin to fish the first thing to-morrow
morning. He was one of those lads that grow everywhere in England, and
at twelve or thirteen years of age look as much alike as goslings, - a
lad with light-brown hair, cheeks of cream and roses, full lips,
indeterminate nose and eyebrows, - a physiognomy in which it seems
impossible to discern anything but the generic character to boyhood;
as different as possible from poor Maggie's phiz, which Nature seemed
to have moulded and colored with the most decided intention. But that
same Nature has the deep cunning which hides itself under the
appearance of openness, so that simple people think they can see
through her quite well, and all the while she is secretly preparing a
refutation of their confident prophecies. Under these average boyish
physiognomies that she seems to turn off by the gross, she conceals
some of her most rigid, inflexible purposes, some of her most
unmodifiable characters; and the dark-eyed, demonstrative, rebellious
girl may after all turn out to be a passive being compared with this
pink-and-white bit of masculinity with the indeterminate features.&quot;Maggie,&quot; said Tom, confidentially, taking her into a corner, as soon
as his mother was gone out to examine his box and the warm parlor had
taken off the chill he had felt from the long drive, &quot;you don't know
what I've got inmypockets,&quot; nodding his head up and down as a
means of rousing her sense of mystery.&quot;No,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;How stodgy they look, Tom! Is it marls (marbles)
or cobnuts?&quot; Maggie's heart sank a little, because Tom always said it
was &quot;no good&quot; playing withherat those games, she played so badly.&quot;Marls! no; I've swopped all my marls with the little fellows, and
cobnuts are no fun, you silly, only when the nuts are green. But see
here!&quot; He drew something half out of his right-hand pocket.&quot;What is it?&quot; said Maggie, in a whisper. &quot;I can see nothing but a bit
of yellow.&quot;&quot;Why, it's - a - new - guess, Maggie!&quot;&quot;Oh, Ican'tguess, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, impatiently.&quot;Don't be a spitfire, else I won't tell you,&quot; said Tom, thrusting his
hand back into his pocket and looking determined.&quot;No, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, imploringly, laying hold of the arm that was
held stiffly in the pocket. &quot;I'm not cross, Tom; it was only because I
can't bear guessing.Pleasebe good to me.&quot;Tom's arm slowly relaxed, and he said, &quot;Well, then, it's a new
fish-line - two new uns, - one for you, Maggie, all to yourself. I
wouldn't go halves in the toffee and gingerbread on purpose to save
the money; and Gibson and Spouncer fought with me because I wouldn't.
And here's hooks; see here - I say,won'twe go and fish to-morrow
down by the Round Pool? And you shall catch your own fish, Maggie and
put the worms on, and everything; won't it be fun?&quot;Maggie's answer was to throw her arms round Tom's neck and hug him,
and hold her cheek against his without speaking, while he slowly
unwound some of the line, saying, after a pause, -&quot;Wasn't I a good brother, now, to buy you a line all to yourself? You
know, I needn't have bought it, if I hadn't liked.&quot;&quot;Yes, very, very good - Idolove you, Tom.&quot;Tom had put the line back in his pocket, and was looking at the hooks
one by one, before he spoke again.&quot;And the fellows fought me, because I wouldn't give in about the
toffee.&quot;&quot;Oh, dear! I wish they wouldn't fight at your school, Tom. Didn't it
hurt you?&quot;&quot;Hurt me? no,&quot; said Tom, putting up the hooks again, taking out a
large pocket-knife, and slowly opening the largest blade, which he
looked at meditatively as he rubbed his finger along it. Then he
added, -&quot;I gave Spouncer a black eye, I know; that's what he got by wanting to
leatherme;I wasn't going to go halves because anybody leathered
me.&quot;&quot;Oh, how brave you are, Tom! I think you're like Samson. If there came
a lion roaring at me, I think you'd fight him, wouldn't you, Tom?&quot;&quot;How can a lion come roaring at you, you silly thing? There's no
lions, only in the shows.&quot;&quot;No; but if we were in the lion countries - I mean in Africa, where
it's very hot; the lions eat people there. I can show it you in the
book where I read it.&quot;&quot;Well, I should get a gun and shoot him.&quot;&quot;But if you hadn't got a gun, - we might have gone out, you know, not
thinking, just as we go fishing; and then a great lion might run
toward us roaring, and we couldn't get away from him. What should you
do, Tom?&quot;Tom paused, and at last turned away contemptuously, saying, &quot;But the
lionisn'tcoming. What's the use of talking?&quot;&quot;But I like to fancy how it would be,&quot; said Maggie, following him.
&quot;Just think what you would do, Tom.&quot;&quot;Oh, don't bother, Maggie! you're such a silly. I shall go and see my
rabbits.&quot;Maggie's heart began to flutter with fear. She dared not tell the sad
truth at once, but she walked after Tom in trembling silence as he
went out, thinking how she could tell him the news so as to soften at
once his sorrow and his anger; for Maggie dreaded Tom's anger of all
things; it was quite a different anger from her own.&quot;Tom,&quot; she said, timidly, when they were out of doors, &quot;how much money
did you give for your rabbits?&quot;&quot;Two half-crowns and a sixpence,&quot; said Tom, promptly.&quot;I think I've got a great deal more than that in my steel purse
upstairs. I'll ask mother to give it you.&quot;&quot;What for?&quot; said Tom. &quot;I don't wantyourmoney, you silly thing.
I've got a great deal more money than you, because I'm a boy. I always
have half-sovereigns and sovereigns for my Christmas boxes because I
shall be a man, and you only have five-shilling pieces, because you're
only a girl.&quot;&quot;Well, but, Tom - if mother would let me give you two half-crowns and a
sixpence out of my purse to put into your pocket and spend, you know,
and buy some more rabbits with it?&quot;&quot;More rabbits? I don't want any more.&quot;&quot;Oh, but, Tom, they're all dead.&quot;Tom stopped immediately in his walk and turned round toward Maggie.
&quot;You forgot to feed 'em, then, and Harry forgot?&quot; he said, his color
heightening for a moment, but soon subsiding. &quot;I'll pitch into Harry.
I'll have him turned away. And I don't love you, Maggie. You sha'n't
go fishing with me to-morrow. I told you to go and see the rabbits
every day.&quot; He walked on again.&quot;Yes, but I forgot - and I couldn't help it, indeed, Tom. I'm so very
sorry,&quot; said Maggie, while the tears rushed fast.&quot;You're a naughty girl,&quot; said Tom, severely, &quot;and I'm sorry I bought
you the fish-line. I don't love you.&quot;&quot;Oh, Tom, it's very cruel,&quot; sobbed Maggie. &quot;I'd forgive you, ifyouforgot anything - I wouldn't mind what you did - I'd forgive you and
love you.&quot;&quot;Yes, you're silly; but I neverdoforget things,Idon't.&quot;&quot;Oh, please forgive me, Tom; my heart will break,&quot; said Maggie,
shaking with sobs, clinging to Tom's arm, and laying her wet cheek on
his shoulder.Tom shook her off, and stopped again, saying in a peremptory tone,
&quot;Now, Maggie, you just listen. Aren't I a good brother to you?&quot;&quot;Ye-ye-es,&quot; sobbed Maggie, her chin rising and falling convulsedly.&quot;Didn't I think about your fish-line all this quarter, and mean to buy
it, and saved my money o' purpose, and wouldn't go halves in the
toffee, and Spouncer fought me because I wouldn't?&quot;&quot;Ye-ye-es - and I - lo-lo-love you so, Tom.&quot;&quot;But you're a naughty girl. Last holidays you licked the paint off my
lozenge-box, and the holidays before that you let the boat drag my
fish-line down when I'd set you to watch it, and you pushed your head
through my kite, all for nothing.&quot;&quot;But I didn't mean,&quot; said Maggie; &quot;I couldn't help it.&quot;&quot;Yes, you could,&quot; said Tom, &quot;if you'd minded what you were doing. And
you're a naughty girl, and you sha'n't go fishing with me to-morrow.&quot;With this terrible conclusion, Tom ran away from Maggie toward the
mill, meaning to greet Luke there, and complain to him of Harry.Maggie stood motionless, except from her sobs, for a minute or two;
then she turned round and ran into the house, and up to her attic,
where she sat on the floor and laid her head against the worm-eaten
shelf, with a crushing sense of misery. Tom was come home, and she had
thought how happy she should be; and now he was cruel to her. What use
was anything if Tom didn't love her? Oh, he was very cruel! Hadn't she
wanted to give him the money, and said how very sorry she was? She
knew she was naughty to her mother, but she had never been naughty to
Tom - had nevermeantto be naughty to him.&quot;Oh, he is cruel!&quot; Maggie sobbed aloud, finding a wretched pleasure in
the hollow resonance that came through the long empty space of the
attic. She never thought of beating or grinding her Fetish; she was
too miserable to be angry.These bitter sorrows of childhood! when sorrow is all new and strange,
when hope has not yet got wings to fly beyond the days and weeks, and
the space from summer to summer seems measureless.Maggie soon thought she had been hours in the attic, and it must be
tea-time, and they were all having their tea, and not thinking of her.
Well, then, she would stay up there and starve herself, - hide herself
behind the tub, and stay there all night, - and then they would all be
frightened, and Tom would be sorry. Thus Maggie thought in the pride
of her heart, as she crept behind the tub; but presently she began to
cry again at the idea that they didn't mind her being there. If she
went down again to Tom now - would he forgive her? Perhaps her father
would be there, and he would take her part. But then she wanted Tom to
forgive her because he loved her, not because his father told him. No,
she would never go down if Tom didn't come to fetch her. This
resolution lasted in great intensity for five dark minutes behind the
tub; but then the need of being loved - the strongest need in poor
Maggie's nature - began to wrestle with her pride, and soon threw it.
She crept from behind her tub into the twilight of the long attic, but
just then she heard a quick foot-step on the stairs.Tom had been too much interested in his talk with Luke, in going the
round of the premises, walking in and out where he pleased, and
whittling sticks without any particular reason, - except that he didn't
whittle sticks at school, - to think of Maggie and the effect his anger
had produced on her. He meant to punish her, and that business having
been performed, he occupied himself with other matters, like a
practical person. But when he had been called in to tea, his father
said, &quot;Why, where's the little wench?&quot; and Mrs. Tulliver, almost at
the same moment, said, &quot;Where's your little sister?&quot; - both of them
having supposed that Maggie and Tom had been together all the
afternoon.&quot;I don't know,&quot; said Tom. He didn't want to &quot;tell&quot; of Maggie, though
he was angry with her; for Tom Tulliver was a lad of honor.&quot;What! hasn't she been playing with you all this while?&quot; said the
father. &quot;She'd been thinking o' nothing but your coming home.&quot;&quot;I haven't seen her this two hours,&quot; says Tom, commencing on the
plumcake.&quot;Goodness heart; she's got drownded!&quot; exclaimed Mrs. Tulliver, rising
from her seat and running to the window.&quot;How could you let her do so?&quot; she added, as became a fearful woman,
accusing she didn't know whom of she didn't know what.&quot;Nay, nay, she's none drownded,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver. &quot;You've been
naughty to her, I doubt, Tom?&quot;&quot;I'm sure I haven't, father,&quot; said Tom, indignantly. &quot;I think she's in
the house.&quot;&quot;Perhaps up in that attic,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, &quot;a-singing and talking
to herself, and forgetting all about meal-times.&quot;&quot;You go and fetch her down, Tom,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, rather
sharply, - his perspicacity or his fatherly fondness for Maggie making
him suspect that the lad had been hard upon &quot;the little un,&quot; else she
would never have left his side. &quot;And be good to her, do you hear? Else
I'll let you know better.&quot;Tom never disobeyed his father, for Mr. Tulliver was a peremptory man,
and, as he said, would never let anybody get hold of his whip-hand;
but he went out rather sullenly, carrying his piece of plumcake, and
not intending to reprieve Maggie's punishment, which was no more than
she deserved. Tom was only thirteen, and had no decided views in
grammar and arithmetic, regarding them for the most part as open
questions, but he was particularly clear and positive on one
point, - namely, that he would punish everybody who deserved it. Why,
he wouldn't have minded being punished himself if he deserved it; but,
then, he neverdiddeserve it.It was Tom's step, then, that Maggie heard on the stairs, when her
need of love had triumphed over her pride, and she was going down with
her swollen eyes and dishevelled hair to beg for pity. At least her
father would stroke her head and say, &quot;Never mind, my wench.&quot; It is a
wonderful subduer, this need of love, - this hunger of the heart, - as
peremptory as that other hunger by which Nature forces us to submit to
the yoke, and change the face of the world.But she knew Tom's step, and her heart began to beat violently with
the sudden shock of hope. He only stood still at the top of the stairs
and said, &quot;Maggie, you're to come down.&quot; But she rushed to him and
clung round his neck, sobbing, &quot;Oh, Tom, please forgive me - I can't
bear it - I will always be good - always remember things - do love
me - please, dear Tom!&quot;We learn to restrain ourselves as we get older. We keep apart when we
have quarrelled, express ourselves in well-bred phrases, and in this
way preserve a dignified alienation, showing much firmness on one
side, and swallowing much grief on the other. We no longer approximate
in our behavior to the mere impulsiveness of the lower animals, but
conduct ourselves in every respect like members of a highly civilized
society. Maggie and Tom were still very much like young animals, and
so she could rub her cheek against his, and kiss his ear in a random
sobbing way; and there were tender fibres in the lad that had been
used to answer to Maggie's fondling, so that he behaved with a
weakness quite inconsistent with his resolution to punish her as much
as she deserved. He actually began to kiss her in return, and say, -&quot;Don't cry, then, Magsie; here, eat a bit o' cake.&quot;Maggie's sobs began to subside, and she put out her mouth for the cake
and bit a piece; and then Tom bit a piece, just for company, and they
ate together and rubbed each other's cheeks and brows and noses
together, while they ate, with a humiliating resemblance to two
friendly ponies.&quot;Come along, Magsie, and have tea,&quot; said Tom at last, when there was
no more cake except what was down-stairs.So ended the sorrows of this day, and the next morning Maggie was
trotting with her own fishing-rod in one hand and a handle of the
basket in the other, stepping always, by a peculiar gift, in the
muddiest places, and looking darkly radiant from under her
beaver-bonnet because Tom was good to her. She had told Tom, however,
that she should like him to put the worms on the hook for her,
although she accepted his word when he assured her that worms couldn't
feel (it was Tom's private opinion that it didn't much matter if they
did). He knew all about worms, and fish, and those things; and what
birds were mischievous, and how padlocks opened, and which way the
handles of the gates were to be lifted. Maggie thought this sort of
knowledge was very wonderful, - much more difficult than remembering
what was in the books; and she was rather in awe of Tom's superiority,
for he was the only person who called her knowledge &quot;stuff,&quot; and did
not feel surprised at her cleverness. Tom, indeed, was of opinion that
Maggie was a silly little thing; all girls were silly, - they couldn't
throw a stone so as to hit anything, couldn't do anything with a
pocket-knife, and were frightened at frogs. Still, he was very fond of
his sister, and meant always to take care of her, make her his
housekeeper, and punish her when she did wrong.They were on their way to the Round Pool, - that wonderful pool, which
the floods had made a long while ago. No one knew how deep it was; and
it was mysterious, too, that it should be almost a perfect round,
framed in with willows and tall reeds, so that the water was only to
be seen when you got close to the brink. The sight of the old favorite
spot always heightened Tom's good humor, and he spoke to Maggie in the
most amicable whispers, as he opened the precious basket and prepared
their tackle. He threw her line for her, and put the rod into her
hand. Maggie thought it probable that the small fish would come to her
hook, and the large ones to Tom's. But she had forgotten all about the
fish, and was looking dreamily at the glassy water, when Tom said, in
a loud whisper, &quot;Look, look, Maggie!&quot; and came running to prevent her
from snatching her line away.Maggie was frightened lest she had been doing something wrong, as
usual, but presently Tom drew out her line and brought a large tench
bouncing on the grass.Tom was excited.&quot;O Magsie, you little duck! Empty the basket.&quot;Maggie was not conscious of unusual merit, but it was enough that Tom
called her Magsie, and was pleased with her. There was nothing to mar
her delight in the whispers and the dreamy silences, when she listened
to the light dripping sounds of the rising fish, and the gentle
rustling, as if the willows and the reeds and the water had their
happy whisperings also. Maggie thought it would make a very nice
heaven to sit by the pool in that way, and never be scolded. She never
knew she had a bite till Tom told her; but she liked fishing very
much.It was one of their happy mornings. They trotted along and sat down
together, with no thought that life would ever change much for them;
they would only get bigger and not go to school, and it would always
be like the holidays; they would always live together and be fond of
each other. And the mill with its booming; the great chestnut-tree
under which they played at houses; their own little river, the Ripple,
where the banks seemed like home, and Tom was always seeing the
water-rats, while Maggie gathered the purple plumy tops of the reeds,
which she forgot and dropped afterward; above all, the great Floss,
along which they wandered with a sense of travel, to see the rushing
spring-tide, the awful Eagle, come up like a hungry monster, or to see
the Great Ash which had once wailed and groaned like a man, these
things would always be just the same to them. Tom thought people were
at a disadvantage who lived on any other spot of the globe; and
Maggie, when she read about Christiana passing &quot;the river over which
there is no bridge,&quot; always saw the Floss between the green pastures
by the Great Ash.Life did change for Tom and Maggie; and yet they were not wrong in
believing that the thoughts and loves of these first years would
always make part of their lives. We could never have loved the earth
so well if we had had no childhood in it, - if it were not the earth
where the same flowers come up again every spring that we used to
gather with our tiny fingers as we sat lisping to ourselves on the
grass; the same hips and haws on the autumn's hedgerows; the same
redbreasts that we used to call &quot;God's birds,&quot; because they did no
harm to the precious crops. What novelty is worth that sweet monotony
where everything is known, andlovedbecause it is known?The wood I walk in on this mild May day, with the young yellow-brown
foliage of the oaks between me and the blue sky, the white
star-flowers and the blue-eyed speedwell and the ground ivy at my
feet, what grove of tropic palms, what strange ferns or splendid
broad-petalled blossoms, could ever thrill such deep and delicate
fibres within me as this home scene? These familiar flowers, these
well-remembered bird-notes, this sky, with its fitful brightness,
these furrowed and grassy fields, each with a sort of personality
given to it by the capricious hedgerows, - such things as these are the
mother-tongue of our imagination, the language that is laden with all
the subtle, inextricable associations the fleeting hours of our
childhood left behind them. Our delight in the sunshine on the
deep-bladed grass to-day might be no more than the faint perception of
wearied souls, if it were not for the sunshine and the grass in the
far-off years which still live in us, and transform our perception
into love.>


Maggie'S intentions, as usual, were on a larger scale than Tom
imagined. The resolution that gathered in her mind, after Tom and Lucy
had walked away, was not so simple as that of going home. No! she
would run away and go to the gypsies, and Tom should never see her any
more. That was by no means a new idea to Maggie; she had been so often
told she was like a gypsy, and &quot;half wild,&quot; that when she was
miserable it seemed to her the only way of escaping opprobrium, and
being entirely in harmony with circumstances, would be to live in a
little brown tent on the commons; the gypsies, she considered, would
gladly receive her and pay her much respect on account of her superior
knowledge. She had once mentioned her views on this point to Tom and
suggested that he should stain his face brown, and they should run
away together; but Tom rejected the scheme with contempt, observing
that gypsies were thieves, and hardly got anything to eat and had
nothing to drive but a donkey. To-day however, Maggie thought her
misery had reached a pitch at which gypsydom was her refuge, and she
rose from her seat on the roots of the tree with the sense that this
was a great crisis in her life; she would run straight away till she
came to Dunlow Common, where there would certainly be gypsies; and
cruel Tom, and the rest of her relations who found fault with her,
should never see her any more. She thought of her father as she ran
along, but she reconciled herself to the idea of parting with him, by
determining that she would secretly send him a letter by a small
gypsy, who would run away without telling where she was, and just let
him know that she was well and happy, and always loved him very much.Maggie soon got out of breath with running, but by the time Tom got to
the pond again she was at the distance of three long fields, and was
on the edge of the lane leading to the highroad. She stopped to pant a
little, reflecting that running away was not a pleasant thing until
one had got quite to the common where the gypsies were, but her
resolution had not abated; she presently passed through the gate into
the lane, not knowing where it would lead her, for it was not this way
that they came from Dorlcote Mill to Garum Firs, and she felt all the
safer for that, because there was no chance of her being overtaken.
But she was soon aware, not without trembling, that there were two men
coming along the lane in front of her; she had not thought of meeting
strangers, she had been too much occupied with the idea of her friends
coming after her. The formidable strangers were two shabby-looking men
with flushed faces, one of them carrying a bundle on a stick over his
shoulder; but to her surprise, while she was dreading their
disapprobation as a runaway, the man with the bundle stopped, and in a
half-whining, half-coaxing tone asked her if she had a copper to give
a poor man. Maggie had a sixpence in her pocket, - her uncle Glegg's
present, - which she immediately drew out and gave this poor man with a
polite smile, hoping he would feel very kindly toward her as a
generous person. &quot;That's the only money I've got,&quot; she said
apologetically. &quot;Thank you, little miss,&quot; said the man, in a less
respectful and grateful tone than Maggie anticipated, and she even
observed that he smiled and winked at his companion. She walked on
hurriedly, but was aware that the two men were standing still,
probably to look after her, and she presently heard them laughing
loudly. Suddenly it occurred to her that they might think she was an
idiot; Tom had said that her cropped hair made her look like an idiot,
and it was too painful an idea to be readily forgotten. Besides, she
had no sleeves on, - only a cape and bonnet. It was clear that she was
not likely to make a favorable impression on passengers, and she
thought she would turn into the fields again, but not on the same side
of the lane as before, lest they should still be uncle Pullet's
fields. She turned through the first gate that was not locked, and
felt a delightful sense of privacy in creeping along by the hedgerows,
after her recent humiliating encounter. She was used to wandering
about the fields by herself, and was less timid there than on the
highroad. Sometimes she had to climb over high gates, but that was a
small evil; she was getting out of reach very fast, and she should
probably soon come within sight of Dunlow Common, or at least of some
other common, for she had heard her father say that you couldn't go
very far without coming to a common. She hoped so, for she was getting
rather tired and hungry, and until she reached the gypsies there was
no definite prospect of bread and butter. It was still broad daylight,
for aunt Pullet, retaining the early habits of the Dodson family, took
tea at half-past four by the sun, and at five by the kitchen clock;
so, though it was nearly an hour since Maggie started, there was no
gathering gloom on the fields to remind her that the night would come.
Still, it seemed to her that she had been walking a very great
distance indeed, and it was really surprising that the common did not
come within sight. Hitherto she had been in the rich parish of Garum,
where was a great deal of pasture-land, and she had only seen one
laborer at a distance. That was fortunate in some respects, as
laborers might be too ignorant to understand the propriety of her
wanting to go to Dunlow Common; yet it would have been better if she
could have met some one who would tell her the way without wanting to
know anything about her private business. At last, however, the green
fields came to an end, and Maggie found herself looking through the
bars of a gate into a lane with a wide margin of grass on each side of
it. She had never seen such a wide lane before, and, without her
knowing why, it gave her the impression that the common could not be
far off; perhaps it was because she saw a donkey with a log to his
foot feeding on the grassy margin, for she had seen a donkey with that
pitiable encumbrance on Dunlow Common when she had been across it in
her father's gig. She crept through the bars of the gate and walked on
with new spirit, though not without haunting images of Apollyon, and a
highwayman with a pistol, and a blinking dwarf in yellow with a mouth
from ear to ear, and other miscellaneous dangers. For poor little
Maggie had at once the timidity of an active imagination and the
daring that comes from overmastering impulse. She had rushed into the
adventure of seeking her unknown kindred, the gypsies; and now she was
in this strange lane, she hardly dared look on one side of her, lest
she should see the diabolical blacksmith in his leathern apron
grinning at her with arms akimbo. It was not without a leaping of the
heart that she caught sight of a small pair of bare legs sticking up,
feet uppermost, by the side of a hillock; they seemed something
hideously preternatural, - a diabolical kind of fungus; for she was too
much agitated at the first glance to see the ragged clothes and the
dark shaggy head attached to them. It was a boy asleep, and Maggie
trotted along faster and more lightly, lest she should wake him; it
did not occur to her that he was one of her friends the gypsies, who
in all probability would have very genial manners. But the fact was
so, for at the next bend in the lane Maggie actually saw the little
semicircular black tent with the blue smoke rising before it, which
was to be her refuge from all the blighting obloquy that had pursued
her in civilized life. She even saw a tall female figure by the column
of smoke, doubtless the gypsy-mother, who provided the tea and other
groceries; it was astonishing to herself that she did not feel more
delighted. But it was startling to find the gypsies in a lane, after
all, and not on a common; indeed, it was rather disappointing; for a
mysterious illimitable common, where there were sand-pits to hide in,
and one was out of everybody's reach, had always made part of Maggie's
picture of gypsy life. She went on, however, and thought with some
comfort that gypsies most likely knew nothing about idiots, so there
was no danger of their falling into the mistake of setting her down at
the first glance as an idiot. It was plain she had attracted
attention; for the tall figure, who proved to be a young woman with a
baby on her arm, walked slowly to meet her. Maggie looked up in the
new face rather tremblingly as it approached, and was reassured by the
thought that her aunt Pullet and the rest were right when they called
her a gypsy; for this face, with the bright dark eyes and the long
hair, was really something like what she used to see in the glass
before she cut her hair off.&quot;My little lady, where are you going to?&quot; the gypsy said, in a tone of
coaxing deference.It was delightful, and just what Maggie expected; the gypsies saw at
once that she was a little lady, and were prepared to treat her
accordingly.&quot;Not any farther,&quot; said Maggie, feeling as if she were saying what she
had rehearsed in a dream. &quot;I'm come to stay withyou, please.&quot;&quot;That's pretty; come, then. Why, what a nice little lady you are, to
be sure!&quot; said the gypsy, taking her by the hand. Maggie thought her
very agreeable, but wished she had not been so dirty.There was quite a group round the fire when she reached it. An old
gypsy woman was seated on the ground nursing her knees, and
occasionally poking a skewer into the round kettle that sent forth an
odorous steam; two small shock-headed children were lying prone and
resting on their elbows something like small sphinxes; and a placid
donkey was bending his head over a tall girl, who, lying on her back,
was scratching his nose and indulging him with a bite of excellent
stolen hay. The slanting sunlight fell kindly upon them, and the scene
was really very pretty and comfortable, Maggie thought, only she hoped
they would soon set out the tea-cups. Everything would be quite
charming when she had taught the gypsies to use a washing-basin, and
to feel an interest in books. It was a little confusing, though, that
the young woman began to speak to the old one in a language which
Maggie did not understand, while the tall girl, who was feeding the
donkey, sat up and stared at her without offering any salutation. At
last the old woman said, -&quot;What! my pretty lady, are you come to stay with us? Sit ye down and
tell us where you come from.&quot;It was just like a story; Maggie liked to be called pretty lady and
treated in this way. She sat down and said, -&quot;I'm come from home because I'm unhappy, and I mean to be a gypsy.
I'll live with you if you like, and I can teach you a great many
things.&quot;&quot;Such a clever little lady,&quot; said the woman with the baby sitting down
by Maggie, and allowing baby to crawl; &quot;and such a pretty bonnet and
frock,&quot; she added, taking off Maggie's bonnet and looking at it while
she made an observation to the old woman, in the unknown language. The
tall girl snatched the bonnet and put it on her own head hind-foremost
with a grin; but Maggie was determined not to show any weakness on
this subject, as if she were susceptible about her bonnet.&quot;I don't want to wear a bonnet,&quot; she said; &quot;I'd rather wear a red
handkerchief, like yours&quot; (looking at her friend by her side). &quot;My
hair was quite long till yesterday, when I cut it off; but I dare say
it will grow again very soon,&quot; she added apologetically, thinking it
probable the gypsies had a strong prejudice in favor of long hair. And
Maggie had forgotten even her hunger at that moment in the desire to
conciliate gypsy opinion.&quot;Oh, what a nice little lady! - and rich, I'm sure,&quot; said the old
woman. &quot;Didn't you live in a beautiful house at home?&quot;&quot;Yes, my home is pretty, and I'm very fond of the river, where we go
fishing, but I'm often very unhappy. I should have liked to bring my
books with me, but I came away in a hurry, you know. But I can tell
you almost everything there is in my books, I've read them so many
times, and that will amuse you. And I can tell you something about
Geography too, - that's about the world we live in, - very useful and
interesting. Did you ever hear about Columbus?&quot;Maggie's eyes had begun to sparkle and her cheeks to flush, - she was
really beginning to instruct the gypsies, and gaining great influence
over them. The gypsies themselves were not without amazement at this
talk, though their attention was divided by the contents of Maggie's
pocket, which the friend at her right hand had by this time emptied
without attracting her notice.&quot;Is that where you live, my little lady?&quot; said the old woman, at the
mention of Columbus.&quot;Oh, no!&quot; said Maggie, with some pity; &quot;Columbus was a very wonderful
man, who found out half the world, and they put chains on him and
treated him very badly, you know; it's in my Catechism of Geography,
but perhaps it's rather too long to tell before tea - _I want my tea
so_.&quot;The last words burst from Maggie, in spite of herself, with a sudden
drop from patronizing instruction to simple peevishness.&quot;Why, she's hungry, poor little lady,&quot; said the younger woman. &quot;Give
her some o' the cold victual. You've been walking a good way, I'll be
bound, my dear. Where's your home?&quot;&quot;It's Dorlcote Mill, a good way off,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;My father is Mr.
Tulliver, but we mustn't let him know where I am, else he'll fetch me
home again. Where does the queen of the gypsies live?&quot;&quot;What! do you want to go to her, my little lady?&quot; said the younger
woman. The tall girl meanwhile was constantly staring at Maggie and
grinning. Her manners were certainly not agreeable.&quot;No,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;I'm only thinking that if she isn't a very good
queen you might be glad when she died, and you could choose another.
If I was a queen, I'd be a very good queen, and kind to everybody.&quot;&quot;Here's a bit o' nice victual, then,&quot; said the old woman, handing to
Maggie a lump of dry bread, which she had taken from a bag of scraps,
and a piece of cold bacon.&quot;Thank you,' said Maggie, looking at the food without taking it; &quot;but
will you give me some bread-and-butter and tea instead? I don't like
bacon.&quot;&quot;We've got no tea nor butter,&quot; said the old woman, with something like
a scowl, as if she were getting tired of coaxing.&quot;Oh, a little bread and treacle would do,&quot; said Maggie.&quot;We han't got no treacle,&quot; said the old woman, crossly, whereupon
there followed a sharp dialogue between the two women in their unknown
tongue, and one of the small sphinxes snatched at the bread-and-bacon,
and began to eat it. At this moment the tall girl, who had gone a few
yards off, came back, and said something which produced a strong
effect. The old woman, seeming to forget Maggie's hunger, poked the
skewer into the pot with new vigor, and the younger crept under the
tent and reached out some platters and spoons. Maggie trembled a
little, and was afraid the tears would come into her eyes. Meanwhile
the tall girl gave a shrill cry, and presently came running up the boy
whom Maggie had passed as he was sleeping, - a rough urchin about the
age of Tom. He stared at Maggie, and there ensued much incomprehensible
chattering. She felt very lonely, and was quite sure she should begin to
cry before long; the gypsies didn't seem to mind her at all, and she felt
quite weak among them. But the springing tears were checked by new
terror, when two men came up, whose approach had been the cause
of the sudden excitement. The elder of the two carried a bag, which
he flung down, addressing the women in a loud and scolding tone,
which they answered by a shower of treble sauciness; while a black
cur ran barking up to Maggie, and threw her into a tremor that only
found a new cause in the curses with which the younger man called
the dog off, and gave him a rap with a great stick he held in his hand.Maggie felt that it was impossible she should ever be queen of these
people, or ever communicate to them amusing and useful knowledge.Both the men now seemed to be inquiring about Maggie, for they looked
at her, and the tone of the conversation became of that pacific kind
which implies curiosity on one side and the power of satisfying it on
the other. At last the younger woman said in her previous deferential,
coaxing tone, -&quot;This nice little lady's come to live with us; aren't you glad?&quot;&quot;Ay, very glad,&quot; said the younger man, who was looking at Maggie's
silver thimble and other small matters that had been taken from her
pocket. He returned them all except the thimble to the younger woman,
with some observation, and she immediately restored them to Maggie's
pocket, while the men seated themselves, and began to attack the
contents of the kettle, - a stew of meat and potatoes, - which had been
taken off the fire and turned out into a yellow platter.Maggie began to think that Tom must be right about the gypsies; they
must certainly be thieves, unless the man meant to return her thimble
by and by. She would willingly have given it to him, for she was not
at all attached to her thimble; but the idea that she was among
thieves prevented her from feeling any comfort in the revival of
deference and attention toward her; all thieves, except Robin Hood,
were wicked people. The women saw she was frightened.&quot;We've got nothing nice for a lady to eat,&quot; said the old woman, in her
coaxing tone. &quot;And she's so hungry, sweet little lady.&quot;&quot;Here, my dear, try if you can eat a bit o' this,&quot; said the younger
woman, handing some of the stew on a brown dish with an iron spoon to
Maggie, who, remembering that the old woman had seemed angry with her
for not liking the bread-and-bacon, dared not refuse the stew, though
fear had chased away her appetite. If her father would but come by in
the gig and take her up! Or even if Jack the Giantkiller, or Mr.
Greatheart, or St. George who slew the dragon on the half-pennies,
would happen to pass that way! But Maggie thought with a sinking heart
that these heroes were never seen in the neighborhood of St. Ogg's;
nothing very wonderful ever came there.Maggie Tulliver, you perceive, was by no means that well trained,
well-informed young person that a small female of eight or nine
necessarily is in these days; she had only been to school a year at
St. Ogg's, and had so few books that she sometimes read the
dictionary; so that in travelling over her small mind you would have
found the most unexpected ignorance as well as unexpected knowledge.
She could have informed you that there was such a word as &quot;polygamy,&quot;
and being also acquainted with &quot;polysyllable,&quot; she had deduced the
conclusion that &quot;poly&quot; mean &quot;many&quot;; but she had had no idea that
gypsies were not well supplied with groceries, and her thoughts
generally were the oddest mixture of clear-eyed acumen and blind
dreams.Her ideas about the gypsies had undergone a rapid modification in the
last five minutes. From having considered them very respectful
companions, amenable to instruction, she had begun to think that they
meant perhaps to kill her as soon as it was dark, and cut up her body
for gradual cooking; the suspicion crossed her that the fierce-eyed
old man was in fact the Devil, who might drop that transparent
disguise at any moment, and turn either into the grinning blacksmith,
or else a fiery-eyed monster with dragon's wings. It was no use trying
to eat the stew, and yet the thing she most dreaded was to offend the
gypsies, by betraying her extremely unfavorable opinion of them; and
she wondered, with a keenness of interest that no theologian could
have exceeded, whether, if the Devil were really present, he would
know her thoughts.&quot;What! you don't like the smell of it, my dear,&quot; said the young woman,
observing that Maggie did not even take a spoonful of the stew. &quot;Try a
bit, come.&quot;&quot;No, thank you,&quot; said Maggie, summoning all her force for a desperate
effort, and trying to smile in a friendly way. &quot;I haven't time, I
think; it seems getting darker. I think I must go home now, and come
again another day, and then I can bring you a basket with some
jam-tarts and things.&quot;Maggie rose from her seat as she threw out this illusory prospect,
devoutly hoping that Apollyon was gullible; but her hope sank when the
old gypsy-woman said, &quot;Stop a bit, stop a bit, little lady; we'll take
you home, all safe, when we've done supper; you shall ride home, like
a lady.&quot;Maggie sat down again, with little faith in this promise, though she
presently saw the tall girl putting a bridle on the donkey, and
throwing a couple of bags on his back.&quot;Now, then, little missis,&quot; said the younger man, rising, and leading
the donkey forward, &quot;tell us where you live; what's the name o' the
place?&quot;&quot;Dorlcote Mill is my home,&quot; said Maggie, eagerly. &quot;My father is Mr.
Tulliver; he lives there.&quot;&quot;What! a big mill a little way this side o' St. Ogg's?&quot;&quot;Yes,&quot; said Maggie. &quot;Is it far off? I think I should like to walk
there, if you please.&quot;&quot;No, no, it'll be getting dark, we must make haste. And the donkey'll
carry you as nice as can be; you'll see.&quot;He lifted Maggie as he spoke, and set her on the donkey. She felt
relieved that it was not the old man who seemed to be going with her,
but she had only a trembling hope that she was really going home.&quot;Here's your pretty bonnet,&quot; said the younger woman, putting that
recently despised but now welcome article of costume on Maggie's head;
&quot;and you'll say we've been very good to you, won't you? and what a
nice little lady we said you was.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, thank you,&quot; said Maggie, &quot;I'm very much obliged to you. But I
wish you'd go with me too.&quot; She thought anything was better than going
with one of the dreadful men alone; it would be more cheerful to be
murdered by a larger party.&quot;Ah, you're fondest o'me, aren't you?&quot; said the woman. &quot;But I can't
go; you'll go too fast for me.&quot;It now appeared that the man also was to be seated on the donkey,
holding Maggie before him, and she was as incapable of remonstrating
against this arrangement as the donkey himself, though no nightmare
had ever seemed to her more horrible. When the woman had patted her on
the back, and said &quot;Good-by,&quot; the donkey, at a strong hint from the
man's stick, set off at a rapid walk along the lane toward the point
Maggie had come from an hour ago, while the tall girl and the rough
urchin, also furnished with sticks, obligingly escorted them for the
first hundred yards, with much screaming and thwacking.Not Leonore, in that preternatural midnight excursion with her phantom
lover, was more terrified than poor Maggie in this entirely natural
ride on a short-paced donkey, with a gypsy behind her, who considered
that he was earning half a crown. The red light of the setting sun
seemed to have a portentous meaning, with which the alarming bray of
the second donkey with the log on its foot must surely have some
connection. Two low thatched cottages - the only houses they passed in
this lane - seemed to add to its dreariness; they had no windows to
speak of, and the doors were closed; it was probable that they were
inhabitated by witches, and it was a relief to find that the donkey
did not stop there.At last - oh, sight of joy! - this lane, the longest in the world, was
coming to an end, was opening on a broad highroad, where there was
actually a coach passing! And there was a finger-post at the
corner, - she had surely seen that finger-post before, - &quot;To St. Ogg's,
2 miles.&quot; The gypsy really meant to take her home, then; he was
probably a good man, after all, and might have been rather hurt at the
thought that she didn't like coming with him alone. This idea became
stronger as she felt more and more certain that she knew the road
quite well, and she was considering how she might open a conversation
with the injured gypsy, and not only gratify his feelings but efface
the impression of her cowardice, when, as they reached a cross-road.
Maggie caught sight of some one coming on a white-faced horse.&quot;Oh, stop, stop!&quot; she cried out. &quot;There's my father! Oh, father,
father!&quot;The sudden joy was almost painful, and before her father reached her,
she was sobbing. Great was Mr. Tulliver's wonder, for he had made a
round from Basset, and had not yet been home.&quot;Why, what's the meaning o' this?&quot; he said, checking his horse, while
Maggie slipped from the donkey and ran to her father's stirrup.&quot;The little miss lost herself, I reckon,&quot; said the gypsy. &quot;She'd come
to our tent at the far end o' Dunlow Lane, and I was bringing her
where she said her home was. It's a good way to come after being on
the tramp all day.&quot;&quot;Oh yes, father, he's been very good to bring me home,&quot; said
Maggie, - &quot;a very kind, good man!&quot;&quot;Here, then, my man,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, taking out five shillings.
&quot;It's the best day's workyouever did. I couldn't afford to lose
the little wench; here, lift her up before me.&quot;&quot;Why, Maggie, how's this, how's this?&quot; he said, as they rode along,
while she laid her head against her father and sobbed. &quot;How came you
to be rambling about and lose yourself?&quot;&quot;Oh, father,&quot; sobbed Maggie, &quot;I ran away because I was so unhappy; Tom
was so angry with me. I couldn't bear it.&quot;&quot;Pooh, pooh,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, soothingly, &quot;you mustn't think o'
running away from father. What 'ud father do without his little
wench?&quot;&quot;Oh no, I never will again, father - never.&quot;Mr. Tulliver spoke his mind very strongly when he reached home that
evening; and the effect was seen in the remarkable fact that Maggie
never heard one reproach from her mother, or one taunt from Tom, about
this foolish business of her running away to the gypsies. Maggie was
rather awe-stricken by this unusual treatment, and sometimes thought
that her conduct had been too wicked to be alluded to.>


While the possible troubles of Maggie's future were occupying her
father's mind, she herself was tasting only the bitterness of the
present. Childhood has no forebodings; but then, it is soothed by no
memories of outlived sorrow.The fact was, the day had begun ill with Maggie. The pleasure of
having Lucy to look at, and the prospect of the afternoon visit to
Garum Firs, where she would hear uncle Pullet's musical box, had been
marred as early as eleven o'clock by the advent of the hair-dresser
from St. Ogg's, who had spoken in the severest terms of the condition
in which he had found her hair, holding up one jagged lock after
another and saying, &quot;See here! tut, tut, tut!&quot; in a tone of mingled
disgust and pity, which to Maggie's imagination was equivalent to the
strongest expression of public opinion. Mr. Rappit, the hair-dresser,
with his well-anointed coronal locks tending wavily upward, like the
simulated pyramid of flame on a monumental urn, seemed to her at that
moment the most formidable of her contemporaries, into whose street at
St. Ogg's she would carefully refrain from entering through the rest
of her life.Moreover, the preparation for a visit being always a serious affair in
the Dodson family, Martha was enjoined to have Mrs. Tulliver's room
ready an hour earlier than usual, that the laying out of the best
clothes might not be deferred till the last moment, as was sometimes
the case in families of lax views, where the ribbon-strings were never
rolled up, where there was little or no wrapping in silver paper, and
where the sense that the Sunday clothes could be got at quite easily
produced no shock to the mind. Already, at twelve o'clock, Mrs.
Tulliver had on her visiting costume, with a protective apparatus of
brown holland, as if she had been a piece of satin furniture in danger
of flies; Maggie was frowning and twisting her shoulders, that she
might if possible shrink away from the prickliest of tuckers, while
her mother was remonstrating, &quot;Don't, Maggie, my dear; don't make
yourself so ugly!&quot; and Tom's cheeks were looking particularly
brilliant as a relief to his best blue suit, which he wore with
becoming calmness, having, after a little wrangling, effected what was
always the one point of interest to him in his toilet: he had
transferred all the contents of his every-day pockets to those
actually in wear.As for Lucy, she was just as pretty and neat as she had been
yesterday; no accidents ever happened to her clothes, and she was
never uncomfortable in them, so that she looked with wondering pity at
Maggie, pouting and writhing under the exasperating tucker. Maggie
would certainly have torn it off, if she had not been checked by the
remembrance of her recent humiliation about her hair; as it was, she
confined herself to fretting and twisting, and behaving peevishly
about the card-houses which they were allowed to build till dinner, as
a suitable amusement for boys and girls in their best clothes. Tom
could build perfect pyramids of houses; but Maggie's would never bear
the laying on the roof. It was always so with the things that Maggie
made; and Tom had deduced the conclusion that no girls could ever make
anything. But it happened that Lucy proved wonderfully clever at
building; she handled the cards so lightly, and moved so gently, that
Tom condescended to admire her houses as well as his own, the more
readily because she had asked him to teach her. Maggie, too, would
have admired Lucy's houses, and would have given up her own
unsuccessful building to contemplate them, without ill temper, if her
tucker had not made her peevish, and if Tom had not inconsiderately
laughed when her houses fell, and told her she was &quot;a stupid.&quot;&quot;Don't laugh at me, Tom!&quot; she burst out angrily; &quot;I'm not a stupid. I
know a great many things you don't.&quot;&quot;Oh, I dare say, Miss Spitfire! I'd never be such a cross thing as
you, making faces like that. Lucy doesn't do so. I like Lucy better
than you;Iwish Lucy wasmysister.&quot;&quot;Then it's very wicked and cruel of you to wish so,&quot; said Maggie,
starting up hurriedly from her place on the floor, and upsetting Tom's
wonderful pagoda. She really did not mean it, but the circumstantial
evidence was against her, and Tom turned white with anger, but said
nothing; he would have struck her, only he knew it was cowardly to
strike a girl, and Tom Tulliver was quite determined he would never do
anything cowardly.Maggie stood in dismay and terror, while Tom got up from the floor and
walked away, pale, from the scattered ruins of his pagoda, and Lucy
looked on mutely, like a kitten pausing from its lapping.&quot;Oh, Tom,&quot; said Maggie, at last, going half-way toward him, &quot;I didn't
mean to knock it down, indeed, indeed I didn't.&quot;Tom took no notice of her, but took, instead, two or three hard peas
out of his pocket, and shot them with his thumbnail against the
window, vaguely at first, but presently with the distinct aim of
hitting a superannuated blue-bottle which was exposing its imbecility
in the spring sunshine, clearly against the views of Nature, who had
provided Tom and the peas for the speedy destruction of this weak
individual.Thus the morning had been made heavy to Maggie, and Tom's persistent
coldness to her all through their walk spoiled the fresh air and
sunshine for her. He called Lucy to look at the half-built bird's nest
without caring to show it Maggie, and peeled a willow switch for Lucy
and himself, without offering one to Maggie. Lucy had said, &quot;Maggie,
shouldn'tyoulike one?&quot; but Tom was deaf.Still, the sight of the peacock opportunely spreading his tail on the
stackyard wall, just as they reached Garum Firs, was enough to divert
the mind temporarily from personal grievances. And this was only the
beginning of beautiful sights at Garum Firs. All the farmyard life was
wonderful there, - bantams, speckled and top-knotted; Friesland hens,
with their feathers all turned the wrong way; Guinea-fowls that flew
and screamed and dropped their pretty spotted feathers; pouter-pigeons
and a tame magpie; nay, a goat, and a wonderful brindled dog, half
mastiff, half bull-dog, as large as a lion. Then there were white
railings and white gates all about, and glittering weathercocks of
various design, and garden-walks paved with pebbles in beautiful
patterns, - nothing was quite common at Garum Firs; and Tom thought
that the unusual size of the toads there was simply due to the general
unusualness which characterized uncle Pullet's possessions as a
gentleman farmer. Toads who paid rent were naturally leaner. As for
the house, it was not less remarkable; it had a receding centre, and
two wings with battlemented turrets, and was covered with glittering
white stucco.Uncle Pullet had seen the expected party approaching from the window,
and made haste to unbar and unchain the front door, kept always in
this fortified condition from fear of tramps, who might be supposed to
know of the glass case of stuffed birds in the hall, and to
contemplate rushing in and carrying it away on their heads. Aunt
Pullet, too, appeared at the doorway, and as soon as her sister was
within hearing said, &quot;Stop the children, for God's sake! Bessy; don't
let 'em come up the door-steps; Sally's bringing the old mat and the
duster, to rub their shoes.&quot;Mrs. Pullet's front-door mats were by no means intended to wipe shoes
on; the very scraper had a deputy to do its dirty work. Tom rebelled
particularly against this shoewiping, which he always considered in
the light of an indignity to his sex. He felt it as the beginning of
the disagreeables incident to a visit at aunt Pullet's, where he had
once been compelled to sit with towels wrapped round his boots; a fact
which may serve to correct the too-hasty conclusion that a visit to
Garum Firs must have been a great treat to a young gentleman fond of
animals, - fond, that is, of throwing stones at them.The next disagreeable was confined to his feminine companions; it was
the mounting of the polished oak stairs, which had very handsome
carpets rolled up and laid by in a spare bedroom, so that the ascent
of these glossy steps might have served, in barbarous times, as a
trial by ordeal from which none but the most spotless virtue could
have come off with unbroken limbs. Sophy's weakness about these
polished stairs was always a subject of bitter remonstrance on Mrs.
Glegg's part; but Mrs. Tulliver ventured on no comment, only thinking
to herself it was a mercy when she and the children were safe on the
landing.&quot;Mrs. Gray has sent home my new bonnet, Bessy,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, in a
pathetic tone, as Mrs. Tulliver adjusted her cap.&quot;Has she, sister?&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, with an air of much interest.
&quot;And how do you like it?&quot;&quot;It's apt to make a mess with clothes, taking 'em out and putting 'em
in again,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, drawing a bunch of keys from her pocket
and looking at them earnestly, &quot;but it 'ud be a pity for you to go
away without seeing it. There's no knowing what may happen.&quot;Mrs. Pullet shook her head slowly at this last serious consideration,
which determined her to single out a particular key.&quot;I'm afraid it'll be troublesome to you getting it out, sister,&quot; said
Mrs. Tulliver; &quot;but Ishouldlike to see what sort of a crown she's
made you.&quot;Mrs. Pullet rose with a melancholy air and unlocked one wing of a very
bright wardrobe, where you may have hastily supposed she would find a
new bonnet. Not at all. Such a supposition could only have arisen from
a too-superficial acquaintance with the habits of the Dodson family.
In this wardrobe Mrs. Pullet was seeking something small enough to be
hidden among layers of linen, - it was a door-key.&quot;You must come with me into the best room,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet.&quot;May the children come too, sister?&quot; inquired Mrs. Tulliver, who saw
that Maggie and Lucy were looking rather eager.&quot;Well,&quot; said aunt Pullet, reflectively, &quot;it'll perhaps be safer for
'em to come; they'll be touching something if we leave 'em behind.&quot;So they went in procession along the bright and slippery corridor,
dimly lighted by the semi-lunar top of the window which rose above the
closed shutter; it was really quite solemn. Aunt Pullet paused and
unlocked a door which opened on something still more solemn than the
passage, - a darkened room, in which the outer light, entering feebly,
showed what looked like the corpses of furniture in white shrouds.
Everything that was not shrouded stood with its legs upward. Lucy laid
hold of Maggie's frock, and Maggie's heart beat rapidly.Aunt Pullet half-opened the shutter and then unlocked the wardrobe,
with a melancholy deliberateness which was quite in keeping with the
funereal solemnity of the scene. The delicious scent of rose-leaves
that issued from the wardrobe made the process of taking out sheet
after sheet of silver paper quite pleasant to assist at, though the
sight of the bonnet at last was an anticlimax to Maggie, who would
have preferred something more strikingly preternatural. But few things
could have been more impressive to Mrs. Tulliver. She looked all round
it in silence for some moments, and then said emphatically, &quot;Well,
sister, I'll never speak against the full crowns again!&quot;It was a great concession, and Mrs. Pullet felt it; she felt something
was due to it.&quot;You'd like to see it on, sister?&quot; she said sadly. &quot;I'll open the
shutter a bit further.&quot;&quot;Well, if you don't mind taking off your cap, sister,&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver.Mrs. Pullet took off her cap, displaying the brown silk scalp with a
jutting promontory of curls which was common to the more mature and
judicious women of those times, and placing the bonnet on her head,
turned slowly round, like a draper's lay-figure, that Mrs. Tulliver
might miss no point of view.&quot;I've sometimes thought there's a loop too much o' ribbon on this left
side, sister; what do you think?&quot; said Mrs. Pullet.Mrs. Tulliver looked earnestly at the point indicated, and turned her
head on one side. &quot;Well, I think it's best as it is; if you meddled
with it, sister, you might repent.&quot;&quot;That's true,&quot; said aunt Pullet, taking off the bonnet and looking at
it contemplatively.&quot;How much might she charge you for that bonnet, sister?&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver, whose mind was actively engaged on the possibility of
getting a humble imitation of thischef-d'&Aring;&#147;uvremade from a piece
of silk she had at home.Mrs. Pullet screwed up her mouth and shook her head, and then
whispered, &quot;Pullet pays for it; he said I was to have the best bonnet
at Garum Church, let the next best be whose it would.&quot;She began slowly to adjust the trimmings, in preparation for returning
it to its place in the wardrobe, and her thoughts seemed to have taken
a melancholy turn, for she shook her head.&quot;Ah,&quot; she said at last, &quot;I may never wear it twice, sister; who
knows?&quot;&quot;Don't talk o' that sister,&quot; answered Mrs. Tulliver. &quot;I hope you'll
have your health this summer.&quot;&quot;Ah! but there may come a death in the family, as there did soon after
I had my green satin bonnet. Cousin Abbott may go, and we can't think
o' wearing crape less nor half a year for him.&quot;&quot;Thatwouldbe unlucky,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, entering thoroughly
into the possibility of an inopportune decease. &quot;There's never so much
pleasure i' wearing a bonnet the second year, especially when the
crowns are so chancy, - never two summers alike.&quot;&quot;Ah, it's the way i' this world,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, returning the
bonnet to the wardrobe and locking it up. She maintained a silence
characterized by head-shaking, until they had all issued from the
solemn chamber and were in her own room again. Then, beginning to cry,
she said, &quot;Sister, if you should never see that bonnet again till I'm
dead and gone, you'll remember I showed it you this day.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver felt that she ought to be affected, but she was a woman
of sparse tears, stout and healthy; she couldn't cry so much as her
sister Pullet did, and had often felt her deficiency at funerals. Her
effort to bring tears into her eyes issued in an odd contraction of
her face. Maggie, looking on attentively, felt that there was some
painful mystery about her aunt's bonnet which she was considered too
young to understand; indignantly conscious, all the while, that she
could have understood that, as well as everything else, if she had
been taken into confidence.When they went down, uncle Pullet observed, with some acumen, that he
reckoned the missis had been showing her bonnet, - that was what had
made them so long upstairs. With Tom the interval had seemed still
longer, for he had been seated in irksome constraint on the edge of a
sofa directly opposite his uncle Pullet, who regarded him with
twinkling gray eyes, and occasionally addressed him as &quot;Young sir.&quot;&quot;Well, young sir, what do you learn at school?&quot; was a standing
question with uncle Pullet; whereupon Tom always looked sheepish,
rubbed his hands across his face, and answered, &quot;I don't know.&quot; It was
altogether so embarrassing to be seatedt&Atilde;&ordf;te-&Atilde;&nbsp;-t&Atilde;&ordf;tewith uncle
Pullet, that Tom could not even look at the prints on the walls, or
the flycages, or the wonderful flower-pots; he saw nothing but his
uncle's gaiters. Not that Tom was in awe of his uncle's mental
superiority; indeed, he had made up his mind that he didn't want to be
a gentleman farmer, because he shouldn't like to be such a
thin-legged, silly fellow as his uncle Pullet, - a molly-coddle, in
fact. A boy's sheepishness is by no means a sign of overmastering
reverence; and while you are making encouraging advances to him under
the idea that he is overwhelmed by a sense of your age and wisdom, ten
to one he is thinking you extremely queer. The only consolation I can
suggest to you is, that the Greek boys probably thought the same of
Aristotle. It is only when you have mastered a restive horse, or
thrashed a drayman, or have got a gun in your hand, that these shy
juniors feel you to be a truly admirable and enviable character. At
least, I am quite sure of Tom Tulliver's sentiments on these points.
In very tender years, when he still wore a lace border under his
outdoor cap, he was often observed peeping through the bars of a gate
and making minatory gestures with his small forefinger while he
scolded the sheep with an inarticulate burr, intended to strike terror
into their astonished minds; indicating thus early that desire for
mastery over the inferior animals, wild and domestic, including
cockchafers, neighbors' dogs, and small sisters, which in all ages has
been an attribute of so much promise for the fortunes of our race.
Now, Mr. Pullet never rode anything taller than a low pony, and was
the least predatory of men, considering firearms dangerous, as apt to
go off of themselves by nobody's particular desire. So that Tom was
not without strong reasons when, in confidential talk with a chum, he
had described uncle Pullet as a nincompoop, taking care at the same
time to observe that he was a very &quot;rich fellow.&quot;The only alleviating circumstance in at&Atilde;&ordf;te-&Atilde;&nbsp;-t&Atilde;&ordf;tewith uncle Pullet
was that he kept a variety of lozenges and peppermint-drops about his
person, and when at a loss for conversation, he filled up the void by
proposing a mutual solace of this kind.&quot;Do you like peppermints, young sir?&quot; required only a tacit answer
when it was accompanied by a presentation of the article in question.The appearance of the little girls suggested to uncle Pullet the
further solace of small sweet-cakes, of which he also kept a stock
under lock and key for his own private eating on wet days; but the
three children had no sooner got the tempting delicacy between their
fingers, than aunt Pullet desired them to abstain from eating it till
the tray and the plates came, since with those crisp cakes they would
make the floor &quot;all over&quot; crumbs. Lucy didn't mind that much, for the
cake was so pretty, she thought it was rather a pity to eat it; but
Tom, watching his opportunity while the elders were talking, hastily
stowed it in his mouth at two bites, and chewed it furtively. As for
Maggie, becoming fascinated, as usual, by a print of Ulysses and
Nausicaa, which uncle Pullet had bought as a &quot;pretty Scripture thing,&quot;
she presently let fall her cake, and in an unlucky movement crushed it
beneath her foot, - a source of so much agitation to aunt Pullet and
conscious disgrace to Maggie, that she began to despair of hearing the
musical snuff-box to-day, till, after some reflection, it occurred to
her that Lucy was in high favor enough to venture on asking for a
tune. So she whispered to Lucy; and Lucy, who always did what she was
desired to do, went up quietly to her uncle's knee, and blush-all over
her neck while she fingered her necklace, said, &quot;Will you please play
us a tune, uncle?&quot;Lucy thought it was by reason of some exceptional talent in uncle
Pullet that the snuff-box played such beautiful tunes, and indeed the
thing was viewed in that light by the majority of his neighbors in
Garum. Mr. Pullet hadboughtthe box, to begin with, and he
understood winding it up, and knew which tune it was going to play
beforehand; altogether the possession of this unique &quot;piece of music&quot;
was a proof that Mr. Pullet's character was not of that entire nullity
which might otherwise have been attributed to it. But uncle Pullet,
when entreated to exhibit his accomplishment, never depreciated it by
a too-ready consent. &quot;We'll see about it,&quot; was the answer he always
gave, carefully abstaining from any sign of compliance till a suitable
number of minutes had passed. Uncle Pullet had a programme for all
great social occasions, and in this way fenced himself in from much
painful confusion and perplexing freedom of will.Perhaps the suspense did heighten Maggie's enjoyment when the fairy
tune began; for the first time she quite forgot that she had a load on
her mind, that Tom was angry with her; and by the time &quot;Hush, ye
pretty warbling choir,&quot; had been played, her face wore that bright
look of happiness, while she sat immovable with her hands clasped,
which sometimes comforted her mother with the sense that Maggie could
look pretty now and then, in spite of her brown skin. But when the
magic music ceased, she jumped up, and running toward Tom, put her arm
round his neck and said, &quot;Oh, Tom, isn't it pretty?&quot;Lest you should think it showed a revolting insensibility in Tom that
he felt any new anger toward Maggie for this uncalled-for and, to him,
inexplicable caress, I must tell you that he had his glass of cowslip
wine in his hand, and that she jerked him so as to make him spill half
of it. He must have been an extreme milksop not to say angrily, &quot;Look
there, now!&quot; especially when his resentment was sanctioned, as it was,
by general disapprobation of Maggie's behavior.&quot;Why don't you sit still, Maggie?&quot; her mother said peevishly.&quot;Little gells mustn't come to see me if they behave in that way,&quot; said
aunt Pullet.&quot;Why, you're too rough, little miss,&quot; said uncle Pullet.Poor Maggie sat down again, with the music all chased out of her soul,
and the seven small demons all in again.Mrs. Tulliver, foreseeing nothing but misbehavior while the children
remained indoors, took an early opportunity of suggesting that, now
they were rested after their walk, they might go and play out of
doors; and aunt Pullet gave permission, only enjoining them not to go
off the paved walks in the garden, and if they wanted to see the
poultry fed, to view them from a distance on the horse-block; a
restriction which had been imposed ever since Tom had been found
guilty of running after the peacock, with an illusory idea that fright
would make one of its feathers drop off.Mrs. Tulliver's thoughts had been temporarily diverted from the
quarrel with Mrs. Glegg by millinery and maternal cares, but now the
great theme of the bonnet was thrown into perspective, and the
children were out of the way, yesterday's anxieties recurred.&quot;It weighs on my mind so as never was,&quot; she said, by way of opening
the subject, &quot;sister Glegg's leaving the house in that way. I'm sure
I'd no wish t' offend a sister.&quot;&quot;Ah,&quot; said aunt Pullet, &quot;there's no accounting for what Jane 'ull do.
I wouldn't speak of it out o' the family, if it wasn't to Dr.
Turnbull; but it's my belief Jane lives too low. I've said so to
Pullet often and often, and he knows it.&quot;&quot;Why, you said so last Monday was a week, when we came away from
drinking tea with 'em,&quot; said Mr. Pullet, beginning to nurse his knee
and shelter it with his pocket-hand-kerchief, as was his way when the
conversation took an interesting turn.&quot;Very like I did,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, &quot;for you remember when I said
things, better than I can remember myself. He's got a wonderful
memory, Pullet has,&quot; she continued, looking pathetically at her
sister. &quot;I should be poorly off if he was to have a stroke, for he
always remembers when I've got to take my doctor's stuff; and I'm
taking three sorts now.&quot;&quot;There's the 'pills as before' every other night, and the new drops at
eleven and four, and the 'fervescing mixture 'when agreeable,'&quot;
rehearsed Mr. Pullet, with a punctuation determined by a lozenge on
his tongue.&quot;Ah, perhaps it 'ud be better for sister Glegg ifshe'dgo to the
doctor sometimes, instead o' chewing Turkey rhubard whenever there's
anything the matter with her,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, who naturally saw
the wide subject of medicine chiefly in relation to Mrs. Glegg.&quot;It's dreadful to think on,&quot; said aunt Pullet, raising her hands and
letting them fall again, &quot;people playing with their own insides in
that way! And it's flying i' the face o' Providence; for what are the
doctors for, if we aren't to call 'em in? And when folks have got the
money to pay for a doctor, it isn't respectable, as I've told Jane
many a time. I'm ashamed of acquaintance knowing it.&quot;&quot;Well,we'veno call to be ashamed,&quot; said Mr. Pullet, &quot;for Doctor
Turnbull hasn't got such another patient as you i' this parish, now
old Mrs. Sutton's gone.&quot;&quot;Pullet keeps all my physic-bottles, did you know, Bessy?&quot; said Mrs.
Pullet. &quot;He won't have one sold. He says it's nothing but right folks
should see 'em when I'm gone. They fill two o' the long store-room
shelves a'ready; but,&quot; she added, beginning to cry a little, &quot;it's
well if they ever fill three. I may go before I've made up the dozen
o' these last sizes. The pill-boxes are in the closet in my
room, - you'll remember that, sister, - but there's nothing to show for
the boluses, if it isn't the bills.&quot;&quot;Don't talk o' your going, sister,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver; &quot;I should have
nobody to stand between me and sister Glegg if you was gone. And
there's nobody but you can get her to make it up with Mr. Tulliver,
for sister Deane's never o' my side, and if she was, it's not to be
looked for as she can speak like them as have got an independent
fortin.&quot;&quot;Well, your husbandisawk'ard, you know, Bessy,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet,
good-naturedly ready to use her deep depression on her sister's
account as well as her own. &quot;He's never behaved quite so pretty to our
family as he should do, and the children take after him, - the boy's
very mischievous, and runs away from his aunts and uncles, and the
gell's rude and brown. It's your bad luck, and I'm sorry for you,
Bessy; for you was allays my favorite sister, and we allays liked the
same patterns.&quot;&quot;I know Tulliver's hasty, and says odd things,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver,
wiping away one small tear from the corner of her eye; &quot;but I'm sure
he's never been the man, since he married me, to object to my making
the friends o' my side o' the family welcome to the house.&quot;&quot;Idon't want to make the worst of you, Bessy,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet,
compassionately, &quot;for I doubt you'll have trouble enough without that;
and your husband's got that poor sister and her children hanging on
him, - and so given to lawing, they say. I doubt he'll leave you poorly
off when he dies. Not as I'd have it said out o' the family.&quot;This view of her position was naturally far from cheering to Mrs.
Tulliver. Her imagination was not easily acted on, but she could not
help thinking that her case was a hard one, since it appeared that
other people thought it hard.&quot;I'm sure, sister, I can't help myself,&quot; she said, urged by the fear
lest her anticipated misfortunes might be held retributive, to take
comprehensive review of her past conduct. &quot;There's no woman strives
more for her children; and I'm sure at scouring-time this Lady-day as
I've had all the bedhangings taken down I did as much as the two gells
put together; and there's the last elder-flower wine I've
made - beautiful! I allays offer it along with the sherry, though
sister Glegg will have it I'm so extravagant; and as for liking to
have my clothes tidy, and not go a fright about the house, there's
nobody in the parish can say anything against me in respect o'
backbiting and making mischief, for I don't wish anybody any harm; and
nobody loses by sending me a porkpie, for my pies are fit to show with
the best o' my neighbors'; and the linen's so in order as if I was to
die to-morrow I shouldn't be ashamed. A woman can do no more nor she
can.&quot;&quot;But it's all o' no use, you know, Bessy,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, holding
her head on one side, and fixing her eyes pathetically on her sister,
&quot;if your husband makes away with his money. Not but what if you was
sold up, and other folks bought your furniture, it's a comfort to
think as you've kept it well rubbed. And there's the linen, with your
maiden mark on, might go all over the country. It 'ud be a sad pity
for our family.&quot; Mrs. Pullet shook her head slowly.&quot;But what can I do, sister?&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver. &quot;Mr. Tulliver's not a
man to be dictated to, - not if I was to go to the parson and get by
heart what I should tell my husband for the best. And I'm sure I don't
pretend to know anything about putting out money and all that. I could
never see into men's business as sister Glegg does.&quot;&quot;Well, you're like me in that, Bessy,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet; &quot;and I think
it 'ud be a deal more becoming o' Jane if she'd have that pier-glass
rubbed oftener, - there was ever so many spots on it last
week, - instead o' dictating to folks as have more comings in than she
ever had, and telling 'em what they're to do with their money. But
Jane and me were allays contrairy; shewouldhave striped things,
and I like spots. You like a spot too, Bessy; we allays hung together
i' that.&quot;&quot;Yes, Sophy,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver, &quot;I remember our having a blue ground
with a white spot both alike, - I've got a bit in a bed-quilt now; and
if you would but go and see sister Glegg, and persuade her to make it
up with Tulliver, I should take it very kind of you. You was allays a
good sister to me.&quot;&quot;But the right thing 'ud be for Tulliver to go and make it up with her
himself, and say he was sorry for speaking so rash. If he's borrowed
money of her, he shouldn't be above that,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, whose
partiality did not blind her to principles; she did not forget what
was due to people of independent fortune.&quot;It's no use talking o' that,&quot; said poor Mrs. Tulliver, almost
peevishly. &quot;If I was to go down on my bare knees on the gravel to
Tulliver, he'd never humble himself.&quot;&quot;Well, you can't expect me to persuadeJaneto beg pardon,&quot; said
Mrs. Pullet. &quot;Her temper's beyond everything; it's well if it doesn't
carry her off her mind, though there neverwasany of our family
went to a madhouse.&quot;&quot;I'm not thinking of her begging pardon,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver. &quot;But if
she'd just take no notice, and not call her money in; as it's not so
much for one sister to ask of another; time 'ud mend things, and
Tulliver 'ud forget all about it, and they'd be friends again.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver, you perceive, was not aware of her husband's
irrevocable determination to pay in the five hundred pounds; at least
such a determination exceeded her powers of belief.&quot;Well, Bessy,&quot; said Mrs. Pullet, mournfully, &quot;Idon't want to help
you on to ruin. I won't be behindhand i' doing you a good turn, if it
is to be done. And I don't like it said among acquaintance as we've
got quarrels in the family. I shall tell Jane that; and I don't mind
driving to Jane's tomorrow, if Pullet doesn't mind. What do you say,
Mr. Pullet?&quot;&quot;I've no objections,&quot; said Mr. Pullet, who was perfectly contented
with any course the quarrel might take, so that Mr. Tulliver did not
apply tohimfor money. Mr. Pullet was nervous about his
investments, and did not see how a man could have any security for his
money unless he turned it into land.After a little further discussion as to whether it would not be better
for Mrs. Tulliver to accompany them on a visit to sister Glegg, Mrs.
Pullet, observing that it was tea-time, turned to reach from a drawer
a delicate damask napkin, which she pinned before her in the fashion
of an apron. The door did, in fact, soon open, but instead of the
tea-tray, Sally introduced an object so startling that both Mrs.
Pullet and Mrs. Tulliver gave a scream, causing uncle Pullet to
swallow his lozenge - for the fifth time in his life, as he afterward
noted.>


In order to see Mr. and Mrs. Glegg at home, we must enter the town of
St. Ogg's, - that venerable town with the red fluted roofs and the
broad warehouse gables, where the black ships unlade themselves of
their burthens from the far north, and carry away, in exchange, the
precious inland products, the well-crushed cheese and the soft fleeces
which my refined readers have doubtless become acquainted with through
the medium of the best classic pastorals.It is one of those old, old towns which impress one as a continuation
and outgrowth of nature, as much as the nests of the bower-birds or
the winding galleries of the white ants; a town which carries the
traces of its long growth and history like a millennial tree, and has
sprung up and developed in the same spot between the river and the low
hill from the time when the Roman legions turned their backs on it
from the camp on the hillside, and the long-haired sea-kings came up
the river and looked with fierce, eager eyes at the fatness of the
land. It is a town &quot;familiar with forgotten years.&quot; The shadow of the
Saxon hero-king still walks there fitfully, reviewing the scenes of
his youth and love-time, and is met by the gloomier shadow of the
dreadful heathen Dane, who was stabbed in the midst of his warriors by
the sword of an invisible avenger, and who rises on autumn evenings
like a white mist from his tumulus on the hill, and hovers in the
court of the old hall by the river-side, the spot where he was thus
miraculously slain in the days before the old hall was built. It was
the Normans who began to build that fine old hall, which is, like the
town, telling of the thoughts and hands of widely sundered
generations; but it is all so old that we look with loving pardon at
its inconsistencies, and are well content that they who built the
stone oriel, and they who built the Gothic fa&Atilde;&sect;ade and towers of finest
small brickwork with the trefoil ornament, and the windows and
battlements defined with stone, did not sacreligiously pull down the
ancient half-timbered body with its oak-roofed banqueting-hall.But older even than this old hall is perhaps the bit of wall now built
into the belfry of the parish church, and said to be a remnant of the
original chapel dedicated to St. Ogg, the patron saint of this ancient
town, of whose history I possess several manuscript versions. I
incline to the briefest, since, if it should not be wholly true, it is
at least likely to contain the least falsehood. &quot;Ogg the son of
Beorl,&quot; says my private hagiographer, &quot;was a boatman who gained a
scanty living by ferrying passengers across the river Floss. And it
came to pass, one evening when the winds were high, that there sat
moaning by the brink of the river a woman with a child in her arms;
and she was clad in rags, and had a worn and withered look, and she
craved to be rowed across the river. And the men thereabout questioned
her, and said, 'Wherefore dost thou desire to cross the river? Tarry
till the morning, and take shelter here for the night; so shalt thou
be wise and not foolish.' Still she went on to mourn and crave. But
Ogg the son of Beorl came up and said, 'I will ferry thee across; it
is enough that thy heart needs it.' And he ferried her across. And it
came to pass, when she stepped ashore, that her rags were turned into
robes of flowing white, and her face became bright with exceeding
beauty, and there was a glory around it, so that she shed a light on
the water like the moon in its brightness. And she said, 'Ogg, the son
of Beorl, thou art blessed in that thou didst not question and wrangle
with the heart's need, but wast smitten with pity, and didst
straightway relieve the same. And from henceforth whoso steps into thy
boat shall be in no peril from the storm; and whenever it puts forth
to the rescue, it shall save the lives both of men and beasts.' And
when the floods came, many were saved by reason of that blessing on
the boat. But when Ogg the son of Beorl died, behold, in the parting
of his soul, the boat loosed itself from its moorings, and was floated
with the ebbing tide in great swiftness to the ocean, and was seen no
more. Yet it was witnessed in the floods of aftertime, that at the
coming on of eventide, Ogg the son of Beorl was always seen with his
boat upon the wide-spreading waters, and the Blessed Virgin sat in the
prow, shedding a light around as of the moon in its brightness, so
that the rowers in the gathering darkness took heart and pulled anew.&quot;This legend, one sees, reflects from a far-off time the visitation of
the floods, which, even when they left human life untouched, were
widely fatal to the helpless cattle, and swept as sudden death over
all smaller living things. But the town knew worse troubles even than
the floods, - troubles of the civil wars, when it was a continual
fighting-place, where first Puritans thanked God for the blood of the
Loyalists, and then Loyalists thanked God for the blood of the
Puritans. Many honest citizens lost all their possessions for
conscience' sake in those times, and went forth beggared from their
native town. Doubtless there are many houses standing now on which
those honest citizens turned their backs in sorrow, - quaint-gabled
houses looking on the river, jammed between newer warehouses, and
penetrated by surprising passages, which turn and turn at sharp angles
till they lead you out on a muddy strand overflowed continually by the
rushing tide. Everywhere the brick houses have a mellow look, and in
Mrs. Glegg's day there was no incongruous new-fashioned smartness, no
plate-glass in shop-windows, no fresh stucco-facing or other
fallacious attempt to make fine old red St. Ogg's wear the air of a
town that sprang up yesterday. The shop-windows were small and
unpretending; for the farmers' wives and daughters who came to do
their shopping on market-days were not to be withdrawn from their
regular well-known shops; and the tradesmen had no wares intended for
customers who would go on their way and be seen no more. Ah! even Mrs.
Glegg's day seems far back in the past now, separated from us by
changes that widen the years. War and the rumor of war had then died
out from the minds of men, and if they were ever thought of by the
farmers in drab greatcoats, who shook the grain out of their
sample-bags and buzzed over it in the full market-place, it was as a
state of things that belonged to a past golden age when prices were
high. Surely the time was gone forever when the broad river could
bring up unwelcome ships; Russia was only the place where the linseed
came from, - the more the better, - making grist for the great vertical
millstones with their scythe-like arms, roaring and grinding and
carefully sweeping as if an informing soul were in them. The
Catholics, bad harvests, and the mysterious fluctuations of trade were
the three evils mankind had to fear; even the floods had not been
great of late years. The mind of St. Ogg's did not look extensively
before or after. It inherited a long past without thinking of it, and
had no eyes for the spirits that walk the streets. Since the centuries
when St. Ogg with his boat and the Virgin Mother at the prow had been
seen on the wide water, so many memories had been left behind, and had
gradually vanished like the receding hilltops! And the present time
was like the level plain where men lose their belief in volcanoes and
earthquakes, thinking to-morrow will be as yesterday, and the giant
forces that used to shake the earth are forever laid to sleep. The
days were gone when people could be greatly wrought upon by their
faith, still less change it; the Catholics were formidable because
they would lay hold of government and property, and burn men alive;
not because any sane and honest parishioner of St. Ogg's could be
brought to believe in the Pope. One aged person remembered how a rude
multitude had been swayed when John Wesley preached in the
cattle-market; but for a long while it had not been expected of
preachers that they should shake the souls of men. An occasional burst
of fervor in Dissenting pulpits on the subject of infant baptism was
the only symptom of a zeal unsuited to sober times when men had done
with change. Protestantism sat at ease, unmindful of schisms, careless
of proselytism: Dissent was an inheritance along with a superior pew
and a business connection; and Churchmanship only wondered
contemptuously at Dissent as a foolish habit that clung greatly to
families in the grocery and chandlering lines, though not incompatible
with prosperous wholesale dealing. But with the Catholic Question had
come a slight wind of controversy to break the calm: the elderly
rector had become occasionally historical and argumentative; and Mr.
Spray, the Independent minister, had begun to preach political
sermons, in which he distinguished with much subtlety between his
fervent belief in the right of the Catholics to the franchise and his
fervent belief in their eternal perdition. Most of Mr. Spray's
hearers, however, were incapable of following his subtleties, and many
old-fashioned Dissenters were much pained by his &quot;siding with the
Catholics&quot;; while others thought he had better let politics alone.
Public spirit was not held in high esteem at St. Ogg's, and men who
busied themselves with political questions were regarded with some
suspicion, as dangerous characters; they were usually persons who had
little or no business of their own to manage, or, if they had, were
likely enough to become insolvent.This was the general aspect of things at St. Ogg's in Mrs. Glegg's
day, and at that particular period in her family history when she had
had her quarrel with Mr. Tulliver. It was a time when ignorance was
much more comfortable than at present, and was received with all the
honors in very good society, without being obliged to dress itself in
an elaborate costume of knowledge; a time when cheap periodicals were
not, and when country surgeons never thought of asking their female
patients if they were fond of reading, but simply took it for granted
that they preferred gossip; a time when ladies in rich silk gowns wore
large pockets, in which they carried a mutton-bone to secure them
against cramp. Mrs. Glegg carried such a bone, which she had inherited
from her grandmother with a brocaded gown that would stand up empty,
like a suit of armor, and a silver-headed walking-stick; for the
Dodson family had been respectable for many generations.Mrs. Glegg had both a front and a back parlor in her excellent house
at St. Ogg's, so that she had two points of view from which she could
observe the weakness of her fellow-beings, and reinforce her
thankfulness for her own exceptional strength of mind. From her front
window she could look down the Tofton Road, leading out of St. Ogg's,
and note the growing tendency to &quot;gadding about&quot; in the wives of men
not retired from business, together with a practice of wearing woven
cotton stockings, which opened a dreary prospect for the coming
generation; and from her back windows she could look down the pleasant
garden and orchard which stretched to the river, and observe the folly
of Mr. Glegg in spending his time among &quot;them flowers and vegetables.&quot;
For Mr. Glegg, having retired from active business as a wool-stapler
for the purpose of enjoying himself through the rest of his life, had
found this last occupation so much more severe than his business, that
he had been driven into amateur hard labor as a dissipation, and
habitually relaxed by doing the work of two ordinary gardeners. The
economizing of a gardener's wages might perhaps have induced Mrs.
Glegg to wink at this folly, if it were possible for a healthy female
mind even to simulate respect for a husband's hobby. But it is well
known that this conjugal complacency belongs only to the weaker
portion of the sex, who are scarcely alive to the responsibilities of
a wife as a constituted check on her husband's pleasures, which are
hardly ever of a rational or commendable kind.Mr. Glegg on his side, too, had a double source of mental occupation,
which gave every promise of being inexhaustible. On the one hand, he
surprised himself by his discoveries in natural history, finding that
his piece of garden-ground contained wonderful caterpillars, slugs,
and insects, which, so far as he had heard, had never before attracted
human observation; and he noticed remarkable coincidences between
these zoological phenomena and the great events of that time, - as, for
example, that before the burning of York Minster there had been
mysterious serpentine marks on the leaves of the rose-trees, together
with an unusual prevalence of slugs, which he had been puzzled to know
the meaning of, until it flashed upon him with this melancholy
conflagration. (Mr. Glegg had an unusual amount of mental activity,
which, when disengaged from the wool business, naturally made itself a
pathway in other directions.) And his second subject of meditation was
the &quot;contrairiness&quot; of the female mind, as typically exhibited in Mrs.
Glegg. That a creature made - in a genealogical sense - out of a man's
rib, and in this particular case maintained in the highest
respectability without any trouble of her own, should be normally in a
state of contradiction to the blandest propositions and even to the
most accommodating concessions, was a mystery in the scheme of things
to which he had often in vain sought a clew in the early chapters of
Genesis. Mr. Glegg had chosen the eldest Miss Dodson as a handsome
embodiment of female prudence and thrift, and being himself of a
money-getting, money-keeping turn, had calculated on much conjugal
harmony. But in that curious compound, the feminine character, it may
easily happen that the flavor is unpleasant in spite of excellent
ingredients; and a fine systematic stinginess may be accompanied with
a seasoning that quite spoils its relish. Now, good Mr. Glegg himself
was stingy in the most amiable manner; his neighbors called him
&quot;near,&quot; which always means that the person in question is a lovable
skinflint. If you expressed a preference for cheese-parings, Mr. Glegg
would remember to save them for you, with a good-natured delight in
gratifying your palate, and he was given to pet all animals which
required no appreciable keep. There was no humbug or hypocrisy about
Mr. Glegg; his eyes would have watered with true feeling over the sale
of a widow's furniture, which a five-pound note from his side pocket
would have prevented; but a donation of five pounds to a person &quot;in a
small way of life&quot; would have seemed to him a mad kind of lavishness
rather than &quot;charity,&quot; which had always presented itself to him as a
contribution of small aids, not a neutralizing of misfortune. And Mr.
Glegg was just as fond of saving other people's money as his own; he
would have ridden as far round to avoid a turnpike when his expenses
were to be paid for him, as when they were to come out of his own
pocket, and was quite zealous in trying to induce indifferent
acquaintances to adopt a cheap substitute for blacking. This
inalienable habit of saving, as an end in itself, belonged to the
industrious men of business of a former generation, who made their
fortunes slowly, almost as the tracking of the fox belongs to the
harrier, - it constituted them a &quot;race,&quot; which is nearly lost in these
days of rapid money-getting, when lavishness comes close on the back
of want. In old-fashioned times an &quot;independence&quot; was hardly ever made
without a little miserliness as a condition, and you would have found
that quality in every provincial district, combined with characters as
various as the fruits from which we can extract acid. The true
Harpagons were always marked and exceptional characters; not so the
worthy tax-payers, who, having once pinched from real necessity,
retained even in the midst of their comfortable retirement, with their
wallfruit and wine-bins, the habit of regarding life as an ingenious
process of nibbling out one's livelihood without leaving any
perceptible deficit, and who would have been as immediately prompted
to give up a newly taxed luxury when they had had their clear five
hundred a year, as when they had only five hundred pounds of capital.
Mr. Glegg was one of these men, found so impracticable by chancellors
of the exchequer; and knowing this, you will be the better able to
understand why he had not swerved from the conviction that he had made
an eligible marriage, in spite of the too-pungent seasoning that
nature had given to the eldest Miss Dodson's virtues. A man with an
affectionate disposition, who finds a wife to concur with his
fundamental idea of life, easily comes to persuade himself that no
other woman would have suited him so well, and does a little daily
snapping and quarrelling without any sense of alienation. Mr. Glegg,
being of a reflective turn, and no longer occupied with wool, had much
wondering meditation on the peculiar constitution of the female mind
as unfolded to him in his domestic life; and yet he thought Mrs.
Glegg's household ways a model for her sex. It struck him as a
pitiable irregularity in other women if they did not roll up their
table-napkins with the same tightness and emphasis as Mrs. Glegg did,
if their pastry had a less leathery consistence, and their damson
cheese a less venerable hardness than hers; nay, even the peculiar
combination of grocery and druglike odors in Mrs. Glegg's private
cupboard impressed him as the only right thing in the way of cupboard
smells. I am not sure that he would not have longed for the
quarrelling again, if it had ceased for an entire week; and it is
certain that an acquiescent, mild wife would have left his meditations
comparatively jejune and barren of mystery.Mr. Glegg's unmistakable kind-heartedness was shown in this, that it
pained him more to see his wife at variance with others, - even with
Dolly, the servant, - than to be in a state of cavil with her himself;
and the quarrel between her and Mr. Tulliver vexed him so much that it
quite nullified the pleasure he would otherwise have had in the state
of his early cabbages, as he walked in his garden before breakfast the
next morning. Still, he went in to breakfast with some slight hope
that, now Mrs. Glegg had &quot;slept upon it,&quot; her anger might be subdued
enough to give way to her usually strong sense of family decorum. She
had been used to boast that there had never been any of those deadly
quarrels among the Dodsons which had disgraced other families; that no
Dodson had ever been &quot;cut off with a shilling,&quot; and no cousin of the
Dodsons disowned; as, indeed, why should they be? For they had no
cousins who had not money out at use, or some houses of their own, at
the very least.There was one evening-cloud which had always disappeared from Mrs.
Glegg's brow when she sat at the breakfast-table. It was her fuzzy
front of curls; for as she occupied herself in household matters in
the morning it would have been a mere extravagance to put on anything
so superfluous to the making of leathery pastry as a fuzzy curled
front. By half-past ten decorum demanded the front; until then Mrs.
Glegg could economize it, and society would never be any the wiser.
But the absence of that cloud only left it more apparent that the
cloud of severity remained; and Mr. Glegg, perceiving this, as he sat
down to his milkporridge, which it was his old frugal habit to stem
his morning hunger with, prudently resolved to leave the first remark
to Mrs. Glegg, lest, to so delicate an article as a lady's temper, the
slightest touch should do mischief. People who seem to enjoy their ill
temper have a way of keeping it in fine condition by inflicting
privations on themselves. That was Mrs. Glegg's way. She made her tea
weaker than usual this morning, and declined butter. It was a hard
case that a vigorous mood for quarrelling, so highly capable of using
an opportunity, should not meet with a single remark from Mr. Glegg on
which to exercise itself. But by and by it appeared that his silence
would answer the purpose, for he heard himself apostrophized at last
in that tone peculiar to the wife of one's bosom.&quot;Well, Mr. Glegg! it's a poor return I get for making you the wife
I've made you all these years. If this is the way I'm to be treated,
I'd better ha' known it before my poor father died, and then, when I'd
wanted a home, I should ha' gone elsewhere, as the choice was offered
me.&quot;Mr. Glegg paused from his porridge and looked up, not with any new
amazement, but simply with that quiet, habitual wonder with which we
regard constant mysteries.&quot;Why, Mrs. G., what have I done now?&quot;&quot;Done now, Mr. Glegg?done now?- I'm sorry for you.&quot;Not seeing his way to any pertinent answer, Mr. Glegg reverted to his
porridge.&quot;There's husbands in the world,&quot; continued Mrs. Glegg, after a pause,
&quot;as 'ud have known how to do something different to siding with
everybody else against their own wives. Perhaps I'm wrong and you can
teach me better. But I've allays heard as it's the husband's place to
stand by the wife, instead o' rejoicing and triumphing when folks
insult her.&quot;&quot;Now, what call have you to say that?&quot; said Mr. Glegg, rather warmly,
for though a kind man, he was not as meek as Moses. &quot;When did I
rejoice or triumph over you?&quot;&quot;There's ways o' doing things worse than speaking out plain, Mr.
Glegg. I'd sooner you'd tell me to my face as you make light of me,
than try to make out as everybody's in the right but me, and come to
your breakfast in the morning, as I've hardly slept an hour this
night, and sulk at me as if I was the dirt under your feet.&quot;&quot;Sulk at you?&quot; said Mr. Glegg, in a tone of angry facetiousness.
&quot;You're like a tipsy man as thinks everybody's had too much but
himself.&quot;&quot;Don't lower yourself with using coarse language tome, Mr. Glegg!
It makes you look very small, though you can't see yourself,&quot; said
Mrs. Glegg, in a tone of energetic compassion. &quot;A man in your place
should set an example, and talk more sensible.&quot;&quot;Yes; but will you listen to sense?&quot; retorted Mr. Glegg, sharply. &quot;The
best sense I can talk to you is what I said last night, - as you're i'
the wrong to think o' calling in your money, when it's safe enough if
you'd let it alone, all because of a bit of a tiff, and I was in hopes
you'd ha' altered your mind this morning. But if you'd like to call it
in, don't do it in a hurry now, and breed more enmity in the family,
but wait till there's a pretty mortgage to be had without any trouble.
You'd have to set the lawyer to work now to find an investment, and
make no end o' expense.&quot;Mrs. Glegg felt there was really something in this, but she tossed her
head and emitted a guttural interjection to indicate that her silence
was only an armistice, not a peace. And, in fact hostilities soon
broke out again.&quot;I'll thank you for my cup o' tea, now, Mrs. G.,&quot; said Mr. Glegg,
seeing that she did not proceed to give it him as usual, when he had
finished his porridge. She lifted the teapot with a slight toss of the
head, and said, -&quot;I'm glad to hear you'llthankme, Mr. Glegg. It's little thanksIget for what I do for folks i' this world. Though there's never a
woman o'yourside o' the family, Mr. Glegg, as is fit to stand up
with me, and I'd say it if I was on my dying bed. Not but what I've
allays conducted myself civil to your kin, and there isn't one of 'em
can say the contrary, though my equils they aren't, and nobody shall
make me say it.&quot;&quot;You'd better leave finding fault wi' my kin till you've left off
quarrelling with you own, Mrs. G.,&quot; said Mr. Glegg, with angry
sarcasm. &quot;I'll trouble you for the milk-jug.&quot;&quot;That's as false a word as ever you spoke, Mr. Glegg,&quot; said the lady,
pouring out the milk with unusual profuseness, as much as to say, if
he wanted milk he should have it with a vengeance. &quot;And you know it's
false. I'm not the woman to quarrel with my own kin;youmay, for
I've known you to do it.&quot;&quot;Why, what did you call it yesterday, then, leaving your sister's
house in a tantrum?&quot;&quot;I'd no quarrel wi' my sister, Mr. Glegg, and it's false to say it.
Mr. Tulliver's none o' my blood, and it was him quarrelled with me,
and drove me out o' the house. But perhaps you'd have had me stay and
be swore at, Mr. Glegg; perhaps you was vexed not to hear more abuse
and foul language poured out upo' your own wife. But, let me tell you,
it'syourdisgrace.&quot;&quot;Did ever anybody hear the like i' this parish?&quot; said Mr. Glegg,
getting hot. &quot;A woman, with everything provided for her, and allowed
to keep her own money the same as if it was settled on her, and with a
gig new stuffed and lined at no end o' expense, and provided for when
I die beyond anything she could expect - to go on i' this way, biting
and snapping like a mad dog! It's beyond everything, as God A 'mighty
should ha' made womenso.&quot; (These last words were uttered in a tone
of sorrowful agitation. Mr. Glegg pushed his tea from him, and tapped
the table with both his hands.)&quot;Well, Mr. Glegg, if those are your feelings, it's best they should be
known,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg, taking off her napkin, and folding it in an
excited manner. &quot;But if you talk o' my being provided for beyond what
I could expect, I beg leave to tell you as I'd a right to expect a
many things as I don't find. And as to my being like a mad dog, it's
well if you're not cried shame on by the county for your treatment of
me, for it's what I can't bear, and I won't bear -  - &quot;Here Mrs. Glegg's voice intimated that she was going to cry, and
breaking off from speech, she rang the bell violently.&quot;Sally,&quot; she said, rising from her chair, and speaking in rather a
choked voice, &quot;light a fire up-stairs, and put the blinds down. Mr.
Glegg, you'll please to order what you'd like for dinner. I shall have
gruel.&quot;Mrs. Glegg walked across the room to the small book-case, and took
down Baxter's &quot;Saints' Everlasting Rest,&quot; which she carried with her
up-stairs. It was the book she was accustomed to lay open before her
on special occasions, - on wet Sunday mornings, or when she heard of a
death in the family, or when, as in this case, her quarrel with Mr.
Glegg had been set an octave higher than usual.But Mrs. Glegg carried something else up-stairs with her, which,
together with the &quot;Saints' Rest&quot; and the gruel, may have had some
influence in gradually calming her feelings, and making it possible
for her to endure existence on the ground-floor, shortly before
tea-time. This was, partly, Mr. Glegg's suggestion that she would do
well to let her five hundred lie still until a good investment turned
up; and, further, his parenthetic hint at his handsome provision for
her in case of his death. Mr. Glegg, like all men of his stamp, was
extremely reticent about his will; and Mrs. Glegg, in her gloomier
moments, had forebodings that, like other husbands of whom she had
heard, he might cherish the mean project of heightening her grief at
his death by leaving her poorly off, in which case she was firmly
resolved that she would have scarcely any weeper on her bonnet, and
would cry no more than if he had been a second husband. But if he had
really shown her any testamentary tenderness, it would be affecting to
think of him, poor man, when he was gone; and even his foolish fuss
about the flowers and garden-stuff, and his insistence on the subject
of snails, would be touching when it was once fairly at an end. To
survive Mr. Glegg, and talk eulogistically of him as a man who might
have his weaknesses, but who had done the right thing by her,
not-withstanding his numerous poor relations; to have sums of interest
coming in more frequently, and secrete it in various corners, baffling
to the most ingenious of thieves (for, to Mrs. Glegg's mind, banks and
strong-boxes would have nullified the pleasure of property; she might
as well have taken her food in capsules); finally, to be looked up to
by her own family and the neighborhood, so as no woman can ever hope
to be who has not the pr&Atilde;&brvbar;terite and present dignity comprised in being
a &quot;widow well left,&quot; - all this made a flattering and conciliatory view
of the future. So that when good Mr. Glegg, restored to good humor by
much hoeing, and moved by the sight of his wife's empty chair, with
her knitting rolled up in the corner, went up-stairs to her, and
observed that the bell had been tolling for poor Mr. Morton, Mrs.
Glegg answered magnanimously, quite as if she had been an uninjured
woman: &quot;Ah! then, there'll be a good business for somebody to take
to.&quot;Baxter had been open at least eight hours by this time, for it was
nearly five o'clock; and if people are to quarrel often, it follows as
a corollary that their quarrels cannot be protracted beyond certain
limits.Mr. and Mrs. Glegg talked quite amicably about the Tullivers that
evening. Mr. Glegg went the length of admitting that Tulliver was a
sad man for getting into hot water, and was like enough to run through
his property; and Mrs. Glegg, meeting this acknowledgment half-way,
declared that it was beneath her to take notice of such a man's
conduct, and that, for her sister's sake, she would let him keep the
five hundred a while longer, for when she put it out on a mortgage she
should only get four per cent.>


&quot;Suppose sister Glegg should call her money in; it 'ud be very awkward
for you to have to raise five hundred pounds now,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver
to her husband that evening, as she took a plaintive review of the
day.Mrs. Tulliver had lived thirteen years with her husband, yet she
retained in all the freshness of her early married life a facility of
saying things which drove him in the opposite direction to the one she
desired. Some minds are wonderful for keeping their bloom in this way,
as a patriarchal goldfish apparently retains to the last its youthful
illusion that it can swim in a straight line beyond the encircling
glass. Mrs. Tulliver was an amiable fish of this kind, and after
running her head against the same resisting medium for thirteen years
would go at it again to-day with undulled alacrity.This observation of hers tended directly to convince Mr. Tulliver that
it would not be at all awkward for him to raise five hundred pounds;
and when Mrs. Tulliver became rather pressing to knowhowhe would
raise it without mortgaging the mill and the house which he had said
he neverwouldmortgage, since nowadays people were none so ready to
lend money without security, Mr. Tulliver, getting warm, declared that
Mrs. Glegg might do as she liked about calling in her money, he should
pay it in whether or not. He was not going to be beholden to his
wife's sisters. When a man had married into a family where there was a
whole litter of women, he might have plenty to put up with if he
chose. But Mr. Tulliver didnotchoose.Mrs. Tulliver cried a little in a trickling, quiet way as she put on
her nightcap; but presently sank into a comfortable sleep, lulled by
the thought that she would talk everything over with her sister Pullet
to-morrow, when she was to take the children to Garum Firs to tea. Not
that she looked forward to any distinct issue from that talk; but it
seemed impossible that past events should be so obstinate as to remain
unmodified when they were complained against.Her husband lay awake rather longer, for he too was thinking of a
visit he would pay on the morrow; and his ideas on the subject were
not of so vague and soothing a kind as those of his amiable partner.Mr. Tulliver, when under the influence of a strong feeling, had a
promptitude in action that may seem inconsistent with that painful
sense of the complicated, puzzling nature of human affairs under which
his more dispassionate deliberations were conducted; but it is really
not improbable that there was a direct relation between these
apparently contradictory phenomena, since I have observed that for
getting a strong impression that a skein is tangled there is nothing
like snatching hastily at a single thread. It was owing to this
promptitude that Mr. Tulliver was on horseback soon after dinner the
next day (he was not dyspeptic) on his way to Basset to see his sister
Moss and her husband. For having made up his mind irrevocably that he
would pay Mrs. Glegg her loan of five hundred pounds, it naturally
occurred to him that he had a promissory note for three hundred pounds
lent to his brother-in-law Moss; and if the said brother-in-law could
manage to pay in the money within a given time, it would go far to
lessen the fallacious air of inconvenience which Mr. Tulliver's
spirited step might have worn in the eyes of weak people who require
to know preciselyhowa thing is to be done before they are strongly
confident that it will be easy.For Mr. Tulliver was in a position neither new nor striking, but, like
other every-day things, sure to have a cumulative effect that will be
felt in the long run: he was held to be a much more substantial man
than he really was. And as we are all apt to believe what the world
believes about us, it was his habit to think of failure and ruin with
the same sort of remote pity with which a spare, long-necked man hears
that his plethoric short-necked neighbor is stricken with apoplexy. He
had been always used to hear pleasant jokes about his advantages as a
man who worked his own mill, and owned a pretty bit of land; and these
jokes naturally kept up his sense that he was a man of considerable
substance. They gave a pleasant flavor to his glass on a market-day,
and if it had not been for the recurrence of half-yearly payments, Mr.
Tulliver would really have forgotten that there was a mortgage of two
thousand pounds on his very desirable freehold. That was not
altogether his own fault, since one of the thousand pounds was his
sister's fortune, which he had to pay on her marriage; and a man who
has neighbors thatwillgo to law with him is not likely to pay off
his mortgages, especially if he enjoys the good opinion of
acquaintances who want to borrow a hundred pounds on security too
lofty to be represented by parchment. Our friend Mr. Tulliver had a
good-natured fibre in him, and did not like to give harsh refusals
even to his sister, who had not only come in to the world in that
superfluous way characteristic of sisters, creating a necessity for
mortgages, but had quite thrown herself away in marriage, and had
crowned her mistakes by having an eighth baby. On this point Mr.
Tulliver was conscious of being a little weak; but he apologized to
himself by saying that poor Gritty had been a good-looking wench
before she married Moss; he would sometimes say this even with a
slight tremulousness in his voice. But this morning he was in a mood
more becoming a man of business, and in the course of his ride along
the Basset lanes, with their deep ruts, - lying so far away from a
market-town that the labor of drawing produce and manure was enough to
take away the best part of the profits on such poor land as that
parish was made of, - he got up a due amount of irritation against Moss
as a man without capital, who, if murrain and blight were abroad, was
sure to have his share of them, and who, the more you tried to help
him out of the mud, would sink the further in. It would do him good
rather than harm, now, if he were obliged to raise this three hundred
pounds; it would make him look about him better, and not act so
foolishly about his wool this year as he did the last; in fact, Mr.
Tulliver had been too easy with his brother-in-law, and because he had
let the interest run on for two years, Moss was likely enough to think
that he should never be troubled about the principal. But Mr. Tulliver
was determined not to encourage such shuffling people any longer; and
a ride along the Basset lanes was not likely to enervate a man's
resolution by softening his temper. The deep-trodden hoof-marks, made
in the muddiest days of winter, gave him a shake now and then which
suggested a rash but stimulating snarl at the father of lawyers, who,
whether by means of his hoof or otherwise, had doubtless something to
do with this state of the roads; and the abundance of foul land and
neglected fences that met his eye, though they made no part of his
brother Moss's farm, strongly contributed to his dissatisfaction with
that unlucky agriculturist. If this wasn't Moss's fallow, it might
have been; Basset was all alike; it was a beggarly parish, in Mr.
Tulliver's opinion, and his opinion was certainly not groundless.
Basset had a poor soil, poor roads, a poor non-resident landlord, a
poor non-resident vicar, and rather less than half a curate, also
poor. If any one strongly impressed with the power of the human mind
to triumph over circumstances will contend that the parishioners of
Basset might nevertheless have been a very superior class of people, I
have nothing to urge against that abstract proposition; I only know
that, in point of fact, the Basset mind was in strict keeping with its
circumstances. The muddy lanes, green or clayey, that seemed to the
unaccustomed eye to lead nowhere but into each other, did really lead,
with patience, to a distant high-road; but there were many feet in
Basset which they led more frequently to a centre of dissipation,
spoken of formerly as the &quot;Markis o' Granby,&quot; but among intimates as
&quot;Dickison's.&quot; A large low room with a sanded floor; a cold scent of
tobacco, modified by undetected beer-dregs; Mr. Dickison leaning
against the door-post with a melancholy pimpled face, looking as
irrelevant to the daylight as a last night's guttered candle, - all
this may not seem a very seductive form of temptation; but the
majority of men in Basset found it fatally alluring when encountered
on their road toward four o'clock on a wintry afternoon; and if any
wife in Basset wished to indicate that her husband was not a
pleasure-seeking man, she could hardly do it more emphatically than by
saying that he didn't spend a shilling at Dickison's from one
Whitsuntide to another. Mrs. Moss had said so ofherhusband more
than once, when her brother was in a mood to find fault with him, as
he certainly was to-day. And nothing could be less pacifying to Mr.
Tulliver than the behavior of the farmyard gate, which he no sooner
attempted to push open with his riding-stick than it acted as gates
without the upper hinge are known to do, to the peril of shins,
whether equine or human. He was about to get down and lead his horse
through the damp dirt of the hollow farmyard, shadowed drearily by the
large half-timbered buildings, up to the long line of tumble-down
dwelling-houses standing on a raised causeway; but the timely
appearance of a cowboy saved him that frustration of a plan he had
determined on, - namely, not to get down from his horse during this
visit. If a man means to be hard, let him keep in his saddle and speak
from that height, above the level of pleading eyes, and with the
command of a distant horizon. Mrs. Moss heard the sound of the horse's
feet, and, when her brother rode up, was already outside the kitchen
door, with a half-weary smile on her face, and a black-eyed baby in
her arms. Mrs. Moss's face bore a faded resemblance to her brother's;
baby's little fat hand, pressed against her cheek, seemed to show more
strikingly that the cheek was faded.&quot;Brother, I'm glad to see you,&quot; she said, in an affectionate tone. &quot;I
didn't look for you to-day. How do you do?&quot;&quot;Oh, pretty well, Mrs. Moss, pretty well,&quot; answered the brother, with
cool deliberation, as if it were rather too forward of her to ask that
question. She knew at once that her brother was not in a good humor;
he never called her Mrs. Moss except when he was angry, and when they
were in company. But she thought it was in the order of nature that
people who were poorly off should be snubbed. Mrs. Moss did not take
her stand on the equality of the human race; she was a patient,
prolific, loving-hearted woman.&quot;Your husband isn't in the house, I suppose?&quot; added Mr. Tulliver after
a grave pause, during which four children had run out, like chickens
whose mother has been suddenly in eclipse behind the hen-coop.&quot;No,&quot; said Mrs. Moss, &quot;but he's only in the potato-field yonders.
Georgy, run to the Far Close in a minute, and tell father your uncle's
come. You'll get down, brother, won't you, and take something?&quot;&quot;No, no; I can't get down. I must be going home again directly,&quot; said
Mr. Tulliver, looking at the distance.&quot;And how's Mrs. Tulliver and the children?&quot; said Mrs. Moss, humbly,
not daring to press her invitation.&quot;Oh, pretty well. Tom's going to a new school at Midsummer, - a deal of
expense to me. It's bad work for me, lying out o' my money.&quot;&quot;I wish you'd be so good as let the children come and see their
cousins some day. My little uns want to see their cousin Maggie so as
never was. And me her godmother, and so fond of her; there's nobody
'ud make a bigger fuss with her, according to what they've got. And I
know she likes to come, for she's a loving child, and how quick and
clever she is, to be sure!&quot;If Mrs. Moss had been one of the most astute women in the world,
instead of being one of the simplest, she could have thought of
nothing more likely to propitiate her brother than this praise of
Maggie. He seldom found any one volunteering praise of &quot;the little
wench&quot;; it was usually left entirely to himself to insist on her
merits. But Maggie always appeared in the most amiable light at her
aunt Moss's; it was her Alsatia, where she was out of the reach of
law, - if she upset anything, dirtied her shoes, or tore her frock,
these things were matters of course at her aunt Moss's. In spite of
himself, Mr. Tulliver's eyes got milder, and he did not look away from
his sister as he said, -&quot;Ay; she's fonder o' you than o' the other aunts, I think. She takes
after our family: not a bit of her mother's in her.&quot;&quot;Moss says she's just like what I used to be,&quot; said Mrs. Moss, &quot;though
I was never so quick and fond o' the books. But I think my Lizzy's
like her;she'ssharp. Come here, Lizzy, my dear, and let your uncle
see you; he hardly knows you, you grow so fast.&quot;Lizzy, a black-eyed child of seven, looked very shy when her mother
drew her forward, for the small Mosses were much in awe of their uncle
from Dorlcote Mill. She was inferior enough to Maggie in fire and
strength of expression to make the resemblance between the two
entirely flattering to Mr. Tulliver's fatherly love.&quot;Ay, they're a bit alike,&quot; he said, looking kindly at the little
figure in the soiled pinafore. &quot;They both take after our mother.
You've got enough o' gells, Gritty,&quot; he added, in a tone half
compassionate, half reproachful.&quot;Four of 'em, bless 'em!&quot; said Mrs. Moss, with a sigh, stroking
Lizzy's hair on each side of her forehead; &quot;as many as there's boys.
They've got a brother apiece.&quot;&quot;Ah, but they must turn out and fend for themselves,&quot; said Mr.
Tulliver, feeling that his severity was relaxing and trying to brace
it by throwing out a wholesome hint &quot;They mustn't look to hanging on
their brothers.&quot;&quot;No; but I hope their brothers 'ull love the poor things, and remember
they came o' one father and mother; the lads 'ull never be the poorer
for that,&quot; said Mrs. Moss, flashing out with hurried timidity, like a
half-smothered fire.Mr. Tulliver gave his horse a little stroke on the flank, then checked
it, and said angrily, &quot;Stand still with you!&quot; much to the astonishment
of that innocent animal.&quot;And the more there is of 'em, the more they must love one another,&quot;
Mrs. Moss went on, looking at her children with a didactic purpose.
But she turned toward her brother again to say, &quot;Not but what I hope
your boy 'ull allays be good to his sister, though there's but two of
'em, like you and me, brother.&quot;The arrow went straight to Mr. Tulliver's heart. He had not a rapid
imagination, but the thought of Maggie was very near to him, and he
was not long in seeing his relation to his own sister side by side
with Tom's relation to Maggie. Would the little wench ever be poorly
off, and Tom rather hard upon her?&quot;Ay, ay, Gritty,&quot; said the miller, with a new softness in his tone;
&quot;but I've allays done what I could for you,&quot; he added, as if
vindicating himself from a reproach.&quot;I'm not denying that, brother, and I'm noways ungrateful,&quot; said poor
Mrs. Moss, too fagged by toil and children to have strength left for
any pride. &quot;But here's the father. What a while you've been, Moss!&quot;&quot;While, do you call it?&quot; said Mr. Moss, feeling out of breath and
injured. &quot;I've been running all the way. Won't you 'light, Mr.
Tulliver?&quot;&quot;Well, I'll just get down and have a bit o' talk with you in the
garden,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, thinking that he should be more likely to
show a due spirit of resolve if his sister were not present.He got down, and passed with Mr. Moss into the garden, toward an old
yew-tree arbor, while his sister stood tapping her baby on the back
and looking wistfully after them.Their entrance into the yew-tree arbor surprised several fowls that
were recreating themselves by scratching deep holes in the dusty
ground, and at once took flight with much pother and cackling. Mr.
Tulliver sat down on the bench, and tapping the ground curiously here
and there with his stick, as if he suspected some hollowness, opened
the conversation by observing, with something like a snarl in his
tone, -&quot;Why, you've got wheat again in that Corner Close, I see; and never a
bit o' dressing on it. You'll do no good with it this year.&quot;Mr. Moss, who, when he married Miss Tulliver, had been regarded as the
buck of Basset, now wore a beard nearly a week old, and had the
depressed, unexpectant air of a machine-horse. He answered in a
patient-grumbling tone, &quot;Why, poor farmers like me must do as they
can; they must leave it to them as have got money to play with, to put
half as much into the ground as they mean to get out of it.&quot;&quot;I don't know who should have money to play with, if it isn't them as
can borrow money without paying interest,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, who
wished to get into a slight quarrel; it was the most natural and easy
introduction to calling in money.&quot;I know I'm behind with the interest,&quot; said Mr. Moss, &quot;but I was so
unlucky wi' the wool last year; and what with the Missis being laid up
so, things have gone awk'arder nor usual.&quot;&quot;Ay,&quot; snarled Mr. Tulliver, &quot;there's folks as things 'ull allays go
awk'ard with; empty sacks 'ull never stand upright.&quot;&quot;Well, I don't know what fault you've got to find wi' me, Mr.
Tulliver,&quot; said Mr. Moss, deprecatingly; &quot;I know there isn't a
day-laborer works harder.&quot;&quot;What's the use o' that,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, sharply, &quot;when a man
marries, and's got no capital to work his farm but his wife's bit o'
fortin? I was against it from the first; but you'd neither of you
listen to me. And I can't lie out o' my money any longer, for I've got
to pay five hundred o' Mrs. Glegg's, and there'll be Tom an expense to
me. I should find myself short, even saying I'd got back all as is my
own. You must look about and see how you can pay me the three hundred
pound.&quot;&quot;Well, if that's what you mean,&quot; said Mr. Moss, looking blankly before
him, &quot;we'd better be sold up, and ha' done with it; I must part wi'
every head o' stock I've got, to pay you and the landlord too.&quot;Poor relations are undeniably irritating, - their existence is so
entirely uncalled for on our part, and they are almost always very
faulty people. Mr. Tulliver had succeeded in getting quite as much
irritated with Mr. Moss as he had desired, and he was able to say
angrily, rising from his seat, -&quot;Well, you must do as you can.Ican't find money for everybody else
as well as myself. I must look to my own business and my own family. I
can't lie out o' my money any longer. You must raise it as quick as
you can.&quot;Mr. Tulliver walked abruptly out of the arbor as he uttered the last
sentence, and, without looking round at Mr. Moss, went on to the
kitchen door, where the eldest boy was holding his horse, and his
sister was waiting in a state of wondering alarm, which was not
without its alleviations, for baby was making pleasant gurgling
sounds, and performing a great deal of finger practice on the faded
face. Mrs. Moss had eight children, but could never overcome her
regret that the twins had not lived. Mr. Moss thought their removal
was not without its consolations. &quot;Won't you come in, brother?&quot; she
said, looking anxiously at her husband, who was walking slowly up,
while Mr. Tulliver had his foot already in the stirrup.&quot;No, no; good-by,&quot; said he, turning his horse's head, and riding away.No man could feel more resolute till he got outside the yard gate, and
a little way along the deep-rutted lane; but before he reached the
next turning, which would take him out of sight of the dilapidated
farm-buildings, he appeared to be smitten by some sudden thought. He
checked his horse, and made it stand still in the same spot for two or
three minutes, during which he turned his head from side to side in a
melancholy way, as if he were looking at some painful object on more
sides than one. Evidently, after his fit of promptitude, Mr. Tulliver
was relapsing into the sense that this is a puzzling world. He turned
his horse, and rode slowly back, giving vent to the climax of feeling
which had determined this movement by saying aloud, as he struck his
horse, &quot;Poor little wench! she'll have nobody but Tom, belike, when
I'm gone.&quot;Mr. Tulliver's return into the yard was descried by several young
Mosses, who immediately ran in with the exciting news to their mother,
so that Mrs. Moss was again on the door-step when her brother rode up.
She had been crying, but was rocking baby to sleep in her arms now,
and made no ostentatious show of sorrow as her brother looked at her,
but merely said:&quot;The father's gone to the field, again, if you want him, brother.&quot;&quot;No, Gritty, no,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, in a gentle tone. &quot;Don't you
fret, - that's all, - I'll make a shift without the money a bit, only
you must be as clever and contriving as you can.&quot;Mrs. Moss's tears came again at this unexpected kindness, and she
could say nothing.&quot;Come, come! - the little wench shall come and see you. I'll bring her
and Tom some day before he goes to school. You mustn't fret. I'll
allays be a good brother to you.&quot;&quot;Thank you for that word, brother,&quot; said Mrs. Moss, drying her tears;
then turning to Lizzy, she said, &quot;Run now, and fetch the colored egg
for cousin Maggie.&quot; Lizzy ran in, and quickly reappeared with a small
paper parcel.&quot;It's boiled hard, brother, and colored with thrums, very pretty; it
was done o' purpose for Maggie. Will you please to carry it in your
pocket?&quot;&quot;Ay, ay,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, putting it carefully in his side pocket.
&quot;Good-by.&quot;And so the respectable miller returned along the Basset lanes rather
more puzzled than before as to ways and means, but still with the
sense of a danger escaped. It had come across his mind that if he were
hard upon his sister, it might somehow tend to make Tom hard upon
Maggie at some distant day, when her father was no longer there to
take her part; for simple people, like our friend Mr. Tulliver, are
apt to clothe unimpeachable feelings in erroneous ideas, and this was
his confused way of explaining to himself that his love and anxiety
for &quot;the little wench&quot; had given him a new sensibility toward his
sister.>


Owing to this new adjustment of Mrs. Glegg's thoughts, Mrs. Pullet
found her task of mediation the next day surprisingly easy. Mrs.
Glegg, indeed checked her rather sharply for thinking it would be
necessary to tell her elder sister what was the right mode of behavior
in family matters. Mrs. Pullet's argument, that it would look ill in
the neighborhood if people should have it in their power to say that
there was a quarrel in the family, was particularly offensive. If the
family name never suffered except through Mrs. Glegg, Mrs. Pullet
might lay her head on her pillow in perfect confidence.&quot;It's not to be expected, I suppose,&quot; observed Mrs. Glegg, by way of
winding up the subject, &quot;as I shall go to the mill again before Bessy
comes to see me, or as I shall go and fall down o' my knees to Mr.
Tulliver, and ask his pardon for showing him favors; but I shall bear
no malice, and when Mr. Tulliver speaks civil to me, I'll speak civil
to him. Nobody has any call to tell me what's becoming.&quot;Finding it unnecessary to plead for the Tullivers, it was natural that
aunt Pullet should relax a little in her anxiety for them, and recur
to the annoyance she had suffered yesterday from the offspring of that
apparently ill-fated house. Mrs. Glegg heard a circumstantial
narrative, to which Mr. Pullet's remarkable memory furnished some
items; and while aunt Pullet pitied poor Bessy's bad luck with her
children, and expressed a half-formed project of paying for Maggie's
being sent to a distant boarding-school, which would not prevent her
being so brown, but might tend to subdue some other vices in her, aunt
Glegg blamed Bessy for her weakness, and appealed to all witnesses who
should be living when the Tulliver children had turned out ill, that
she, Mrs. Glegg, had always said how it would be from the very first,
observing that it was wonderful to herself how all her words came
true.&quot;Then I may call and tell Bessy you'll bear no malice, and everything
be as it was before?&quot; Mrs. Pullet said, just before parting.&quot;Yes, you may, Sophy,&quot; said Mrs. Glegg; &quot;you may tell Mr. Tulliver,
and Bessy too, as I'm not going to behave ill because folks behave ill
to me; I know it's my place, as the eldest, to set an example in every
respect, and I do it. Nobody can say different of me, if they'll keep
to the truth.&quot;Mrs. Glegg being in this state of satisfaction in her own lofty
magnanimity, I leave you to judge what effect was produced on her by
the reception of a short letter from Mr. Tulliver that very evening,
after Mrs. Pullet's departure, informing her that she needn't trouble
her mind about her five hundred pounds, for it should be paid back to
her in the course of the next month at farthest, together with the
interest due thereon until the time of payment. And furthermore, that
Mr. Tulliver had no wish to behave uncivilly to Mrs. Glegg, and she
was welcome to his house whenever she liked to come, but he desired no
favors from her, either for himself or his children.It was poor Mrs. Tulliver who had hastened this catastrophe, entirely
through that irrepressible hopefulness of hers which led her to expect
that similar causes may at any time produce different results. It had
very often occurred in her experience that Mr. Tulliver had done
something because other people had said he was not able to do it, or
had pitied him for his supposed inability, or in any other way piqued
his pride; still, she thought to-day, if she told him when he came in
to tea that sister Pullet was gone to try and make everything up with
sister Glegg, so that he needn't think about paying in the money, it
would give a cheerful effect to the meal. Mr. Tulliver had never
slackened in his resolve to raise the money, but now he at once
determined to write a letter to Mrs. Glegg, which should cut off all
possibility of mistake. Mrs. Pullet gone to beg and pray forhimindeed! Mr. Tulliver did not willingly write a letter, and found the
relation between spoken and written language, briefly known as
spelling, one of the most puzzling things in this puzzling world.
Nevertheless, like all fervid writing, the task was done in less time
than usual, and if the spelling differed from Mrs. Glegg's, - why, she
belonged, like himself, to a generation with whom spelling was a
matter of private judgment.Mrs. Glegg did not alter her will in consequence of this letter, and
cut off the Tulliver children from their sixth and seventh share in
her thousand pounds; for she had her principles. No one must be able
to say of her when she was dead that she had not divided her money
with perfect fairness among her own kin. In the matter of wills,
personal qualities were subordinate to the great fundamental fact of
blood; and to be determined in the distribution of your property by
caprice, and not make your legacies bear a direct ratio to degrees of
kinship, was a prospective disgrace that would have embittered her
life. This had always been a principle in the Dodson family; it was
one form if that sense of honor and rectitude which was a proud
tradition in such families, - a tradition which has been the salt of
our provincial society.But though the letter could not shake Mrs. Glegg's principles, it made
the family breach much more difficult to mend; and as to the effect it
produced on Mrs. Glegg's opinion of Mr. Tulliver, she begged to be
understood from that time forth that she had nothing whatever to say
about him; his state of mind, apparently, was too corrupt for her to
contemplate it for a moment. It was not until the evening before Tom
went to school, at the beginning of August, that Mrs. Glegg paid a
visit to her sister Tulliver, sitting in her gig all the while, and
showing her displeasure by markedly abstaining from all advice and
criticism; for, as she observed to her sister Deane, &quot;Bessy must bear
the consequence o' having such a husband, though I'm sorry for her,&quot;
and Mrs. Deane agreed that Bessy was pitiable.That evening Tom observed to Maggie: &quot;Oh my! Maggie, aunt Glegg's
beginning to come again; I'm glad I'm going to school.You'llcatch
it all now!&quot;Maggie was already so full of sorrow at the thought of Tom's going
away from her, that this playful exultation of his seemed very unkind,
and she cried herself to sleep that night.Mr. Tulliver's prompt procedure entailed on him further promptitude in
finding the convenient person who was desirous of lending five hundred
pounds on bond. &quot;It must be no client of Wakem's,&quot; he said to himself;
and yet at the end of a fortnight it turned out to the contrary; not
because Mr. Tulliver's will was feeble, but because external fact was
stronger. Wakem's client was the only convenient person to be found.
Mr. Tulliver had a destiny as well as &Aring;&#146;dipus, and in this case
he might plead, like &Aring;&#146;dipus, that his deed was inflicted on him
rather than committed by him.>


The gentleman in the ample white cravat and shirt-frill, taking his
brandy-and-water so pleasantly with his good friend Tulliver, is Mr.
Riley, a gentleman with a waxen complexion and fat hands, rather
highly educated for an auctioneer and appraiser, but large-hearted
enough to show a great deal ofbonhomietoward simple country
acquaintances of hospitable habits. Mr. Riley spoke of such
acquaintances kindly as &quot;people of the old school.&quot;The conversation had come to a pause. Mr. Tulliver, not without a
particular reason, had abstained from a seventh recital of the cool
retort by which Riley had shown himself too many for Dix, and how
Wakem had had his comb cut for once in his life, now the business of
the dam had been settled by arbitration, and how there never would
have been any dispute at all about the height of water if everybody
was what they should be, and Old Harry hadn't made the lawyers.Mr. Tulliver was, on the whole, a man of safe traditional opinions;
but on one or two points he had trusted to his unassisted intellect,
and had arrived at several questionable conclusions; amongst the rest,
that rats, weevils, and lawyers were created by Old Harry. Unhappily
he had no one to tell him that this was rampant Manich&Atilde;&brvbar;ism, else he
might have seen his error. But to-day it was clear that the good
principle was triumphant: this affair of the water-power had been a
tangled business somehow, for all it seemed - look at it one way - as
plain as water's water; but, big a puzzle as it was, it hadn't got the
better of Riley. Mr. Tulliver took his brandy-and-water a little
stronger than usual, and, for a man who might be supposed to have a
few hundreds lying idle at his banker's, was rather incautiously open
in expressing his high estimate of his friend's business talents.But the dam was a subject of conversation that would keep; it could
always be taken up again at the same point, and exactly in the same
condition; and there was another subject, as you know, on which Mr.
Tulliver was in pressing want of Mr. Riley's advice. This was his
particular reason for remaining silent for a short space after his
last draught, and rubbing his knees in a meditative manner. He was not
a man to make an abrupt transition. This was a puzzling world, as he
often said, and if you drive your wagon in a hurry, you may light on
an awkward corner. Mr. Riley, meanwhile, was not impatient. Why should
he be? Even Hotspur, one would think, must have been patient in his
slippers on a warm hearth, taking copious snuff, and sipping
gratuitous brandy-and-water.&quot;There's a thing I've got i' my head,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver at last, in
rather a lower tone than usual, as he turned his head and looked
steadfastly at his companion.&quot;Ah!&quot; said Mr. Riley, in a tone of mild interest. He was a man with
heavy waxen eyelids and high-arched eyebrows, looking exactly the same
under all circumstances. This immovability of face, and the habit of
taking a pinch of snuff before he gave an answer, made him trebly
oracular to Mr. Tulliver.&quot;It's a very particular thing,&quot; he went on; &quot;it's about my boy Tom.&quot;At the sound of this name, Maggie, who was seated on a low stool close
by the fire, with a large book open on her lap, shook her heavy hair
back and looked up eagerly. There were few sounds that roused Maggie
when she was dreaming over her book, but Tom's name served as well as
the shrillest whistle; in an instant she was on the watch, with
gleaming eyes, like a Skye terrier suspecting mischief, or at all
events determined to fly at any one who threatened it toward Tom.&quot;You see, I want to put him to a new school at Midsummer,&quot; said Mr.
Tulliver; &quot;he's comin' away from the 'cademy at Lady-day, an' I shall
let him run loose for a quarter; but after that I want to send him to
a downright good school, where they'll make a scholard of him.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Mr. Riley, &quot;there's no greater advantage you can give him
than a good education. Not,&quot; he added, with polite significance, - &quot;not
that a man can't be an excellent miller and farmer, and a shrewd,
sensible fellow into the bargain, without much help from the
schoolmaster.&quot;&quot;I believe you,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, winking, and turning his head on
one side; &quot;but that's where it is. I don'tmeanTom to be a miller
and farmer. I see no fun i' that. Why, if I made him a miller an'
farmer, he'd be expectin' to take to the mill an' the land, an'
a-hinting at me as it was time for me to lay by an' think o' my latter
end. Nay, nay, I've seen enough o' that wi' sons. I'll never pull my
coat off before I go to bed. I shall give Tom an eddication an' put
him to a business, as he may make a nest for himself, an' not want to
push me out o' mine. Pretty well if he gets it when I'm dead an' gone.
I sha'n't be put off wi' spoon-meat afore I've lost my teeth.&quot;This was evidently a point on which Mr. Tulliver felt strongly; and
the impetus which had given unusual rapidity and emphasis to his
speech showed itself still unexhausted for some minutes afterward in a
defiant motion of the head from side to side, and an occasional &quot;Nay,
nay,&quot; like a subsiding growl.These angry symptoms were keenly observed by Maggie, and cut her to
the quick. Tom, it appeared, was supposed capable of turning his
father out of doors, and of making the future in some way tragic by
his wickedness. This was not to be borne; and Maggie jumped up from
her stool, forgetting all about her heavy book, which fell with a bang
within the fender, and going up between her father's knees, said, in a
half-crying, half-indignant voice, -&quot;Father, Tom wouldn't be naughty to you ever; I know he wouldn't.&quot;Mrs. Tulliver was out of the room superintending a choice supper-dish,
and Mr. Tulliver's heart was touched; so Maggie was not scolded about
the book. Mr. Riley quietly picked it up and looked at it, while the
father laughed, with a certain tenderness in his hard-lined face, and
patted his little girl on the back, and then held her hands and kept
her between his knees.&quot;What! they mustn't say any harm o' Tom, eh?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver,
looking at Maggie with a twinkling eye. Then, in a lower voice,
turning to Mr. Riley, as though Maggie couldn't hear, &quot;She understands
what one's talking about so as never was. And you should hear her
read, - straight off, as if she knowed it all beforehand. And allays at
her book! But it's bad - it's bad,&quot; Mr. Tulliver added sadly, checking
this blamable exultation. &quot;A woman's no business wi' being so clever;
it'll turn to trouble, I doubt. But bless you!&quot; - here the exultation
was clearly recovering the mastery, - &quot;she'll read the books and
understand 'em better nor half the folks as are growed up.&quot;Maggie's cheeks began to flush with triumphant excitement. She thought
Mr. Riley would have a respect for her now; it had been evident that
he thought nothing of her before.Mr. Riley was turning over the leaves of the book, and she could make
nothing of his face, with its high-arched eyebrows; but he presently
looked at her, and said, -&quot;Come, come and tell me something about this book; here are some
pictures, - I want to know what they mean.&quot;Maggie, with deepening color, went without hesitation to Mr. Riley's
elbow and looked over the book, eagerly seizing one corner, and
tossing back her mane, while she said, -&quot;Oh, I'll tell you what that means. It's a dreadful picture, isn't it?
But I can't help looking at it. That old woman in the water's a
witch, - they've put her in to find out whether she's a witch or no;
and if she swims she's a witch, and if she's drowned - and killed, you
know - she's innocent, and not a witch, but only a poor silly old
woman. But what good would it do her then, you know, when she was
drowned? Only, I suppose, she'd go to heaven, and God would make it up
to her. And this dreadful blacksmith with his arms akimbo,
laughing, - oh, isn't he ugly? - I'll tell you what he is. He's the
Devilreally&quot; (here Maggie's voice became louder and more emphatic),
&quot;and not a right blacksmith; for the Devil takes the shape of wicked
men, and walks about and sets people doing wicked things, and he's
oftener in the shape of a bad man than any other, because, you know,
if people saw he was the Devil, and he roared at 'em, they'd run away,
and he couldn't make 'em do what he pleased.&quot;Mr. Tulliver had listened to this exposition of Maggie's with
petrifying wonder.&quot;Why, what book is it the wench has got hold on?&quot; he burst out at
last.&quot;The 'History of the Devil,' by Daniel Defoe, - not quite the right
book for a little girl,&quot; said Mr. Riley. &quot;How came it among your
books, Mr. Tulliver?&quot;Maggie looked hurt and discouraged, while her father said, -&quot;Why, it's one o' the books I bought at Partridge's sale. They was all
bound alike, - it's a good binding, you see, - and I thought they'd be
all good books. There's Jeremy Taylor's 'Holy Living and Dying' among
'em. I read in it often of a Sunday&quot; (Mr. Tulliver felt somehow a
familiarity with that great writer, because his name was Jeremy); &quot;and
there's a lot more of 'em, - sermons mostly, I think, - but they've all
got the same covers, and I thought they were all o' one sample, as you
may say. But it seems one mustn't judge by th' outside. This is a
puzzlin' world.&quot;&quot;Well,&quot; said Mr. Riley, in an admonitory, patronizing tone as he
patted Maggie on the head, &quot;I advise you to put by the 'History of the
Devil,' and read some prettier book. Have you no prettier books?&quot;&quot;Oh, yes,&quot; said Maggie, reviving a little in the desire to vindicate
the variety of her reading. &quot;I know the reading in this book isn't
pretty; but I like the pictures, and I make stories to the pictures
out of my own head, you know. But I've got '&Atilde;&#134;sop's Fables,' and a book
about Kangaroos and things, and the 'Pilgrim's Progress.'&quot;&quot;Ah, a beautiful book,&quot; said Mr. Riley; &quot;you can't read a better.&quot;&quot;Well, but there's a great deal about the Devil in that,&quot; said Maggie,
triumphantly, &quot;and I'll show you the picture of him in his true shape,
as he fought with Christian.&quot;Maggie ran in an instant to the corner of the room, jumped on a chair,
and reached down from the small bookcase a shabby old copy of Bunyan,
which opened at once, without the least trouble of search, at the
picture she wanted.&quot;Here he is,&quot; she said, running back to Mr. Riley, &quot;and Tom colored
him for me with his paints when he was at home last holidays, - the
body all black, you know, and the eyes red, like fire, because he's
all fire inside, and it shines out at his eyes.&quot;&quot;Go, go!&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, peremptorily, beginning to feel rather
uncomfortable at these free remarks on the personal appearance of a
being powerful enough to create lawyers; &quot;shut up the book, and let's
hear no more o' such talk. It is as I thought - the child 'ull learn
more mischief nor good wi' the books. Go, go and see after your
mother.&quot;Maggie shut up the book at once, with a sense of disgrace, but not
being inclined to see after her mother, she compromised the matter by
going into a dark corner behind her father's chair, and nursing her
doll, toward which she had an occasional fit of fondness in Tom's
absence, neglecting its toilet, but lavishing so many warm kisses on
it that the waxen cheeks had a wasted, unhealthy appearance.&quot;Did you ever hear the like on't?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, as Maggie
retired. &quot;It's a pity but what she'd been the lad, - she'd ha' been a
match for the lawyers,shewould. It's the wonderful'st thing&quot; - here
he lowered his voice - &quot;as I picked the mother because she wasn't o'er
'cute - bein' a good-looking woman too, an' come of a rare family for
managing; but I picked her from her sisters o' purpose, 'cause she was
a bit weak like; for I wasn't agoin' to be told the rights o' things
by my own fireside. But you see when a man's got brains himself,
there's no knowing where they'll run to; an' a pleasant sort o' soft
woman may go on breeding you stupid lads and 'cute wenches, till it's
like as if the world was turned topsy-turvy. It's an uncommon puzzlin'
thing.&quot;Mr. Riley's gravity gave way, and he shook a little under the
application of his pinch of snuff before he said, -&quot;But your lad's not stupid, is he? I saw him, when I was here last,
busy making fishing-tackle; he seemed quite up to it.&quot;&quot;Well, he isn't not to say stupid, - he's got a notion o' things out o'
door, an' a sort o' common sense, as he'd lay hold o' things by the
right handle. But he's slow with his tongue, you see, and he reads but
poorly, and can't abide the books, and spells all wrong, they tell me,
an' as shy as can be wi' strangers, an' you never hear him say 'cute
things like the little wench. Now, what I want is to send him to a
school where they'll make him a bit nimble with his tongue and his
pen, and make a smart chap of him. I want my son to be even wi' these
fellows as have got the start o' me with having better schooling. Not
but what, if the world had been left as God made it, I could ha' seen
my way, and held my own wi' the best of 'em; but things have got so
twisted round and wrapped up i' unreasonable words, as aren't a bit
like 'em, as I'm clean at fault, often an' often. Everything winds
about so - the more straightforrad you are, the more you're puzzled.&quot;Mr. Tulliver took a draught, swallowed it slowly, and shook his head
in a melancholy manner, conscious of exemplifying the truth that a
perfectly sane intellect is hardly at home in this insane world.&quot;You're quite in the right of it, Tulliver,&quot; observed Mr. Riley.
&quot;Better spend an extra hundred or two on your son's education, than
leave it him in your will. I know I should have tried to do so by a
son of mine, if I'd had one, though, God knows, I haven't your ready
money to play with, Tulliver; and I have a houseful of daughters into
the bargain.&quot;&quot;I dare say, now, you know of a school as 'ud be just the thing for
Tom,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, not diverted from his purpose by any sympathy
with Mr. Riley's deficiency of ready cash.Mr. Riley took a pinch of snuff, and kept Mr. Tulliver in suspense by
a silence that seemed deliberative, before he said, -&quot;I know of a very fine chance for any one that's got the necessary
money and that's what you have, Tulliver. The fact is, I wouldn't
recommend any friend of mine to send a boy to a regular school, if he
could afford to do better. But if any one wanted his boy to get
superior instruction and training, where he would be the companion of
his master, and that master a first rate fellow, I know his man. I
wouldn't mention the chance to everybody, because I don't think
everybody would succeed in getting it, if he were to try; but I
mention it to you, Tulliver, between ourselves.&quot;The fixed inquiring glance with which Mr. Tulliver had been watching
his friend's oracular face became quite eager.&quot;Ay, now, let's hear,&quot; he said, adjusting himself in his chair with
the complacency of a person who is thought worthy of important
communications.&quot;He's an Oxford man,&quot; said Mr. Riley, sententiously, shutting his
mouth close, and looking at Mr. Tulliver to observe the effect of this
stimulating information.&quot;What! a parson?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, rather doubtfully.&quot;Yes, and an M.A. The bishop, I understand, thinks very highly of him:
why, it was the bishop who got him his present curacy.&quot;&quot;Ah?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, to whom one thing was as wonderful as another
concerning these unfamiliar phenomena. &quot;But what can he want wi' Tom,
then?&quot;&quot;Why, the fact is, he's fond of teaching, and wishes to keep up his
studies, and a clergyman has but little opportunity for that in his
parochial duties. He's willing to take one or two boys as pupils to
fill up his time profitably. The boys would be quite of the
family, - the finest thing in the world for them; under Stelling's eye
continually.&quot;&quot;But do you think they'd give the poor lad twice o' pudding?&quot; said
Mrs. Tulliver, who was now in her place again. &quot;He's such a boy for
pudding as never was; an' a growing boy like that, - it's dreadful to
think o' their stintin' him.&quot;&quot;And what money 'ud he want?&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, whose instinct told
him that the services of this admirable M.A. would bear a high price.&quot;Why, I know of a clergyman who asks a hundred and fifty with his
youngest pupils, and he's not to be mentioned with Stelling, the man I
speak of. I know, on good authority, that one of the chief people at
Oxford said, Stelling might get the highest honors if he chose. But he
didn't care about university honors; he's a quiet man - not noisy.&quot;&quot;Ah, a deal better - a deal better,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver; &quot;but a hundred
and fifty's an uncommon price. I never thought o' paying so much as
that.&quot;&quot;A good education, let me tell you, Tulliver, - a good education is
cheap at the money. But Stelling is moderate in his terms; he's not a
grasping man. I've no doubt he'd take your boy at a hundred, and
that's what you wouldn't get many other clergymen to do. I'll write to
him about it, if you like.&quot;Mr. Tulliver rubbed his knees, and looked at the carpet in a
meditative manner.&quot;But belike he's a bachelor,&quot; observed Mrs. Tulliver, in the interval;
&quot;an' I've no opinion o' housekeepers. There was my brother, as is dead
an' gone, had a housekeeper once, an' she took half the feathers out
o' the best bed, an' packed 'em up an' sent 'em away. An' it's unknown
the linen she made away with - Stott her name was. It 'ud break my
heart to send Tom where there's a housekeeper, an' I hope you won't
think of it, Mr. Tulliver.&quot;&quot;You may set your mind at rest on that score, Mrs. Tulliver,&quot; said Mr.
Riley, &quot;for Stelling is married to as nice a little woman as any man
need wish for a wife. There isn't a kinder little soul in the world; I
know her family well. She has very much your complexion, - light curly
hair. She comes of a good Mudport family, and it's not every offer
that would have been acceptable in that quarter. But Stelling's not an
every-day man; rather a particular fellow as to the people he chooses
to be connected with. But Ithinkhe would have no objection to take
your son; Ithinkhe would not, on my representation.&quot;&quot;I don't know what he could haveagainstthe lad,&quot; said Mrs.
Tulliver, with a slight touch of motherly indignation; &quot;a nice
fresh-skinned lad as anybody need wish to see.&quot;&quot;But there's one thing I'm thinking on,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, turning
his head on one side and looking at Mr. Riley, after a long perusal of
the carpet. &quot;Wouldn't a parson be almost too high-learnt to bring up a
lad to be a man o' business? My notion o' the parsons was as they'd
got a sort o' learning as lay mostly out o' sight. And that isn't what
I want for Tom. I want him to know figures, and write like print, and
see into things quick, and know what folks mean, and how to wrap
things up in words as aren't actionable. It's an uncommon fine thing,
that is,&quot; concluded Mr. Tulliver, shaking his head, &quot;when you can let
a man know what you think of him without paying for it.&quot;&quot;Oh, my dear Tulliver,&quot; said Mr. Riley, &quot;you're quite under a mistake
about the clergy; all the best schoolmasters are of the clergy. The
schoolmasters who are not clergymen are a very low set of men
generally.&quot;&quot;Ay, that Jacobs is, at the 'cademy,&quot; interposed Mr. Tulliver.&quot;To be sure, - men who have failed in other trades, most likely. Now, a
clergyman is a gentleman by profession and education; and besides
that, he has the knowledge that will ground a boy, and prepare him for
entering on any career with credit. There may be some clergymen who
are mere bookmen; but you may depend upon it, Stelling is not one of
them, - a man that's wide awake, let me tell you. Drop him a hint, and
that's enough. You talk of figures, now; you have only to say to
Stelling, 'I want my son to be a thorough arithmetician,' and you may
leave the rest to him.&quot;Mr. Riley paused a moment, while Mr. Tulliver, some-what reassured as
to clerical tutorship, was inwardly rehearsing to an imaginary Mr.
Stelling the statement, &quot;I want my son to know 'rethmetic.&quot;&quot;You see, my dear Tulliver,&quot; Mr. Riley continued, &quot;when you get a
thoroughly educated man, like Stelling, he's at no loss to take up any
branch of instruction. When a workman knows the use of his tools, he
can make a door as well as a window.&quot;&quot;Ay, that's true,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, almost convinced now that the
clergy must be the best of schoolmasters.&quot;Well, I'll tell you what I'll do for you,&quot; said Mr. Riley, &quot;and I
wouldn't do it for everybody. I'll see Stelling's father-in-law, or
drop him a line when I get back to Mudport, to say that you wish to
place your boy with his son-in-law, and I dare say Stelling will write
to you, and send you his terms.&quot;&quot;But there's no hurry, is there?&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver; &quot;for I hope, Mr.
Tulliver, you won't let Tom begin at his new school before Midsummer.
He began at the 'cademy at the Lady-day quarter, and you see what
good's come of it.&quot;&quot;Ay, ay, Bessy, never brew wi' bad malt upo' Michael-masday, else
you'll have a poor tap,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver, winking and smiling at Mr.
Riley, with the natural pride of a man who has a buxom wife
conspicuously his inferior in intellect. &quot;But it's true there's no
hurry; you've hit it there, Bessy.&quot;&quot;It might be as well not to defer the arrangement too long,&quot; said Mr.
Riley, quietly, &quot;for Stelling may have propositions from other
parties, and I know he would not take more than two or three boarders,
if so many. If I were you, I think I would enter on the subject with
Stelling at once: there's no necessity for sending the boy before
Midsummer, but I would be on the safe side, and make sure that nobody
forestalls you.&quot;&quot;Ay, there's summat in that,&quot; said Mr. Tulliver.&quot;Father,&quot; broke in Maggie, who had stolen unperceived to her father's
elbow again, listening with parted lips, while she held her doll
topsy-turvy, and crushed its nose against the wood of the
chair, - &quot;father, is it a long way off where Tom is to go? Sha'n't we
ever go to see him?&quot;&quot;I don't know, my wench,&quot; said the father, tenderly. &quot;Ask Mr. Riley;
he knows.&quot;Maggie came round promptly in front of Mr. Riley, and said, &quot;How far
is it, please, sir?&quot;&quot;Oh, a long, long way off,&quot; that gentleman answered, being of opinion
that children, when they are not naughty, should always be spoken to
jocosely. &quot;You must borrow the seven-leagued boots to get to him.&quot;&quot;That's nonsense!&quot; said Maggie, tossing her head haughtily, and
turning away, with the tears springing in her eyes. She began to
dislike Mr. Riley; it was evident he thought her silly and of no
consequence.&quot;Hush, Maggie! for shame of you, asking questions and chattering,&quot;
said her mother. &quot;Come and sit down on your little stool, and hold
your tongue, do. But,&quot; added Mrs. Tulliver, who had her own alarm
awakened, &quot;is it so far off as I couldn't wash him and mend him?&quot;&quot;About fifteen miles; that's all,&quot; said Mr. Riley. &quot;You can drive
there and back in a day quite comfortably. Or - Stelling is a
hospitable, pleasant man - he'd be glad to have you stay.&quot;&quot;But it's too far off for the linen, I doubt,&quot; said Mrs. Tulliver,
sadly.The entrance of supper opportunely adjourned this difficulty, and
relieved Mr. Riley from the labor of suggesting some solution or
compromise, - a labor which he would otherwise doubtless have
undertaken; for, as you perceive, he was a man of very obliging
manners. And he had really given himself the trouble of recommending
Mr. Stelling to his friend Tulliver without any positive expectation
of a solid, definite advantage resulting to himself, notwithstanding
the subtle indications to the contrary which might have misled a
too-sagacious observer. For there is nothing more widely misleading
than sagacity if it happens to get on a wrong scent; and sagacity,
persuaded that men usually act and speak from distinct motives, with a
consciously proposed end in view, is certain to waste its energies on
imaginary game.Plotting covetousness and deliberate contrivance, in order to compass
a selfish end, are nowhere abundant but in the world of the dramatist:
they demand too intense a mental action for many of our
fellow-parishioners to be guilty of them. It is easy enough to spoil
the lives of our neighbors without taking so much trouble; we can do
it by lazy acquiescence and lazy omission, by trivial falsities for
which we hardly know a reason, by small frauds neutralized by small
extravagances, by maladroit flatteries, and clumsily improvised
insinuations. We live from hand to mouth, most of us, with a small
family of immediate desires; we do little else than snatch a morsel to
satisfy the hungry brood, rarely thinking of seed-corn or the next
year's crop.Mr. Riley was a man of business, and not cold toward his own interest,
yet even he was more under the influence of small promptings than of
far-sighted designs. He had no private understanding with the Rev.
Walter Stelling; on the contrary, he knew very little of that M.A. and
his acquirements, - not quite enough, perhaps, to warrant so strong a
recommendation of him as he had given to his friend Tulliver. But he
believed Mr. Stelling to be an excellent classic, for Gadsby had said
so, and Gadsby's first cousin was an Oxford tutor; which was better
ground for the belief even than his own immediate observation would
have been, for though Mr. Riley had received a tincture of the
classics at the great Mudport Free School, and had a sense of
understanding Latin generally, his comprehension of any particular
Latin was not ready. Doubtless there remained a subtle aroma from his
juvenile contact with the &quot;De Senectute&quot; and the fourth book of the
&quot;&Atilde;&#134;neid,&quot; but it had ceased to be distinctly recognizable as classical,
and was only perceived in the higher finish and force of his
auctioneering style. Then, Stelling was an Oxford man, and the Oxford
men were always - no, no, it was the Cambridge men who were always good
mathematicians. But a man who had had a university education could
teach anything he liked; especially a man like Stelling, who had made
a speech at a Mudport dinner on a political occasion, and had
acquitted himself so well that it was generally remarked, this
son-in-law of Timpson's was a sharp fellow. It was to be expected of a
Mudport man, from the parish of St. Ursula, that he would not omit to
do a good turn to a son-in-law of Timpson's, for Timpson was one of
the most useful and influential men in the parish, and had a good deal
of business, which he knew how to put into the right hands. Mr. Riley
liked such men, quite apart from any money which might be diverted,
through their good judgment, from less worthy pockets into his own;
and it would be a satisfaction to him to say to Timpson on his return
home, &quot;I've secured a good pupil for your son-in-law.&quot; Timpson had a
large family of daughters; Mr. Riley felt for him; besides, Louisa
Timpson's face, with its light curls, had been a familiar object to
him over the pew wainscot on a Sunday for nearly fifteen years; it was
natural her husband should be a commendable tutor. Moreover, Mr. Riley
knew of no other schoolmaster whom he had any ground for recommending
in preference; why, then, should be not recommend Stelling? His friend
Tulliver had asked him for an opinion; it is always chilling, in
friendly intercourse, to say you have no opinion to give. And if you
deliver an opinion at all, it is mere stupidity not to do it with an
air of conviction and well-founded knowledge. You make it your own in
uttering it, and naturally get fond of it. Thus Mr. Riley, knowing no
harm of Stelling to begin with, and wishing him well, so far as he had
any wishes at all concerning him, had no sooner recommended him than
he began to think with admiration of a man recommended on such high
authority, and would soon have gathered so warm an interest on the
subject, that if Mr. Tulliver had in the end declined to send Tom to
Stelling, Mr. Riley would have thought his &quot;friend of the old school&quot;
a thoroughly pig-headed fellow.If you blame Mr. Riley very severely for giving a recommendation on
such slight grounds, I must say you are rather hard upon him. Why
should an auctioneer and appraiser thirty years ago, who had as good
as forgotten his free-school Latin, be expected to manifest a delicate
scrupulosity which is not always exhibited by gentlemen of the learned
professions, even in our present advanced stage of morality?Besides, a man with the milk of human kindness in him can scarcely
abstain from doing a good-natured action, and one cannot be
good-natured all round. Nature herself occasionally quarters an
inconvenient parasite on an animal toward whom she has otherwise no
ill will. What then? We admire her care for the parasite. If Mr. Riley
had shrunk from giving a recommendation that was not based on valid
evidence, he would not have helped Mr. Stelling to a paying pupil, and
that would not have been so well for the reverend gentleman. Consider,
too, that all the pleasant little dim ideas and complacencies - of
standing well with Timpson, of dispensing advice when he was asked for
it, of impressing his friend Tulliver with additional respect, of
saying something, and saying it emphatically, with other inappreciably
minute ingredients that went along with the warm hearth and the
brandy-and-water to make up Mr. Riley's consciousness on this
occasion - would have been a mere blank.
